The Justice Department filed a lawsuit alleging that Microsoft was violating section 2 of the Sherman Antitrust act by attempting to unlawfully maintain it's monopoly over personal computer operating systems. Specially the government alleged that Microsoft was engaging in anti-competitive agreements and marking practices with Original Equipment Manufacturers (OEM's). The suit alleged that Microsoft was conditioning the licensing of it's operating system on OEMs agreeing to limit the installation of competing operating systems (like OS/2) on their products. The case was resolved on August 21, 1995. Microsoft agreed to final judgment. This judgment is usually referred to in the press as the 1995 Consent Decree. The consent decree prevented Microsoft form entering into anti-competitive agreements with OEM in an attempt to condition or protect access to it's operating system.

The petition alleged that Microsoft had violated the terms of that agreement by requiring OEMs to include Microsoft's Internet Explorer as a condition for licensing the Windows 95 operating system. On December 11th the Court issued a preliminary injunction against Microsoft. This injunction prohibited Microsoft from licensing Windows 95 (or any successor versions) on the condition that the licensee also license or include Microsoft Internet Explorer in their products. On December 15th, Microsoft announced in order to comply with the Court's order that it would make available to OEM's who did not want to also license Internet Explorer two choices, either a current version of Windows 95 in which any files containing Internet Explorer functionality had been wholly removed from the operating system or a two year old version of Windows 95. The problem with this was that neither option was commercially viable to OEMs. Microsoft had strictly construed the court's order and completely removed any files containing Internet Explorer functionally from Windows 95, regardless of whether those files contained other instructions necessary for the functioning of the operating system. Thus the removal of these files severely compromised the functioning of the operating system. Additionally the older version of Windows 95 was of no use to the OEMs because it contained none of the bug fixes or software improvement added over the last two years to handle new hardware.

The Justice Department enters into a detailed proof that Microsoft has a monopoly in operating systems. This includes a discussion of the market share held by Microsoft and comments by OEM executives that they have no commercial alternative to Windows to install on their computers. Also discussed it the so called "network effect" of the operating system market. This is the snowballing effect that aids Microsoft's monopoly and makes entry in the operating system market very difficult. The more machines that have Windows installed encourages more software developers to write applications for that operating system which in turn stimulates the purchase an installation of Windows. There is also a fascinating discussion regarding Microsoft's recognition of the threat which Internet browsers generally and Netscape Navigator and Sun's JAVA programming language in particular pose to Microsoft's domination of the operating system market. There are several quotations from Microsoft internal communications that are especially interesting, especially so to the rabid anti-microsoftite. These quotations begin on page 21 of the memorandum. There would seem to be little doubt that the government will prevail on it's contention that Microsoft has a monopoly on operating systems and that it views Netscape and JAVA as a threat to that position.

"Most of IEUs [focus group] were Navigator users. They said they would not switch, would not want to download IE4 to replace their Navigator browser. However, once everything is in the OS and right there, integrated into the OS, in their face so to speak, then they said they would use it because there would be no more need to use something "separate."

Microsoft's anticompetitive conduct. Microsoft has refused to let OEMs alter Windows "boot up" screens and the default Windows desktop. These agreement prevent OEMs from altering what a new user sees the first time he or she boots up Windows. Thus, only Microsoft's Internet Connection Wizard will be prominently displayed. Microsoft has further entered into exclusionary agreements with ISP's and Online Service Providers (collectively referred to as Internet Access Providers (IAP's), and Internet Content Providers (ICP's). In these agreements Microsoft refuses to list an IAP it's Internet Connection Wizard (the Windows applet to assist in creating an internet account and connection), unless these companies agree to provide Internet Explorer as their primary browser. These IAP's are prohibited from providing their customers with more than a fixed percentage of alternate browsers, even if the customer requests another browser. Rather than risk deletion from the Internet Connection Wizard and the resultant loss of new customers, most IAP's have consented to these agreements.

It utilizes "Push" technology, i.e. anytime your modem is inactive it downloads information from these "channels" enabling the user to get information from these sites in seemingly much fast rate than a straight download.

Cir. 1978). Much of the arguments cited to sustain this charge are the same or similar to those cited in support of the first charge. First it must be proved that Windows 98 and Internet Explorer are separate and distinguishable products. Microsoft contends that they are single "integrated" product but the memorandum provides several examples of why this is not the case.

Consent Decree. Furthermore Microsoft continues to market Internet Explorer separately and in conjunction with products other than Windows. The final evidence cited to support this contention is that Microsoft does intends to continue offering Internet Explorer for use with other operating systems such as Apple Macintosh, Sun's Solaris, Windows 3.1, and various versions of UNIX.

It is clear from the earlier cited examples of exclusionary agreements between Microsoft and OEM's, IAP's, and ICP's that Microsoft possesses sufficient market power to compel acceptance of the tied products of Windows 98 and Internet Explorer. Fourth and last, to prove per se illegality, the Justice Department must show the foreclosure of a not insubstantial amount of commerce in the tied product market. Since the tying of Windows 98 and Internet Explorer will effect the future of entire computer industry it is clear that the tying will foreclose a not insubstantial amount of commerce.

The first condition has been met from material already sited above. The second condition is proved with statements from competitors and Microsoft personnel. From the deposition of Netscape Vice-president Marc Andreessen, in July 1995 Microsoft executives met with Netscape and proposed that Microsoft and Netscape not compete. Microsoft proposed that if Netscape would agree to get out of the Windows browser market that Microsoft would agree not to compete with Netscape to provide browsers to non-Windows operating systems.

The Justice Department contends that this was a blatantly illegal proposal to form a cartel in restraint of trade. But more importantly it demonstrates Microsoft's intent to monopolize the Windows browser market.

Department's complaint. They have however been engaging in a long running public relations campaign against the government's action. Microsoft first claimed that the computer industry is so competitive and fast changing that the allegations of the Justice Department were completely unfounded. they essential were claiming that they were only just holding their own in the computer industry and could be decimated in short order by an new development. This strategy did not seem to resonate, possibly because Microsoft's incredible ubiquity in computing seemed to belie such a claim. Microsoft then changed tactics and claimed that any delay or interference in it's release of Windows 98 would have a drastic domino effect throughout the computer industry. This strategy was couple with a flag waving campaign that the government was threatening America's worldwide dominance of the software industry by interfering with Microsoft. This sounded oddly similar to the 1960's refrain that what was good for General Motors was good for America, with the implication that what was bad for GM was bad for America.

Microsoft also appealed to anti-regulatory forces that believe that virtually any regulation of business by government is not in the "interest" of the American people, or alternately that it socialist or possibly morally reprehensible.

It appears that the Justice Department has outlined a very strong case. Doubtlessly Microsoft will offer an different interpretation in it's answer to the complaint. The public relations campaign of Microsoft has been adroitly avoiding the legal aspects of the case, preferring allegorical comparisons and emotional appeals to patriotism and the pocket book. Which side will prevail? I believe that the Justice Department will be successful in obtaining preliminary relief. As the Justice Department stated in it's memorandum the success of this action will largely turn on the question of the preliminary injunction. Without it, Microsoft would have months to consolidate it's position in the market, making many available remedies unworkable. Judge Thomas Jackson has already ruled against Microsoft several times and has threatened them with contempt. Judge Jackson called for a hearing Friday to review a timetable to consider the request for preliminary relief. Only time will tell.

The assignment and use of Internet domain names has occasioned great concern recently, partly due to the phenomenal growth of the Internet and the transition of the Internet to a commercially-used medium of communication.

This paper is going to give an overview of the international organizations that are dedicated to the protection of intellectual property and their documents in which they try to find the solutions to problems connected with trademarks and domain names in Internet.

Internet community, working to satisfy the requirement for enhancements to the Internet's global Domain Name System (DNS). Membership in the IAHC comprises a broad range of legal, administrative, operations and technical constituencies. Representatives come from organizations that sponsor TLD (Top Level Domain) administration, sponsor similar international activities, review and define relevant international legal matters, provide Internet service, and develop Internet technologies and products.

"design team", formulating criteria and procedures but seeking review, modification and consensus from the rest of the Internet community. Internet standards are developed according to the principal of "rough consensus" which means a strongly dominant sense of preference within the community that is seeking to achieve forward progress, in spite of differing opinions.

Trademarks on the Internet in what they said that the best approach to creating a comprehensive domain name dispute policy was not to create one at all, but instead to propose a sui generis approach which would permit a workable procedural, rather than substantive, system for domain name registration and dispute resolution. Substantive issues, such as whether a domain name is used "in commerce", whether an extortion had occurred, and whether one party is entitled to domain name registration while another is not, should be left to the courts and trademark tribunals as they deem fit. There already is a growing body of domain name dispute jurisprudence which suggests that these substantive trademark law-related issues can be and are best resolved by these tribunals.

The involvement of WIPO in the discussions concerning trademarks and Internet domain names came from the conviction, held within the International Bureau of WIPO, that the Internet itself as a means of global commerce, and domain name difficulties in particular, would drive forward the need for a rethinking of the international trademark legal system, to make that system more compatible with commercial needs on the Internet. As the international organization responsible for the promotion of intellectual property throughout the world, WIPO thought it prudent to educate itself with respect to present trademark difficulties in the area of Internet domain names. In the process of that self-education, the WIPO International Bureau found itself providing information and insight to the Internet community on ways in which the existing trademark system could interface with the globalization of commerce on the Internet.

WIPO has undertaken discussions with its Member States concerning the dispute resolution procedures with respect to Internet domain names. In particular, one week after the release of the IAHC Final Report (which included the first public mention of the dispute resolution procedures), a WIPO Meeting of Consultants on Trademarks and Internet Domain Names was held from February 12 to 14, 1997, at WIPO Headquarters in Geneva to discuss issues relating to trademarks and Internet domain names.[6] Sixteen consultants participated in the meeting, including individuals from national trademark offices and members of the International Ad Hoc Committee (IAHC), along with WIPO officials. A full range of issues dealing with trademarks and Internet domain names were discussed by the Consultants over the three days. There was no report of the meeting. The discussions of the Consultants highlighted that there were many important and pressing issues relating to trademarks and Internet domain names which needed to be addressed immediately in the international context, and that WIPO was an appropriate forum to carry on such discussions. Based on the discussions of the consultants, the International Bureau determined that it would be appropriate to convene the present Consultative Meeting, to which all WIPO Member States and interested intergovernmental organizations and non-governmental organizations have been invited, to further discuss issues of trademarks and Internet domain names.

The WIPO Center does not administer procedures for resolution of disputes among States. Rather, it performs private sector services, providing procedures for settling commercial disputes among private parties.

Importantly, the WIPO Center administers procedures only. It does not set law, nor does it create substantive rules. The relevant law to be applied in the context of ADR comes from other sources, such as the relevant national or regional law. The WIPO Center itself does not have jurisdiction to settle disputes, but rather to administer procedures which facilitate the settling of disputes.

ACPs. These procedures were established under the gTLD-MoU, to implement a policy, stated in the MoU, that domain names should not infringe certain demonstrable intellectual property rights. The WIPO Center will provide the procedures for the creation of the panels themselves, and the on-line services to facilitate the proceedings. The WIPO Center will not participate in the decision-making process. In fact, a clause of the MoU itself prohibits any WIPO staff member from being a member of an ACP. ACP procedures may be initiated by any third party, and will be conducted on-line. Extensive due process safeguards will be put into place, including the right to be heard, the right to appeal, etc. Significantly, because the ACP process is an administrative procedure, it will not preclude recourse by any of the participants to the relevant national or regional court which would otherwise have jurisdiction in the case. However, because the procedures will be faster, cheaper and more convenient that court action, it is expected that in many cases these procedures will be chosen over court actions.

The ACP procedures deal with many existing domain name conflict issues. For example, the case of so-called "reverse hijacking" has been much discussed, in which a domain name holder who has been using the domain name legitimately for a long time is challenged by a trademark holder who wants to take the domain name away. Under the proposed ACP procedures and procedural guidelines, the domain name holder is protected in two ways.

First, the domain name cannot be suspended prior to the conclusion of the challenge proceedings, unless the challenge is filed within 30 days of the date of registration of the domain name (a situation very different from the "reverse hijacking" situation). Second, the gTLD-MoU policy recognizes that a domain name holder may have sufficient rights to withstand a challenge by a trademark holder.

A New York Trial Court held Prodigy could be held liable for a unanimous posting to one of its bulletin boards. The issue was whether Prodigy would be considered a publisher or distributor for the purposes of plaintiff's liable claims.

Still, while those who opt to visit online gambling sites enjoy the convenience of waging from their bedroom, serious threats of consumer fraud loom as bettors possess no means to confirm casino operators are playing fair.

Lottery site was being accessed by Missouri citizens located other than on tribal lands. The court found that the issue of the geographical scope of the tribe's lottery need not be decided because the tribe was entitled to sovereign immunity even if the State's view of the lottery's geographical scope was correct. Only Congress can limit the scope of tribal immunity and it has not done so, even with regard to extra-territorial activities.

Furthermore, with casino gambling outside its scope, the 1961 law covers a very narrow range of online wagering.64 Thus, both houses of Congress have embarked on efforts to outright prohibit Internet gambling.

The lines have been drawn and the camps divided on either side of the online gambling issue. This issue has created strange bedfellows, some historical adversaries joining forces toward the same goal, often for very different reasons.

The law on Internet gambling is far from clear, but after the Justice Department's recent change of heart, wagering online is becoming increasingly riskier. U.S. Attorney General Janet Reno has unequivocally stated, "The Internet is not an electronic sanctuary for illegal betting.113 And to Internet betting operators everywhere we have a simple message: You can't hide online and you can't hide offshore."114 With arrests and criminal charges of online betting parlors already carried out, the Feds have joined several states in the fight to outlaw betting on the Net.

Thus, with a pair of bills making their way through Congress and national exposure of the controversial issue, the state of Internet gambling is sure to change. Still, even if legislation makes the practice unlawful, serious concerns of enforcement linger. Extradition of off shore operators is unlikely, and policing bettors presents another legitimate challenge for law enforcement. Nevertheless, other considerations, such as Western Union's recent decision to discontinue money transfers to offshore bookmakers,116 could impact the new industry. With offshore casino startup and licensing costs estimated at $1.5 million,117 exactly who is it that the odds favor?

Internet payment systems. The concerns of individual consumers, corporations, and financial institutions need to addressed. Many of the modern payment systems and corresponding protocols recognize this as they promote their security and user privacy features along with the actual payment and transaction functions. Thus, today's electronic commerc programs focus on security measures such as digital signatures and encryption technology as well as liability insurance.

Hash functions are similar to encryption functions. Most operate by grabbing a block of data at a time and by repeatedly using a simple scrambling function, modify the bits. If this scrambling is done repeatedly, then there is no known practical way to predict the outcome. It is not possible for someone to modify the document in any way and ensure that the same output will emerge from the hash function.

CyberCoin. A CyberCoin user receives a secret key when she signs up. This key is known only to the user's computer and to the central computer. When a transaction is ready, a file containing the amount and the details of the transaction is put together by the user and then signed with her secret key. The central bank can check this transaction by repeating the computation because it knows the secret value as well.

While, the hash-based signature may be the least known of the signature algorithms, it is rapidly becoming popular because it is less computationally intensive than the other algorithms. Many of the microcash payment systems, like DEC's Millicent or CyberCoin utilize hash-based signatures to reduce the processing costs and make smaller transactions feasible.

This could allow the receiver to forge a signature. The other two signature algorithms, DSS and RSA do not have this limitation since they are public-key algorithms whereby two keys exist for each user. One key (the private key) creates the signature and is kept secret while the other (public) key verifies the signature.

Both hash-based and public-key algorithms can be adjusted to increase security by ensuring that the keys use a sufficient number of bits to resist all known attacks. Hash-based signatures are inherently easier to attack because the secret used to create the signature is known to both sides.

One of the earliest security protocols for Internet transactions is the Secure Socket Layer Protocol (SSL), a protocol-independent encryption scheme developed by Netscape. SSL is not a payment system, rather it is a secure transmission protocol which can be used to provide security for not only payments over the Internet, but also many other types of communications.

It provides channel security between the application layer and the transport layer of the network by allowing encrypted transactions which are transparent to HTML or CGI to travel by the server "behind the scenes". SSL supports but does not mandate the use of public-key encryption or certification techniques.

The Secure Electronic Transactions (SET) protocol is a collection of encryption and security specifications. It is used as an industry-wide open standard for ensuring secure payment transactions over the Internet.

Developed by MasterCard International and Visa International, the primary goal of SET is to protect the credit card system, establish consumer confidence in the Internet as a marketplace, and build commercial transaction volume over the Internet. SET establishes a method for interoperabillity of secure transaction software over multiple popular hardware platforms and operating systems.

The SET Consumer Wallet enables consumers to shop safely on the Internet through such features as one-time entry of account information, multiple payment options, transaction receipt log, and Web-based customer service.

The SET Merchant Cash Register enables payment card services for secure sales of goods and services over the Internet. SET Payment Gateway Service enables banks and processors to process Internet payments.

SET is designed to protect the confidentiality of personal and financial information. It uses digital certificates to authenticate the parties in a payment card transaction. The SET standard for security procedures and technology ensures consistent implementation among vendors, credit card companies, and financial institutions. The SET protocol authenticates cardholders, merchants, and banks; assures confidentiality of payment information; ensures that messages have not been corrupted during transit; and provides for interoperability among different software and hardware platforms. Consumers are protected from merchant imposters and theft of credit card numbers.

A stored-value card (SVC) and a smart card may operate much the same with respect to the loading and disbursement of value. Typically, an SVC holds value that is encoded on the magnetic strip on the back of the card.

Generally, it is used only in a closed system and, very often, the card is not reusable or reloadable. A smart card, on the other hand, performs the same functions but uses a microprocessor chip in the card. The chip adds an interactive memory feature to smart card capabilities that is not present in magnetic strip SVCs. Usually, a smart card is reloadable with respect to the value and information that it carries and communicates.

The Open Buying on the Internet (OBI) standard is an open, flexible protocol for business-to-business Internet commerce. It is intended for the high-volume, low-dollar transactions that account for 80% of most organizations' purchasing activities. OBI is not a product or a service; it is a freely available standard which any organization or individual can obtain and use to build a product, service or solution.

The Roundtable was composed of a number of Fortune 500 organizations and their primary suppliers of office supplies, laboratory supplies, and temporary help. The goal of the Roundtable was to provide access to easy to use, open, standards-based Internet purchasing solutions in 1997. Through a consensus-based process, that included close consultation with technology providers and financial institutions, the Roundtable participants developed a generic set of requirements, an architecture, and detailed technical specifications and guidelines and compliance and implementation information.

When deciding matters of security, the Roundtable participants sought a design which reflected the degree of risks typically associated with business purchases. The OBI standard uses Secure Sockets Layer (SSL) protocol to secure communications on the Internet. OBI requires Digital certificates to be used for authentication of purchasers as well as servers. Digital Signatures can be applied to OBI Order Requests in order to provide high levels of assurance as to the identity of the originator of an order as well as the integrity of the order.

Open Trading Protocol (OTP) is an international standard for retail trade on the Internet. The OTP standard enables a consistent framework for multiple forms of electronic commerce, ensuring a consistent, easy to use consumer purchasing experience regardless of the payment instrument or software and hardware product used. The protocol is freely available to developers and users. OTP is not owned by any one company and is managed by an independent organization.

The OTP standard was designed to support and complement other specifications like SET (Secure Electronic Transactions) and the EMV (Europay, MasterCard and Visa) chip card specification to offer a consistent online interaction for consumers, merchants, and banks using any number of payment options.

The OTP standard specifies how Internet trading transactions can occur easily, safely, and efficiently for all parties, regardless of the method of payment, thereby making it very similar to the trading environment in the physical world.

The OTP standard compliments but does not replace these protocols. OTP provides a clearly understood set of rules that covers the following: offers for sale; agreements to purchase; payment by using existing payment protocols such as SET, Mondex, CyberCash, GeldKarte, etc.; the transfer of goods and services; delivery; receipts for purchases; multiple methods of payment; support for problem resolution and; payment brand and protocol selection.

In addition to providing consumers with a consistent approach to trading on the Internet, consumers will also have records of purchases which could be used for tax purposes, making expense claims, feeding into financial management software, or sending a claim back to a merchant to solve a problem.

The OTP website gives access to the OTP specification, information material, as well as an e-mail forum to facilitate the exchange of comments and recommendations by merchants, vendors, and financial institutions. The website also provides any updates to the specification that come as a result of this exchange.

CyberCash is a leader in the development of major electronic commerce payments on the Internet. CyberCash's primary focus is on providing secure financial transactions over the Internet via multiple payment types, including credit, cash, and check. CyberCash enables merchants around the world to accept multiple forms of payment around the clock, including CyberCoin, and PayNow electronic check. Recently, CyberCash adopted the new SET protocol to provide secure, open standard-based solutions for the many merchants, banks, processors and consumers who use CyberCash's services.

The CyberCash credit card payment system consists of three parts: (1) the CyberCash Wallet which is installed from software that is distributed free to consumers; (2) The Secure Merchant Payment System (SMPS) for the seller's web server which communicates with the customer's Wallet software, and; (3) CyberCash Gateway Servers for banks which links the seller's server to existing financial networks of the bank in safe manner for the bank by acting as a firewall. CyberCash offers real-time transactions and secure credit card authentication based on digital signatures and RSA-encryption.

CyberCash's PayNow Service provides for payments to be made directly from a checking account. This service can be applied to both consumer and business purchases. It can be used for the sale of hard goods, digital goods, or even as an online way to present and pay real world bills online.

Electronic cash (also known as digital cash) is the electronic equivalent of real cash. It is implemented by using public-key cryptography, digital signatures, and blind signatures. In an electronic cash system, there is usually a bank, responsible for issuing currency, customers who have accounts at the bank and can withdraw and deposit currency, and merchants who will accept currency in exchange for goods or a service. Every customer, merchant, and bank has its own public/private key pair. The keys are used to encrypt, for security, and to digitally sign, for authentication, blocks of data that represent coins. A bank digitally signs coins using its private key.

Consumers and merchants verify the coins using the bank's widely-available public key. Customers sign bank deposits and withdrawals with their private key, then the bank uses the customers' public keys to verify the signature.

Ecash is a fully anonymous electronic cash system, using numbered bank accounts and blind signatures produced by Digicash. It is an online software program which provides fully anonymous electronic cash by using blind signature techniques.

Ecash is implemented using RSA public-key cryptography. Every user in the system has her own public/private key pair. Special client and merchant software is required to use the Ecash system. The client software is called a "cyberwallet" and is responsible for withdrawing and depositing coins from a bank, and paying or receiving coins from a merchant.

With Ecash, the user purchases digital money from an Ecash-licensed bank with which she has an existing account on the Internet. The coins are then stored on the user's hard drive. When a user makes a purchase at an Ecash-enabled site, the system software deducts the coins from her hard drive and forwards them to the vendor. The vendor then sends the coins to the user's bank for verification. The vendor then chooses whether to be issued new Ecash or to have the Ecash deposited into an Ecash account.

The strengths of Ecash are its full anonymity and security along with the fact that Ecash allows for direct person-to-person transactions. The electronic cash used is untraceable. Through the employment of security protocols such as RSA public-key cryptography, the Ecash system is safe from message tampering. Further, coins cannot be stolen while they are in transit. The main problem with Ecash, however, may be the size of the database of spent coins. The Ecash system keeps a database of every coin ever spent. If a large number of people start using the system, the database could become unmanageable. Unfortunately, the task of maintaining a database of spent coins is probably beyond the capabilities of today's state-of-the-art database systems.

NetCash uses identified electronic cash, thereby making it less anonymous than Ecash. Developed by the University of Southern California, the system is based on distributed currency servers who are insured by a central certification authority. The currency server mints coins and keeps track of th serial numbers of all unspent coins. Electronic checks can be exchanged for NetCash.

Mondex in partnership with AT&T has moved their smart card system into the realm of micropayments. User's purchase and download "coins" in bulk from their Mondex participating bank onto their smartcard. When users wish to make a purchase on the Internet from a Mondex-enabled vendor, they swipe their card though their reader (hardware purchased separately) and the coins are transferred to the vendor. The vendors settle the funds transfer with the users' bank. The advantages of Mondex are that the system permits purchases as small as three cents. Also, one card will work in both the online and offline worlds. Mondex's security relies on a digital signature which is generated by a chip on the card and which can be recognized by other genuine Mondex cards. This security process also identifies the party for which the cash is intended so that funds cannot be intercepted by a third party without detection.

These emerging forms of electronic payment systems raise several issues with regard to the interpretation and application of existing FDIC laws and regulations. Whether deposit insurance covers the new forms of electronic payment is a prominent concern for depositors and other consumers of stored-value products as well as banks, non-banks, and the entire financial system.

There are advantages and disadvantages to having FDIC deposit insurance coverage for stored-value and other Internet payment products. One advantage, for example, is the bank issuer of an insured SVC could use FDIC coverage as a marketing tool, allowing its products to be promoted as government-insured.

Customers wishing to purchase goods and services over the Internet would enter into an agreement with the Company. The Company plans to establish agency accounts at insured depository institutions. These accounts would be entitled "[CyberCash] as agent for its customers." Upon establishing a relationship with the Company, customers would transfer funds from their personal accounts o the agency account. Once a customer has established a relationship with he Company and funded their CyberCash account or "wallet", the customer may purchase an item offered for sale over the Internet by selecting the CyberCash payment option on the customer's computer screen.

"[IPP] as agent for its customers" satisfied the first condition of expressly disclosing a fiduciary relationship. The FDIC then determined that CyberCash's proposal to maintain records in the normal course of business, indicating the name, ownership capacity, and address of the customer and other parties of interest satisfied the second requirement.

Because CyberCash's creation of agency accounts to which customers transfer funds fell precisely within the deposit broker definition, the majority of the FDIC's analysis focused on the exemption and CyberCash's primary purpose for the placement of funds with an insured depository institution.

CyberCash's statement that the agency accounts would receive no interest satisfied the first criteria of no payment for fund placement. CyberCash's stated business purpose of providing an Internet payment mechanism satisfied the second criteria that the business be established for a purpose other than placing funds. Finally, the FDIC noted that CyberCash's substantial purpose was to provide an Internet payment system, not to establish agency accounts.

Since electronic authentication is a prerequisite for binding Internet transactions and payments as well as for electronic documents that will hold up in court, Digital Signature Trust Co. will operate an accessible data base for storing, retrieving, and verifying the current validity of a digital certificate. (36) It will also provide escrow services for cryptographic keys used for encryption rather than authentication.

The OCC's legal analysis declared that acting as a CA, as well as engaging in the intertwined function of key repository, is part of the business of banking regardless of whether bank-issued digital certificates are used for financial transactions. The OCC determined that CA activities are the functional equivalent of notary services long offered by banks and, consequentially, are a logical outgrowth of bank identification and verification skills.

Further, CA activities respond to bank customer needs and involve risks similar in nature to those already assumed by banks. Similarly, the key escrow service was approved on the basis of being the functional equivalent and logical extension of traditional bank safekeeping services.

Initially, Digital Signature Trust will issue only fairly high level certificates to persons who physically present themselves at a designated registration office and provide a reliable photo ID and other indicia of identity. This is in recognition of the crucial role that a CA is to play in the prevention of identity theft. While it will issue certificates to Utah residents, it will primarily interact with wholesale customers, both within and outside the state, providing certificates for use within closed systems where pre-existing contractual relationships bind the relying parties.

Utah law attempts to attract CA's by significantly insulating them from legal liability, and by shifting certain legal burdens onto the CA's subscribers in the event that a digital signature is disputed.

The current popularity of the Internet makes it a natural site for an international marketplace. Individuals will be able to purchase goods and services through the Internet with the same convenience as catalog ordering.

Corporations will be able to conduct business over the Internet. Lawyers will be able to file documents with the court and make the necessary payments at the same time. Of course, none of this will happen without the support of the public. The public needs to be assured that their transactions are safe and private. In order to succeed, consumers must be assured that their information is kept confidential between the parties tot he transaction.

Also, someone must be responsible for failures in the systems. Banks are the logical choice for insuring payment providers as well as for performing the functions of a Certificate Authority. Bank's capital strength, fiduciary tradition, and long involvement with electronic services and data base management create a natural affinity for providing these electronic services.

Further, banks are real world institutions that people trust, thereby creating the necessary link between the cyber world and the real world that will instill confidence in all users. As users become familiar with and confident in these systems, a new era of transactions will take hold, thereby creating a truly global, and perhaps, paperless marketplace.

The power to tax Online Electronic Commerce is the continuing "nexus" question as it relates to both the Due Process clause and the Commerce Clause of the United States Constitution. Under the Fifth Amendment, no person is to be deprived of life, liberty, or property without due process of law.

The Fourteenth Amendment applies this same restraint upon the states. The evolution of Supreme Court doctrine limits the authority of a State to assess or impose a duty to collect taxes arising out of the economic activity of a foreign business engaged in interstate commerce. The constitutional limitations on such authority have been derived from two sources: the Due Process Clause and the Commerce Clause.

Transaction taxes are taxes like a sales tax. These types of taxes are unmanageable to collect from the buyer of the goods. It is next to impossible for a state to seek each buyer to remit the tax owed from each sale. Rather, the in-state resident vendors collect the tax and remit the collected amount to State tax authority. Most of state vendors refuse to collect and remit taxes. This is true for mail order as well as electronic commerce. The seminal United States Supreme Court case on establishing the "minimum contacts" and "substantial nexus" as it relates to electronic commerce is Quill Corp. v. North Dakota.(9) Here, the Court defined physical presence to include such things as office, equipment, employees, independent contractors, agents or affiliates. North Dakota filed an action in state court to require petitioner Quill Corporation to collect and pay a use tax on goods purchased for use in the State. The Court found in Quill's favor finding the case indistinguishable from National Bellas Hess in holding that a similar Illinois statute violated the Fourteenth Amendment's Due Process Clause and created an unconstitutional burden on interstate commerce.(10) The Bellas Hess court concluded that a "seller whose only connection with customers in the State is by common carrier or the . . . mail" lacked the requisite minimum contacts with the State.(11) The North Dakota State Supreme Court reversed the decision of the trial court. The state supreme court applied the rationale that pursuant to Complete Auto Transit,(12) and its progeny, the Commerce Clause no longer mandated t he sort of physical presence nexus suggested in Bellas Hess. Moreover, with respect to the Due Process Clause, cases following Bellas Hess had not construed minimum contacts to require physical presence within a State as a prerequisite to the legitimate exercise o f state power. The United States Supreme Court reversed the North Dakota Supreme court and held that (a) the Due Process Clause does not bar enforcement of the State's use tax against Quill and that (b) the State's enforcement of the use tax against Quill places an unconstitutional burden on interstate commerce. The Supreme Court's due process jurisprudence has grown wherein they have abandoned formalistic tests focused on a defendant's presence within a state to a more flexible inquiry into whether a defendant's contacts made it reasonable to require it to defend the suit in that State. To the extent that this Court's decisions have indicated that the clause requires a physical presence in a State, they are overruled. In this case, Quill has purposefully directed its activities at North Dakota residents, the magnitude of those contacts are more than sufficient for due process purposes, and the tax is related to the benefits Quill receives from access to the State.(13) Moreover, the Court went on to hold that the State's enforcement of the use tax against Quill places an unconstitutional burden on interstate commerce. The Court found that the Bellas Hess holding was not rendered obsolete by the Court's subsequent decision in Complete Auto. which set forth the four part test that continues to govern the validity of state taxes under the Commerce Clause. Although Complete Auto renounced an analytical approach that looked to a statute's formal language rather than its practical effect in determining a state tax statute's validity, the Bellas Hess decision did not rely on such formalism. Nor is Bellas Hess inconsistent with Complete Auto. It concerns the first part of the Complete Auto test and stands for the proposition that a vendor whose only contacts with the taxing State are by mail or common carrier lacks the "substantial nexus" required by the Commerce Clause.(14) Contrary to the State's argument, a mail order house may have the "minimum contacts" with a taxing State as required by the Due Process Clause, and yet lack the "substantial nexus" with the State required by the Commerce Clause.

This nexus can be established when affiliated companies create presence for the vendor. Separating sales from service and support, even through separate corporate entities can be insufficient to negate the physical presence nexus. Courts look to common control for finance, policies, business practice, common corporate officers, directors, employees and common telephone numbers. While focusing on the degree of separate "public" identity in name and advertising a court will also look toward the intent when creating separate corporation (If to evade state tax).

Income Taxes have a due process analysis that is based upon similar attributes of a personal jurisdiction analysis. Obviously the state is seeking to tax income derived from sources within the state Under this analysis a physical presence is required, usually an office or property located within the state. This property can be real property or just personal property. Also required are continuous, systematic or regular contacts by employee or agent. Here the courts have extended the physical presence nexus based on an employee who had a home office. Telecommuting from home by the employee established physical presence for the business and brought the revenue from in-state sales subject to state income tax. Sales of goods and services within the state are treated slightly differently. Services like advertising, direct mail and catalogs will not normally subject a business to income taxation unless an employee visits the state. This is true for electronically performed services, which usually do not create the physical presence nexus unless an employee visits the state. With sales of tangible personal property, the state's ability to tax is narrowed by the Commerce Clause. As long as the vendor fills the orders from outside the state, a nexus cannot be established. Any physical presence or visits to the state by company representatives will make the revenue subject to state income taxation. Intangible property sales can be broadly construed where a company licenses its property (software, trademark) to another.

Electronic commerce has worldwide implications for taxation. Countries around the globe will seek to gain a share in the revenues generated. Two primary nexus are sustained to create a tax liability for a company doing business around the globe. The first nexus is source jurisdiction wherein all the revenue generated by an in-country company location is taxable by that country, regardless of the buyer's location. State and local taxation may occur on sales made within these respective jurisdictions. The second nexus is called residence jurisdiction and is applied by most countries on their citizen's income regardless of where the income was earned. Most countries have tax treaties with the United States, which eliminate double taxation by countries by giving credit for taxes paid to foreign governments.

The different types of tax that will most likely affect online commercial transactions and activities include sales and use tax, excise tax, and customs duties. Geography (where the company or business is located) and physicality (what tangible things are being sold or what services are being provided) are the basis for tax laws. In online commerce, where the normal concepts of geography and physicality are transcended, governments are having difficulty applying current tax laws to goods and services "sold" online.

Sales tax is a tax imposed by states on the sale of personal property and services and is based on the gross sales price of that property. Sales tax is imposed on intrastate transactions, where the goods and services are used in the same state as sold. The seller of the property is responsible for collecting the applicable sales tax. The consumer or purchaser of the property may be a business entity purchasing a product, which will be consumed in the process of making products or an individual buying a product at the retail level for individual use. Conversely, use tax is a tax imposed on the use or consumption of tangible personal property and services in interstate transactions. "Use Tax can be defined as a tax on the storage, use, or other consumption of tangible personal property not subject to sales tax or otherwise exempt from tax, usually because the property was purchased outside of the jurisdiction in which it will be used." Transactions are generally subject to sales or use tax and payment is generally self-imposed by the buyer or user. A state sales tax and use tax are complimentary, that is a transaction would be subject to one or the other, but not both, and both increase the final cost to the buyer.

States normally impose a sales and use tax on the sale of tangible personal property. The definition of tangible personal property is determined by the individual state. As a general rule, it is defined as any personal property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, touched, or perceived by the senses. States occasionally include non-tangible goods within their list of tangible personal property or will alternately indicate a non-tangible is taxable regardless. A common example is software products.

For those goods which can be delivered electronically online or in tangible form (as a compact disk or diskette) such as software, photographs, books, sound recordings, artwork, the method of delivery may be a factor in whether the product is taxed. Some states may impose a tax only if the product is delivered in tangible form, while other states may impose a tax on those products regardless of the method of delivery. States often apply the laws they have developed for the taxation of software products to other goods, which can be delivered in either an electronic or tangible format.

With respect to taxation of services, most states impose a sales and use tax on certain services. There is more variation between states as to what types of services are taxed than exists in taxation of tangible goods. In contrast to goods, states do not tax all services; rather they indicate which specific services are taxable. Inconsistencies arise between states because of differences in state's tax statutes, different language and terms in those statutes ("information services" versus "computer services"), and constant change in computer technology that outdates those tax statutes.

The end-user of a good or service ultimately pays the sales tax. Even though states may require the vendor who sells the goods or provides the service to actually pay the tax to the state, those vendors are generally allowed to pass the tax through to the end user. Conversely, the end-user most often does not pay a use tax. For simplicity, states most often impose the duty to pay a use tax on the out of state vendor.

Though there are several types of exemptions from sales tax, the most common exemption is the purchase of an item for resale. For instance, a retail company making an out-of-state sale is usually not liable for sales tax in the retail company's home state, and unless the retailer has nexus in that state, neither is the retailer liable for sales tax in the state where the customer is located. Therefore, it is possible for out-of-state sales to be completely free of sales tax. Focusing on one type in which the sale is often exempt from sales tax in the seller's home state, the exemption for a sale to an out-of-state buyer, lets take a look at California as an example.

State, pursuant to the contract of sale, and delivered by the retailer to such point by means of facilities operated by the retailer, delivery by the retailer to a carrier for shipment to a consignee at such a point, or delivery by the retailer to a customs broker or forwarding agent for shipment outside this State." California's rules are fairly typical of the way out-of-state sales are treated."

A problem is created when a sale is not subject to a sales tax to either the seller or purchase. The use tax is the states attempt to remedy this problem. Except for the fact that a use tax is charged to the buyer of the good by the state in which the good is used, it basically is the same as sales tax. Looking at an example may distinguish the two; for instance, a mail-order company may not be required to collect a sales tax for goods sold to a purchaser in another state. The purchaser of the good is required to figure the applicable use tax due and pay it to the state in which the good is used. Use tax is designed to collect tax on those sales, which are exempt from sales tax, and is imposed on the buyer of the goods, as opposed to the sellers. Sellers located in a different state than the ultimate user but that have nexus in a state may be required to collect the use tax, but the basic premise, that the tax is imposed on the buyer, remains unchanged.

The biggest problem with the collection of the use tax is the fact that most buyers are not aware that they should be paying a use tax, and therefore, most sales subject to use tax go unpaid. Additionally, if a seller does not collect the use tax from the buyer, the state to which the tax is due can attempt to collect it directly from the buyer. Some types of sales subject to use tax cannot go unpaid, such as large purchases like cars and boats, because they are subject to registration and use tax is collected at registration time. Even though states have attempted to enforce the payment of use tax through audits of mail order companies and the subsequent mailing of tax remittal forms to buyers of mail-order products, the majority of applicable use tax goes unremitted.

An excise tax is a tax imposed by either a state or the federal government on a specific product or transaction. For example, telecommunications services and gasoline and fuels may be subject to a percentage federal or state tax. The method of delivery of the product is not a factor in the imposition of the tax. The provider or sell of the service or product is required to collect the tax and remit it to the government, but the purchaser is required to pay the excise tax.

Customs duties are taxes imposed by the federal government on goods that are imported into the United States, and vary by commodity. Duties vary by country of origin of the product and the international treaty that governs trade with that country. The tariff is the schedule that indicates the rate or amount at which the tax is calculated.

A notable exception to customs duties is telecommunications, which are exempt from the Tariff Schedules. Thus, there is an advantage to electronic delivery over tangible good method of delivery, with respect to software for example. In contrast, original artwork, sheet music and books are duty free, regardless of the method of delivery. The importer of the goods is responsible for payment of applicable customs duties to the U.S Customs Service.

Many states attempt to tax income that non-resident companies make from sales and other sources derived within the state. The authority to impose this tax is based on whether there is a nexus between the non-resident company and the state. Nexus can be defined as a seller's minimum level of physical presence within a state that permits the taxing authority to require the seller to register, collect and remit sales/use tax and comply with the state's taxing statutes and regulations. Traditionally, nexus is created when a seller has a 'physical presence' in a location, or has an 'agent' of the company conducting business in a location. With respect to services, while almost any activity that results in a sale of services over the internet can create a nexus, services solely delivered electronically over the internet generally do not create nexus. It is important to keep in mind that this is generally speaking, and states have been able to impose income tax based on nexus where the service provided was only an electronic one. The ability of a state to impose a tax on a non-resident company for the sale of tangible goods is limited by federal law, which provides "that a state has no power to impose income tax on income derived from the interstate sale of goods if the company's only business activities in the state are soliciting (but not accepting or filling) orders in the state."

Software sales can either be considered sales of tangible or intangible property depending on its form. In its tangible property form, such as shrink-wrapped software, it is usually subject to sales and use tax, conditioned on the premise that the seller has nexus with the state. Software in its intangible property form, such as electronically downloaded software, may or may not be taxable depending on the rules of the state in which it is sold. Software delivered in a physical form may be treated differently from software delivered electronically, depending on the state in which the sale takes place.

The internet can be analogously compared to an on-line mail-order catalogue, in that it serves as a marketing and order-taking mechanism for products, which are viewed, ordered and then mailed to the purchaser. Software and information downloads are also delivered via the internet electronically.

Internet access or downloading of data or software purchased on the internet might be subject to tax under some states' utility tax laws. A utility tax is a tax on the consumption of public utilities, such as electricity, and in some states, telecommunications services are subject to a utility tax.

Often the taxability of a transaction is based on whether or not there is an exchange of tangible personal property. States differ in their specific definition of what constitutes tangible personal property and in their application of tax law. Tangible personal property can be defined as something that can be seen and/or touched. Some states consider the sale of data or software, which is downloaded over the Internet to be an exchange of tangible personal property, and therefore subject it to sales tax. The exact transaction in another state may not be considered to involve tangible personal property, and therefore not subject to sales tax.

Generally, the sale of tangible personal property is usually subject to sales and use tax. A sale of physical shrink-wrapped or canned software is usually considered a sale of tangible personal property and, therefore, almost all states impose sales and use tax these sales. In order to know whether a state subjects such a sale to sales and use tax, one would need to consult the state tax law of the state in which the sale is made. If the state does not address the issue with specific rules, a company can look to the rules defining tangible and intangible software or goods.

Examples of intangible goods include software, CDs, magazine articles, news broadcasts, stocks, airline tickets and insurance policies. These are items whose value does not rely on a physical form. Much of today's intellectual property is produced, packaged, and stored somewhere and then physically delivered to its final destination. The technology exists in some aspects or soon will exist to transfer the content of these products in digital form over the internet. Custom software is usually not considered tangible property. In most cases it is considered services. In states that subject services to sales tax, custom software may be taxable.

Shrink-wrapped or canned software delivered electronically may be considered the sale of tangible or intangible property depending on the state in which it is sold. States have different rules regarding the liability to collect sales and use tax on canned software that is transferred electronically.

Some states do not tax electronically transferred software, even though they may tax the same software sold in a box. California, Maryland, Massachusetts, Missouri, South Carolina, and Utah are all states that exempt from sales tax canned software that is transmitted electronically. California, for example, will not tax canned software if it is "transferred electronically from the seller's place of business, to or through the purchaser's computer, and the purchaser does not obtain possession of any tangible personal property, such as storage media, in the transaction."

The internet has emerged as a provider of information by consumer demand and has transformed into an effective distribution channel, similar to other more traditional forms of media, such as radio, television and print media. "News from around the world is now available on the Internet, usually free of charge. More than 2,700 newspapers have online businesses, of which over 60 percent are U.S.-based. More than 800 TV stations across the U.S. have Web sites. AudioNet calls itself the leader in Internet broadcasting, with live continuous broadcasts of over 175 radio and television stations, play-by-play of thousands of college and professional sporting events, live music, on-demand music from the CD Jukebox, live and on-demand shows and Internet-only Webcasts and live and on-demand corporate and special events."

Service Providers or ISPs, that maintain computers (servers) which are directly connected to the Internet. Their customers can access the Internet through a modem connection or direct line from their computers to the ISP server.

Most states source revenues from services in the state where the income producing activity is performed. ISP services should follow this basic model. ISPs with customers across the country may start to see states moving to source revenues in the state the customer is located in. This does not make the ISP taxable in each state in which it has customers, as the ISP still has to have nexus.

Internet companies furnishing content should be taxable as service companies though some states may provide special rules for newspapers and publications, with internet publications possibly being subject to any such rules. Companies offering business and personal services over the internet most likely will have sales based for tax purposes in the state in which the income producing activity takes place. Specific industries, such as the financial services industry, may face new rules addressing particular industries as they relate to internet services' taxation.

Service Providers (ISPs) for basic access to the Internet and/or additional services such as electronic mail. These charges are subject to sales and use tax in some states, and to telecommunications taxes in others in which the telecom provider the internet service provider may actually collect the tax. In some other states, internet access and related fees is considered to be a service, which is generally tax-exempt.

In the case where goods are sold over the internet, the internet serves as an electronic order taking service similar to mail order, with the physical goods delivered through traditional channels such as US Mail, UPS and Federal Express. The application of the rules of nexus usually determines the taxability of these transactions. If the seller is determined to have nexus in the buyer's jurisdiction, the purchase is subject to sales tax same as a mail-order catalogue. Two questions have arisen as a result of the nature of business conducted over the Internet (i) Does a web site hosted on a server create physical presence in the state in which the server resides, and (ii) can the ISP which hosts a web site on its servers for a company be deemed an agent of that company for the purposes of determining nexus.

The nature of the Internet allows it to not only act as a purchasing mechanism, but as a delivery channel as well. This is the case with electronic goods, such as software, games, documentation, data and information. The taxability of such transactions is determined by a jurisdiction's stance on tangible vs. intangible goods. Most states do not tax those items that it considers intangible. Some states will only consider physical goods that you can touch and see as tangible. These states would consider downloads a transfer of an intangible, and would therefore consider it tax exempt.

Other states have broadened their definition of tangible goods to include software, with a few of them making a distinction between 'canned', or pre-written software and custom software. These states would consider a download a transfer of a tangible good and therefore taxable.

Sales of Goods Purchased Over the Internet: In Georgia, sales of goods over the Internet are treated the same as sales of tangible personal property through more traditional channels and, therefore, subject to the rules of nexus and Georgia's sales/use tax laws.

The most complicated analysis for determining whether sales/use taxes should apply may be whether nexus exists. While states do not seem to be enacting a bunch of new taxes specifically geared to tax the internet, perhaps they are trying to expand the stretch of nexus to cover some of the internet companies whose businesses reach into many states. This may be the most adjudicated aspect of determining who can tax internet companies.

In New Mexico, legislation was pending that deemed an out-of-state business who maintains a web site on a computer physically located in New Mexico to not have sufficient nexus.(3) Similarly, in New York, nexus is not created by an non-resident company advertising on an in-state server or ISP.(4) Other states requires that the transaction start and end within the state for it to be subject to any tax.

Once it has been determined that the constitutional nexus threshold has been met for a particular state, then one must determine if the state has laws that apply to the particular transaction and how they apply. This is also not an easy task, at least in the more nebulous areas of the purchase of information and/or software from the Internet and internet access charges.

In other states such as Iowa, Tennessee, and Wisconsin, whether a sales/use tax is levied upon access charges depends on whether the service begins and ends within the state.(9) Other states base their taxes on whether or not the access is considered an information, computer, and / or data service and whether tangible property was part of the sale.

The National League of Cities maintains that it is the federal government, not the states and localities who are enacting new taxes, referring to a tax increase that affects airline ticket prices when purchased over the internet.(19) Thus, while it would seem that the states are clamoring for another source of income by taxing internet activities, the states seem to be aware that they need to encourage access to the net by not taxing it, for they are counting on the possible revenues.

The Multistate Tax Commission, composed of Business and State representatives and aided by academic consultants, is in the process of drafting the Nexus Guideline for Application of a State's Sales Tax and Use Tax on Out-of-State Business.(57) If implemented, this guideline would provide uniformity among the states' application of nexus in levying sales and use taxes. The guideline provides examples to clarify specifically how the nexus analysis would apply to various transactions. The MTC is still attempting to address perhaps the trickiest issue regarding nexus: determining "physical presence" when intangible property is involved.

". . . . buyers will no longer believe that purchasing from a vendor who is not required to collect use tax is a good bargain. Therefore, lack of taxes will no longer serve as a selling point in mail or Internet/Online purchased of tangible personal property. When the purchaser realized that they have to pay the tax anyway, they will no longer seek out 'tax-free' vendors.

This version would impose a three-year moratorium on new state and local taxes.(65) It is likely that some form of the Internet Tax Freedom Act will be passed this year. And the debate about how to treat sales and use taxes imposed on internet transactions will continue. Stay tuned . . . .

Supreme Court have classified media into three categories. Each is unique in character and therefore each is uniquely regulated. The current models of media regulation include print, broadcast and cable.

The Federal Communications Commission has no province to regulate the print media since traditional printers do not rely on any technology over which the FCC exercises control, i.e.. airwaves or telephony lines.

Herald Pub. Co. v. Tornillo 418 U.S. 241 (1974), the court held that the owner of a newspaper had the exclusive right to determine which messages to carry and which to refuse. The court based its decision on the right of the newspaper to determine how it speaks (intrusion of privacy). Congress and the courts have been satisfied to allow the market to regulate the print media.

In 1984, Congress the first Cable Act. The biggest impact of the first act was that it allowed municipalities to grant exclusive franchises to cable companies. Therefore, the city of Atlanta was allowed to grant one company the exclusive right to offer cable services within city limits. In 1992, Congress passed the second Cable Act which eliminated exclusive franchises.

The internet, in the most basic sense, is a global network of interconnected computers and servers which can exchange information in a matter of seconds. The internet allows people to communicate almost instantly with others around the globe at millions of computers on virtually every continent.

Unlike cable and broadcasting, there is no intermediary between message senders and receivers on the internet. Because of the lack of monitoring, the internet poses a serious threat to the well-being of children.

The internet raises the same concerns to Congress today that the printing press raised to European kings over 300 years ago. For the first time, the general populace has the ability to educate themselves or spread their points of view without an overseer.

While using an electronic pen to transmit his signature over the internet, the president stated, "Today, with the stroke of a pen, our laws will catch up with our future. We will help to create an open marketplace where competition and innovation can move as quickly as light."

Senator Exon blasted opponents of the bill saying, "Those who cry censorship hide behind the First Amendment to make defense of those who would give pornography to children and engage in sexual conversations. What a travesty."

Its open-ended prohibitions embrace all nonprofit organizations and individuals posting indecent messages or displaying them in their own computers in the presence of minors. The general unqualified term indecent and patently offensive cover large amounts of non-pornographic material with serious educational or other value."

The board should be drawn by lottery with two-year terms. Before creation of the actual board, there should be an interim board to decide minimum qualifications for future board members. If the agency has industry professionals there will enough experience to adequately formulate policy decisions. These decisions would then have to pass muster with the non-professional board of directors.

This allows the industry control of its policies but gives the public the power of veto. This is still somewhat a political process, but it minimizes political pressure and completely removes the state from private concerns.

After paying hefty fees to operate services in the first place, isp's will be hesitant to invite further fines and penalties. Individual publishers who violate the policies could be removed from the service. In light of the penalties and fines service providers and publishers would be compelled to govern themselves properly. This system makes regulating their practices and any sanctions taken are, in a sense, self-imposed.

I. Introduction In recent years, society has experienced a technological advancement in it's access to information like no other time period in history. Federal and state court systems in this country have not been immune from this technological development and have begun to utilize the advancements that have been cultivated to make their professional vocations adaptable, organized, and efficient. Attorneys, judges and the court systems themselves have taken advantage of this information explosion by capitalizing on the use of word processing systems, CD-ROMs and the Internet.

In fact, federal and state court systems in this country have begun to publish their decisions through new technological mediums like electronic bulletin boards, CD-ROMs and the Internet. As a result of law schools and other small publishers efforts, decisions of the U.S. Supreme Court, all the U.S. Courts of Appeals, and over a third of all state supreme courts can now be found on the Internet. Even though all the information is there for the taking, the fact remains that most of the information is useless because it is impossible to cite to this information in a court document.

This paper proposes a single change for the state of Georgia. That change deals with the state of Georgia adopting a new citation system that is simple, straightforward and manageable. The new citation system will be effective for both case law in both the print and the electronic formats.

Part I of this paper will discuss the medium-neutral, vendor neutral and public domain citation forms. In addition, it will focus on which states have adopted uniform citation systems and will then discuss why Georgia should adopt a similar system.

Part II of this paper will address the initial public awareness of the changes that need to be made in the area of legal citation and which entity was at the forefront of this endeavor. The American Bar Association recommendations for a uniform citation system will be examined and the recent changes the Bluebook has made concerning citations and technical advances will be reviewed.

Part III of this paper will expound on the criticisms of the uniform and electronic citation system and will specifically discuss where West Publishing and others stand on changes to the current citation system.

There are many reasons why Georgia should adopt a medium-neutral and vendor-neutral citation system. The main reason would be that Georgia, like so many other states, cannot afford to be left behind. Many states around the country currently have in place or are developing new citation systems to aid them in their pursuit of automated court systems. But the reasons for the adoption of a uniform citation system for the state of Georgia are a little more specific and should be considered individually.

First, with the new age of technology banging at the door it is necessary that Georgia move away from the current citation system, which is comprised of page numbering and should redirect it's attention towards a uniform citation system which focuses on paragraph numbering. As technology moves forward our society will move farther away from print publishing and will become more and more a society that does not use paper. This is not to say that case reporters will not be used ever again, it just means that Georgia must consider a uniform citation system which will enable lawyers and judges to cite to case law which exist on the new forms of technology, like the Internet and CD ROMs.

The second reason Georgia should consider a new uniform citation system is to cut down the lag time between when a decision is handed down and when a decision is actually published. In many instances, cases appear in advance sheets weeks after the opinions are first issued by the courts.

The third reason why Georgia should consider a uniform system of citation is that of copyright. Currently West Publishing is the only publisher which issues case law for all the state and federal appellate jurisdictions.

Many publishers like LEXIS have complained about West's licensing fees and how such fees have kept them from competing in the open market. Under the new uniform citation system such licensing fees would not be necessary.

The uniform citation debate began with the Department of Justice (DOJ) in 1995 when it tried to obtain a new federal case law data base which could be utilized by it's attorney's. The DOJ looked into obtaining a public domain database which would be comprised of federal and state court opinions.

It considered using a non-proprietary method for case citation, along with the elimination of certain publications or the utilization of old citation formats. The DOJ wanted to take into account the new technology in it's citation system and therefore, focused on citation systems which could cite to Internet and CD-ROM court opinions. The DOJ wanted a citation system which would not require a parallel citation or an internal page reference.

The DOJ and it's ideas sparked a huge political controversy and, as a result, the DOJ discontinued it's pursuit of uniform citation system. Fortunately, the pursuit of a uniform citation system continues and it's just the participants that have changed.

In the future, more changes may be necessary to take into consideration the changes in technology, but the changes in these rules acknowledge the move in legal citations towards a more uniform system that takes into consideration the new age of technology.

They publish all the National Reporter Systems, the federal court reports, a few official state reports, some jurisdictional digests and maintains one of the most widely used computer legal research tools in the world, WESTLAW. It can easily be stated that West's main problem with a uniform citation system is that it is deathly afraid of the potential loss of revenues.

West contends that a change in the citation system to a public domain system will open the door for the possibility of the government to censor opinions and even restrict access; 2) West also thinks that a public domain database will stifle competition in the open market place, which will in the end injure the consumer; 3) West also thinks that a new database will only help those with better than average computer knowledge and libraries already offer access to court opinions for the public; 4) A new citation system will only increase competition in the already competitive legal publishing market; 5) Creation of a new public domain database would only waste tax payers dollars; and 6) It the system is not broke why fix it(33).

Further, minor technical changes would have very little effect on paragraph numbering any way. Also, many critics state that if each state was free to conduct it's own system the result would be out right confusing and difficult to manage. Most states in this country are beginning to adopt uniform citation systems. The idea of a uniform citation system is enhanced by organizations such as the American Bar Association and their recommendations for the adoption of such a system. In time, all states will have uniform citation systems which may not be identical but will have the basic premises in place so that legal business in each states may be conducted at a faster and more efficient pace.

The basic need for a uniform citation system in the state of Georgia is clear. As the current system stands, when federal and state opinions are necessary their is basically only one source from which attorneys and judges can cite in the state of Georgia. West Publishing and Lexis have control over federal and state cases and in most circumstances are necessary if a lawyers wishes to cite to a court in the state of Georgia. The main problem is that West Publishing claims a copyright to the page numbering systems that are used in most opinions. This prevents other publishing companies from being able to publish and print legal opinions. As a result, West Publishing maintains a virtual monopoly on the so called proper citations that are currently being used. Further, an attorney may find a court opinion in another publication but will not have any way to properly cite to this opinion without including the internal page numbers in there case citations to the state or federal courts.

Companies like Versuslaw enable the attorneys and the judges in the state of Georgia easier access to the law and take away form West's virtual monopoly of the case law that belongs to the public in the first place. The adoption of a uniform citation system would further help stop West from monopolizing the case law in the legal profession and would open the market to more reasonable legal research costs. As it stands today, unless the court systems in this country adopt a more uniform citation system and put these uniform citations on opinions before they are published West will have no reason to adopt a uniform citation system of their own.

Second, Georgia should adopt a uniform citation system because there will be little or no cost related to the adoption of such a system. These days, most opinions and draft legislation are created using some kind of word processing software on a computer. Most of the opinions written by judges are done on Word or Word perfect. These programs, as well as, most other programs can automatically number paragraphs as the opinions are being written. Further, a set of macros can easily be created to number paragraphs after the opinions are written. If by chance, paragraph numbers had to be placed manually before each paragraph the additional effort by the typist would be minimal. In addition, there should be very little concern by the state of Georgia for any added expense for putting court opinions in sequential order. In Georgia it would take very little additional effort on the part of the Court Clerk to make sure that opinions are numbered when the opinions are handed down form the court.

Third, every day more and more primary authority is being transmitted to publishers in electronic form. Also, court and legislatures around the country are releasing their decisions and statutes to the public (to other judges and attorneys) in an electronic form by way of the Internet or via bulletin boards. Currently, all the Circuit Courts for the U.S. Court of Appeals have URL's which publish their most recent decisions handed down by the courts in their jurisdictions. In addition, more and more state supreme courts have URL's which publish their most recent decisions. A uniform citation system would further increase the speed by which Georgia could publish it's courts opinions, and as a result, the attorneys and judges in the state of Georgia would have the most recent decisions in their state to make the proper informed legal decisions.

Fourth, the state of Georgia must accept that the print medium is no longer the primary medium by which attorneys and judges obtain their legal research and most recent case law information. Attorneys want the most recent case decisions in the fastest way possible so they can help their clients. As the future approaches at a devastating pace electronic publication of the law can be seen more and more in commercial online databases. These databases contain both primary and secondary authority. There are CD-ROM products which contain both primary and secondary authority. Also, there are electronic bulletin boards which contain the full text of the most recent decisions and statutes for certain jurisdictions in this country.

In addition, there is the Internet which contains an ever increasing amount of up to date primary authority information. Georgia should move immediately to adopt a uniform system of citation that demonstrates the opinions by the year and the sequential order of the release, and that provides for precise location markers within each opinion by utilizing a paragraph numbering system within each opinion.

LEXIS or CD-ROM. A parallel citation is not necessary unless the reader has only the print version of the South West Reporter. If this is the case, the reader can simply use one of the charts or tables provided by West Publishing.

The medium neutral citation has many benefits when compared to the old citation method. Under the new system, it will not be necessary for publishers to provide star paging and there will never be any need to pay licensing fees to West Publishing in order to utilize there pinpoint citations. In addition, the medium-neutral citation can be used as soon as the case is actually issued by the court in Georgia. The courts of Georgia, as well as, the attorneys that practice law within the state will no longer have to wait for advance sheets because they will be unnecessary. Further, there will not be a need to look up page numbers in two print versions for the same case. Also, the cases will be put directly into the public domain for the viewing of judges, attorneys and the public.

As we enter into the year 2000 states, companies and professionals(70) must change and develop with the new technology. The state court systems are not immune from the technological changes that are taking place in our society on a daily basis. It is for these reasons and for the reasons previously stated in this paper that Georgia adopt the American Bar Associations recommendations of a uniform citation system. It is the Georgia courts that should determine the actual citations for their opinions not the private publishers like West. The legal citation in Georgia will cite to the case number assigned by the clerk and all of the paragraphs will be numbered.

As a result, the new citation system will allow attorneys in Georgia to locate the law in printed editions, CD-ROMS, on the Internet and in all the new technologies that our society will benefit from in the future.

In time, Georgia will have the opportunity to adopt a fully vendor-neutral and medium-neutral case citation and could eventually develop it's own form of case archives.(71) It is not to late, for Georgia to take it's place as one of the leaders in the automation of the legal profession.

Could the goal of improved productivity and efficiency have been realized if new tools were incorrectly used? Not likely. Forklifts make first rate entertainment in drag races at a really big warehouse, but drag races don't move product out the door. Further, Employer may have paid compensation when Employee-Speed-Racer lost his foot to a hungry lift-claw.

Georgia State University in the early 1970's, office workers in at least one department were instructed to turn their heads away from the paper rolls to avoid the noxious, chemical smell. This occurred during training on the new equipment. Shortly after the machine was put into use, those same office workers were instructed to refrain from placing their faces on the glass and blinding themselves in the name of scientific experimentation, thus rendering themselves useless for the afternoon and potentially causing retinal damage. This instruction was given in response to certain behaviors exhibited by said office workers.

Such uses steal time from the employer, wastes the employer's resources and creates potential for liability for the employer. Pretty easy to distinguish what the employer wants and doesn't want. However, without sitting at each employee's shoulder throughout their shift, it is not so easy to distinguish the beneficial from the bad.

Although the standard to find sexual harassment cited in the case is "sufficiently severe or pervasive to alter the conditions of employment and create an abusive working environment, and the unwelcome conduct must be repeated and continuous rather than consist of isolated and occasional acts," it is interesting that the three cases cited by the court all include physical contact. It does not seem likely that a Bowman-like plaintiff would be successful unless the behavior culminated in touch. Nor would success seem likely in cases involving e-mail and the internet i this court.

Currently lower courts are split with various interpretations of how an employer's responsibility should be determined. Employment attorneys are waiting for the Supreme Court's decision in Faragher v. City of Boca Raton, No. 97-282 (U.S. argued March 25, 1998) to see if employers will be held strictly liable for acts of sexual harassment by their employees or if a show of negligence on the employer's part will be required before employer liability is found.

If the Court finds that employers will be held strictly liable for the sexually harassing acts of its employees, what do employers fear their employees will do to create that liability? Send sexually offensive e-mails, download sexual materials and pictures from the internet using them as screen savers and backgrounds and forward same via e-mail to co-workers.

As an employee told me, "it's just e-mail; I don't have time to put that much consideration into it." That same employee would never send a business letter without asking me to review it for overextended commitments.

The information relayed in, and attached to, an e-mail is available for printing, downloading, forwarding (if no restrictive device is put on the e-mail) and it is stored in the company's server (at least for some period of time). Each of those uses are beneficial: printed information can be hand carried to the place where it is most needed (directions to the office), downloaded files enable the recipient to manipulate the data, forwarded information can be gotten to the appropriate party, lost files may be recovered from the server. At the same time, such uses of e-mail can be threatening to a company when an employee's use of a conversational tone introduces personal comments about or to others that would be better left unsaid, much less written, or commits the company to unachievable promises.

If the employer anticipates potential liability, and dutifully creates policies to prevent sexual harassment, the policies must be administered or the employer is still without control and protection. Thus, the employer must be able to withstand challenges best on invasion of privacy claims.

Business use may be an even broader exception as the provider of the communications service is authorized to intercept messages. No notice is required by the provider as long as it is within the ordinary course of business and the subject matter of the intercepted communication is one in which the interceptor has a legal interest. The potential difficulty for employers here is in the language of the statute - the prohibited interception is one performed by an "electronic.... device". Any device furnished to the user by the provider of the wire or electronic communication service, in the ordinary course of its business, is exempt from the interception prohibition. [22] Although numerous writers conclude that the employer is the furnisher, it remains to be seen if that determination will be so easily made. For example, where employer is using outside service provider equipment to host and manage its network and connections, it may not be deemed the furnisher.

The legal issue to be resolved is a balance of the employee's reasonable expectation of privacy and the employer's right to access and monitor electronic mail for legitimate business reasons. An employee does not have a 'right' to privacy, but simply a reasonable expectation of privacy in the workplace.

Software to monitor employee use of the internet is available. Employers may choose software that blocks specific sites, block incoming files, flags incoming mail with certain sensitive word cominations, and monitors how much time employees spend at sites.

Employees' keys to the universe of the web need not be withdrawn by the employer if clear policies are established, relayed to the employees and then put into practice. Then leave it to the employees to practice thoughtful self-restraint, while the courts determine where liability for employees' actions will lie in the world of Internet.

Const. amend. IV The right of the people to be secure in their persons, houses, papers, and effects, against unreasonable searches and seizures, shall not be violated, and no Warrants shall issue, but upon probable cause, supported by Oath or affirmation, and particularly describing the place to be searched, and the persons or things to be seized.

United States and subject to the jurisdiction thereof, are citizens of the United States and of the State wherein they reside. No State shall make or enforce any law which shall abridge the privileges or immunities of citizens of the United States; nor shall any State deprive any person of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor deny to any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the laws.

Monitors of the Mouse Program tracks Internet use, block smut and hate sites. New software from Equitrac called E.P.I.C. (Equitrac Professional Internet Client), allow businesses to block access to certain sites, but also to track time on line, monitor on-line research an track e-mail.

Recent studies show that incidents of academic misconduct in the United States are steadily increasing, according to Donald McCabe, a professor of business ethics at Rutgers University who has conducted extensive research in the area of cheating at colleges and universities.

While the Internet may offer students easier ways to cheat, technology may offer a more sophisticated approach to detect academic misconduct. One particular mechanism, the Stanford Copy Analysis Mechanism (SCAM), was created to find illegal copying of documents in digital libraries using a registration server approach.

Thus, the likelihood that a student will cheat is much lower, because they have not waited to write their papers until the night before the due date, which produces the panic that often leads to incidents of academic misconduct.

READ THIS NOTE: While PaperSure is a research service for hire, we intend for our product to be used as an information resource only. Students in particular are warned that using this research material verbatim and representing it as their own work constitutes plagiarism and violates the honor code of any educational institution. Several states have statutes regarding obtaining research material to be used for academic credit. Students are urged to be aware of their state regulations on what is permissible. If in doubt, check with your teacher or professor.

PaperSure assumes no responsibility for how the information we provide is used and we make no guarantees that using this information will result in a better job, a good grade or even make your teeth whiter.

These warnings may helpful in deterring acts of accidental plagiarism, but, are these term paper and research sites really trying to stop academic misconduct, or are they merely trying to avoid legal liability for themselves?

For example, medical degrees and licenses obtained fraudulently would undermine the public's confidence in the health care system. This lack of confidence could lead citizens to forego or delay treatment or attempt to self treat, resulting in the unnecessary suffering of patients and exacerbation of their ailments at an increased cost to all consumers paying the freight for health care. Moreover, fraudulently obtained medical degrees and licenses result in incompetent physicians with the same end result.

Federal judges have mostly been unwilling to let stand piecemeal state statutes, reasoning that such patchwork regulation by states could cripple the power of a seamless Internet structure, as illustrated in the following two landmark cases.

The statute also prohibited the use of "embedded links" to corporate logos or other copyrighted material without permission. The court reasoned that this would chill "non-commercial educational speech, news, and commentary -- a prohibition with well-recognized First Amendment problems."

ALA v. Pataki teaches us that the Internet is much like a railway and its transmission of electronic information is interstate commerce, which cannot be impermissibly burdened absent a local interest that outweighs the interest of the government in maintaining an open information highway.

Although the local interest is substantial, a court could readily decide that pedagogical, technological, or other solutions to academic misconduct that key more directly into students' and educators' responsibilities are more conducive to the result desired with far less potential burden on the interstate transmission of information across the Internet. Further, in light of the fact that one of the defendants in the current BU suit was "permanently" enjoined from doing business in Massachusetts in 1981, [96] the local benefit of an injunction here may be relatively minor compared to its imposition on interstate Internet commerce.

Georgia law in Miller [99] because it prohibits sales of term papers with knowledge that the buyer intends to pass the work off as his own. These two elements would seemingly narrow the statute within acceptable parameters if the Internet was not implicated. However, because the two are inextricably linked (i.e. term paper mills have flourished exponentially with the ease of Internet transmission and research capabilities), [100] the district court hearing this case may be unwilling to veer from existing precedent, where the result would make state inroads into the seamless unity of the information superhighway.

Rice v Paladin Enterprises is the most readily analogous of the state law cases to the BU case, although the underlying illegal acts are morally incomparable. While the focus of Rice was not Internet-related, the Fourth Circuit court readily found that the defendant publisher civilly liable for aiding and abetting a triple homicide, by virtue of its publication and sales of a manual written for contract killers.

It is no exaggeration to say that this fulfills a dream that humankind has had for thousands years, the library at Alexandria writ very, very large. We are, of course, not there yet; searching for information on the Internet is still relatively crude, the ability of 'customized' information requests still in a primitive state. But one would hope that the legal system would be... at least, not discouraging -- the continued development of new and improved methods for making this information available...The B.U. lawsuit, however, moves in precisely the wrong direction.

Academic institutions promulgate rules and expect their students to abide by them, or face serious consequences. If we analogize these "school rules" to laws in general, it is apparent that they exist to keep order and integrity in a particular environment. If the rules/laws are merely on paper, and not enforced, the result is total chaos.

While academic misconduct has always existed, the introduction of the Internet into the classroom opens up a new world of possibilities for those who want to cheat. Not only does this technology foster the "seasoned" cheater's ability to get away with this behavior, but it also gives students who wouldn't normally cheat an easier excuse to do so, because it will be harder to get caught. As the virtual world continues to expand so rapidly, there will be an increasing number of ways for students to apply the technology to their education. The critical issue is whether or not these students will use the resource properly.

This paper will examine the topic of defamatory speech as it relates to the quickly emerging and rapidly expanding resource known as the World Wide Web (WWW). We will present the concept of defamatory speech and its elements from a historical perspective, discuss current treatment of internet defamation in the United States and survey the international treatment of "cyberdefamation".

Defamation, when in a written permanent form, is known as libel, and oral defamation is known as slander. While web pages can include sound files which, with the use of a sound card and speakers, can reproduce sounds, words, etc., the overwhelming majority of content on the internet is graphical in nature. As the internet, at least for the time being, is primarily a visual medium, and considering that the view from a screen is readily printable into a more permanent form, defamatory speech over the internet most probably falls under the rubric of libel.

That pronouncement established a nearly insurmountable bar to a public official bringing a successful action for defamation and signaled a sea change in defamation law vis a vis public official and (as shall be shown), "famous" persons in general.

The Curtis Publishing Company case and its progeny established and solidified the requirement that "public figures" must meet the same standard as public officials in order to successfully bring defamation actions.

This decision, taken to its logical conclusion, created the circular argument that whatever the media felt was newsworthy thus became newsworthy, since it was being reported on and which, by virtue of its news worthiness would bar most recoveries under the nearly impenetrable New York Times "actual malice" standard. The Rosenbloom decision represented the Court's high water mark on the issue.

The US Supreme Court veered back from the Rosenbloom precipice in Gertz v. Robert Welch Inc. Rather then retaining this bootstrap theory as a bar to a private party's recovery, the Court ruled that even in matters of public concern, a publisher of defamatory material may not hide behind the shield of "actual malice" where a private person is concerned.

"The first remedy of any victim of defamation is self-help - using available opportunities to contradict the lie or correct the error and thereby to minimize its adverse impact on reputation. Public officials and public figures usually enjoy significantly greater access to the channels of effective communication and hence have a more realistic opportunity to counteract false statements than private individuals normally enjoy.

Group two is also prevented from recovery if the statements made are related to the narrow facet of their lives in which they are considered public persons, and group 3 enjoys the greatest protection, only needing to contend with a mere negligence standard. All of these foundation cases were relatively entrenched prior to the advent of the internet (at least as a major conduit of communication among lay persons), and the unique characteristics it represents. It is against this backdrop that we examine the current state of affairs within defamation law as it relates to the internet.

As noted above, the CDA Section 230(c ) takes this further by simply stating that "no provider or user of or user of an interactive computer service shall be treated as the publisher or speaker of any information provided by another information content provider." Congress, knowing that historically the party responsible for offensive publications is the publishing party, as opposed to the author or distributor, gave blanket protection to Internet Service Providers by refusing to allow them to be labeled publishers.

Unlike Sections 223(a)(1) and 223(d), Section 230(c ) of the CDA survived its first real test in America's Courts. The Zeran case began on April 25, 1995 when a notice appeared on an America OnLine ("AOL"), bulletin board advertising the sale of T-shirts containing logos regarding the Oklahoma City bombing. The notice requested that interested parties contact the plaintiff, Kenneth Zeran. Zeran was not an AOL subscriber and had no involvement in the notices, nevertheless, Zeran received threatening phone calls and death threats as a result. Zeran promptly complained to AOL and AOL removed the offending message. Similar messages were posted multiple times thereafter, with each occurrence resulting in Zeran receiving additional threats, etc. Eventually, a broadcaster at a radio station in Oklahoma City read one of the notices on the air and encouraged listeners to call Zeran and express their displeasure. Zeran sued AOL negligence under state law, contending that AOL should not have allowed similar messages to be posted after having been made aware of the problem.

The main objective of the defamation victim is probably to have the information deleted, so future litigation may focus on actual knowledge of the ISP. The greatest risk for the ISP for liability may be in cases where the defamed party requests that an offending message is deleted, but the ISP fails or refuses to comply. In such a situation, the control over content may be irrelevant, as the ISP has been notified of the content.

We saw in Zeran that the CDA protects the ISP, and Judge Shoob revealed the difficulty in drafting a criminal statute to prevent another Zeran scenario. If the ISP cannot be held responsible and criminal legislation is not the solution, what is?

Jurisdiction over the offending party is another angle to be considered in this type of analysis. However, because the jurisdiction questions of internet law have hardly been answered, this approach may be the most unpredictable.

ISP liability issue for defamatory material was determined by how much control the ISP exercised over the content that was distributed through its service. [n46] The liability was greater if a great amount of control was exercised over the content. If little control was exercised, the provider was similar to a mere distributor and was not held liable without actual knowledge of the nature of the content.

Ideally, the actual author of the defamatory material should be held primarily responsible for its publication, but as was the case in Zeran, the party ultimately responsible for the harm is not readily available for prosecution. Even where the actual author is available, it is not unheard of, and is even common to see the person controlling the object on which the defamatory statement is displayed to be held responsible if the person had knowledge of the statement and failed to make reasonable efforts to remove it. This is done to protect the defamed person. By holding the publisher or distributor responsible, the law encourages the party to promptly remove the material and discourages future reckless publications.

What makes law on the internet so different that historical defamation law does not apply? What great harm would result from holding ISP liable as distributors or even as publishers of defamatory material on the internet and is it sound public policy to immunize ISP from such liability? These are questions that the drafters of the CDA need to reconsider when analyzing the usefulness of the CDA. It is not clear that being exposed to distributor liability would be a disaster for an ISP.

As was stated above, the liability for an ISP does not attach until the ISP has notice of the offensive material. Recent commentators suggest that such liability does not "open the floodgates" for defamation lawsuits against ISP. The facts in Zeran illustrate this. According to Zeran, the first defamatory message was posted on April 25, 1995, and after he notified AOL, was removed the next day. On April 26, 1995, a new posting appeared. AOL asserts that it removed this posting not later than April 27, 1995. On April 29, 1995, someone contacted an Oklahoma City radio station concerning the April 25 posting. The Oklahoma City radio station thereafter broadcast material that was the subject of a separate suit by Zeran. Thus, even if Zeran's complaint against AOL had not been dismissed, he might not have been able to prove that any tortious act of AOL caused him substantial damages. AOL arguably committed no tort at all with respect to the April 25 posting. Furthermore, any damages to Zeran may well have resulted from redistribution of the April 25 posting before AOL had reason to know it was defamatory, and therefore before AOL committed any tort with respect to that posting.

As the internet crosses almost all national boundaries, defamatory speech transmitted online is potentially actionable in a variety of sovereign jurisdictions. Just as certain tort situations in the United States allow a plaintiff to "forum shop" for the most sympathetic jurisdiction to hear her case, so might an aggrieved party seek a country with a more liberal stance regarding what constitutes defamation when deciding where to bring suit.

The result is a patchwork of differing laws for speech that may be perfectly legal in its country of origin yet quite illegal in others. Such a situation demonstrates the potential for one government to push its laws beyond its geographic boundaries and project its values worldwide. The question of enforceability of a judgment aside, this leads to considerable uncertainty both on the part of concerned authors as well as the internet service providers (ISP'S) [n49] who service them. The concern for the ISP's is particularly urgent as several are multi-national and maintain property in these foreign jurisdictions, which could be seized to pay damages.

France is also an attractive venue for bringing suit under its favorable right of privacy laws. [n56] The right of privacy is quite broadly construed and, like England, no distinction between public & private persons is made. Accordingly, if attachable property can be found within the country or its possessions, France would be another viable alternative for defamation litigation.

China is apparently constructing its internet access under a vast intra-net model which would not provide access to the entire wealth of the actual World Wide Web, rather, it would be the "CWW" - China Wide Web. Access to the global internet and its ideas would still exist, but would be limited to a select inner circle of persons, presumably those considered impervious to the dangers which free access would hold for the masses.

Although a thorough analysis of the global landscape is beyond the scope of this article, the disparate treatment of the topic may help to guide policy makers in this country as they grapple with the concept here.

"Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof; or abridging the freedom of speech, or of the press; or the right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition the Government for a redress of grievances."

This paper will review the current anti-stalking statutes and examine how they apply to stalking on the Internet, discuss possible problems with the anti-stalking statutes, and examine the problems associated with enforcement of the current anti-stalking statutes against cyberstalkers.

While it is argued that stalking has been a problem for hundreds of years[3], it has only been in the last decade that state laws have been passed to deal with the issue.  Prior to enacting specific anti-stalking statutes, stalking was often prosecuted under harassment, assault, or domestic violence statutes[4].  However, in 1990 after a series of tragic deaths[5], California passed the first anti-stalking statute.  This law made it a crime to willfully, maliciously, and repeatedly harass or follow another person.  Additionally, a "credible threat" with the intent to place that person in reasonable fear for their safety or the safety of their immediate family is required[6].  Since California passed its anti-stalking statute, all other states have either passed similar statutes or revised other statutes to include stalking activities[7].

Anti-stalking statutes can be grouped in to three general categories, the credible threat model, the two-tiered, non-credible threat model, and the literal stalking, non-credible threat model[8].  While each state law may differ slightly, these three categories are representative of the anti-stalking laws as a whole.

The California anti-stalking law[9] is an example of the credible threat model.  California criminalized intentional obsessive harassment by someone who makes a credible threat.  The statute has two actus reus elements that have separate means rea requirements.  First, the statute requires willful, malicious, and repeated following or harassment.  The statute further defines "harass" as a "knowing and willful course of conduct directed at a specific person that seriously alarms, annoys, torments, or terrorizes the person, and that serves no legitimate purpose.  This course of conduct must be such as would cause a reasonable person to suffer substantial emotional distress, and must actually cause substantial emotional distress to the person."[10] The statute does not define following, but rather assumes that its meaning is clear[11].  The second requirement is that the conduct results in a credible threat.  A credible threat[12] requires the victim to reasonably fear for his or her safety and the perpetrator must have intent and ability to complete the threat.

The statute further defines aggravated stalking as willful, malicious, and repeated following or harassment of another person and making a credible threat with the intent to place that person in reasonable fear of death or bodily injury[17].  Under the Florida statute, stalking is a misdemeanor in the first degree and aggravated stalking is a felony of the third degree.  This statute differs from the California statute in two major ways.  First, it does not require that the perpetrator have the apparent ability to carry out the threat.  Secondly, it provides an exception to the credible threat if the person commits stalking (lesser offense) in violation of a court order.   Although, the Florida and California statutes are similar, the Florida statute reaches further than the California Statute because it creates immediate criminal liability without physical attack or threat of attack[18].

Finally, the Connecticut anti-stalking law defines stalking in literal terms rather than  harassing behavior.  Under the statute, stalking is defined as intentional and willful following or lying in wait for such other person and causes such other person to reasonably fear for his physical safety[19].   The Connecticut law is much narrower than the California or Florida statute in that it only includes literal stalking behavior[20].  However, where there are situations of literal stalking, it reaches further than the California or Florida statutes because it does not require a credible threat.

Whether or not current state stalking statutes can be used to prosecute persons who commit cyberstalking will generally depend on the individual state statute that is being considered.  While a few statutes do specifically deal with computer contact, and a number more are broad enough to allow an argument that cyberstalking should apply, many of the statutes simply were not written with cyberstalking in mind and thus cannot easily be applied in a cyberstalking situation.

Although, these statutes do assist in combating the stalking problem, they are very much limited in their ability to combat cyberstalking.  The Interstate Stalking Act is limited because it requires that the perpetrator cross state lines.  However, one could make the argument that Internet communication does cross state lines. Furthermore, 18 USC 875(c)  requires an actual threat be made against the victim.  As demonstrated by the Baker case, anything less that a direct threat made against the victim may fall short of the requirements needed to prosecute cyberstalking.

One of the concerns with the state laws that cover Internet communication as part of their anti-stalking statutes is whether the laws will hold up to a constitutional challenge.  In Grayned v. City of Rockford [33], the Supreme Court held that a criminal law must clearly define what conduct it prohibits, otherwise it is void for vagueness under the Fourteenth and Fifth Amendment right to due process of law.  The purpose for requiring that the statute be clearly defined is to allow people of ordinary intelligence notice of what conduct is illegal and to eliminate arbitrary and discriminatory enforcement of the statute by police officers, judges, and juries. The anti-stalking statutes are being challenged because they are too broad to provide required notice to ordinary citizens and to provide specific application by law enforcement officials[34].  Some of the statutes prohibit conduct intended to harass, annoy or alarm another person.  What exactly constitutes harassment or alarm may not be specific enough to survive the vagueness doctrine.  The other extreme is that the laws may be drafted too narrow to be effective against the activity which they wish to control.

In addition to the constitutional issues, there are other specific problems that surround cyberstalking.  These problems include what is a credible threat in an Internet situation or can an E-mail result in reasonable fear of physical harm.[39] The problem with these requirements has a lot to do with the unique nature of Internet communication.  The Internet allows persons from around the world to communicate directly with one another without the other person knowing their physical location.  Credible threat is generally defined as having the intent and ability to carry out the threat.  Under this definition, it is very difficult to determine whether a threat received is credible.  The victim is unaware of who the perpetrator is and where he is physically located. Along the same lines, is it reasonable to fear someone you do not know and cannot locate?  Furthermore, is it reasonable to fear someone that is in another country?  These are the factual issues that will have to be determined by the courts in looking at cyberstalking cases.

The Internet has begun to present seemingly complex and intricate issues in the law today.  In order to understand these issues we must first understand what is the Internet.  The Internet is a complex series of computer networks upon computer networks which are connected by telephone lines, satellites and computer terminals. [40] When a person accesses the Internet she is not entering the "third dimension" but rather is connecting her computer to another computer in another location via the linkages of telephone lines and satellite communications.  There are actual physical locations (with the exception of satellites) where each of the communication links are located.  These physical locations are unknown to an end user.  It  is a seamless transition from one computer network which may be grounded in Los Angeles to another computer network grounded in Tokyo, Japan.

These seamless and invisible transitions present unique jurisdictional issues involving crimes and other events occurring over the Internet.  In order to understand how these new issues will be treated by the courts it is important to first understand  how the courts have applied personal jurisdiction under traditional mechanisms.  The first section will provide a brief overview of the Supreme Courts treatment of personal jurisdiction employing traditional mechanisms.  The second section will provide some  a brief overview of recent developments in courts treatment of personal jurisdiction involving events and crimes other than cyberstalking.  The third and final section will discuss recent developments in the area of personal jurisdiction involving cyberstalking.

It is obvious to see the personal jurisdiction issues that can arise through the use of the Internet. Does an Internet user establish minimum contacts by merely logging onto Internet and sending an e-mail which is transmitted from Georgia through Utah into California?  Has an Internet user purposefully availed herself to a foreign jurisdiction by posting a website on a local network that can be accessed by users in foreign jurisdictions? What constitutes physical presence in the world of cyberspace?  The cases below attempt to address some of these issues.

The court found that the "minimum contacts" were insufficient, that suit was not reasonably foreseeable in the forum and that jurisdiction would violate "traditional notions of fair dealing and substantial justice." [65] The court found that merely accessing the server and mailing payments to Florida were insufficient contacts and the totality of circumstances did not  demonstrate the necessary  "presence" for jurisdiction. [66]  Finally, the court warned that finding personal jurisdiction would herald a substantial danger to the livelihood of on-line communications and legal power over those who utilized them.

This case will have a dramatic impact upon future prosecution  of Internet related crimes.  Because the vast majority of electronic messages are transmitted across state lines into centralized repositories, prosecutors will no longer have to address inconsistent or poorly written state statutes and  will be able to utilize stronger and clearer federal statutes.

While criminal protsecution may be the best alternative for protection from cyberstalking, it may be possible to bring a successful claim under civil tort claims.[75] Specifically, assault, intentional infliction of emotional distress, and invasion of privacy may provide recourse to the victim.[76] While these alternatives will not result in the criminal punishment for the perpetrator, the economic penalties that are available may serve as a deterrent to prevent the stalker from continuing in his stalking.

Assault requires that the perpetrator intend to cause harmful or offensive physical contact and that the victim be put in apprehension of such contact. [77] In the case of cyberstalking, this would pose similar problem as the credible threat requirement from the anti-stalking statutes.  The victim will be required to prove that the stalker had the ability and intent to carry out his threats.[78] This may not be an easy task if the two persons are not located in the same geographical location.

A second tort that may apply to cyberstalking activities is intentional infliction of emotional distress.  Generally, intentional infliction of emotional distress requires that the conduct of the actor intentionally or recklessly takes a course of action that is extreme, outrageous, and causes severe emotional distress to the victim.[79] In applying this standard to a cyberstalking situation, the burden of the victim is very high.  Courts are very reluctant to find conduct "outrageous" under a reasonable person standard.[80] However, where the situation will support such a claim, this tort claim may provide adequate recourse to a stalking victim.

Finally, invasion of privacy may be used in situations of cyberstalking.  The general standard to be applied in this tort is that the conduct must be something in the nature of prying or intrusion that would be offensive or objectionable to a reasonable person.  The subject matter that is being intruded upon must be of a private nature.[81] This tort may offer another alternative to combat the actions of a stalker.  This tort would especially be useful in situations where the stalker is using the Internet to collect data about the individual through the use of the Internet and using that information to harass or threaten the victim.

While these tort actions are available as an alternative to anti-stalking laws, courts have been hesitant to extend the application of tort theories to new crimes.[82] However, where the circumstances of cyberstalking activity allow for a claim under the standards set forth through the common law, the economic penalties may be a useful tool to protect a victim from the harassment of a stalker.

Moreover, while trademark owners rightfully expect to have their marks protected from all damaging use by others, the case law only involves the unauthorized commercial use of trademarks. Thus, one problem with the enforcement of trademark rights on the Internet is the limitation of particular enforcement mechanisms to commercial use.

Because the user attempted to trade on the value of the mark, the court found the user to be engaged in commerce. In addition, where the user prevented the trademark owner from using the mark on the Internet, thereby lessening the selling power of the mark for the owner, and found him liable for trademark dilution.

Further, for any number of reasons, a company may not be able to purchase a domain name from an unauthorized user. If a company has multiple trademarks, all or most of which have been registered as domain names by someone else, purchasing the names may be costly. Likewise, a small company with only one trademark possibly cannot afford to purchase a domain name from an unauthorized user.

In the meantime, the company is unable to use its trademark as a domain name to market its products or services on the Internet. As a result, the selling power of the trademark for the company is diminished. Thus, while the Lanham Act has proven effective in the enforcement of trademark rights in commercial use, the Act is ineffective when non-commercial use prevents trademark owners from using their marks.

Intellectual Property Organization (WIPO), an arm of the United Nations, is developing uniform guidelines to address disputes associated with trademarks and Internet domain names. One significant purpose of the guidelines is to prevent jurisdictional issues from interfering with international enforcement of trademark rights. Agreement to follow the guidelines is made on a voluntary basis. The U.S. House of Representatives passed a bill to amend the Lanham Act to incorporate WIPO's guidelines and the bill is now pending in the U.S. Senate. It appears, however, that application of the guidelines will be limited to commercial usage of trademarks.

The act sought to criminalize the use of any trademark on the Internet where the use implied permission by the trademark owner. Notwithstanding the goal of the law, the protection of trademarks and other forms of intellectual property from unauthorized use on the Internet, the law appeared to also encompass the non-commercial use of hyperlinks and anonymous e-mail. Thus, although the legislature intended the statute to prevent fraud and the presence of misleading information on the Internet, challengers argued that it was overly broad.

Moreover, plaintiffs argued that the law was overly broad and vague, and violated the Commerce Clause because it had the effect of regulating commerce outside the state boundaries. The court agreed with plaintiffs and enjoined the state from enforcing the law.

Despite the court's injunction of the Georgia statute, Georgia's concerns about trademark protection on the Internet are valid. Unfortunately, after this case, states' efforts to draft similar laws will be dampened. One problem is the lack of uniformity. One state's law may be very narrow while another state's effort may be overly broad like the Georgia statute. Another problem exists where individuals will have no notice of what can and cannot be done from state to state. Finally, because the Internet is an interstate medium, a state statute cannot be enforced without violating the Commerce Clause.

A company may discover that an unauthorized user has registered its trademark as a domain name after attempting to register the domain name itself or locating a web site on the Internet using the domain name. Network Solutions, Inc. (NSI), the federally contracted company responsible for registering Internet domain names, has a policy to register names on a first come, first served basis. During the registration process, NSI requires registrants to indicate that they have a legal right to use the desired domain names, but does nothing to verify any rights.

Where a trademark owner could suffer the same fate when a domain name registrant uses a trademark for non-commercial purposes, the trademark owner also should be accorded protection from the unauthorized use.

Meta-tags, on the other hand, do not appear on web pages. Rather, meta-tags are embedded within in the language used to create web pages and consist of key words with which search engines locate web sites. Thus, an Internet user searching for a web site with a particular trademark actually may locate a site that has no real affiliation with the trademark holder at all. Moreover, the Internet user may not search any further for the web site he or she originally intended to visit.

A trademark holder may view the language with which an individual or another entity created a web page to determine whether its trademark is embedded as a meta-tag. However, unless the trademark holder has become aware of infringing or diluting use of its trademark, the holder potentially could never discover the damaging use.

Once again, the laws that would protect trademark holders are applicable only to unauthorized commercial use of trademarks. Trademark holders have significantly less protection from potentially damaging non-commercial use of their trademarks.

Registration Services is one of several companies that manage domain name databases. However, the information maintained by these organizations is limited to trademarks registered with the PTO and domain names listed with InterNIC.

Sophisticated web page developers have access to tools that allow easy access and exploitation of trademarks in their pure forms. Thus, more than ever before, potentially damaging non-commercial use of trademarks on the Internet is likely to create confusion among consumers and decrease the value of marks to their owners.

Until Congress acts, both the PTO and NSI should be required to work more closely to assure better policing of potentially infringing or diluting Internet domain names. Perhaps the cross-referencing of databases may be the starting point. Moreover, as a condition of its contract, the government should require NSI to become more involved in the prevention and resolution of domain name disputes.

Infrastructure (NII) and its popular public part, the "Internet," has created unprecedented opportunities for government and private industry to collect, organize, and share information on individuals. Yet to many the danger seems remote and diffused: a few extra pieces of targeted junk mail, another telemarketer calling in the evening, another on-line form to fill out.

I will then ask whether Foucault's panopticism does indeed describe modern information surveillance. Second, I will consider a utilitarian counterargument to the idea that a pervasive modern panopticism is something to be feared and avoided. Finally, I will suggest technological and legal bulwarks against an emerging panoptic dataveillance. I will review American data privacy law, concluding that in general it is inadequate and unprincipled.

As a symbol of manipulation, it crystallizes the sinister side of modern dataveillance, that vague aspect of the Information Age that makes us uneasy without knowing exactly why. As a paradigm of manipulation, it focuses technological and legal efforts to protect personal data privacy. Our technology and law must now weigh the benefits of the Information Age against both Big Brother and the Panopticon.

"We know the principle: at the periphery, an annular building; at the center, a tower; this tower is pierced with wide windows that open onto the inner side of the ring; the peripheric building is divided into cells, each of which extends the whole width of the building; they have two windows, one on the inside, corresponding to the windows on the tower; the other, on the outside, allows the light to cross the cell from one end to the other. All that is needed, then, is to place a supervisor in a central tower and to confine in each cell a madman, someone sick, someone condemned, a worker, or a schoolboy. By the effect of backlighting, one can observe from the tower, standing out precisely against the light, the small captive silhouettes in the cells of the periphery. They are like so many cages, so many small theatres, in which each actor is alone, perfectly individualized and constantly visible."

"The fundamental advantage of the Panopticon is so evident that one is in danger of obscuring it in the desire to prove it. To be incessantly under the eyes of the inspector is to lose in effect the power to do evil and almost the thought of wanting to do it."

"[A]n investigation that would be extended without limit to a meticulous and ever more analytical observation, a judgment that would at the same time be the constitution of a file that was never closed, the calculated leniency of a penalty that would be interlaced with the ruthless curiosity of an examination..."

Here I will suggest technological and legal bulwarks against an emerging panoptic dataveillance. In particular, I will review American data privacy law, concluding that in general it is inadequate and unprincipled.

Public key encryption technology offers a technological response to some important aspects of the panoptic society. Philip Zimmerman's publicly distributable encryption program, PGP, implements the RSA encryption standard.

I think if one reads Orwell and Huxley carefully, one realizes that '1984' is a state of mind. In the past, dictatorships always have come with hobnailed boots and tanks and machine-guns, but a dictatorship of dossiers, a dictatorship of data banks can be just as repressive, just as chilling and just as debilitating on our constitutional protections.

The law characterizes the claim for control of the collection and disclosure of personal information as a right to "privacy." This right to data privacy, however, should be distinguished from another legal right also characterized as a right to "privacy:" the right of autonomy, or the ability to control intimate decisions (e.g., marriage, child-bearing, sex, pregnancy). While the right of autonomy is a "fundamental right" entitled to the protection of the federal constitution's Fourteenth Amendment, little constitutional or tort law protection exists for data privacy. What protection exists is statutory, as Congress and (to a lesser extent) state legislatures have stepped in to fill what appears to be a gap.

Congress has also addressed the problem of "matching" one governmental database against another with a general statute. The Computer Matching and Privacy Protection Act of 1988 regulates such database matching, requiring reports by agencies that do match records, and simultaneously setting up procedural requirements for notifying individuals of their right to a hearing before the termination of federal benefits. Database matching is not prohibited, however, because it increases the efficiency of the federal government.

Statutes restrict the release of information pertaining to an individual's prior treatment in an alcohol treatment [40] or drug rehabilitation [41] program, and the Department of Health and Human Services is required to protect social security records.

In summary, except where federal government information gathering is concerned, the law of personal data protection is spotty and reactionary. [52] Federal and state legislatures are essentially putting out fires, rather than pursuing any principled pattern of data privacy legislation.

Identity theft involves the wrongful acquiring and use of an individual's personal information in order to impersonate him or her. Typically, stolen information includes, name, address, telephone number, social security number, driver's license number, credit card numbers, bank account numbers, mother's maiden name, PINs, telephone calling card numbers, birth certificates, and passports. The identity thief uses various combinations of these pieces of information to buy goods, take financial accounts, open new accounts, divert mail, apply for loans, apply for credit cards, acquire employment, rent apartments, all in the victim's name.

To obtain copies of credit reports consumer can contact Equifax, TransUnion, or Experian.34 After obtaining a copy of their credit report consumers should look for unknown accounts, changes of address, or other wrong information.

Recordkeeping is essential. Victims should keep a log of all conversations and correspondence, note time spent and expenses incurred, confirm conversations in writing, send all correspondence by certified mail (return receipt requested), and keep copies of everything. There are many other agencies to be notified, depending on the victim's situation and the extent of the theft.

Cyber Hacking is an act punishable only when the hacker caused serious consequence or damage. For example, a Massachusetts teen-ager was accused of crippling an airport control tower has become the first juvenile charged in federal court with computer hacking.

If a judge accepts the plea bargain, the perpetrator will get two years' probation, a fine and community service. He will also be banned from using a computer with a modem for two years. The boy broke into a Bell Atlantic computer system on March 10, 1997, causing a system crash that knocked out power at Worcester Airport. Communication between the tower and aircraft was disrupted for six hours.

A CyberTerrorist will remotely access the processing control systems of a cereal manufacturer, change the levels of iron supplement, and sicken and kill the children of a nation enjoying their food. That CyberTerrorist will then perform similar remote alterations at a processor of infant formula.

A CyberTerrorist will place a number of computerized bombs around a city, all simultaneously transmitting unique numeric patterns, each bomb receiving each other's pattern. If bomb one stops transmitting, all the bombs detonate simultaneously. 1) the CyberTerrorist does not have to be strapped to any of these bombs; 2) no large truck is required; 3) the number of bombs and urban dispersion are extensive; 4) the encrypted patterns cannot be predicted and matched through alternate transmission; and 5) the number of bombs prevents disarming them all simultaneously. The bombs will detonate.

A CyberTerrorist will disrupt the banks, the international financial transactions, the stock exchanges. The people of a country will lose all confidence in the economic system. A CyberTerrorist does not even attempt to gain entry to the building since otherwise arrest would be immediate.

A CyberTerrorist will attack the next generation of air traffic control systems, and collide two large civilian aircraft. This is a realistic scenario, since the CyberTerrorist will also crack the aircraft's in-cockpit sensors.

While the Internet bred some tough cyber crimes, it also provides a potentially efficient vehicle for the global community to fight crimes, including cyber crimes. The following organizations have taken the initiative to utilize the Internet as the virtual battleground to stimulate and encourage international cooperation on crime control.

Centre for the Prevention of Crime(ICPC) is an international non governmental organization created with the mission of assisting cities and countries to reduce delinquency, violent crime and insecurity. It collaborates with local, national, regional and specialized entities to harness prevention experience and know how from around the world to solve local crime problems.

Homicide Investigators Association asks, Anyone, anywhere who believes they have information pertaining to a homicide investigation may give the information to them, with total anonymity. That information will then be passed on to the proper authorities through the I.H.I.A. network.

Above are just some examples found on the Internet. Although most of these websites of international organizations are built or used for the purposes of education, information exchange or crimes data reporting and have very limited binding effect on actual law enforcement, they are playing a important role calling for the need for international effort or cooperation on crime control as the Internet increasingly significant communication media in the global community.

The Internet makes it harder for the prosecution of crimes. As stated in Part II, crimes on the Internet can be committed without national boundary limits, which creates a series of problems to the criminal justice systems in all countries. For example, there may be jurisdictional disputes among the country where the criminal information was transmitted, the country where the service provider is located, the country where the criminal information is received and the country where the offender/suspect is found or caught. And the jurisdictional problem become more complicated and unsolved if the criminal information was transmitted from several countries, or the criminal information is simultaneously received by several countries or the offenders are in different countries. Even the jurisdictional issue is solved, the prosecution may still have problem gathering sufficient evidence (digital evidence) to convict the offender beyond reasonable doubt. Just for this reason, the international nature of the Internet creates a great deed for international cooperation on crime control.

Proposal for a International Criminal Court that dealt with cybercrimes sounds like a good idea and noteworthy efforts, but how practical or realistic it would be is still a question. In order to have international justice, the International Criminal Court that is to be adopted must have universal powers, i.e. the court must be empowered the exclusive jurisdiction when the international crimes was committed on the Internet. This has been for a long time an unsolved issue in the international community. But the effort to establish such a court is no doubt one of the approaches for international cooperation on fighting crimes.

It has 185 members. Although it does not legislate like a national parliament or congress, representatives of almost all countries of the world -large and small, rich and poor, with varying political views and social systems can have a voice and vote in shaping the policies of the international community. The UN will still be an ideal existing international organization where the Internet international cooperation on crime control may take place. In response to the rapid development of the Internet and the existing or potential serious problems of high tech crimes created by the advent of the Internet, The UN should take the initiative and effort to facilitate or undertake the international cooperation on crime control.

Establish a specialized law enforcement agency, like its existing 14 specialized agencies, which undertakes the responsibilities of general law enforcement, for example, investigating complex international crimes, including cybercrimes, that go beyond the national borders or the jurisdiction of each member state, extraditing criminals per the request from members, coordinating any law enforcement affairs; even prosecuting international criminals (those not falling within any specific jurisdiction) before the International Court of Justice, providing law enforcement information exchange services to member nations.

Set up a global law enforcement website for the global community to report crimes, provide investigation clues, notify whereabouts of notorious criminals, etc.. The law enforcement agency's information unit shall timely forward the information to respective nation or even dispatch personnel within its authority to apprehend the suspect. The site will work mainly as the Information Exchange Hub or Channel on the Internet so that member nations' law enforcement agencies can obtain extra useful information from all outside sources, the world citizens ( individuals ) also can freely visit the portion of the Information Hub that is open to the public and communicate freely with the Hub.

Charter) to include new terms such as "Internet", "Cyber Crimes" in order to adapt to the new wave of the high technology revolution. Revising related extradition treaties to cover crimes committed on the Internet making some relatively common cyber crimes extraditable crimes.

Respect for national sovereignty - Co-operation is based on actions taken by the police forces in the various Member States, operating within their own national boundaries and in accordance with their own national laws.

Enforcement of ordinary criminal law - The Organization's field of activity is limited to crime prevention and law enforcement in connection with ordinary criminal offenses. This is the only basis on which there can be agreement between all Member States.

The uncontrollable Internet brings the global community together and closer. The Internet "without national boundary" does not belong to any single organization or country. The development of the Internet also goes beyond the control of any organization or country. Just because of the unique nature of the Internet, the need for international cooperation on crime control on the Internet has come on the agenda for the global community to action. A new era for international cooperation has come with the development of the Internet. The International cooperation will create an environment where international dialogue, remedies and solutions can be achieved between the global communities, and will educate and create awareness of the vulnerabilities to cybercrime for the ultimate protection against any financial, intellectual property loss and even loss of human lives; International cooperation will certainly provide an international network of expertise from the global communities where talent and broad-based practical knowledge and skill is immediately accessible to all members of the community.

"thrive" with it unless the international community does not work together to control it. In seeking solutions to the problems, the international community should strive for maximizing cooperation between nations in order to address the potential for tremendous economic losses and the general threat to the safety, privacy and other fundamental values that near-instantaneous cross-border electronic transactions may create. A feasible scheme, taking into account the international reality, suggests that the United Nations take the initiative to formally launch the international cooperation program on crime control on the Internet although there are some international organizations building their own websites educating and encouraging the community to fighting crimes through the Internet. The United Nations can establish a specialized law enforcement agency in charge of controlling crimes on the Internet, modifying relevant documents to include and punish cyber crimes. Before a specialized law enforcement agency comes to work, the international community can turn to the International Criminal Police Organization (Interpol) for alternative solutions, although Interpol also has to amend its constitution to cover such new terms as Internet, Cybercrimes.

The internet is changing the way the world does business at a mind numbing pace. Traditional commercial law is outdated and can not be efficiently applied to the world of e-commerce. This paper takes a glimpse at two aspects of internet business which are currently under scrutiny by consumer advocates and policy makers. Taxation of internet revenue is our first subject of analysis, followed by an examination of proposed Article 2B of the Uniform Commercial Code.

On the other hand, there are several proposals to keep the Internet a free trade environment because it will promote more business worldwide. In addition, some people believe free trade is good because the countries divide their labors, each producing the things that they are better at, whether absolutely or relatively, and gains grow cumulatively. The following are some developments in the area of e-commerce taxation at the interstate and international level.

Many states currently seek to tax online transactions such as the sale of goods or other digital content. It is clear that a state may impose such a tax on a buyer residing within the state. However, the logistics of ensuring that every buyer remits such a tax to the state is unmanageable.

As the result, states seek to require the vendor to collect the tax from the buyer and then pay it to the state. If the vendor is located within the state, there is no problem. But when the buyer engages in an online transaction with an out-of-state vendor, a state does not have the power to require an out-of state vendor to collect and pay tax on transactions with its residents unless the vendor has physical presence in the state.

Like in the case of mail-order, a state may impose a tax on an online transaction. However, there must be some connection between the tax payer or the taxpayer's activities and the state that is sufficient to allow the state to exercise jurisdiction over the person. This connection called nexus. Some areas of tax law require that a person be physically present before nexus is established. 3 In 1992, in the case of Quill Corporation v. North Dakota, 4 the U.S. Supreme Court addressed the issue of whether North Dakota could require an out-of-state vendor to collect tax on mail-order sales made to its residents. In that case, the vendor sold office products to North Dakota residents through mail order and over the telephone. The vendor refused to collect tax on its sales to customers in North Dakota because it felt it did not have sufficient nexus with the state. North Dakota argued that the vendor did have a sufficient business connection because it was taking full advantage of the business market that the state had nurtured.

The Act prohibits a state or local government from imposing, assessing, or attempting to collect any tax or fee on the Internet or interactive computer services or on their use. It preserves state and local taxing authority with respect to income, license, and sales taxes.

Finance Committee's version of the bill differs significantly from those passed by the House and by the Senate Commerce Committee. The House version calls for a three-year moratorium, while the Senate Commerce Committee's version would keep the six-year moratorium. Both the House and the Senate Commerce Committee versions would block states from citing the presence of computer servers to establish a company's physical presence within a state. The Senate Finance Committee's version is silent on this issue.

"Since the U.S. is now the world leader in provision of Internet, it is naturally interested in the WTO maintaining the present system of duty-free international commerce. One argument of the U.S. is that if global telephone and fax services are not subjected to payment of import duties, why should international e-commerce not be exempt from tariffs. But others feel that the issue is not so simple and straightforward. If no customs duty is now imposed on cross-border e-commerce, this is not because governments have decided not to, but because they are yet to cope with rapidly changing technology. The purchase and sale of digitalised information may seem like a new transaction, but it could be seen as either a service (medical diagnosis, for example) or a physical product (a book in electronic form). In many cases, such goods and services are already covered by existing WTO rules on tariffs." 17 The U.S. administration has strongly proposed a free trade environment on the Internet. The following is an extract from A Framework For Global Electronic Commerce by President William J. Clinton and Vice President Albert Gore, Jr.

"For over 50 years, nations have negotiated tariff reductions because they have recognized that the economies and citizens of all nations benefit from freer trade. Given this recognition, and because the Internet is truly a global medium, it makes little sense to introduce tariffs on goods and services delivered over the Internet.

Thus, while it remains possible to administer tariffs for products ordered over the Internet but ultimately delivered via surface or air transport, the structure of the Internet makes it difficult to do so when the product or service is delivered electronically.

In addition, the United States believes that no new taxes should be imposed on Internet commerce. The taxation of commerce conducted over the Internet should be consistent with the established principles of international taxation, should avoid inconsistent national tax jurisdictions and double taxation, and should be simple to administer and easy to understand.

The system should be simple and transparent. It should be capable of capturing the overwhelming majority of appropriate revenues, be easy to implement, and minimize burdensome record keeping and costs for all parties.

Any such taxation system will have to accomplish these goals in the context of the Internet's special characteristics -- the potential anonymity of buyer and seller, the capacity for multiple small transactions, and the difficulty of associating online activities with physically defined locations.

To achieve global consensus on this approach, the United States, through the Treasury Department, is participating in discussions on the taxation of electronic commerce through the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD), the primary forum for cooperation in international taxation.

The Administration believes that the same broad principles applicable to international taxation, such as not hindering the growth of electronic commerce and neutrality between conventional and electronic commerce, should be applied to subfederal taxation. No new taxes should be applied to electronic commerce, and states should coordinate their allocation of income derived from electronic commerce. Of course, implementation of these principles may differ at the subfederal level where indirect taxation plays a larger role.

From a recent report, "World Trade Organisation (WTO) members have agreed not to impose tariff on international electronic commerce. They have also agreed to develop a plan to deal with electronic commerce over the Internet.

In conclusion, the Congress and the WTO have taken the standstill position on the Internet taxation issue. The Congress and WTO need more time to study of the impact of the online business and to develop a taxation system that is more suitable to the ecommerce. Therefore, anyone doing business electronically should review the statutes, regulations, rulings and case law of each jurisdiction to determine whether it has nexus with that jurisdiction and whether its activities are subject to tax.

Throughout the UCC 2B drafting process consumer advocates have complained about unfair provisions of the rule. As recently as March 10, 1998 attorney Todd Paglia from Ralph Nader's Consumer Project on Technology, wrote, "Article 2B suffers from a strong software industry/publisher bias. First time observers attending the 2B process often have the same reaction: it seems like the industry is getting together to write its own law." 23Contrary to this opinion shared by lawyers and journalists about art. 2B, I discovered that most of their concerns were evaluated and the proposed law has been changed accordingly.

Carol Morrissey is concerned that consumer protections will be compromised not only by the inconspicuous nature of the licenses but also if manufacturer's use shrinkwrap licenses to limit a product's warranty. Traditionally, under the UCC a seller can disclaim implied warranties (such as an implied warranty that this product is fit for the purpose designed) but the disclaimer must be conspicuous. When software is purchased over the telephone or on the internet, it is difficult to make the disclaimer conspicuous because the consumer never sees the product before it is purchased. The drafters of art. 2B therefore contemplated dropping the conspicuous requirement. If done however, consumer advocates argued that the right to disclaim implied warranties should also be dropped. By the end of 1997 the draft no longer allowed manufacturer's to disclaim implied warranties in mass-market contracts.

Article 2B permits a licensor to disclaim implied warranties in most situations but regulates its right to do so in mass-market licenses, which are not negotiated. In mass-market transactions, which more closely resemble the purchase of goods, Article 2B applies the perfect tender rule and the implied warranties of merchantability and fitness for ordinary purpose.

From shrinkwrap licenses to conflict of law, the UCC Article 2B drafting process is a prime example of how consumers, manufacturers, and legislators can work together to forge efficient rules for internet commerce. The sale of information products is being regulated in a fair, and open manner.

This paper has briefly touched on a few of the unique issues presented by this task. It also notes the effective way in which the UCC drafters are creating cyberlaw. Committees are listening to the concerns of all involved and deliberate, careful drafting has produced a document that might meet those needs. As intimidating as the task may seem, it is necessary to halt the potential chaos that the internet invites.

List if the institution is involved in research with military or nuclear applications. The fact that an individual or company appears on the Entity List means a license is required to export to that entity, regardless of the product or service, regardless of the country where the entity is located. The CCL entry will also refer to applicable licensing exceptions and their locations within the regulations.

Allowing criminals to "communicate with impunity, safe from wiretaps and other forms of surveillance," certainly will interfere with law enforcement efforts. These very considerations were the reason that, until recently, cryptography was classified under export law as a munition and its export generally prohibited pursuant to the Arms Export Control Act.

By restricting encryption technology exports, current U.S. regulations restrict the export of all software applications that contain encryption technology as a secondary, but important, marketing component.

The SAFE Act would place the key with some third party apart from law enforcement or manufacturers. Neither side will be satisfied with this proposal, which offers neither quick access to law enforcement in case of emergency, nor restricts the number of parties with the ability to decrypt ciphertext.

Like the original SAFE Act, the bill would allow the export of encryption software generally already available abroad without the necessity for a key recovery program. The bill also proposes a one-time review for all encryption software exports, the establishment of a center for law enforcement to research encryption issues (Net Center), and the classification as a felony of any crime-related use of encryption. Although the elimination of the key recovery requirement will appeal to software manufacturers, the establishment of a Net Center, the National Electronic Technology Center, fails to provide any resolution to the issues in conflict. To effectively address the concerns of law enforcement, the center's activities would have to focus on cracking strong encryption algorithms. If the Center is successful in cracking the codes, the concern of commercial users and software developers about the privacy of electronic communication will be renewed. The E-Privacy converts an issue properly resolved by the legislative body representing the interests of all U.S. citizens, to a race between the scientists employed by the government and those employed by the software industry.

However, the software developer's operator action framework provides no better solution. U.S. government decision-makers are, at least, ultimately answerable to the people, not the Board of Directors. Power is not necessarily less dangerous when entrusted to a coalition of already powerful corporations than when it is entrusted to a government. Releasing strong encryption to financial institutions that have demonstrated cooperative efforts to combat crime effectively rewards responsibility with privacy and all its market advantages. Policymakers should endeavor to incorporate the elements of multilateral cooperation and self-regulation into future laws and regulations in order to achieve effective, lasting solutions.

In April 1998, the FCC issued a decision on whether the emerging technology of Internet telephony was subject to the same taxes and regulation as regular long distance telephone companies.  Although seemingly an obscure opinion, a closer look at the decision, and the two year battle waged before it was rendered, may reveal the way in which the Internet and the endless services it provides is subject to regulation in the future.

In fact, the decision and the politics surrounding it also demonstrate the complexity of the issues involved in any regulation of this new industry.  At first blush, in fact, it is surprising to see such power players involved in such a seemingly small fight.  In an industry which garnered less than one half of one percent of the market before the decision, the FCC quickly saw intense pressure not only from consumers and big business on both sides of the fence, but also felt the squeeze from numerous influential Congressmen as well as the White House.  The controversy, over a new technology which allows users to make cheap long distance calls over the Internet, if nothing else, reveals the high stakes involved in decisions regarding Internet business.

It is one the first attempts to regulate the Internet and although the FCC's pronouncement has far from settled the matter, a study of the fight as well as the legal conclusions that resulted may shed some light as to how futures battles will be waged and won.

Telephony is a word used to describe the new technology that allows users to place real time long distance phone calls over the Internet system.  Sound is just another form of data that can be sent over the Internet.  It can be digitally transferred into data packets just like the words from an e-mail message.  Of course, sound sent over the Internet, like video, requires much more bandwidth (or space) than simple written transmissions.  In most cases The telephony call is routed through a local telephone switch over the Internet and back out over a local switch on the other end.  Users can place a call from anywhere in the world and yet only be charged the price of a local call.

Before a regulated long distance carrier can offer telecommunications services to the public, they must be certified by and pay tariffs to the FCC and state regulatory commissions.  They are subject to the rules of the 1934 Communications Act and must pay filing fees and annual dues on a state and federal level to remain in business.  ACTA argued that a two tier system of rates where one industry had a decidedly financial and regulatory advantage over the other would lead to a deterioration of the telecommunications infrastructure maintained by the more burdened regulated carriers.

VON also waged an effective media campaign.  There was quickly a landslide of protest over the proposed regulation and in the flurry of controversy that followed, the Commission quietly put the issue of telephony regulations on a back burner until 1998 when ACTA again brought the petition to the FCC's attention.

At the heart of the debate over telephony was the telephone industries required contributions to the Universal Fund.  The Universal Fund is a tax on the industry that helps assure affordable service for all US citizens by paying for telephone infrastructure in rural and hard to reach areas.  The goal of universal service is one of the founding mandates of the FCC and they consider it a extremely important issue.  The cost of the service is significant and can easily double the price of a long distance call.  The Universal Service obligation is currently split with states paying 75 per cent and the federal government picking up the remaining 25 per cent.

More importantly, however, ACTA pointed to the 1996 Telecommunications Act and said the providers of long distance Internet services should be classified as interstate telecommunications carriers under the statute and therefore subject to the regulation requirements.

VON also pointed out that section 223(e) states 'nothing in this section [concerning restrictions on obscene communications via telephone facilities or interactive computer services] shall be construed to treat interactive computer services as common carriers or telecommunication carriers' 47 U.S.C. 223 9(e)(6).

VON thought the argument that the FCC had authority to regulate the telephony software manufacturers was absurd.  One commentator explained "its like arguing that instead of regulating FedEx or Airborn Express like the postal service, we should instead regulate the manufacturer of mail boxes." 19/VON pushed hard to get the FCC to reject the ACTA petition.

Although only a narrow class of providers of telephony have been carved from the opinion that may be subject to FCC regulation, the door has been opened for regulation.  The FCC has said that while the Telecommunications Act of 1996 clearly intended that information services should not be regulated, it has in the same sentence said that if a service being provided acts exactly like other regulated industries, then they have the authority to regulate it.

Also significant, was the fact that the FCC chose not to address the issue of telephony's effect on the limited resources of the net.  The Commission stated that the concern over bandwidth was a legitimate one, but that the matter was already under consideration in the Access Reform Hearings. 26a/ The significance of this issue remaining alive should not be underestimated.  The FCC has initiated many far reaching policies in the television, radio and other industries in the name of limited spectrum.  The argument has cut both ways as the changing technologies have warranted.  The vast power of the policy is demonstrated in the extreme regulation of the infant cable industry in the early 70's versus the subsequent almost total de-regulation of the industry a decade later as channel capabilities improved.

Time will tell if the money generated from the line charges (especially those that ISPs now must indirectly pay as they use telecommunications carriers to increase capacity) will make up for the loss of monies as the market shifts to telephony carriers.  30/The FCC as well as congress will need to find a way to balance the two very important policy initiatives of supporting universal access for all citizens and keeping the Internet free from regulation.

Telephony remains unregulated today because of the intense pressures on the FCC from a wide variety of interested parties.  ACTA's petition contained legitimate legal arguments that fell only in the face of the overwhelming counter arguments in regards to policy.  The battle that VON waged was won in the media and on the hill, not in the courtroom.  It is a battle, however, that leaves immense power to decide the fate of the telephony industry in the hands of an administrative agency.  It is an important lesson on how fights over the regulation of the Internet will be played in the future and a reminder of how quickly those decisions can be changed with a new pronouncement of administrative policy.

It is significant that, in the end, the decision not to regulate telephony was based on policy and not legality.  From a legal sense, the FCC did not exempt the new technology from regulation.  Clearly the FCC has left the decision to regulate the industry in its discretion.  A challenge to telephony regulation in court might encounter an uphill battle because, on the face of the statute, some forms of telephony can clearly be considered telecommunications service.  This fact, combined with the traditional deference the court has given administrative agencies show that battles in this industry might be better waged in the congress than at the courthouse.

Insurance in the United States has traditionally been regulated at the state level. Until earlier this century, in fact, the federal government did not have the Constitutional authority to regulate insurance, since insurance was not a power delegated to it under the Constitution, and the Supreme Court had held that insurance was not considered interstate commerce.

Under the McCarran-Ferguson Act, Congress left virtually all insurance regulation up to the individual states.1 Section 1012 of McCarran-Ferguson contains an extremely strong presumption in favor of state regulation, requiring that any federal law that does not explicitly state it applies to insurance is pre-empted by applicable state insurance regulations. Although there have been some recent efforts to federalize the regulation of automobile insurance, (see, e.g. the recently proposed Auto Choice Reform Act2, which would superimpose a federally imposed tort election for personal automobile insurance) this area of law continues to be regulated almost exclusively on the state level.

Every state regulates insurance differently, but most have the same basic concerns: financially secure insurers who are complying with state regulations and a knowledgeable sales force that is subject to state regulation and discipline. Here is a broad overview of how most states view their role in insurance regulation, with links to the Utah Insurance Department's webpage for demonstrative purposes. Note that individual state regulations do vary substantially from state to state.

In order to obtain an agent's license one must take and pass an insurance exam, pass a background check, and pay the registration fee. In many cases, a prospective agent must have a sponsoring company. The meaning of "sell insurance" is often not clearly defined, but usually includes soliciting insurance, describing coverage, binding coverage, and accepting insurance premiums.

All states have some process under which companies must file the rates they want to use and the policy forms (i.e. the insurance contracts) they want to issue. Automobile insurers generally get more scrutiny here than other insurers due to the mandatory nature of automobile insurance. State requirements vary from laissez-faire (automobile rates in Wyoming need not be filed at all) to state mandated (policy forms in Texas must conform to statutory language; rates in Massachusetts are set by the state). This is also where Departments make sure that coverage offerings conform with specific state statutory requirements. For example, most states require that drivers purchase Bodily Injury (insurance for personal injuries one causes to others) and Property Damage (insurance for property damage one causes), but Florida has adopted a "no-fault" insurance model that requires that all drivers purchase Personal Injury Protection (insurance for people in the driver's car) and Property Damage. State coverage definitions vary substantially from state to state.

There are basically three ways that insurers sell automobile insurance in the United States today. Most companies use agents - licensed sales people that are not company employees. Direct writers such as State Farm, Allstate and Nationwide use "captive" agency forces, meaning that their agency contracts require exclusivity (i.e. the agent cannot contract with any other insurance company) as a condition of getting the contract. In return, direct writers generally help pay some part of the agent's overhead, provide much stronger advertising and "brand" recognition, and usually pay large new business commissions (but smaller renewal commissions).

These companies contract with agents like the direct writers, but their agents are free to contract with multiple companies. Generally, these insurers compensate their agents on a straight commission (a percentage of sales) of all insurance the agent sells, whether it was new business or renewal.

State legislatures and state insurance departments have not addressed the issue of online automobile insurance sales. A comprehensive search of all 50 states' Insurance Related Regulations3 revealed only 18 documents that contained the word "internet" and pertained to any kind of insurance. Of these 18 documents, six pertain to life & health insurance, two to surplus lines insurance, one to workers' compensation insurance, and one pertains to residential property insurance. Of the remaining eight documents, all eight were insurance department bulletins.

There were no insurance statutes containing the word "internet" and no administrative regulations addressing insurance that contained the word "internet". Of the eight bulletins, the only one that directly addresses any of the legal issues discussed herein is Administrative Letter 1997-1"Insurance activities requiring persons to be licensed", published by the Virginia Bureau of Insurance on March 10th of 1997.

The code further clarifies that acting as an agent means, ". . .soliciting, negotiating, procuring or effecting contracts of insurance. . ." as well as "receiving or sharing, directly or indirectly, any commission or other valuable consideration arising therefrom". As noted above, the Virginia Commissioner of Insurance, Alfred W. Gross, issued a bulletin in March of 1997, Administrative Letter 1997-1, attempting to clarify who needs to licensed. In his bulletin, he states, "We have, over the years, noted that a number of insurers and agencies, especially large agencies located outside of Virginia. . . do not appear to be aware of this licensing requirement."

Lastly, Commissioner Gross states that Virginia takes ". . . the position that those who, on behalf of an insurer, are making or receiving telephone calls or sending or receiving telefaxes, or utilizing the internet, must, if they fall within the parameters set forth in this administrative letter, be properly licensed and appointed in Virginia, regardless of whether they reside in Virginia." (Emphasis added). There is no attempt to define what constitutes "utilizing the internet" in this context.

Florida, for example, requires every application for insurance to have the agent's state licensing number on the application of insurance. To ensure compliance with this regulation, presumably the agent's license number would have to appear on the quote screen of a web page and on any print-out that was available. Other states may require that an agent's license number appear on business cards and printed advertisements, but these statutes do not address whether electronic advertisements are covered by these requirements.

Historically, all states required policies of insurance to be "countersigned" by an authorized resident agent. This countersignature requirement was designed to make sure that the policy complied with the local rules and laws and that the policy and process had been properly explained to the insured. With the advent of Long Arm Statutes, however, and changes in technology, most states have either removed their countersignature requirements, or specifically allow "countersignature in blank" or "countersignature by facsimile". This change allows the policy to be generated by an insurer's computer and mailed or transmitted directly to the insured, without the additional cost and time of mailing the policy to a local agent for his or her signature and remailing to the insured. About ten states, however, still retain "wet countersignature" laws requiring an original, hand signed countersignature for a policy to be properly valid. Georgia, for example, recently amended its countersignature law, but still requires a wet countersignature if the company is an independent agency company. This means that the ultimate "electronic" transaction including returning a file with the final contract in it to the insured would not be possible under current Georgia law.

Many insurers are starting to rate or underwrite automobile policies based on credit attributes of the insured. For example, an applicant who holds a credit card and has no bankruptcies on his or record in the last seven years may receive a lower rate. Many insurers are also using "credit scores" to predict loss history. These scores are usually bought from a third party vendor, such as Fair Isaac, and are designed to predict automobile insurance loss propensity based on a complicated analysis of the insured's credit attributes.

When one goes online with Progressive and purchase an automobile insurance policy, (see below) it will ask the prospective customer for his or her social security number (along with a lot of other information that may not seem directly related to automobile insurance, like whether or not the inquirer is a college graduate). Progressive asks for a social security number for at least two reasons - it will order a credit report and a credit score, and the major fraud database maintained by the National Insurance Crime Bureau is indexed by social security number.

A related issue, but one on which there is little information available, is whether or not Progressive, and other companies, should be able to use the information they collect online in their marketing analyses. When someone goes online and get a quote from Progressive, Progressive collects and saves all the information that it asks for. Progressive will then use that information in their competitive analysis, because it gives them an accurate, current snapshot of the automobile insurance market.

Web Site. Note that D. Brown identifies the agency name, address, phone number, fax number, email address, and the name of at least one principle owner. A prospective customer has more than enough information to inquiry about the agency's status with an insurance department or Better Business Bureau. Note also that D. Brown makes it clear that it will only provide quotes in Oregon or Washington State, presumably because those are the only two states where it holds licenses.

Note that Progressive is easily identifiable and the web-surfer knows who he or she is dealing with. Progressive's web-page may not comply with agency licensing laws, however, and definitely would not comply with a wet countersignature law. Progressive also lets current insureds and agents access their information online, which is another innovative use of the internet.

This service provides instantaneous premium comparisons for dozens of companies in California only. The web-site makes fairly clear that it does not represent all these companies or sell insurance, but it makes no attempt to distinguish among various policy forms, e.g. and the quotes may therefore be misleading.

The National Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC) should exert leadership in this area of insurance regulation. The NAIC is an organization of state insurance regulators that "provides a forum for the development of uniform policy when uniformity is appropriate."

Due to the unique jurisdictional and control issues surrounding the internet, uniformity of state regulation is appropriate and highly desirable. Other areas of the law that present unique jurisdictional and related issues, such as the regulation of interstate commerce and child support enforcement have been successfully and uniformly regulated by the states through the use of model laws. (See the UCC and the UIFSA, respectively).

The NAIC has an accreditation process which is designed to encourage states to implement its model laws. It has been most active in providing model laws in the area of insurer solvency regulation, an important issue that clearly crosses state lines. In reality, the NAIC has proven largely ineffective at its attempts to promote uniform regulation, however, and some federal involvement is probably necessary in order to accomplish uniform rules among the states.

Substantive issues underlying automobile insurance regulation, such as what limits of insurance are required, what types of coverages are required, and other substantive law issues should be left to the individual states.

Unfortunately, the NAIC has not yet taken a leadership role in this area. In March of 1998 it issued a White Paper entitled "The Marketing of Insurance Over the Internet". Many of the issues addressed above were discussed in the White Paper, which ironically is not available on-line.

The White Paper provides 16 recommendations, none of which involve a model law. The White Paper does recognize that some ". . . jurisdictions have enacted [other] statutes or regulations that tend to limit the viability or efficiency of using the Internet as a distribution channel because the statues or regulations introduce logistical or other barriers." and specifically mentions "wet" countersignature laws. (Conclusion 9, p. 29).

There is no question that pornography is available on the Internet. There is also no question that children have access to this material. How society addresses this unfortunate reality is at the heart of the cyberporn debate. While some believe the most effective way to deal with this problem is through regulation of the Internet, others believe the responsibility of shielding children from cyberporn rests with the parents.

With the proliferation of pornography on the Internet, and children's increased access to the Internet at schools, libraries, and at home, Congress has begun to assert its lawmaking powers towards pornography providers on the Internet. Congress's first major attempt at regulating pornography ran into a roadblock known as the Constitution.

Section (a) prohibited the knowing transmission of obscene or indecent messages to any recipient under the age of 18 years. Section (d) prohibited the knowing sending or displaying of patently offensive messages in a manner that is available to a person under the age of 18.

Following the Supreme Court's finding that the CDA was unconstitutional, both Congress and many states have been busy writing new laws to regulate pornographic and other material on the internet. Although the Senate has passed two bills dealing with the subject, Congress as a whole has not passed any legislation. Many civil libertarian groups such as the American Civil Liberties Union (ACLU) and the Electronic Frontier Foundation (EFF) have already denounced the legislation saying it flies in the face of the Supreme Court's ruling and will restrict Constitutionally protected free speech on the Internet (16).

Bill for the departments of Commerce, Justice, and State that purport to regulate online content and schools and libraries receiving federal funds for Internet access. The Appropriation Bill was then passed on July 23.

In a press release Senator McCain said, "As Internet use in our schools and libraries continues to grow, children's potential exposure to harmful online content will only increase. Schools and libraries can select the technology that best suits their community standards. The prevention lies, not in censoring what goes onto the Internet, but rather in filtering what comes out of it onto the computers our children use outside the home."

Senator Ernest Hollings (D-SC), a co-sponsor of the bill, said, "This legislation protects children from being exposed to explicit material while they're using the Internet at school or the local library. It gives schools and libraries an added financial incentive to filter children's access to the Internet when children are not under parental supervision. We must tackle this problem of children innocently stumbling onto indecent material while using the web for legitimate research purposes or face dire consequences."

The letter from the ACLU and EFF also addressed this bill. The organizations argued that under Reno v. ACLU, the censorship that the blocking software creates is a blatant violation of the First Amendment. The software blocks access to valuable, protected online speech about such topics as AIDS, safe sex, news articles, religious groups, and gay and lesbian issues.

Additionally, they stated in the letter that the bill is contrary to public policy. They said that parents and teachers should provide guidance to children about material on the Internet, not he government. Blocking software puts into the hands of the manufacturer what should be restricted, instead of allowing parents, teachers, and librarians the decision of what is acceptable.

Between Congress's desire to regulate the Internet and to protect children from harmful material and the ACLU's demand for First Amendment free speech rights, an ongoing battle has ensued and is likely not to be settled anytime soon. The law has always been slow to develop into a happy medium that all sides can agree to, and such will be the case here. Although more government regulation is not necessarily better, a completely unrestricted internet may not be in the best interest of children, who already are bombarded through other mediums with more adult issues and situations than previous generations.

Blocking software programs are very distinct. Some filtering programs block specific Web sites while others enable parents to choose the material they want to filter out. Given the variety and features available with blocking software, parents may want to familiarize themselves with what the market has to offer before making a selection.

The Internet can be a safe or dangerous haven for children. Our government, while legitimately concerned about the well-being of our nation's children, has failed to realize the implications of passing laws which seek to restrict our First Amendment rights to freedom of speech and expression. Although the Supreme Court has spoken on this issue and upheld the transmission of cyberporn as constitutionally protected free speech, federal, state and local governments continue to push for more legislation in order to curtail cyberporn.

A website sponsor must be concerned with specifying and receiving the deliverable desired, retaining rights of ownership and transferability, and avoiding exposure to liability for misuse of the works of others.

Allowing the chips to fall where they may leave the Sponsor3 of a website in a compromised legal and competitive position. If a Sponsor has not solidified its rights to important elements of the site, additional (and potentially exorbitant) costs may be incurred later, in the event that a need for rights arises.

For example, if a Developer4 or third-party subsequently elects to use a particular graphic in a manner inconsistent with a Sponsor's competitive position, that Sponsor may have to pay the Developer to refrain.

Frequently, a designer specializes in creating web pages, and thus may have a library of content that it uses over and over for different clients -- this can thwart an Sponsor's desire for a competitively unique website.

In Animation Station, the Bulls displayed third-party animated content on its website among other places, when its contract with the third-party copyright holders did not authorize such use. That court held that the plaintiff could fairly bring suit for injury suffered. As one of the Bulls' co-defendants, Starwave Corporation -- the developer of the website, faces action for copyright infringement, unfair competition, and conversion.

Realistically, developers want to use chunks of code over and over, to reduce the time and expense reinventing basic segments of typical website programming. The Contract should create a license in the Sponsor that gives the Sponsor the right to use the software, but not rights of ownership. The Contract should specify portions and types of code for which the copyright will be retained by the Sponsor.

If the code in question is routine, mathematical, and standard, it probably does not pose a competitive threat, but should be reflected as part of the benefit of the Sponsor's bargain, but the Developer will want to use it in later projects.

If the Developer has a contract right to maintain the site, the Sponsor may not be able to move it to another server at will. Without such a clause, a Sponsor that finds itself dissatisfied with the reliability of the web server, for example, would only have to obtain a new host.

This is the most extensive application of telemedicine. Radiologists review X-ray images, sonograms, CAT scans and MRIs that are sent from the patient's hospital or clinic to the physician who may be located at home or at another hospital. This capability is particularly important for small facilities that do not have full-time radiologists on staff.

All sites were supplied with a conference telephone, fax, and freeze-frame transceivers. Evaluation for the project showed that the technology did improve the health care of these remote residents. While it was impossible to calculate the operating costs of the telemedicine network separate from the other functions of the network, some healthcare costs were reduced.

An offer was extended from the United States to the Soviet Union for medical consultation from the site of the disaster in Armenia to several medical centers in the U.S. Under the auspices of the U.S./U.S.S.R Joint Working Group on Space Biology, telemedicine consultations were conducted using one-way video, voice, and facsimile between a medical center in Yerevan, Armenia and four medical centers in the U.S. The program was extended to Ufa, Russia to facilitate burn victims after a terrible railway accident.

The report indicated that state regulation of these issues was necessary because federal protection of medical records is limited to governmental intrusions involving substance abuse and mental health, and the requirement of written consent from individuals in most circumstances to release medical records.

Yet, when a patient is in one state while medical records are transferred to a second state via video imaging, and the interception or tampering of records occurs in a third state, the necessity of federal regulation of transfers of medical records in telemedicine is heightened.

Because of the different state requirements, physicians should verify that their malpractice liability insurer carriers cover telemedicine interaction for any electronic interaction with out-of-state physicians.

This mammoth problem stems from the very simple practice of using only the last two digits of the year rather than the entire four digits. This is an example of saving a little then and having to spend a tremendous amounts of money now. For years, dates in computers have been expressed by using only the last two digits of the year. For example the date 1998 is known in a computer as 98. On January 1, 2000, the computer will read the date as January 1, 1900 because it will only recognize the last two digits of the year date, 00. The computer will not be able to distinguish between the different centuries. Several reasons are offered for the problem.

The main one is the expense of computer space and the need to conserve space on its drives. A compromise was made at the time between the expense of storing all four digits and the need to store all four digits. It was not seen as necessary to use up valuable expensive computer space by storing the entire four-digit date when two digits would be adequate. A second reason is the common accepted practice of indicating dates with two digits rather than all four. Very seldom in our everyday lives is it necessary to distinguish the century. We have assumed the nineteenth century was meant, therefore the 19 before the first two digits, 98, were seldom used.

One effect this will have on our businesses and lives is that the computer will date everything as 1900, rather than 2000. Therefore all date calculations will be incorrect. Examples of this problem which effect our daily lives are the calculation of late payments and interest charges and payments.

Most all computer-based systems will be affected by the coming of the year 2000. The sheer magnitude and widespread nature of the problem will have a tremendious effect on our everyday lives. As examples, traffic lights are programmed by computers, entry into parking lots using debit cards are computer controlled, utilities for our homes and businesses are computer controlled. The list seems to be endless. The expiration of your drivers license, your credit card, when are your bills due or are they 100 years overdue? If someone owns stock in a publicly traded company, what will happen to the company record showing stock ownership? Will the dividend check be mailed properly? Records of social security benefits, other government benefits or retirement benefits will be effected. The year 2000 problem affects each of us. Each of us has a vital interest in its solution.

The first step is to become informed of just how your company will be effected by the problem. Begin with discovering and listing each piece of equipment within the company with its manufacturer and model. Evaluate each piece of equipment to determine just how far it is from being year 2000 compliant.

Also inventory the systems, hardware and software, that may have problems as well as evaluate their effectiveness. Using your inventory list and your priority list, develop a plan as to which systems must be tackled first. The decision is whether to repair the systems or replace them. The company may have enough inside employees with the expertise to handle various parts of the repair. It may be possible that the manufacturer of that equipment at issue is equipped with its specialists to handle the problem involving that piece. And, alas, it may be necessary to employ one or more of the vendors that specialize in year 2000 compliance to work with the computer-based system.

In today's business world, there is much more interdependence between computer-based systems than we might be willing to recognize. If your systems are compliant and there's are not, you still have a problem.

The Board of Directors will be liable for problems arising out of a company's failure to be year 2000 compliant. Generally the Board of Directors has a fiduciary duty to act in the best interests of the company and its shareholders. The Board of Directors has a duty to see that a business's plans are carried out to become year 2000 compliant. The year 2000 problem is a specific and known problem making the directors liable for its resolvment.

Bankers making loans to companies will need to know the status of the company's compliance in order to intelligently and rationally make loans to them. Among other issues, their compliance or plans for such will affect their business stability and profits and therefore their ability to repay loans.

Investment advisors who advise individuals to invest in companies need to know of the company's status in becoming compliant and in turn notify their investment customers. This falls under his duty of due diligence in advising his clients. The investment advisor who advises an individual to invest in a company that he knows or should know is not taking appropriate steps to become year 2000 complient could be liable for mal-practice. The advisor has a duty to investigate the stability of the company he suggests which includes the year 2000 problem. If the advisor fails to adequately inform the investor, mal-practice could be an issue.

Investors in the company have a right under disclosure laws to be made aware of liabilities of the company. Disclose your status in the area of year 2000 compliance and state clearly and honestly where the company stands and what measures are being taken to become year 2000 compliant.

For example, are your software vendors liable for making their software year 2000 compliant? What types of escape clauses are in the contracts you have with them? Also consider those who maintain your software applications and their liability.

Not only is this a problem from the perspective of the company as a business, but from the business as a customer. If you as a customer depend on delivery of products from other companies, you need to be concerned about their compliance so that you will receive the products properly and in a timely fashion. Otherwise you may be liable to your customers for not supplying a finished product because your supplier has a compliance problem. The intertwining of companies in today's world makes compliance of one company dependent on the compliance of other companies.

There are many companies that specialize in addressing and finding solutions to this tremendous problem. These companies are known as vendors and provide products and services to address the problem. www.year2000.com/y2k-vendors.html Management Support Technology publishes a book that profiles over forty vendors and one hundred software programs aimed at solving the problem.

Just as businesses and companies will have a problem at the onset of the year 2000, so will government. The State of Georgia has not been spared this tremendous problem. Its computer-based systems are vulnerable to all the same problems faced by businesses and companies. The problems will be manifested through disruptions of government services such as benefits.

Although the average citizen may be most unhappy with the disruption of benefits, he may not be so intimately unhappy about the disruptions in the different types of tax collections. However in the long run, the inability to collect and process all types of taxes such as income taxes, property taxes, automobile tags and taxes as well as sales tax will have a direct impact on the individual.

The governor of Georgia, Zell Miller, has recommended that the state implement a "fast track" approach to the solving of this problem that includes 152 million dollars allocated to the project. The state has established a Georgia year 2000 office to coordinate the efforts. This office has established standards and criteria for becoming year 2000 compliant.These are listed on the website. The office has also established a scale by which to rate the importance of making different systems year 2000 compliant. The Legislation directly related to the year 2000 compliance project is House Bill 1166 and senate Bill 638. House Bill 1166 provides for supplemental appropriations for the 1998 fiscal year in excess of 152 million dollars for the administration and efforts required to address the Year 2000 computer compliance problem.

Senate Bill 638 protects political subdivisions of the state from liability from failures caused by the Year 2000 problem. Also found at this web site is a list of agency heads as well as the Year 2000 Project manager assigned to that agency.

The Internet promises to become a completely new way of conducting business with 3-D conferencing and 24 hour cyber-cams that transmit pay-per-view images on a continuous basis into your home. Such applications will become more commonplace. The Internet allows the dissemination of ideas and information anywhere in the world cheaply and immediately.

The first category is a form of telecommunication and is taxed similar to existing telecommunication sales. The second category is traditional remote sales, with the only difference being the medium used - the Internet.

The social impact of allowing e-commerce taxation to bypass state regulation poses a potentially devastating dilemma for local governments. This anticipated loss in revenue would deprive local communities of the resources necessary to pay for police, fire, health, and particularly education services. The ethnic and economic division of Internet use also impacts the issue of taxation. A recent study noted that 80 percent of homes with income > $75,000 have personal computers as compared to only 16 percent for families making <$20,000. A Department of Commerce report noted that the Internet revolution is bypassing the poor, minorities and those who live in inner cities or rural areas. This division in use will result in a heavier burden on the poor and minorities in supporting the local tax base. In addition, as the tax base declines, it will be the poor and minorities who will be paying more for less. Tax schemes are theoretically supposed to tax those taxpayers with the ability to pay and tax to a much lessor extent (or not at all) those taxpayers that are incapable of paying.

Commission on Electronic CommerceFN16will study electronic commerce tax issues and report back to Congress after 18 months on whether electronic commerce should be taxed, and if so, how they can be taxed in a manner that ensures such commerce won't be subject to special, multiple, or discriminatory taxes. State and local elected officials will be given a prominent voice on this commission. Congress, of course, retains full authority to change or discard the Commission's proposals.

Commerce FN18 to endorse the following: 1) Competitive neutrality - all transactions should be treated equally, whether that transaction is done on the phone, b mail, or on the Internet. 2) Expanded Duty to Collect - Encourage congress to authorize state and local governments to require remittance of out-of-state sales tax. 3) Federalism - Congress should reaffirm a states sovereign right to determine their own tax policies. 4) Tax Simplification - Encourage simplification and uniformity among that states. This commission also published criterion for evaluating proposed regulations (see included criteria)FN19.

The destination-based tax system is the one we are currently using. However, the Supreme Court, in Quill, prohibited states from collecting tax on a destination-based system unless the seller has a physical presence in the state. This requirement has certainly put many Internet sellers out of reach, regardless of how much they are selling into a state.

All of the major government assessments concerning the future promise of the Internet have recognized that private sector leadership is essential to the growth of electronic commerce and the realization of the Internet Economy. Governments also have acknowledged that regulatory forbearance is the necessary corollary to industry self-regulation. However, for governments to forbear from direct regulation of the Internet, industry must move beyond the rhetoric of self-regulation and demonstrate that the needs of consumers and the public at large can be met effectively by industry initiatives.

Georgia Tech was sued in the Police Court of Paris over the English language content of its Web page. The court did not reach the issue of whether French law can mandate that Web sites be bilingual to include French.

The European Union, for instance, has considered and adopted various proposals relating to e-commerce, such as taxation, tariffs, property rights, and privacy interests. These proposals can be found at http://www.cordis.lu/esprit/src/ecomcom.htm.

The European Union favors taxation of e-commerce so long as tax obligations are clear and predictable. Like the U.S., however, the European Union and its member states have not adopted any specific tax schemes. The European Union's view on taxation is very similar to that of the Clinton Administration's view. Compare http://www.cordis.lu/esprit/src/ecomcom3.htm with http://www.ecommerce.gov/framewrk.htm.

In December 1996, the (UNCITRAL) issued the UNCITRAL Model Law on Electronic Commerce an attempt to develop legal principles that cut across different legal systems. It deals with legal signatures and recognition of data messages the formation and validity of e-commerce contracts and establishes general principles for certain specific areas of international trade such as carriage of goods.

To apply and place in context all of the proceeding issues it may be important to have a brief review of cases that may be applicable to a regualtion issue. Below is a very brief review of some cases and constitutional issues that impact state and local attempts to regulate and/or tax Internet activity.

A remaining question is how would the Commerce Clause treat the sale of tangible personal property in relation to the treatment of a sale of services. There has been a trend away from the 'old formalism' starting with Western Live Stock v. Bureau of Revenue, 303 US 250 (1938) and culminating with the current internal and external consistency tests under which a sales tax levied on the buyer at point of origin of a service is evaluated.

The internal consistency test evaluates the consequences of every state adopting the same tax and whether multiple taxation would occur. In Jefferson Lines, the court held that 'if every State were to impose a tax identical to Oklahoma's, that is, a tax on ticket sales within the Sate for travel originating there, no sale would be subject to more than one State's tax.

Jefferson Lines, 514 U.S. at 185. The external consistency test looks 'to the economic justification for the State's claim upon the value taxed, that is fairly attributable to economic activity within the taxing State."

The court in Western Live Stock characterized a local state taxing event as an, "agreement, payment, and delivery of some of the service in the taxing State; no other state can claim to be the site of the same combination."

In discussing remote mail order sales and the burdens faced by business, the Court in National Bellas Hess v. DOR of Illinois, 386 US 753 (1967) noted, "the many variations in rates of tax, in allowable exemptions, and in administrative record keeping requirements could entangle National's interstate business in a virtual welter of complicated obligations to local jurisdictions with no legitimate claim to impose a fair share of the cost of the local government." National Bellas Hess, Inc. stands for the legal principle that out-of-state sales companies do not have to collect and remit a use tax without having a legal nexus for sales and use tax purposes.

By far the most immediate need for uniform national standards is in state and local tax policies. Although discrimination against interstate commerce is unconstitutional under the U.S. Supreme Court's jurisprudence, the unfortunate fact is that the current legal environment provides little real remedies to the taxpayer against the imposition of unconstitutional forms of state and local taxes.

Unfortunately, the reality of the Commerce Clause does not live up to its reputation. By far the most immediate need for uniform national standards is in state and local tax policies. Although discrimination against interstate commerce is unconstitutional under the U.S. Supreme Court's jurisprudence interpreting the Commerce Clause of the U.S. Constitution, the unfortunate fact is that the current legal environment provides little real remedies to the taxpayer against the imposition of unconstitutional forms of state and local taxes. Examples of decade-long litigation to obtain refunds of illegally imposed taxes are not uncommon. (See the June 1999 Commerce Net Public Policy Report article States Behaving Badly.

A Due Process evaluation will require the court to determine whether the exercise of jurisdiction over the defendant would violate constitutional principles of due process. The Due Process Clause imposes a limit on a states power to tax. Wisconsin v. Penny Co., 311 U.S. 435, 445. In order for a state to impose a tax there must be a 'nexus' between the state and the person, property or transaction. Nexus is predicated on physical presence, business activity generating revenue in the state and the business utilization of state benefits. The application of 'nexus' to the Internet has caused great debate due to its unique attributes. Application of the principles set out by the Supreme Court in International Shoe have proved difficult, if not impossible, in application to the Internet.

Altogether, the area of taxation and Internet regulation by state and local governments is constantly changing. There are no set standards. This paper could provide no definitive consensus on the best method to use for state and local regulation of Internet business because there is no consensus.

Actually, the most beneficial aspect of this paper is the links provided within its pages. No matter what area of Internet regulation you wish to examine, the links included her provide, at a minimum, a place to begin.

This Note discusses three important e-commerce issues facing societies and governments across the world. First, e-commerce controversy, how is society to grapple with unfettered access to gambling, sex and propaganda?  Second, e-commerce privacy, who will protect your privacy? Is the Internet a safe place to do business?  Third, e-commerce taxation, how will governments protect their local retailers and collect funds necessary to support their public welfare? These are the issues facing the world today with the explosive growth of e-commerce.

Despite continued debate and uncertainty over the legality of on-line gambling sites, currently anyone with access to the Internet can easily turn his PC into a slot machine, horse race, sports betting parlor, or lottery terminal. Internet play is easy; often a player need only open an account and answer several questions before he can begin placing bets on-line. Once the on-line player places his bet, a website operator conducts a simulated game of chance and reports the results back to the player. Some gambling sites will mail winnings checks to the player, but most sites credit the players on-line accounts to encourage more playing. However, many Internet gamblers are finding out that cashing in on winnings is often difficult if not impossible. As many players have realized, "Lady Luck" takes on a different meaning in the Internet arena where operators can cheat and defraud home users.

Internet gambling has become a huge industry. According to the FBI, he number of Internet gambling sites now exceeds 300, and this number is growing at an astounding rate [FN1]. In 1997, the Justice Department estimates that nearly $600 million was illegally wagered on Internet gambling sites [FN2]. Some analysts predict that on-line gambling will generate $10 billion a year by the year 2002 [FN3]. The enormity of both the number of Internet gambling sites and the amount of money being spent on on-line gambling transactions has, understandably, led lawmakers to question whether the Internet can be policed by existing legislation enacted before the emergence of current Internet challenges.

Lacking the funding, technical capability, and often legal jurisdiction to regulate the on-line gaming industry, state governments increasingly have looked to the federal government to regulate gambling activity on the Internet. The National Association of Attorneys General (NAAG) has repeatedly urged Congress to take action at the federal level. To this affect, Congress does have several gaming statutes predating the Internet in its arsenal of resources that could be interpreted to ban on-line gambling operations. Among these are the Travel Act [FN 4], Interstate Transportation of Wagering Paraphernalia Act [FN5], and the Interstate Professional and Amateur Sports Protection Act [FN6] . Although Congress could tailor any of these acts to implicate on-line gambling, Congress has focused its attention on the Wire Act as the most appropriate weapon with which to combat the challenges of Internet gambling.

Whoever being engaged in the business of betting or wagering knowingly uses a wire communication facility for the transmission in interstate or foreign commerce of bets or wagers or information assisting in the placing of bets or wagers on any sporting event or contest, or for the transmission of a wire communication which entitled the recipient to receive money or credit as a result of bets or wagers, or for information assisting in the placing of bets or wagers. . . .

Although these bills are alive in both houses, the Internet Prohibition Act of 1999 may not be the complete answer to regulating the growing Internet gambling industry. Many companies that host Internet gambling sites are located offshore and not amenable to jurisdiction in the United States. And, should the United States pass comprehensive legislation to prohibit Internet gambling, many businesses currently providing gambling services in the United States will simply move their operations offshore. Thus, a major hurdle in the potency of any legislation that prohibits Internet gambling is its inability to reach many Internet offenders.

The Untitled States Department of Commerce estimates that by the year 2001, businesses will conduct $300 billion annually in commerce via the Internet [FN11]. Despite the fact that most Internet commerce uses a security protocol like secure sockets layer (SSL), which encrypts electronic data to prevent fraudulent interception, or secure electronic transaction (SET), which operates with the assistance of a financial institute as a 3rd party to the transaction, completing commercial transactions over the Internet is not risk free. Scam artists, offering fraudulent business opportunities, shabby products, and phony services, have been able to infiltrate these security protocols and capitalize on the Internet by masquerading as legitimate businesses. In fact, an official at Visa International recently opined that nearly half of their transactions from online sales are disputed or full-fledged frauds [FN12].

According to many consumer experts, the Internet is a perfect arena for retail scams since it enables a Cyber swindler to easily and inexpensively reach a large number of potential customers [FN13]. A scam artist willing to invest in developing a sophisticated web site can easily disguise a boileroom operation on the Internet and maintain anonymity while cheating customers.

Two popular scams that the FTC recently cracked involved a credit-repair scheme and email fraud. In the former, an Internet consumer is lured to a site promising relief from bad credit. The consumer is then sold a "kit" containing instructions on how to apply for a new social security number or tax identification number and then use it to develop a new credit profile. In cracking down on and closing these cites, the FTC also warns consumers that using a false social security number in applying for credit violates federal law [FN14].

Furthermore, the FDIC has responded to the growing number of illegitimate online banks misrepresenting themselves as legitimately-chartered, or federally-insured depository institutions through its web site where consumers can report such suspicious banking activities [FN18]. Consumers can also report suspected Internet fraud to the proper state securities regulator by contacting North American Securities Administrators Association (NASAA) [FN19].

Private enforcement groups have also responded to this new medium of scam artists [FN20]. For example, Cyberveillance.com, a Virginia-based company, monitors the World Wide Web for its retail clients and scours the Internet for fraudulent sites [FN21]. When a fraudulent site is detected, the firm sends a warning letter to the site and notifies the Internet site provider. The firm has been successful at halting web sites peddling designer knockoffs, shoddy imitations, gray-market goods destined for foreign markets, and other goods that have simply "fallen off the back of the truck."

According to the American Internet User Survey, sixteen million children under the age of eighteen were using the Internet in the year 1998 [FN22]. Over six million of these children were age twelve and under [FN23]. What is more astounding than the number of children accessing the Web is the type of adult information and products that children can readily access with the click of a mouse. There are an estimated 30,000 "adult" Web sites that feature and sell pornographic materials over the Internet [FN24]. As of date, the government has not been able to effectively traffic these Web sites to ensure that cybersmut does not reach non-adult consumers.

While the Supreme Court has recognized that governments can regulate the geographic location of adult establishments in "real space" to afford safe neighborhoods and communities with a high quality of life [FN25], the Court has struggled with Congress? ability to regulate "red light" districts in cyberspace where geographical boundaries do not exist. In Reno v. ACLU [FN26] , the Court struck down portions of the Communications Decency Act which criminalized the distribution of "indecent" or "patently offensive" materials to children under the age of eighteen. Applying a strict scrutiny test, the Court found that Congress had gone too far in zoning the entire Internet since CDA would also effectively bar adults from engaging in constitutionally protected speech. However, the Reno Court did acknowledge that it would recognize a similar cyberzoning plan once technological advances afforded Congress the ability to enact zoning legislation without also impacting the free speech of adults.

It is no secret that ebusiness is booming, but to illustrate its popularity, a new crop of catch phrases and nicknames have sprung up to describe various aspects of the trade. Among the ones in common use are ebusiness, ecommerce, etail, ecash, and my personal favorite, used to describe the new crop of wealthy young entrepreneurs who have made their fortunes online, the digerati. With a new field comes a new set of challenges for consumers, merchants, and for the legal system that governs them. The changes in merchant/ consumer relationship that have been brought about with the increased popularity of the internet cross many legal disciplines, such as Banking Law, Securities, Privacy Rights, and any number of Criminal issues. Unfortunately, the continued changes have brought more questions than answers.

The question will arise more frequently as Internet consumers demand better security and more privacy for their Internet transactions. The market seems to be responding to these demands, and is constantly coming up with new and better solutions to the problem. One such new product bounces user information around one hundred and fifty or so servers before the transmission reaches its destination. [FN31] The effect of this is that no two servers are ever in possession of both the identity of the sender and that of the receiver. Total anonymity as the user surfs the Internet is the achieved effect. To some of us, the demand for this degree of web-anonymity is not so easy to understand. However, it is obvious to most of us why ebusinesses will not do business in this setting: the inability of an etailer to identify the purchaser either by physical or electronic recognition makes verification of payment source next to impossible.

Because econsumers want to preserve their privacy and their anonymity when making online purchases, the market has sought to respond by creating methods of payment that resemble cash transactions as much as possible. To that end, various businesses have sprung up offering digital cash, or electronic cash services. [FN32] These services act like a bank; a consumer opens an account with them, transfers money into it, and then can transfer money from that account into a purse on their hard drive. When the consumer is online, she can conduct transactions without the bank ever knowing where she is spending her money, unlike the records kept by banks regarding credit card transactions.

The use of this medium does promise a lot more privacy in web transactions, but may not be able to for long. The reason this works is that for the majority of Internet users now, they are able to get online though a dial-up connection with an Internet Service Provider (ISP) with whom they have contracted. These ISPs assign a new Internet Protocol (I.P.) address or identity to the user each time she logs onto the server. For this reason, any purchases made online will be shipped to the purchaser in the form of a download which is directed to the temporary I.P. address the user received for that online session. An online purchaser using some form of digital cash need not take any other steps to protect her identity or her private information, because the I.P. address to which the merchandise was directed dissolves as soon as she goes offline, and an new one is assigned for her next session. Thus the source of the payment is untraceable once the user logs off the Internet.

The main difficulty in involving the government in Internet commerce is the propriety of Congressional regulation. Article I, section 8 of the United States Constitution [FN35] states that Congress has the power to regulate commerce among the several states under the commerce clause, but lacks the authority to regulate intrastate commerce.

Although neither Congress nor the courts has addressed how to tell the difference between ebusinesses that engage in interstate commerce, and those that are engaged in intrastate commerce, some courts have taken steps toward making the demarcation simpler to find. For example, in Compuserve Inc., v. Patterson, 89 F.3d 125 (6th Cir. 1996), the Sixth Circuit held that interactive web sites which allow consumers to place orders with a company, and thus form a contract with them over the internet will be subject to the jurisdiction of the state court in which the consumer complaint arises. Conversely, in Mieczkowski v. Masco Corp., 297 F.Supp. 782, E.D. TX 1998, that court held that a website where passive advertising was done, and there was no opportunity to form a contract, the business would not be subject to the jurisdiction of the state in which the complaint arose. This is a reflection of the longarm statute of each of these states, which will not permit jurisdiction where a business primarily located in a neighbor state has not made certain minimum contacts with the state in question.

Following this reasoning, if and when Congress decides to address the issue of regulation, it is likely that any regulations imposed will stand up in court as long as they do not affect those kinds of ebusinesses that are only engaged in passive advertising over the internet. Who exactly is affected by the legislation will likely be hashed out in the courts, but as a result, it seems inevitable that the proprietors of ebusinesses who have never set foot outside their home state, and never specifically intended to conduct business with anyone outside of their locale will find themselves subject to federal regulations regarding the operation of their businesses.

As to the issue of total anonymity and cash versus credit cards, these will find their own equilibrium within the Internet marketplace. It seems likely that the next step in consumer driven Internet privacy/ security will be the digital equivalent of walking into a store wearing sunglasses and a wig. The bottom line is that for some users, convenience will always outweigh concealment, and perhaps the solution will be, as it is in the physical world, alternate personas available for each user depending on what purchase she makes.

Why is their well running dry? Because of the competitive advantage that some retailers, e.g. e-commerce vendors and mail-order vendors, enjoy. This competitive advantage is their ability to sell products without taxing the purchaser. The reason that these vendors can do this is because they lack "nexus" with many states where their ultimate purchaser resides. Nexus simply means "physical presence" in the forum state. The states are not happy about this and are increasingly demanding that Congress do something to relax the "nexus" requirement that currently prevents states from taxing all goods purchased by their citizenry.

Thus, this segment of the Note begins by discussing the current status of laws governing states? rights to tax out-of-state vendors. The segment then discusses three possible solutions to the current problems with taxing e-commerce and concludes by embracing the national uniform sales tax method as the method most equitable to e-commerce retailers and local retailers as well.

Currently, most states levy a tax on goods sold to their residents in one of two ways. The first way is through a sales tax, which is a tax on gross receipts from the sale or lease of tangible personal property as well as certain services. The tax is usually imposed on the consumer, but collected by the seller. Typically, the sales tax is only collected from those sellers having "nexus" with the state.

To illustrate the application of a sales tax and the nexus of a vendor, think about a trip to the department store for the purchase of an article of clothing. The clothing costs $19.99 and the sales tax is 7%. The department store is located in the tax jurisdiction where you are shopping and as a result the store has nexus with the state and must collect the 7% sales tax imposed in the jurisdiction on the article of clothing that you are purchasing. This is a simple example of a sales tax on a good and the nexus or physical presence that a store has in its locale.

The second way that states levy a tax on goods is through a use tax levied on goods that are purchased outside of the state, but brought into the state to be used. A "use tax" is defined as a tax on the "privilege of using, consuming, distributing or storing tangible personal property after it is brought into [the] state from without [the] state." [FN40] The purpose of a use tax is to make all purchases neutral with regard to taxation.

To illustrate the use tax, imagine that you are a Georgia resident and you want to buy a car. If you purchase your car in Georgia, you will be subject to a 6% tax on the purchase. If, however, you drive for one hour to Alabama, you will only pay a 4% sales tax on the car in Alabama. The incentive to purchase your car in Alabama is obvious. Now Georgia applies a use tax. The use tax will require you to pay Georgia the 6% tax on the car for using the car in Georgia, however the 6% tax will be reduced by the 4% that you have already paid in Alabama. Thus, you will pay Alabama 4% and Georgia 2% for a total of 6% making your purchase decision neutral with regard to the differing tax rate in the two states. This is how the use tax works.

While this problem has existed for a long time, it has never been enough of problem for states to go on the offensive to change the status quo. However, with the advent of e-commerce and an increasingly large chunk of state revenues being siphoned away by the out-of-state vendors. States are beginning to lobby Congress to make changes in the nexus definition that has traditionally kept states from extending there taxing authority outside of their borders.

Currently, states are bound by two principles with regard to collecting taxes from out-of-state vendors. These barriers to taxation are the Commerce Clause of the United States Constitution and the Due Process Clause of the 14th Amendment. The United States Supreme Court in Quill addressed these issues and set forth some guidance as to what questions states and e-commerce retailers must ask.

As a result of Quill, it is clear that as long as Congress remains on the sideline and takes no action to relax the current physical presence requirements of the Commerce Clause, retailers will continue to escape taxation in states where they have no physical operations. While states have tolerated the status quo thus far, once their revenue collection is sufficiently eroded by non-taxable e-commerce sales, there will be state action. However, any such action on behalf of the states will be ineffectual until after October 2001.

On October 21, 1998, Congress passed the Internet Tax Freedom Act which prohibits state and local governments from imposing taxes on Internet access and discriminatory or multiple taxes on e-commerce. [FN47] This moratorium on taxation began on October 21, 1998 and expires on October 21, 2001. The Act also created a commission to study the issues surrounding taxation of e-commerce. Recommendations from the committee are expected in early 2000. An important aspect of the committee is its membership, which includes many state representatives. These state representatives are likely to be partial to tax losses suffered by states. This constituency will probably call for some form of broadened taxation collection to be imposed on e-commerce retailers as soon as the moratorium expires.

First, under the source model, the purchaser could pay the sales tax for the jurisdiction where the vendor is located. [FN49] This model would be easy to implement. The seller would simply add in the tax imposed in his jurisdiction on his Internet site and all of the problems are solved, right? Wrong, this method would produce unwanted economic effects.

These unwanted economic effects are not difficult to foresee because sales tax rates vary wildly from jurisdiction to jurisdiction. As a result, Internet retailers will have an incentive to locate in jurisdiction that have the lowest tax rates. This model leads to states with the lowest tax rates getting a disproportional amount of total Internet revenue taxes. While the model solves the problem of giving Internet businesses an advantage over local retailers, it also creates a new inequity between jurisdictions with low tax rates and those with high tax rates.

Commentators are split as to whether compliance is really an expensive, unfair burden on e-commerce retailers or whether computer software technology is available that will make the compliance cost argument moot. Regardless, the majority of commentators do believe that the compliance costs are very high and could be devastating for small e-commerce retailers. Hence, some suggest a safe harbor for small e-commerce retailers. In other words, an exemption from sales tax collection for small e-commerce retailers that do not reach a certain threshold amount of sales. Again, this proposal results in small Internet retailers obtaining an unfair advantage over local retailers. Thus, this model does not appear to effectively resolve the taxation challenges currently facing most states.

Third, Congress could pass a law subjecting e-commerce to a uniform federal sales tax. The sales tax would in turn be distributed pro rata to the states based on the states Internet consumption. [FN52] This model is by no means perfect, however, it significantly reduces the problems that arise in both the source and destination models.

The uniform federal tax would act to help level the playing field with local retailers by imposing a tax on all e-commerce retailers. While some jurisdictions with high sales tax rates would still be disadvantaged, the shipping costs that e-commerce retailers incur would also act as an equalizer. The uniform sales tax would significantly lessen the undesirable effects of collecting taxes only at their source.

The uniform federal tax also speaks to the problem of high compliance costs that result from the destination model. Instead of e-commerce retailers having to collect and remit hundreds of different taxes to hundreds of different authorities, e-commerce retailers would only have to collect one uniform tax amount and remit to one government body. Thus, the federal uniform sales tax model effectively resolves many of the problems arising from both the destination and source models.

The potential drawbacks to the uniform national sales tax model are that the federal government could waste much of the tax money through bureaucratic inefficiency when it is collected and apportioned. Additionally, some wealthy states may have some of their revenues reapportioned to poorer states. [FN53] While none of the models are going to make everyone happy, the national sales tax model appears to be the least costly and the most equitable.

While no one can predict with absolute certainty how Congress will deal with the issues surrounding e-commerce taxation, it is becoming increasingly evident that the question is not whether states will be able to tax e-commerce retailers, but rather how states will tax e-commerce retailers. At present, the most likely scheme appears to be a federal collection method with apportionment to the states.

This uniform collection method should result in a much more level playing field for e-commerce retailers as well as traditional local retailers. Congress now has the power to make this happen under Quill, and most commentators agree that such a system for collection is not only needed, but also necessary. E-commerce is clearly here to stay; however, e-commerce retailers can expect their taxation advantage over local retailers to dissipate in the not too distant future.

It shall be unlawful for a government entity to sponsor, operate, advertise, promote, license, or authorize by law or compact, or a person to sponsor, operate, advertise, or promote, pursuant to the law or compact of a governmental entity, a lottery, sweepstakes, or other betting, gambling, or wagering scheme based, directly or indirectly, (through the use of geographical references or otherwise,), on one or more competitive games in which amateur or professional athletes participate, or are intended to participate, on one or more performances of such athletes in such games.

Cunard et al. have addressed some of the developments in the law,9 and other students for this course, in previous years, have addressed such issues as ownership rights for web sites10 as well as trademark issues related to the Internet.11 While these previous articles have focused on the current state of the law, they have not addressed traditional causes of action that could be brought against future offending users of "cyberspace."

This paper seeks to go that extra step by analyzing traditional causes of action that may be applicable to "cyberspace." Specifically, the focus of this paper is on traditional property torts, such as trespass, nuisance, and conversion, and their possible applicability to the Internet.

These, along with other precedents, suggest that a traditional approach to the Internet may not only be feasible, but in certain situations, preferable. This paper seeks to address some possibilities along with the advantages and disadvantages of the traditional causes of action.

Applying these traditional definitions, and distinguishing the two, is a little more difficult in a 'non-land ' context like cyberspace. One must begin by re-framing her definition of what one can 'own' (what is property) and then what can be 'interfered with' by another. Once that re-framing occurs and includes the domain of intellectual property (IP),21 it is possible to apply traditional legal concepts to what may be violations or infringements of this domain.

Everyone that spends time in the land of cyberspace has at least two things happen to them: they learn the lingo of the 'net' in order to survive and they get 'spammed.' In Internet lingo, 'spam' is an unwanted "delivery" to a user - usually in the form of advertisements - of bulk e-mailings. It did not take long for the 'spammers' to figure out how to ply their trade; it has taken a little longer for the cure to become available. Combating what was viewed by both creators and users of the net and its products as an infringement began with legal attacks. These attacks first took on the flavor of a Constitutional battle with the First Amendment providing the grist for the controversy.24 Legislation slowly emerged. At the Federal level, the Lanham Act, as the most noted example,25 and the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act26 are serving as foundations for the protection of Internet users and materials creators. State statutes exist, more so in some states than others, but regulations and statutes have not been sufficient to curb abuse.

There have been three other decisions resting, in large part, on the assertion of trespass as the cause of action. These three decisions, reached almost simultaneously in October-November, 1998, firmly establish the tenets of the age-old doctrine of trespass as a valuable tool in the judicial circles of cyberspace.

The undisputed facts establish that defendant committed a trespass to chattels in violation of Virginia Common Law. Although authority under Virginia law respecting an action for trespass to chattels is sparse, case law suggests that trespass to chattels is indeed actionable in Virginia.

For the purposes of this paper, the legitimate use of domain names, regardless of trademark conflicts, will not be referred to as "cybersquatting," while illegitimate uses of a domain name (including "cyberpiracy") will be referred to as "cybersquatting."

One of the shortcomings of using the Lanham Act66 to enjoin "cybersquatters" is that the statute only protects a name if it is a registered trademark.67 Thus, no protection is offered for famous names that are not trademarks (i.e. "whitehouse.com" or "thevatican.com" would not qualify for protection under the Lanham Act).

Black's Law Dictionary defines a nuisance as "that activity which arises from unreasonable, unwarranted or unlawful use by a person of his own property, working obstruction or injury to right of another, or to the public, and producing such material annoyance, inconvenience and discomfort that law will presume resulting damage."70 Also, courts have defined nuisance as broadly as "[A]n offensive, annoying, unpleasant, or obnoxious thing or practice; a cause or source of annoyance, especially a continuing or repeated invasion or disturbance of another's right, or anything that works a hurt, inconvenience or damage."71 These definitions encompass activities that harm more than merely property. The whole purpose behind a nuisance suit is to enjoin a harmful activity.

Given the above factors for nuisance, it would seem a natural application to "cybersquatting." The social value of "cybersquatting" is very low compared to the social utility of a legitimate web site used for commercial purposes, and the activity of "cybersquatting" can be easily avoided. Also, "cybersquatting" takes up bandwidth and, if traffic to that site is heavy, slows access to other legitimate sites that may share hosts with that "cybersquatter." The most important factor, however, is the harm sustained by the legitimate owner of the name. If a name is recognized and associated with good will (i.e. Pope John Paul II), using that name to siphon unwary Internet users to unrelated sites (i.e. pornographic sites) would severely compromise the integrity of the name. Moreover, if the name is associated with a reliable product, it would be harmful to the legitimate owner of the name if others were to unwittingly conduct business with the "cybersquatter." The potential harm is unfathomable. In almost all situations, the courts would reach similar results under nuisance as they would by using a "smell test" under other causes of action.

There are two main advantages with nuisance suits that are not available with other causes of action. First, unlike trademarks, a plaintiff does not necessarily have to predate the "cybersquatter" as long as the plaintiff can show that "cybersquatting" is a nuisance.77 This allows for owners of famous marks (such as MTV) to enjoin preexisting domain names from using their mark.

Secondly, if nuisance bars the use of a domain name by one illegitimate owner, most likely, all other illegitimate owners will be barred from using that name. Since, under nuisance, the activity itself is enjoined, the identity of the offender should be irrelevant (i.e. if the current owner can't operate a cement factory, then future owners can't operate a cement factory).

An enduring aspect of the Anglo-American common law system has been its ability to adapt legal concepts that are centuries old to new, emerging situations and technologies. As part of the general trend in the legal system to look at Internet domain issues as analogous to real property matters, it is reasonable to consider the potential application of the tort of conversion as a basis for a claim for remedies in Internet-domain related conflicts.

When claims are related to copyright infringement, many courts have held that attempts to invoke conversion claims were preempted by the Copyright Act. In Garrido v. Burger King,84 a Florida appellate court held that a claim alleging conversion and misappropriation of advertising ideas was preempted because the elements required to prove each of these claims was not qualitatively different from those required to prove copyright infringement.

However, in Rasmussen v. Kalitta Flying Service,85 the Ninth Circuit court held that an engineer who developed modifications for cargo planes was entitled to pursue a claim for conversion against the owner of the aircraft because the engineer had a property right in the Supplemental Type Certificate issued by the FAA, that the California elements for conversion were met, and that this property interest was not preempted by Federal copyright, patent, or other statutes.

Existing intellectual property statutes may be inadequate to deal with the problems that can arise in Internet situations. For example, in U.S. v. LaMacchia,86 an MIT student set up an Internet bulletin board which allowed users to download software applications such as Excel 5.0 and WordPerfect 6.0. LaMacchia's scheme was estimated to cost the software copyright holders more than $1 million in lost revenue.

The application of conversion in an Internet setting would have to involve a dispossession or disruption of another party's lawful exercise of rights, as opposed to trespass to chattels, which may involve a lesser degree of interference with such rights. The distinction between conversion and trespass in an Internet context was considered in CompuServe v. Cyber Promotions,88 where the court ruled that unsolicited e-mail advertising was more appropriately an actionable trespass to chattels that was unprotected by the First Amendment.

A claim for conversion based upon the alleged misappropriation of trade secrets may be allowable in at least some jurisdictions. In Prudential94 a court denied a defense motion for summary judgement under Pennsylvania law in a case alleging the misappropriation of trade secrets, including customer lists and files, by a former agent of the plaintiff insurance company.

Claims for conversion for corporate assets and trade secrets may be actionable in some jurisdictions. In Patient Transfer Systems v. Patient Handling Systems,95 a defense motion for summary judgement was denied and a claim allowed to proceed where a defendant former employee allegedly retained and used files and a demonstration kit belonging to the plaintiff company.

At least some jurisdictions will not allow claims for conversion involving intangible property. A claim of conversion was dismissed in Frink America v. Champion Road Machinery, Ltd.,97 where the court ruled that New York law limited actions for conversion to tangible property in a case alleging the misappropriation and use of the plaintiff's engineering and production drawings by the defendant competitor.

Misappropriation of trade secrets may be actionable under a tort claim for conversion. In Homenexus v. Directweb,98 a defense motion to dismiss was denied for a claim of conversion of trade secrets involving the plaintiff company's business plan and Internet system.

The most promising precedent for conversion claims in this context may arise from Rasmussen113 where no preemption was found because of a different quality of property rights created by a government license, apart from the copyright concerns. Especially if future judicial trends move towards a recognition of real property rights in domain names, and away from strict copyright/trademark concerns, then a window of opportunity may expand for conversion claims in Internet domain dispute resolution.

This paper has attempted to analyze the viability of several common law property torts to disputes in "cyberspace." As "cyberspace" becomes more sophisticated, it becomes more akin to the physical world. Even now, the virtual businesses are striving to mimic the physical world by making the "visual perusing experience" an experience that stimulates all the human senses. As these virtual environments move closer to the physical world, it becomes easier to apply traditional causes of action to the virtual world. History shows that with the advent of new technology (i.e. television, radio, etc.), the law has repeatedly attempted to apply old categories to new technology. Here, with the Internet, there seems to be more applicability of the old laws than there is with the other technological advances. Although there may have been a need for new legislation at the birth of the Internet, given the current trend of the virtual world becoming more and more like the physical world, it appears that the old laws are becoming more amenable to the Internet.

"...[w]e may define trespass as any intrusion which invades the possessor's protected interest in exclusive possession, whether that intrusion is by visible or invisible pieces of matter or by energy which can be measured only by the mathematical language of the physicist."

This paper will address another of these issues. It will contend that, despite its inconsistent legal roots in the print media, framing -- also sometimes known as "in-line" linking -- creates a derivative work and is, thus, copyright infringement, if the derivative work was created without permission of the copyright owner.

No "bright line" rule exists as to how much originality, "spark" of creativity, or independent creation is required, but it must be enough to distinguish the finished derivative work from the pre-existing material used in the derivative work.(8) Fixation, of course, may even be so transient to include storage in a computer's random-access memory or on its hard disk drive.(9) To fulfill the "lawfully made" requirement, permission must be given by the copyright owner of the material used as the source of the derivative work.

Bonding, gluing, or mounting, in the court's opinion, is thus a transformation or material alteration of the original work, without regard to whether any new copyrightable expression has been added in the process.

Da Vinci may sell his painting if he chooses. The fortunate buyer may then enjoy the painting as it is or, if he chooses, may enjoy it displayed in a very ugly frame he himself designs. (See Illustration 3, below.) All of the Albuquerque A.R.T. decisions support this conclusion.

What the buyer, however, may not do is to change it, alter it, or re-package it in some way the author did not intend, or misrepresent the author's work in some way, such as attributing the work to someone else or attributing a creation to the author that the author did not produce.

What makes the Web so popular and functional is its use of "hyper-text" links -- often represented on a Web "page" by colored text or a graphic images -- which allow viewers to link to and view related Web "pages" with little more than a "click" of a mouse button, without regard to the geographic location of the computers on which these other "pages" are physically housed.

The information from the second site -- which could be a document, image, or audio or video clip, or even the full Web "page" itself -- is "pulled in" and appears in a smaller window or frame within the first site's Web "page". The Web address (Uniform Resource Locator) displayed just below the browser's function command buttons still contains the address for the first Web site, even though the information from the second site is currently displayed -- altered (in that, most likely, the advertising and source identifiers which appear on the second site have not been imported and "framed" to appear on the first site with the other parts of the "page") and surrounded by a frame created by the author of the first Web site, including the first Web site's logo. This makes it appear to the computer user that "the content of the external site appears to be offered by the framing site."(29) In fact, the computer user may not even be aware that he has changed "locations."

The outcome of what little litigation there has been in the area of framing and in-line linking, however, does not necessarily support this statement. Though the first of these cases was settled out of court and, therefore, arguably has no value as precedent, its resolution lends support to the argument that framing of Web sites creates an infringing derivative work.

The parties settled in June 1997, with Total News agreeing not to frame the plaintiffs' Web sites, but retaining the right to provide hyper-link connections to those sites.(46) Some news services still listed on the Total News Web site have programmed their Web sites not to allow framing but to open a new, separate browser window when a user arrives at their sites through a Total News link.

Though not argued as a copyright case, it is clear from this case, as well as the previous cases, that framing changes a framed Web site, alters it, re-packages it in a way its author did not intend, transforms it, misrepresenting the author's work in the process, either by attributing the work to someone else or attributing a creation to the author that the author himself did not produce.

"Link Disclaimer" should address the issues that your Web site cannot control the content of third party-owned Web sites that link to your Web site, and inform the user of your Web site that if [he visits] your Web site through a link from a third-party Web site and find[s] the content of that Web site inappropriate or offensive that [he should contact you so that you may evaluate this matter. On the other hand, when your Web site is the "Linking Page" you should notify your Web site users that they may find links from your Web site to third-party owned Web sites that contain content that they may find to be of interest. You might also want to inform your Web site users that you initially visited these third-party Web sites before linking to them but that they must understand that you do not control their content and that such content frequently changes."

"[B]ecause [the gambling can be] done in private[,] [t]he barriers to addiction are lowered: The social stigma of gambling is removed; no one in your family or community has to know if you are gambling; access is greatly increased.

In Upjohn Co. v. United States, the Supreme Court recognized that the purpose of the attorney/client privilege "was to encourage full and frank communications between the attorneys and their clients and thereby promote broader public interests in the observance of the law and the administration of justice." [FN2] Today, the increased viability of practicing law on the Internet gives rise to concerns regarding the protection of privileged information and the violation of the attorney/client privilege. As more and more attorneys and legal service providers try to take advantage of the Internet as a tool to reach a wider client base, the ability to structure the medium of exchange to protect the valuable attorney/client privilege is of major concern.

The perception to many seemed, and in some cases still seems, to be that Internet technology and email was not a safe medium in which to interact with clients regarding privileged material. The concern was that since e-mail was a new medium of exchange, perhaps using it would make privileged communications between attorney/client more susceptible to being breached.

The ABA Rules of Professional Conduct state: "A lawyer shall not reveal information relating to representation of a client unless the client consents after consultation?" [FN3] Most Bar associations have issued opinions in order to interpret this rule with regards to the reliability of e-mail.

The Alaska State Bar takes a liberal standard and permits lawyers to communicate with clients on all topics using e-mail. [FN5] Overall, the current trend is to embrace e-mail as a reliable way to communicate privileged information between attorney and client. The expectation is that the attorney/client privilege will not be waived through judicious use of e-mail. In U.S. v. Maxwell, the court ruled on this issue by affirming that e-mail users have an expectation of privacy. [FN6] With the force of the courts affirming the sentiment of the Bar associations, the overall view is that e-mail is in fact a reliable manner in which to communicate with clients.

For the online legal service provider, it is important not to conduct private conversation within a "chat room" type of environment. Obviously, any private communications discussed in front of non-privileged witnesses leads to a waiver of the attorney/client privilege. Therefore, it is best to restrict use of chat rooms to discuss only the most generalized of legal topics.

The overall use of e-mail in the legal environment to advise clients will become more and more prevalent hundreds on millions of people become accustomed to the Internet. Today, many legal service providers operate completely online and the potential market that could utilize this type of service is vast, almost untapped. While it is important to be careful when using any type of communication to speak with a client, it is even more important to take precautions when using e-mail. However, given that warning, e-mail and the Internet will revolutionize the online legal services industry. A company or law firm that can conduct legal business online securely, efficiently and effectively will keep their clients satisfied and build their practice at the same time.

A perusal of the Model Code also reveals no such express prohibition. Most ethics boards and courts who have considered the issue analogize the Internet to telephone or fax communication, and seem to have little trouble applying the ethics rules that apply to those forms of communications to the Internet.

Testimonials and endorsements should be avoided, since some states prohibit them under Rule 7.1 as being inherently misleading. Descriptions of firm practice and other promotional material must not be false or misleading.

The on-line attorney should also be aware of all rules particular to any state in which she is licensed. For example, New York requires that "[e]very attorney 'with an office' located in New York to post 'in that office' a Statement of Clients Rights." [FN20] The prudent attorney who is licensed and solicits in New York would post the full text of the Statement of Clients Rights conspicuously on his web site, avoiding any potential argument (one he would likely lose) about whether his web site comes within the rule.

In Georgia, Standard 13(b) generally prohibits compensation for referrals, but does allow lawyers to pay a fee to participate in a bona fide lawyer referral service. There are some on-line referral services in operation in Georgia, [FN26] and Georgia lawyers may participate so long as the referral service otherwise complies with the Standard 13(b).

Whether an on-line legal association is a "firm" under Model Rule 10.1, where the comment says that a "firm" also includes a "legal services organization," may be partially dependent upon whether the site presents the attorneys to the public in such a way that suggests that they are a firm or they conduct themselves as a firm.

After an attorney tackles the logistical, privacy and ethical issues involved in providing legal advice over the Internet, she must still deal with jurisdictional issues. Under their police powers reserved by the United States Constitution, states have a legitimate interest in regulating the practice of law and can take action against lawyers not authorized in their state who give legal advice to residents of that state. Under ABA Model Rule 5.5, a lawyer may be subject to discipline for practicing in a jurisdiction without being licensed to do so. With the advent of the Internet, the traditional geographic boundary lines have not only been blurred, they have completely disappeared. When an attorney dispenses legal advice over the "World Wide Web" by definition she is reaching beyond the borders of the state in which she is licensed.

This question remains largely unanswered. However, in a January 1998 decision the California Supreme Court opined in dicta that a lawyer may engage in the "unauthorized practice of law" when he advises a California client on California law by means of "telephone, fax, computer, or other modern technological means." There, a New York law firm represented a California company in a contract dispute. While representing the client, two lawyers from the New York firm performed "substantial work" in California related to the representation. They traveled to California a number of times to advise the client on a proposed settlement agreement and on the potential for arbitration. Ultimately the contract dispute was settled but the client sued the law firm for legal malpractice and other claims in California state court. The client argued that, by practicing law without a license in California and failing to retain California counsel, the law firm had violated  6125 of California Code, thus making the fee agreement unenforceable. The California Supreme Court found that the New York lawyers had engaged in the unauthorized practice in California. The court concluded that: (1) the Firm was "not admitted to the practice of law in California", (2) "did not associate California counsel", and (3) "provided legal services in this state".

The Court concluded that "[t]he law is clear that no one may recover compensation for services as an attorney in this state unless he or she was a member of the state bar at the time those services were performed."

Thus, following Birbrower, a cyber-lawyer not licensed in California who "virtually" enters the state to give legal advice should be wary. It may be wise to retain in-state counsel or at a minimum provide a disclaimer on the web site. It would be important to state in the disclaimer that the attorney is not licensed in California and that the advice given is just general legal advice and the communication does not form a attorney/client relationship.

In Illinois the Supreme Court has gone a step farther and proposed rules to govern Internet legal advice across state boundaries. The proposed rules would require legal web sites to register in a jurisdiction before they could provide legal advice to clients in that state. The court reiterated the point that a legal web site can only be run by an attorney licensed and in good standing otherwise it will constitute the unauthorized practice of law. [FN32] Conversely the Arizona State Bar seems to be taking a hands off approach.

On July 7, 1999 Mr. Hirschfeld, a former Arizona attorney who was disbarred in 1985, launched Lexstrat, a site which offers online legal advice. It is interesting that while the Arizona State Bar ethics opinion limits what a licensed attorney may do on the Internet, it does not address what an unlicensed person may do. In fact, a criminal statute banning the unauthorized practice of law in Arizona expired in 1984 and has not been re-enacted.

As we have seen, it is unclear what constitutes the unauthorized practice of law on the Internet. The courts provide little guidance and the state bar regulations are sparse and inconsistent. Some states are on the verge of requiring legal web sites to register in their jurisdiction while others allow unlicensed people to provide legal advice online. Cyber-attorneys should treat the practice of law on-line as they would treat the practice of law through traditional means. The cautious attorney will use disclaimers to notify clients of the lack of state licensure and that the site is not providing legal advice in certain states. The option is to either be licensed in that state or retain in-state counsel.

It is evident that the speed with which the Internet is changing and developing the legal landscape is out-pacing the various regulatory bodies? ability to react. Here is where attorneys are well-suited to apply their legal training, to think, reason, consider the policy implications, and develop the law and ethical guidelines around the use of the internet for legal practice. It is obvious that the Internet is here to stay. In many areas of the law, the Web can provide an efficient and cost-effective way to serve the legal needs of the public. Therefore the prudent lawyer must proceed, but carefully. One should consider the privacy issues inherent in electronic data transfer, while always keeping in mind the ethical considerations of client solicitation and conflict of interests and avoiding any potential liability for engaging in the unauthorized practice of law.

FN10. N.Y State 709 (internet practice not inherently prohibited where an attorney who wished to conduct trademark searches, render legal opinions on trademark issues, and file and prosecute trademark applications on the Internet).

Following is a summary and analysis of the laws regarding the various forms of monitoring an employee, touching on federal and state responses to the problem of privacy in the workplace. As these materials will show, legislators have been slow in fashioning effective laws that address this particular problem, and courts are reluctant to extend to e-mail privacy the protection given by the present laws to the more traditional modes of communication (e.g., telephone) and to the more traditional, "physical" protections (e.g., lockers and desks).

However, with its numerous exceptions, it does not effectively protect a right to e-mail privacy in the workplace. The three most relevant exceptions to private employers are the consent exception, the provider exception, and the business extension exception. If employers fit one of these exceptions, then the ECPA does not apply.

Hence, an employer who has its employees sign an employment agreement stating that their communications (including e-mail) will be monitored will avoid application of the ECPA. Furthermore, an agreement of this sort would diminish an employee's expectation of privacy.

In other words, if the employer fits the provider definition, it has to prove that its interception was part of the normal course of business, which is not difficult, considering that it can meet these provisions by showing, for example, that it's interception was to protect property (e.g., improper uses or theft), or to provide the service (e.g., quality checks). Hence, section 2511(2)(a)(i), which includes not only common carriers but also any service provider, offers today's employers a means of escaping the prohibitions of the ECPA.

Similarly, e-mail privacy is afforded less protection than physical intrusions in an employee's work environment. As previously mentioned, an employer can initiate workplace searches in order to ferret out evidence of employee violations. What are the parameters of such physical searches of the work place? As in e-mail situations, the court assesses the facts based on a reasonable expectation of privacy standard.

In viewing claims of privacy violation regarding the monitoring of employees' communications, state courts have generally--as in other forms of workplace monitoring and searches--utilized a sort of balancing test, comparing an employee's expectation of privacy with the employer's business-related justification for monitoring. However, regarding e-mail suits, plaintiffs have found it difficult in proving that they hold a reasonable expectation of privacy.

Moreover, they were assured that their e-mails would not be intercepted and used as grounds for termination. Michael Smyth, a operations manager, had used his home computer to exchange e-mails with his supervisor.

Guardian provide state-of-the-art encryption software. For those who find encryption software cumbersome or difficult-to-install, ZipLip, Inc. and Hush Communications offer free Web-based email accounts equipped with encryption software.

As the above cases show, courts are reluctant to construe the old statutes to apply to the problems caused by e-mail technology. All hope is not lost for privacy advocates, however. As the article notes, new societal demands engender new laws. For example, Senator Debra Bowen, who is cultivating a reputation as being a privacy activist, has recently introduced SB1016, a California bill, which makes it a misdemeanor for employers to go through employees' e-mails without notice. The purpose of this new bill is to amend the Labor Code for the benefit of employees who are not knowledgeable about computer issues. The bill, said Beth Givens, director of the Privacy Clearinghouse, may be the first of its type.[39] And if these new laws are slow to appear, another option is still available to those who wish to protect the privacy of their e-mails from their employers: the use of encryption. If technology provides the means of intrusion, then other technology can provide the means of protection.

Imagine opening your local newspaper tomorrow morning and finding that front-page story names you as the lead suspect in a series of unsolved murders. The story has listed your name, age, address and occupation, somehow confusing you with the real suspect who lives across the street from you. Under the defamation law in this country, you would be able to hold both the author of the article, as well as its publisher, liable for defamation. Under the Telecommunications Act, however, if this "story" were released on the Internet, only the author of the text could be sued for defamation, as the Internet service provider (ISP) has been shielded by Congress from publisher's liability.

This paper will discuss the legal differences between publishers and distributors in the context of the law of defamation in the United States, especially in relationship to the Internet. It will then look at how other nations treat ISPs in defamation suits. In conclusion, it will discuss whether or not federal law should be revised to allow ISPs to be held liable as publishers in defamation cases.

Who, then, is a publisher? The dictionary answer is that it is someone who makes something known.3 A publisher can be a speaker, a writer, or a corporation that produces radio and/or TV programs or newspapers, books and/or magazines. A publisher can be addressing one person (the recipient of a personal letter) or a million (those watching the national evening news).

As a publisher, those who publish owe a duty of care to convey information that is not false or defamatory. Thus, in the example above, the journalist and newspaper that publish an incorrect story claiming that you are believed to have committed a series of murders, both publishers (the journalist and newspaper) have violated their duty of care to you. If you can prove that they were at least negligent4 and that your reputation was harmed, then the publishers could be held liable for the damages you sustained as a result of their story.

In Blumenthal v. Drudge,16 the plaintiffs attempted to maneuver around the federal immunity granted in  230 by arguing that AOL was, in fact, a publisher because of the fiduciary relationship between the ISP and the author of the defamatory publication. The court held that even when there was a contract between the author of defamatory material and the ISP providing it to its members, the ISP is still not a publisher.

The new law does not make the defendant's burden any lighter. The defendant still bears the burden of proof under the Defamation Act. Now, while proving that s/he was not the author, editor or publisher of the defamatory material the defendant must show also show that reasonable care was taken in the publishing of the material at issue.

Service providers are only responsible for third-party content which they make available for use if they have knowledge of such content and blocking its use is both technically possible and can be reasonably expected.

Service providers are not responsible for third-party content to which they merely provide access for use. The automatic and temporary storage of third party content because of a user access constitutes the provision of access.

While the law purports to free ISPs from liability if they are not the authors of the content at issue, there is a catch, as there was in England's Defamation Act. Providers must not know about the speech in question, otherwise they will be held liable unless it was not technically feasible or reasonably possible to block it. This could leave ISPs that wish to self-regulate in the awkward position. What happens when and ISP misses something considered offensive, defamatory or illegal?

British and German methods of holding ISPs as publishers unless they can prove they were merely distributors can leave the government with the job of regulating a vast network with no national boundaries to insure that there is no illegal material allowed into their countries via the Internet.

At the same time, punishment is much more likely for ISPs who, like AOL in the Zeran case, allow defamatory material to remain on their servers after being informed of its defamatory content. This knowledge could lead ISPs to be more willing to retract or remove defamatory material on their servers quickly and efficiently.

This knowledge could also have a dangerous chilling effect on free speech on the Internet. Fear of swift (and, in the case of German providers, harsh) penalties could force international providers, like CompuServe, into blocking all users' access to any sites that could potentially be attacked as defamatory. This would have the effect of eliminating one the most impressive and useful characteristics of the Internet - the breadth of its content.

Nevertheless, it is obvious from just the Zeran case that the congressional goal of promoting self-regulation is not likely to be achieved just because of a federal immunity. This immunity does not just protect those ISPs who want to actively attempt to regulate themselves; it protects ISPs who are unwilling to take even the simplest steps to remove harmful and defamatory materials from their servers.

What then is the solution? Unfortunately there are no easy ones. However, an adjustment of the Telecommunications Act could serve the purposes of Congress while protecting ordinary citizens who are subject to defamation on the Internet. If Congress required ISPs to show a good-faith effort to remove defamatory materials from their servers in order to qualify for the federal immunity, it would enable citizens from Kenneth Zeran to Sidney Blumenthal to receive swift responses from ISPs who are publishing defamatory material about them.

Would adjusting the Telecommunications Act in this manner assist you at all if you were face with a situation like that set out in the hypothetical at the beginning of this paper? It is likely that it would, if you promptly notified the ISP that its newsgroup was publishing a false and defamatory statement about you. Whether or not the ISP responded in a swift and satisfactory way would largely depend on the ISP in question, but if no response were forthcoming, you would have recourse to the courts for damages in a tort action.

I want to inform the reader right up front what this article is not about. I am not discussing legal advertising on the Internet or communications between attorney and client via email as activities law firms might engage in on the Internet. What I am going to discuss is the actual practice of law on the Internet. I know what you are thinking; this is as blasphemous as anything imaginable. However, as the Confederacy slowly realized, an eventuality should not be ignored because of its inherent destructive impact on a way of life, but rather should be embraced as a soon to be reality that must be addressed and appropriately dealt with.

If you have spent any time online you will have already witnessed first hand the extent to which law firms are represented on the web. The overwhelming majority of these firms, however, are only attempting to create awareness for their firms; they are not attempting to actual engage in the practice of law online.

Lawyers should want to internetize their livelihoods or else risk the continued erosion of their illusory monopoly in the practice of law. This erosion is taking place at a faster pace today than many attorneys would like to admit. First, there are more legal software packages available today then ever before. Nolo Press, Parsons Technology, and many other companies sell software applications that help individuals prepare legal documents such as a living will, a power of attorney, a bill of sale, a living trust or a non-compete agreement.

Practice of Law Committee for allegedly engaging in the unauthorized practice of law (UPL). In the suit [1], the Committee claimed that Nolo had engaged in UPL by selling software that created legal documents. Ultimately the Committee dropped the suit because of a new legislative enactment allowing such a practice to occur. The legislation clearly states certain activities that do not rise to the level of practicing law.

How are we to prevent individuals from having legal issues resolved using these alternative providers? Perhaps the more appropriate question is, can we prevent individuals from solving their legal problems using these alternative providers?

Clients will benefit from this type of practice for all the obvious reasons. They will have a larger pool of potential providers to obtain legal services. Further, the available services should cost less through this medium.

If we as attorneys have a difficult time articulating what the practice of law is, how do we expect non-lawyers to be able to determine whether or not they are engaging in the unauthorized practice of law. Do we really believe that non-lawyers can properly distinguish between legal and non-legal activities? Oh, I forgot, as attorneys we expect every client to come to us for every problem so that we can tell them the difference. That way we can bill them no matter what the outcome. This attitude is one of the many reasons why lawyers are universally mistrusted and generally not liked. If an individual walks into a business that is named Wills-R-Us, do we believe that that individual believes that she is going to see a lawyer or a non-lawyer? Do we think that that individual would care if a non-lawyer prepared the document?

There is no express provision in the Lawyer's Code of Professional Responsibility that addresses practicing law over the Internet. The Committee believes that using the Internet to take orders for trademark searches, conduct trademark searches, render legal opinions and file trademark applications is analogous to conducting a law practice by telephone or facsimile machine and is likewise permissible, subject to the same restrictions applicable to communication by those means..."

The group sponsors a law course for individuals who wish to represent themselves in legal matters. The course is taught via videotape that students may rent. The course is augmented by an instructor, here the defendant, if a student has any questions.

There are two important outcomes to understand regarding Kaltenbach. One, the court used the non payment for services rendered as a key factor in determining that Mr. Kaltenbach did not engage in the unlawful practice of law. As attorneys, we know that certain professional standards expect us to provide legal assistance each year free of charge or at a substantially reduced rate. No attorney would accept the fact that this pro bono work does not constitute the practice of law merely because it was rendered free of charge. In Kaltenbach, the court would like us to believe that payment, or lack thereof, was a material factor in determining if the unlawful practice of law took place.

Second, the court states that because the defendant did not represent anyone in "any pending or prospective proceedings" that the unlawful practice of law did not take place. The list of services that can be rendered to clients that do not include representation in "any pending or prospective proceedings" is too long to mention. The court has effectively declared that the practice of law is defined as the representation of a client in a legal proceeding for pay. This definition is far too narrow to adequately define what it means to practice law.

In my opinion, the Kaltenbach court has opened the door very wide and potentially allowed non-lawyers a great deal of flexibility in engaging in activities that most attorneys would consider the practice of law.

Another issue to think about when considering practicing law on the Internet is what does it mean to practice law in state? States usually have two key arguments for in state licensing, (1) safeguarding clients, and (2) familiarity with state law.

How are States adequately safeguarding clients when admittance to a state bar can be by mere motion? One of the few requirements under a motion admittance is that the attorney has been admitted in another state and has practiced there for roughly five to seven years depending on the state. A state may also require that the out of state attorney take and pass the MPRE (Multi State Professional Responsibility Exam). The out of state attorney has probably already completed this requirement, as it is often a standard requirement in most states. Neither the motion admittance nor the MPRE requirement adequately addresses the states concern for safeguarding in state clients.

States also argue that an attorney must be licensed by the state to insure that the attorney is familiar enough with that state's laws to provide adequate representation to that state's clients. Motion admittance and successful completion of the MPRE are both rather generic in nature. Neither hurdle properly addresses the issue of whether or not that out of state attorney is even familiar with the peculiarities of that state's ethical standards and disciplinary quirks, let alone that state's law.

Further eroding a state's argument that an attorney must be familiar with that state's laws to adequately represent in state clients is the federal argument. Under the Federal Rules of Appellate Procedure, rule 46, any attorney admitted to practice in any state can be admitted to any federal appellate court. There are certain standards that must be met, such as a certain number of appellate arguments or substantive motions, but once these standards are met, the out of state versus in state distinction is virtually irrelevant. This federal appellate loophole creates a potentially large opportunity for out of state attorneys to practice law in and among the states.

There, the New York firm had visited California on several occasions. The court had clear and convincing evidence that the firm had sufficient physical presence in the state to justify a holding of the unauthorized practice of law. The court did state, however, that physical presence was not necessary to answer the "in state" question but that it was a factor to be considered.

What it means to practice law "in state", why and to what extent we regulate it should be re-addressed using the Internet practice of law as a backdrop. This medium has resulted in a fundamental change in the legal profession and has forced us to reevaluate many of the basic legal tenets we have operated under for so long.

Suing these organizations in an attempt to stop them from engaging in activities that are arguably the unauthorized practice of law is foolish for two reasons. First, these organizations are very capable of withstanding the legal assault that will eventually be waged by lawyers and bar associations in their hope of preventing this practice. These non-law organizations have the financial where with all to debate this issue in court from now until the end of time. These non-law organizations earn very large revenues by engaging in these activities.

Second, law firms and bar associations do not have the time or financial resources to win this war. The monetary drain on the legal community will be too heavy a toll to bear. Perhaps more importantly is the brain drain that will occur. The best and brightest lawyers will be at the forefront of these suits. As attorneys, our efforts should be expended on clients (billable hours) not futile causes.

There are examples in other industries that we can compare with this problem. The big car manufacturers ignored the Japanese threat in the 1960's and early 1970's and paid a heavy price to win back the confidence of the American consumer. Likewise, American steel companies ignored foreign competition and were almost put entirely out of business. Likewise, law firms should not dismiss the threat posed by non-law organizations. These organizations will continue their invasion of what was traditionally considered the sole dominion of the legal community.

Perhaps the most appropriate comparison is that of the advent of personal computers in the early 1980's and their impact on IBM. IBM, as well as many other large hardware and software manufacturers, did not understand the threat that the lowly personal computer posed to their very existence. The established computer companies felt that this innovation had nothing to do with their businesses. As far as these companies were concerned, the PC was an entirely different industry. History, however, clearly shows that their thinking was seriously flawed. Although today IBM has resumed its role as a major market force, it suffered greatly during the late 1980's and early 1990's due to its inability to recognize the paradigm shift in the industry.

The question for every lawyer to consider is twofold, (1) will the legal community recognize the dramatic impact the Internet will have on the practice of law, and (2) will the practice of law online be recognized as an effective means of dealing with the every increasing threat from non-lawyers?

I have listed below several links that have relevance regarding this topic. I have attached them here so as not to perpetuate the often haphazard and schizophrenic approach taken when researching on the web. I hope after reading this article in full you can use these links to further your understanding of this topic.

Personal jurisdiction is the power of a court to decide a matter in controversy and the control by that court over the subject matter and the parties involved. A court cannot assert its jurisdiction over a non-resident defendant unless there is statutory authority that allows for the exercise of that jurisdiction. A Federal district court must comply with the "long arm" statute of the state in which the district court sits. This statutory authorization is constrained by the Due Process Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment of the United States Constitution.

While the Court has not set a clear standard for the level and nature of contacts required to trigger general jurisdiction, it is fair to state that it takes a very high level of activity within the forum state to do so. Specific jurisdiction, on the other hand, arises from a defendant's contact with the forum state.

These conflicting interpretations of Asahi, however, should not create additional confusion for courts determining Internet personal jurisdiction issues, as the newness of the Internet allows courts to develop the law in this area. Even under O'Connor's tougher standard, a court could find that Internet activities accessible in a forum state are the same as activities directed at the forum state.

One approach is to view the Internet as a giant spider web. Under this virtual presence approach, when an Internet user places information in Cyberspace, he becomes present at each point that information touches. This approach is similar to Brennan's concurrence in Asahi. As the Internet carries information into every jurisdiction, a person who puts information on a website should anticipate being haled into court wherever that information flows.

This approach would require courts to determine who initiated the conduct that gives rise to the suit. The highway approach is consistent with O'Connor's opinion in Asahi, as the placement of a product into the "stream of commerce" alone does not constitute "purposeful availment." Additional conduct is required.

Compuserve then sought a declaratory judgment in Ohio, which was dismissed for lack of personal jurisdiction by the district court. The Sixth Circuit reversed the decision, finding that the defendant had purposefully directed his business activities toward Ohio by knowingly entering into a contract with an Ohio resident and "deliberately and repeatedly" transmitting files to Ohio.

In Bensusan, a New York jazz club owner sued a Missouri jazz club owner of the same name for trademark infringement based on the Missourian's use of the name on a website. While the website did contain information about the defendant's club, the site was not interactive. Thus the court did not assert personal jurisdiction over the defendant, reasoning that passive websites do not rise to purposeful availment standard required under a traditional personal jurisdiction analysis.

Although the service was not operational, users were receiving status reports once they provided their email address. The court found that although the defendant had yet to earn any money or send any advertisement to a user, the defendant was "doing business" as the website provided information about an upcoming service and solicited for personal information that would be used at some future date. The defendant's argument that the website was passive was rejected, as the court weighted heavily the fact that the website was designed for future commercial activity.

Those "interactive" sites as defined in the Zippo middle ground send responses to a user. In doing so, the website owner "travels" to the user's forum state. The more interactive the site, the more they contact the forum state. Thus, the more contact they make, the more likely the court will find that "minimum contacts" exist.

Absent a clear showing that uniform regulation is needed, state courts should be allowed to strike the balance in determining who should be subject to their jurisdiction. In the event that the states go too far, our Federal system of government is equipped to step in and address the issue.

Sullivan the Montgomery Alabama police chief argued that an advertisement giving an erroneous account of police activity against civil rights activists damaged his reputation. The court felt the need for free speech and the ability to publish without fear outweighed the damage to the police chief's reputation.(3) The court feared any regulation of the first amendment with regards to public officials and as a result paved the way for future defamation liability debate.

CompuServe provided for a third party to edit and monitor information posted on this forum known as Rumorville USA. The defamatory message was edited and posted to the forum without CompuServe actually reviewing the material.

In essence, the providers which ignore damaging material may not be responsible because they have the defense of lack of knowledge. This contradiction becomes more complicated when one analyzes the effort involved in actually policing all material hosted by a provider, it would be as simple as monitoring and regulating the conversations between individuals in every home and office across America. As a result of the courts inability to create a uniformed policy the legislature took action with the implementation of the Communications Decency Act of 1996.

While the Congress and the courts hastily attack internet authors under the guise of defamation they are creating the one thing that can destroy free speech-FEAR. No longer can a person feel secure in publishing an opinion of whistle blowing on corruption because while protecting the internet services the courts have offered subpoena power to those who wish to expose persons whom do not agree with.

Trying to borrow money and being turned down because his/her credit report was bad; attempting to find employment and being denied a job opportunity because either his/her credit history was bad, or there were traffic or criminal violations on his record; having to prove to his creditors and/or business associates that he/she did not declare bankruptcy;(31) being arrested at gunpoint and thrown in jail for a crime that you did not commit... all while the identity thief is enjoying the fruits of his labor.(32)  Unfortunately, it is not uncommon that a victim of identity theft not even realize that his information has been misappropriated until years have passed and much damage to his or her credit and/or his or her personal reputation has occurred.

Just as the individual victim of identity theft did not have much assistance under the old laws, the criminal did not have much fear of being caught or of a harsh punishment in the event he was caught.  The theft of someone's identity was not even viewed as a crime under the law; it was the fraud that was committed using the stolen identity that was deemed criminal.(33)  Furthermore, because the majority of identity theft frauds are relatively small in amount, federal agencies would not pursue them, and most state or local agencies ignored them.(34)  However, in 1998, President Clinton signed into law the Identity Theft and Assumption Deterrence Act, making the theft of identity information a crime and establishing restitution provisions for individual victims. Nevertheless, many victims of identity theft say that the law did not do enough.  Section I of this paper will discuss the provisions of the Identity Theft and Assumption Deterrence Act of 1998. Section II will discuss the effectiveness of the current law.  Section III will discuss pending legislation.  Finally, Section IV will suggest possible changes to the current system.

Punishment for this newly created crime ranges from fines to imprisonment for three to 25 years depending on the amount of wealth or property aggregated in a one year period and whether or not the identity theft offense is committed in connection with drug trafficking, organized crime, a prior conviction under the statute, or terrorism.(40)  Specifically, if the act involves the "transfer or use of one or more means of identification... [and] as a result of the offense, [the perpetrator] obtains anything of value aggregating $1,000 or more during any 1-year period," then the convicted criminal may receive a fine or imprisonment for not more than three years.(41)  If the act involves the transfer of "an identification document issued under the authority of the United States," or of a birth certificate, driver's license or personal identification card, or the act involves creating false identification documents, the convicted criminal may be fined or may receive up to fifteen years imprisonment.(42)   However, if the offense is committed to facilitate a drug trafficking crime, in connection with a crime of violence, or after a prior conviction under this law, the punishment will range from a mere fine to up to 20 years imprisonment. Finally, if the "offense is committed to facilitate an act of international terrorism," then the perpetrator could be fined or be placed in prison for up to 25 years.(43)  Actual sentencing is of course applied in accordance with the Federal Sentencing Guidelines, and any departure, either upward or downward, must be supported by mitigating factors or the lack thereof.(44)Thus, in addition to creating a new law whereby the thief of identifying information may be prosecuted, the Act provides for a heavy deterrence to would be violators.

This is true notwithstanding the fact that, along with the growth of the Internet, a lucrative market has developed in the ability to "collect, store, and disseminate" vast amounts of private, personal data referred to as "data mining" making it even easier for a identity thief to obtain identifying information.(64) Compounding this problem, many industries, such as banking, have long used personal identifying information such as the social security number as a security measure for transactions in an ironic attempt to protect the consumer and themselves from fraudulent transactions.(65)However, the fact that many security measures are keyed off of such personal identifying information as the social security number makes identity theft even easier now that the social security number of most any individual can now be obtained with the touch of a button.

Thus, victims of identity theft argue that the legislature should enact proactive laws to prevent or limit the use and sale of personal identifying information.(66)  However, supporters of such uses of personal information argue against any type of legislation insisting that their businesses will have to unfairly incur the cost of implementation;(67)they prefer self-regulation.

History of voter registration; or (13) Other similar information, as determined by the FTC.(80)  Specifically, individual reference services providers would be required to disclose to the consumer, upon request, the "nature, content, and substance of all information" in the consumer's file.(81)  Such a requirement would force consumers to become more aware of the vast amounts of personal information that has been gathered about them by such businesses and would allow them the opportunity to monitor the use and better prevent the abuse of such information.  However, the individual reference services providers would have a tremendous increase in the amount of time and money spent monitoring their accounts and communicating information to consumers.

The penalty for a violation of the new regulations shall be the same as a violation of the Federal Trade Commission Act regarding unfair or deceptive acts or practices and/or criminal sanctions under the Social Security Act .(95)  In addition, the attorney general for any state may bring a civil action as parens patriae on behalf of the residents of the State in an attempt to enjoin the act or practice, enforce compliance, obtain damages, or to obtain any other legal or equitable relief deemed appropriate.(96)  Currently, the proposed bill remains in the House Committee on Commerce and the Ways and Means Committee, as well as, the Senate Committee on Finance.

The fact that the legislature has proposed several bills addressing identity theft confirms that the crime has been growing rapidly.  The current Identity Theft Deterrence Act does not go far enough in combating this growing area of crime, and with the growth of the Internet, the potential for harm to innocent victims only increases.  First and foremost, the current law should be amended to place the responsibility of cleaning up a victims's credit or criminal record on the FTC.

Specifically, there should be personnel trained to assist the identity theft victim in every step of the process in order to ensure that his or her credit history is cleared of any fraudulent activity, bankruptcies filed are dismissed and cleared off of their record, and any criminal history compiled by the perpetrator is immediately erased.  A person whose identity has been stolen has already been victimized by definition; there is no reason that the clean up process has to perpetuate this victimization.

Secondly, the current law should be amended to ensure that identity theft cases, no matter how small, are investigated thoroughly by law enforcement, either federal or state and local. Identity thefts notoriously involve small financial transactions.  Identity thieves take advantage of the fact that current law enforcement authorities ignore crimes of a small monetary nature.  However, with the advent of the Internet, one determined identity thief could literally victimized thousands of individuals even though each separate transaction was only a small amount.  The current law allows for penalties if the identity thief obtains anything of value greater than $1,000 in the aggregate in a given year; however, in order to be penalized, the perpetrator must first be prosecuted.  The lack of investigation and prosecution of identity theft is a grave problem which needs to be aggressively addressed..

Third, the provision of the Identity Theft and Protection Act of 2000 requiring credit reporting agencies to notify the consumer immediately upon any request for changes in their accounts should be enacted.  Notification to the consumer at the new and old addresses after a request for a change in address has been made would provide the consumer an opportunity to identify a potential fraudulent transaction before it ever occurs thereby preventing much harm to him or herself as well as the financial institution.  Granted, such notification requirements would necessarily entail in increase in personnel at the credit reporting agencies and a correlating increase in cost of operations, however, as prevalent as identity theft is becoming, this increase in cost could be recovered by reducing the amount of financial loss due to the criminal act.  While the banking and financial industries are vehemently opposed to any regulation and continue to insist that self-regulation is a better route, the self-regulation offered to date has been insufficient to combat the growing crime.(107)  Further, self-regulation offers third party victims no avenue of enforcement other than a possible civil contract action based on any privacy policies issued to the consumer.(108)  Thus, the only answer is for the legislature to enact laws requiring businesses to act responsibly and providing for enforcement provisions if the laws are violated.

Government for tax identification purposes.  Originally, this was probably a good idea as it made the processing of millions of tax returns and claims much easier and probably more accurate.  However, the social security number has now become a second name for every individual and is used by most every business entity to identify that the individual is who he or she claims.  Ironically, such use by businesses began as an attempt to provide the consumer with an added sense of privacy and protection.  For example, the bank uses the social security account number as verification that the person wishing to withdraw funds is the true account holder in an attempt to prevent fraud.  The problem is that the social security number has become so commonly used by all businesses for these purposes that if an identity thief acquires someone's social security number, he then has access to almost every private account belonging to that person.  As such, the provisions proposed in the Social Security Number Protection Act and the Privacy and Identity Protection Act of 2000 prohibiting the sale or purchase of a social security number should be enacted.  Further, the social security number should not be displayed on a person's driver's license, an employee's checks, an employee's identification card, a college identification card, or any other publicly viewable device.  In addition, the act of venders asking for a social security number prior to doing business with a consumer should be prohibited.  Any vendor who refuses to do business with a consumer because that consumer does not want to share their social security number should lose their business license and/or be heavily fined.  While in the past, one could argue that the use of the social security number actually helped to prevent fraud, current crime trends show that it now merely perpetuates the crime of identity theft.  Thus, the usage of the social security number should be severely restricted and/or eliminated.  Picture identification should be required with every transaction.  Encrypted photo identification is a possible solution available to e-businesses; however, any file on the computer is also subject to theft and misuse.  A study should be performed to identify the best possible way to provide accurate verification of identity during online transactions with only a minimum of risk of abuse.

Finally, most businesses now use computers in their daily operations which undoubtedly contain a database of every customer with each customer's name, address, telephone number, social security number, mother's maiden name, etc.  Along with the growth in the development of technology has come the ability of many to break into these databases, steal the identifying information, and either sell it or use for fraudulent purposes.  Indeed, some business actually exist solely to accumulate and sell personal identifying information.  While there is clearly a market for such information, most consumers would argue that both the gathering of the information as well as the ultimate use of the information (i.e. marketers) is an invasion of privacy.  Thus, the legislature should enact a law to prohibit the gathering and sale of personal identifying information.  Business that deal only in the gathering and disseminating of personal information should be banned.  There is no good purpose for having such information made available to any and everyone who wishes to acquire it.  These information brokers argue that consumers actually benefit from the improved accuracy of information given to marketers because they receive less solicitation as every sales call is more targeted.  Most consumers, however, would probably argue that even a well targeted sales call is harassment, and solicitations by mail are mere nuisances which ultimately only cause harm to the environment.  Personal identifying information is just that - personal - and it should be kept that way unless a consumer chooses to release his information.  Consent should not be assumed.

With the advent of the Internet, identity theft has become the fastest growing crime today. Advocates of identity theft prevention insist that the development of data mining and on-line databases filled with personal information invite hackers as well as unethical employees to snoop and take all the personal information on unsuspecting individuals that they can download or print.(109)  Accordingly, they insist that the best way to prevent identity theft is to legislate limitations on those profiting from selling personal information.(110)  Indeed, most would have to agree that unrestricted trade of personal information in the private sector has helped create the identity theft epidemic.   Nonetheless, current laws do nothing to prevent identity theft.  In fact, the current Identity Theft and Deterrence Act has just now made identity theft itself a crime.

Businesses who compile, use and sell personal identifying information admit that such technologically accessible databases are a growing source of the problem, but these same business argue that self-regulation is better than forced legislation.

However, as is evident by the rapid increase in identity theft, self-regulation to date has not been sufficient to curb the growing crime. Thus, while everyone can agree on the source of the problem, not everyone agrees on the cure. However, one thing is certain, unless some action is taken to reduce the access and public sale of personal identifying information, including social security numbers, identity theft will continue to thrive, and no one will be safe from the devious criminal who rapes, steals, kills and lies all while claiming to be you.

"The consumer's social security number is the most important form of information for a thief because it opens up an individual's financial life by providing easy access to bank accounts, brokerage accounts, and other important and private information." Id.

Happen to Your Good Name, that covers everything from how identity theft occurs to how consumers can protect themselves, and it is available on the FTC website . Id. For additional suggestions on how to protect oneself from identity theft, see http://www.stolen-identity.com , http://www.fraud.org , http://www.accessatlanta.com/partners/clarkhoward/cliffnotes/timps/identity_theft , http://www.identitytheft.org , and http://www.privacyrights.org .

Toward the end of the period between 1500 and 1800, pornography lost its political role and instead, began to be produced only for individual sexual gratification. An industry was created that produced mass quantities of publications that were not intended to be political or cultural critiques. Once political pornography evolved (or devolved) to this phase, it ceased being political and began to be profit-making. The political history of pornography has shaped the postmodern definition that we understand today. This change is what lead to the development of the type of pornography that we are most familiar with today. To understand today's pornography, it is necessary to understand and incorporate the political history that pornography has and the influence that its history contributed to our understanding of pornography in this post-modern period.

Since that time, various developments in technology have changed the way pornography is disseminated. However, it was not until the advancement in internet technology that access to pornography was virtually unlimited. Before the internet, one wishing to purchase or view pornographic material had to go to a facility which housed such material and provide photo identification. This allowed the government to regulate children's access to pornography. It also provided the government with an enforceable method of ensuring that illegal pornographic material was not sold. By reviewing the material sold in the establishments selling pornography, and by requiring publishers of the pornographic materials to provide proof of the age of the subjects in the photographs, illegal pornographic materials such as child pornography and bestiality could be monitored.

Now, with the development of the internet, the regulation of pornographic material has become much more difficult.(3) Children can access pornographic materials from their homes or even from public libraries, and illegal materials can easily be disseminated. Anyone with a scanner and a modem can post obscene photographs which are available to millions of people. Indeed, each day additional sites dedicated to pornography are created. The numbers, discussed below, indicate that the pornography industry is experiencing record growth. This paper will examine various approaches to the government's attempts at regulation of pornography and will explore several alternatives to government regulation.

A recent study of public library computers released March 2, 1999 by the American Family Association (an admittedly biased group) found that of 503 incidents where pornography was accessed from public library computers, 245 incidents involved children and 20 involved child pornography. The report documents 195 incidents of children accessing pornography, at an average age of 12-years-old.(6) This study shows the serious need for regulation of pornographic materials, or at least regulation of where pornographic materials can be viewed. Clearly, a public library funded with tax payer dollars should not facilitate a child's illegal access to pornographic material, or an adult's access to illegal child pornography. However, there are many reasons to be cautious of library use of filtering software (discussed below).

Mr. President, Georgetown University Law School has released a remarkable study conducted by researchers at Carnegie Mellon University. This study raises important questions about the availability and the nature of cyberporn. ...

As with any new technology there are dangers and concerns that must be addressed. When the first cars were put on the streets many cyclists were killed before traffic laws were modified. When electronic pagers first were introduced, drug dealers used the technology to further their drug business. Soon after the invention of the first airplane came the horror of the first air crash. The same is true for the internet. For all the development that the internet has furthered, there are still dangers which must be addressed. One such danger is the effect of the internet on the effective regulation of pornography. In many ways the laws governing the internet have not caught up with the developments of the technology. It is a story of virtual "wild west", where the law isn't so much a set of government mandated rules as it is a matter of what technology has developed.

Underlying many of the arguments outlined below is the notion that the First Amendment provides a shield for criminals to view violent, crude and offensive materials. Many of the arguments are stated in ways which are designed to produce emotional and charged responses from the reader. It is important, both for the individual and for the sake of freedom, that the reader fully explore each of the "solutions" outlined below. The First Amendment is often cited as the Amendment which gives America its character. Indeed, when many people think of freedom it is America's expression and acceptance of a wide range of ideas which comes to mind. The reader is urged to consider carefully any solution which at its core aims to strip the First Amendment from our cherished Bill of Rights. In the final analysis it is our freedom of expression which allows us to express our freedom.

One study which purported to shed some light on the true extent of the saturation of pornography on the internet is known as the "Rimm study" or the "Carnegie Mellon University (CMU) study", as it is sometimes called. The author of the study, Martin Rimm, was not an attorney or even a sociologist but instead was an electrical engineering undergraduate student interested in examining the extent of pornography on the internet. His study was published in Georgetown Law Journal (Rimm, 1995b), and has received extensive criticism(22).

The Rimm study has now been greatly discredited. (23) It is cited in this paper not for its statistical accuracy or for its conclusions. Rather, the study is relevant in that it shows the fear and alarmist attitude set forth by various individuals and groups regarding pornography and First Amendment issues. This author in no way approves of the Rimm study or its conclusions and does not purport to rely on any of the Rimm study statistics as a basis either for or against pornography. Following the summary of the study are just a few of the criticisms that the study has received.

Because the sample size is "several orders of magnitude larger than previously published studies of either pornography content or consumption," Rimm maintains that the findings "may have serious implications for legal theory and public policy related to pornography" (Ibid.).

Rimm writes: The best data concerning network pornography consumption comes from the Usenet, which itself constitutes only 11.5% of Internet traffic. Of this 11.5%, approximately 3% by message count, but 22% by byte count (e.g., 2.5% of total Internet backbone traffic) is associated with Usenet newsgroups containing pornographic imagery" (p. 1869). Thus, by Rimm's own figures then, fewer than one-half of 1% of the messages on the Internet (3% of 11.5%) are "associated with" newsgroups that contain pornographic imagery; since some of those messages are, presumably, not themselves pornographic, the actual proportion of pornographic messages is therefore even smaller than that. "However, as this study makes clear, studying pornography according to consumption, as opposed to availability, provides a much more revealing picture of the marketplace" (p. 1869). Although Rimm's figures show that of the forty most popular newsgroups worldwide "only one, alt.binaries.pictures.erotica, contained encoded pornographic images," (p. 1871), he claims that "when the data is (sic) classified by percent of news readers who subscribe to the newsgroups, three of the five most popular newsgroups are pornographic. Moreover, 20,644 of the 101,211 monthly Usenet posts in the top forty newsgroups, or 20.4%, are pornographic" (p. 1873). Oddly, no data are presented to support this claim, i.e., no data classify newsgroups by "percent of newsreaders who subscribe to the newsgroups." Nor is it clear whether Rimm, as he appears to claim, actually looked at 101,211 Usenet posts in the top forty newsgroups in order to determine that 20.4% of the postings "are pornographic."

The CDA was one of the first attempts to regulate internet pornography. The legislation did not survive a constitutional analysis by the Supreme Court. Writing for the majority, Justice Stevens explained that the restrictions prohibiting the transmission of obscene or indecent materials were content-based blanket restrictions on speech, and could not survive a First Amendment challenge as a form of time, place and manner regulation. The provisions were also deemed over broad on their face.

The decision in Reno was reached on First Amendment grounds, obviating the need to conduct a fifth amendment analysis. As the Court pointed out, when a government regulation proposes to limit speech, strict scrutiny is applied. This level of scrutiny requires that the government's ends, or what the government is attempting to protect, be compelling, and the means, or the method of regulating, be narrowly tailored to meet the need. Under the Court's analysis, this burden was not met because the CDA "effectively suppresse[d] a large amount of speech that adults have a constitutional right to receive and to address to one another. The burden on adult speech is unacceptable if less restrictive alternatives would be at least as effective..." Id. at 2346. There was no doubt that the government's ends, or the purpose of the legislation was legitimate. That is, the government clearly had an interest in protecting children. However, in its attempt to protect children, the government infringed on the rights of adults.

One question left open by Reno v. ACLU is how the government can properly regulate pornography on the internet, if indeed there is a way to do so without violating the First Amendment. The Court criticized many of the alternatives available at the time, and seemed to believe that in the near future technology would provide better methods of protecting children. The government would have to devise a scheme that would restrict children's access to pornographic materials without overly burdening consenting adults, and those posting the pornographic material.

One suggestion which was analyzed was the use of credit card verification. Using this method, web hosts, or those who operate the web sites, would require a credit card number before allowing access to pornographic materials. The credit card would not be charged, but rather the age of the viewer would be verified by use of an electronic data base. The Court was not satisfied with this proposal. For one thing, this method may cause an undue burden to non-commercial web hosts. The Court was of the opinion that this method may unduly restrict individuals' expression.

Another option which was discussed by the Court was parental control of what a minor could access. This method involved the use of software that restricts access to web sites containing certain words.(29) "Companies like America Online and Walt Disney have released tools that help parents screen out what can be seen on their computers while on the Internet."(30) Others are also calling for self- regulation, Seth Warshavksy, the owner of the Internet Entertainment Group (IEG) lwhich runs over 30 pornographic sites. He suggested during a Senate Committee meeting on Internet pornography that adult sites should only be viewed by adults. He proposed his method of ensuring that only adults were able to access adult material; what he termed as a "adult only" Internet area. It would be labeled ".adult", instead of the domain names we are so familiar with-".com, .org and .edu." (31) In this manner, one would know when adult material was going to be accessed, thereby avoiding the problem of accidental exposure.

Another problem with this method is enforcement. Specifically, there is virtually no way that the government can ensure that everyone complies with the tagging requirements. With literally millions of new web sites added yearly, it is a monumental task to attempt to document what each site contains, much less to determine whether a violation of the tagging requirements exists. This sort of enforcement would require a huge expenditure by the government and the results are anything but guaranteed. Simply put, the tagging method would place demands on law enforcement much like the "war on drugs", where the arrest of one perpetrator simply creates room in the market for one more entrepreneur.

All of the solutions so far presented can be categorized into one of two categories: zoning solutions and filtering solutions. Lessig points out the differences between the two systems well in his law review article (see footnote 6).

In a zoning solution, "[s]peakers are zoned into a space from which children are excluded." This is the model adopted both by the Communications Decency Act. Under these types of statutes, sites offering pornographic must deny unless and until the individual wishing to view the material can prove that he or she is an adult. A sub-category of the zoning solution would be a requirement that minors configure their browsers in a way that would identify them as a minor to all other computers, possibly through the use of "cookies". (34)In this manner, minors would be telling the world not to allow them access to pornographic materials. And web sites offering the material would simply block the minor's access to the material.

The zoning scheme requires the government to censor items that are considered pornographic, while the filtering system allows individuals to determine what they should and should not see. According to Lessig, zoning solutions are akin to censorship whereas filtering solutions resemble choice(35) For this reason, filtering solutions may not go far enough, while zoning solutions may indeed go too far (at least in a constitutional analysis). There is already much evidence that children can easily bypass parental controls on computers. In fact, a recent TV program documented a child who boasted of his abilities to vie pornography without his parents finding out, despite the fact that his parents had a filtering software on the home computer. (36) Further, even if parents restrict children's access from home computers, there is no ability to control what the children view outside the home.

This paper will focus on the use of disclaimers to avoid the existence or establishment of an attorney client relationship on attorney operated websites. After a brief discussion on the law of attorney disclaimers in general and the related public policy concerns, this paper will address two types of attorney operated websites, first, advertisement sites, then interactive websites.

Restatement to apply, nor does it require that a person share confidential information. In fact many state bars have warned its members against providing advice in certain public settings, such as seminars and radio talk shows. These bars feel that laypeople are likely to rely on such advice on the mistaken assumption that this advice applies specifically to them. Furthermore, when a person does communicate confidential information to an attorney, either in a personal or public setting, it is often powerful evidence that the person intended to form an attorney-client relationship. This communication then may impose a duty upon a lawyer even if he clearly indicates that representation is declined. Therefore, under the Restatement's definition a request for legal advice that is received through an attorney's website will probably begin the formation of an attorney-client relationship, based upon the fact that the client has expressed a desire for legal advice.

In conclusion, it is imperative that an attorney pay particular close attention to online communication with another since the Restatement only requires that the person intend to ask for legal advice, and the indication is that very little is required for them to express this intent.

It is probably reasonable to assume that the courts will error on the side of the public and find that the linchpin for the analysis was the attorney giving legal advice of any kind to another. Therefore, to be conservative, an attorney should assume that every time he responds to a question online, he has provided legal advice and intended to form a confidential attorney-client relationship with the other person.

Presumably, advertising on the Internet may be included in the list of available yet restricted advertising venues. Therefore, attorney advertising on the Internet should be permitted as long as: there is an attempt to keep a recorded copy of the advertisement for two years, that any lawyer not give anything of value for recommendations, and the website include the name of at one attorney responsible for its content.

Even on webpages attorneys should be careful of stating a specialty unless certified. The only ambiguity is that within Rule 7.4 it has guidelines for jurisdictions that have a regulatory authority granting certification as well as for jurisdictions where there are no procedures for any certifications.

At the very least, a data flow diagram of an interactive web site must contain at least and one conditional branch. The very simplest could be some version of the "I accept" button found on many commercial web sites.

Therefore, a web site which returns to the user an answer to "a specific legal question" #(77) or a contract, will, or other legal document has provided a legal service. This may be a direct answer or an e-mail reply.

Today, a lawyer can roll out of bed at home, unshowered, pull up to a PC in pajamas and bunny slippers, and initiate settlement proceedings. Counsel can be notified of a settlement offer while stepping, dripping wet, from the shower an hour later.

Will -- or should -- lawyers be arguing the issues discussed in those virtual courtrooms? If disputing parties flock to a more casual, convenient, and user-friendly forum than the traditional courthouse has provided, will lawyers contribute chiefly as behind-the-scene legal coaches and consultants?

MIRC maintains a web site that provides a variety of information about mediation generally, and articles and discussions about online mediation specifically. See the Mediation Information and Resource Center.

When electronic communication is used, the neutral shuttles back and forth, communicating with the parties and passing on information as permitted, calling joint sessions as appropriate, just as in offline mediation.

Reliability Seal hopes to convey to consumers a level of assurance that this is a legitimate vendor, with the BBB ready to assist the customer if the vendor does not live up to expectations; and with arbitration, at the customer's option, available to resolve unsettled matters.

While pointing out the benefits of "eliminating missed telephone calls, keeping the negotiations moving, [and] saving litigation costs" SettlementOnline states its service helps with "most importantly, getting to a number."

"People in virtual communities use words on screens to exchange pleasantries and argue, engage in intellectual discourse, conduct commerce, exchange knowledge, share emotional support, make plans, brainstorm, gossip, feud, fall in love, find friends and lose them, play games flirt, create a little high art and a lot of idle talk. People in virtual communities do just about everything people do in real life, but we leave our bodies behind."

Some scholars have asserted that the Internet cannot reach its full potential without a carefully crafted model of dispute resolution that encourages cooperation and collaboration, and that reinforces a sense of community.

Both parties to online transactions are familiar with the Internet and know how to use it; both generally have email capability; and the parties have already established a financial relationship, making financial settlements easier to implement.

Unlike oral communications, email messages kept in an electronic archive can be retrieved by the parties, who may look at them frequently and renew their anger over past statements, even when the other party has since moved away from that position.

"No shows" and getting both parties to the (virtual) table can be a real problem in ODR. Cybertribunal, a site founded by a University of Montreal law professor, closed because in over half of the 500 cases Cybertribunal attempted to resolve, the "defendant" never responded to email requests for information.

Full disclosure is essential. Yet visitors to web sites are accustomed to browsing quickly through information and may jump right into the processes offered on the site without reading through the preliminary information and instructions.

ODR doesn't currently create an even informal body of precedent from its resolutions; this makes accountability and predictability of consequences for behavior, particularly by merchants, more difficult.

Encryption technology and digital signature protocols are not yet standardized; parties who need to keep their business confidential and their agreements untampered with run a greater risk when they handle a dispute online instead of face-to-face.

The Internet Neutral glibly notes that participants "should have a Pentium II computer with a direct Internet connection of at least 56K. Many of the technologies are already included in commercially available browsers or are easily downloadable from the Internet as plug-ins to your browser or as 'standalone' programs."

The Federal Trade Commission has had some of the responsibility for regulating commerce ever since the agency was formed in 1914 by Congress to prevent "unfair methods of competition...and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in or affecting commerce."

"Because the Internet makes direct links of communication available to anyone, it empowers its users to bypass existing legal institutions. Decision making in cyberspace is already private and decentralized."

Magistrate was one of two dispute resolution programs pioneered on the Internet in a collaboration by organizations such as The National Conference of Automated Information Research (NCAIR) and the Cyberspace Law Institute.

See id. at 1325. Eisen argues that the near-sole use of written communication in online mediation not only makes communication more difficult; it actively contributes to communication breakdowns. See id. at 1308.

However, the CD you receive is not the one you ordered.  A dispute arises between you and the CD vendor via email over getting the original CD you wanted.  Words are exchanged and become more heated.  Finally, during the climax of these exchanges, you lose your cool and, in the heat of the moment, write: "You Kraut bastard!  I'm sure when you're not spending your time goose-stepping down to the local beer hall, you're figuring out some way to rip off the average customer.

If it weren't for the fact that an ocean separates you, I'd find a way to burn your damn store down!"  Only after cooling down do you realize you made a mistake.  However, you think nothing of your outburst because over 4,000 miles separates you from Germany.

In four days time, there is a knock on your door and, surprised, you see two police officers standing there, arrest warrant in hand.  You have been charged with making terroristic threats over the Internet and are now subject either to deportation to stand trial for the offense in Germany, or domestic prosecution for the same offense in federal court-all under provisions of the Multinational Treaty on Cybercrime.

A great degree of controversy has been generated about this agreement to date.  Some of discourse was generated by the allegation that 19 drafts of this agreement were generated before the United States Department of Justice ever admitted the document's existence. 2  The 2000 Libertarian Party candidate for President, Harry Browne, described the Draft Convention in the following manner: "This treaty doesn't attack crime.

However, the need for uniform standards governing Internet behavior and criminal conduct has been a frequent cry by computer users globally.  The potential harm that one computer can wreak globally over the World Wide Web has already been demonstrated and, until uniform standards exists to bring the perpetrators of "cybercrimes" to justice, serious doubts exist whether Internet wrongdoers can be punished for the acts they carry out across international boundaries and over the Web.

Guzman's case is the most visible example of the problems facing international oversight and jurisdictional issues regarding the Internet.  However, other less-publicized examples have arisen.  In February 2000, a huge denial-of-service attack crippled many large websites in the United States, such as Yahoo!, Amazon.com and eBay.com.  Investigators believe this attack was coordinated by a group of computer criminals working in concert.

Responsibility for tracking and prosecuting cyber-criminals has predictably fallen upon the federal Department of Justice.  In 1991, the Justice Department formed the Computer Crime Unit, which has presently evolved into the Computer Crime and Intellectual Property Section (CCIPS).  This unit encompasses virtually every aspect of computer and Internet communications, including electronic privacy issues, encryption and e-commerce investigations.

This group also coordinates with other law enforcement agencies and officials who have responsibility for investigating computer-related crimes.  For example, the Federal Bureau of Investigations operates the National Infrastructure Protection Center, part of which is organized as a computer crime unit (this is likely the unit that operates the notorious "Carnivore" email interception software). 10 The Computer Crime and Intellectual Property Section is also responsible for international coordination of law enforcement investigations and helping draft legislation with other countries to create cybercrime laws and prosecute cybercriminals.  This is probably the section of the Department of Justice most responsible for helping write the Draft Convention on Cybercrime.

United States' success at passing federal legislation that has regulated large areas of interstate Internet behavior, the nation has been unsuccessful at coordinating international cooperation to criminalize certain forms of Web activity.  In fact, a search of any international agreement between any two or more countries agreeing to outlaw any form of cybercrime does not presently exist.  Thus, the Draft Convention on Cybercrime was simply an event that was waiting for its time to arrive.

However, there are at least four types of international agreements that the President can form that do not need the advice and consent of the Senate. 14 Even though the Supreme Court has already mentioned these agreements have no basis within the Constitution, the High Court has otherwise ruled these "pseudo-treaties"  are consistent with the Constitution, but has likewise criticized them within the same breath.  See Weinberger v. Rossi, 456 U.S. 20 (1982).

Title 4 outlaws infringement of copyright and relies upon pre-existing international agreements to serve as guideposts to define protected materials (such as the Bern Convention for the Protection of Literary and Artistic Works, the WIPO Copyright Treaty, etc.); and Title 5 provides for added party liability by defining and outlining the standards for aiding and abetting criminal behavior, corporate liability, etc.

Section 2 of the Draft outlines the procedural elements signatory nations are to legislate to create a uniform set of standards whereby law enforcement agencies can search and seize computer equipment used for illegal purposes.

The remainder of the Draft provides for measures signatory nations are to undertake to have jurisdiction for the named offenses, as well as principles to foster international cooperation with the Draft's terms and expedited investigations of computer-related offenses.

For instance, nowhere in the text of the document are the words, "substantive due process" or "procedural due process" used.  In fact, no synonymous terms can be found in the entire Draft.  The closest the Draft writers came to actually addressing these points were in the preamble, when they wrote of "ensuring a proper balance between the interests of law enforcement and respect for fundamental human rights."   However, "fundamental human rights" is an ambiguous term that can lead to multiple interpretations.  The United States Supreme Court has already demonstrated that it can articulate fundamental rights from the Due Process Clause, as evidenced in Palko v. Connecticut, 302 U.S. 319 (1937) and Adamson v. California, 332 U.S. 46 (1947).

But domestic definitions of what are fundamental human rights can vary, for example, from a state with a criminal justice system such as Russia, where present legal standards hold the accused is actually guilty until proven innocent.

Such inherent conflicts between American standards of constitutionality and the requirements of the Draft Convention on Cybercrime lead to the central hypothesis of this paper: that the United States signature on this document is a symbolic but hollow act that will ultimately lead to either Congress not ratifying the treaty, or the Supreme Court invalidating many of its provisions as unconstitutional because the Draft's legislative terms trample on many fundamental individual liberties enjoyed by the accused.  Thus, responsibility for fighting cybercrime will have to rest upon domestic law enforcement using new investigative techniques within constitutional bounds, or the private sector will have to increase its vigilance of online activities to intercept and catch cyber-criminals at their own game.

There are three key areas where the Draft Convention on Cybercrime will have insurmountable problems, ensuring the document is either not ratified by the Senate or is overturned by the Supreme Court: first, the non-self-executing nature of the treaty will render it unenforceable; second, certain portions of the Draft's plain text create constitutional conflicts; and third, Supreme Court interpretation of treaties and international law will establish barriers that prevent the Draft from ever having the force and effect of law.

United States courts have increasingly adopted the dualist doctrine interpreting how international law should apply within the nation's legal system.  A dualist doctrine holds that national and international legal systems operate within wholly individual contexts.

Convention on Cybercrime indicates that the treaty is not self-executing.  Multiple portions of the Draft specifically state that signatory nations should enact legislation to make the Draft's provisions effective within the sovereign state's borders.  For example, the first sentence of Title 5, Article 13 states that: "Each Party shall take the necessary measures to ensure that the criminal offense established in accordance with Articles 2-11 are punishable by effective, proportionate and dissuasive sanctions and measures."  Alternatively, under the section titled "Jurisdiction" (Title 5, Article 19), the Draft calls upon signatory nations to, "take such legislative and other measures as may be necessary to establish jurisdiction over any offense established in accordance with Article 2-11 of this Convention, when the offense is committed?"

It is axiomatic that Congress can only enact legislation within constitutionally permissible grounds.  Thus, if the Draft were to call upon the signatory nations to enact legislation that is either a.) unconstitutional upon its face, or b.) contradictory of existing national law, then the Draft could not possibly be self-executing and would have no legal force and effect.

This is exactly the situation that is developing.  As explained in greater detail below, the Draft Convention on Cybercrime outlaws behavior that is not presently criminal activity, it calls upon the United States to enact search and seizure methods that contradict existing Fourth and Fifth Amendment law, and it is further unenforceable under existing treaty interpretation principles.  Congress could not possibly enforce the Draft's provisions without major rewriting of the Fourth and Fifth Amendments and the courts reversing numerous decisions involving international criminal law.

In fact, what the Draft Convention would call on the United States to do is subject at least part of its legal system to the "supranationality" and doctrine of direct effects that is presently seen in Europe among nations who belong to the Council of Europe.  The doctrine of direct effects calls upon nations who ally with one another either by treaty or common interest to concede part of their sovereignty to the umbrella alliance or union. 19 However, as has already been argued, major structural changes to the American constitutional system would have to occur-changes so drastic that their chances of happening are negligible.

England's highest court, the House of Lords, declared the court lacked jurisdiction from the Crown to grant injunctive relief, and it further stated that an English law is valid unless Parliament declares otherwise by repeal legislation. 20 The United States' experience would be similar under the Draft Convention.  Only an act of Congress and major constitutional amendments would create the necessary framework to make the Draft have its full force and effect.

Thus, the Draft Convention on Cybercrime will have no profound effect on the United States criminal code, nor will it enhance domestic law enforcement's ability to "crack down" on cybercriminals.  However, this only becomes clearer by further examining what exact constitutional conflicts and treaty interpretation principles conflict with the Draft Convention.

However, there is a distinction in these two provisions that might create an exception whereby a sovereign government can compel a person to produce the computer information.  These two sections of the Draft are attempting to compel a person to produce data or information.  Thus, they are more analogous to a subpoena duces tecum, calling for the production of documents or things to the court.  Consequently, the government could argue that it is interested in the contents of the subpoenaed items, nd not the person per se, which is a scenario not covered by the Fifth Amendment.

The fatal flaw in this argument, however, is that there is an inseparable act of production that must occur for the accused person to produce the requested data and information under the Draft Convention's terms.  Under these conditions, the accused person could invoke the Fifth Amendment privilege to prevent an "implied authentication."

A simple stretch of facts and circumstances reveals the Doe holding has applicability to the provisions of Articles 14 and 15 of the Draft Convention.  A person under government order to produce data or computer information, if he or she were to produce such items, would be admitting that the items existed, were on his or her hard drive and were the items sought by the government.  Thus, it is reasonable to believe the accused could invoke the Fifth Amendment to oppose such a request for evidence.

One interesting challenge to a Doe immunity claim under the Draft Convention's provisions would be that, since most computer users do not actually own the software or operating systems within their computers and are only licensing these items, any incriminating images or programs the operators create are actually the property of the operating system owner/distributor and are consequently discoverable.  In Fisher v. United States, 425 U.S.

Court's finding two Philippine nationals in contempt for their refusal to testify in the Marcos corruption investigation. The court further ruled that the Fifth Amendment does not bind other nations, and testimony compelled by a domestic court but used by a foreign nation in accord with their laws does not violate the Constitution. 22  However, this decision would have only partial applicability to a prosecution carried out under the Draft Convention.  Theoretically, a national investigative service (such as the FBI) would be called upon to assist another nation's investigative arm with a computer crime having its origins in the United States but its effects in another sovereign state.  More than likely, domestic law enforcement agents must still act within constitutional boundaries in such a case.  However, confusion may arise whether the fruits of their investigation that may be unconstitutional within the U.S. can still be released to a foreign court because these items are within the foreign state's courts' evidentiary standards.

Line (d) calls for the passage of laws that would further permit a law enforcement agency to, "render inaccessible or remove those computer data in the accessed computer file."  Basically, it calls for police agencies to destroy personal files of an accused during the course of an investigation and prior to trial and adjudication.

Facially, this appears to contradict the plain language of the Fourth Amendment, which provides that, "(T)he right of the people to be secure in their persons, houses, papers, and effects, against unreasonable searches and seizures, shall not be violated?"  Also, the Fifth Amendment states that a person," (shall) not be deprived of life, liberty and property, without due process of law; nor shall private property be taken for public use, without just compensation."

In Katz v. United States, 389 U.S. 347 (1967), the defendant was convicted of illegal gambling based upon wagering information that was intercepted by the FBI from tap placed on a telephone booth.  Recognizing that Fourth Amendment protections attach to persons and not places, the High Court held this search unconstitutional and outlined its standards for what constituted a reasonable search utilizing electronic eavesdropping.

A cursory examination of the Draft Convention reveals it does not provide any of the protections provided by these Supreme Court decisions and federal law precedents.  These apparent voids make it very suspect that the act will have anywhere near the impact its preamble states it should within domestic law.

Constitutional issues that are subject to ambiguity and do not readily lend themselves to easy analysis.  Supreme Court opinions on difficult statutes that invoke the Bill of Rights are usually not the most simple of opinions to read.

Article 9, Subsection 2, Line (b) calls for signatory states to define child pornography as including visual depictions of, "a person appearing to be a minor engaged in a sexually explicit conduct."  It does not state that the subjects in the image must be a minor under the age of 18 years old.  Subsection 3 of this same provision permits signatory states to define the term "minor," for purposes of Subsection 2, according to their own individual laws, but it must still include anyone under 18 years old.  However, this exception still does not eliminate ambiguity-this particular code section would make possession of visual images of adults who appear as minors a crime under the Draft Convention on Cybercrime.

The crime as defined within the act is a specific intent crime, and also requires knowledge of attendant circumstances-i.e., the person downloading images off the web must believe the graphics are of minors engaging in sexual conduct.  If the facts and circumstances indicate that the subjects in a picture are not minors, and the accused knows the people within the image are not minors, then a person cannot possess and/or distribute child pornography.  Simply, it is adult pornography that looks like minors.

A similar scenario exists for a person prosecuted for obtaining child pornography that is actually adults depicting minors.  A person might simply have a fetish for young looking (emphasis added) adults, but have no interest in actual minors engaged in sexual conduct.

Even though this might raise eyebrows as an issue of concern, it is not illegal conduct.  Also, a website might offer a disclaimer that all persons depicted in the sexual graphics it holds are over the age of 18 years old.

Convention on Cybercrime would not be complete without mention that the Act does incorporate some safeguards for sovereign nations to ensure that its laws are in compliance with the Draft's provisions.

Subsection 7, which states, "The powers and procedures referred to in the present Article shall be subject to conditions and safeguards as provided for under national law."  Also, Article 23, which provides for mutual assistance of states in international criminal investigations involving the Internet, has codified two subsections that maintain the integrity and supremacy of a signatory nation's laws.  Subsection 3 permits a nation to refuse assistance with an investigation request when it is, "incompatible with the law of the requested party."  Also, Subsection 4 states: "(T)he requested Party may, in addition to conditions or grounds for refusal available under Article 22 (4), refuse assistance if it believes that compliance with the request would prejudice its sovereignty, security, ordre public or other essential interests."

Thus, the United States would still retain the right to not comply with the Draft Convention's stipulations if it found portions wholly incompatible with the Constitution.  However, this point just begs a question-should the Senate ratify and the President sign an agreement that, facially, has so many flaws and contradicts so many fundamental rights now understood, enjoyed by and enforced among American citizens?  Clearly, if this international agreement were to proceed towards ratification within the Congress, severe alterations would have to occur to make it comply with basic constitutional principles.  It is highly doubtful that the Draft Convention, after such changes were made, would retain its full force and effect in the final product.

The force and effect of treaties, once ratified, is they are the supreme law of the land.  Because the Tenth Amendment and the Supremacy Clause ensure the individual states cannot create conflicting or superceding laws to any treaty, a binding international agreement will apply to a state's laws and citizens just as any domestic law would.  See Hauenstein v. Lynham, 100 U.S.

At first glance, it appears that if the Senate were to approve the Draft Convention on Cybercrime, its force and effect would be binding on each American state.  Any new laws or procedures created by the Act would have to be passed through the appropriate federal scheme.  Thus, state and municipal law enforcement agencies, by preemption principles, would have to honor its provisions when carrying out cybercrime investigations.

First, it violates the principle that international agreements cannot conflict with express Constitutional provisions.  In Reid v. Covert, 354 U.S. 1 (1957), the United States government argued that two independent bases permitted military jurisdiction over civilian dependents overseas: Article 1, Section 8 of the Constitution, and an international agreement with a foreign state.  While addressing the latter issue, the Supreme Court's plurality opinion in Reid held there was nothing in the language of the Constitution permitting a treaty or foreign executive agreement to not comply with existing constitutional standards.

As already explained, select portions of the Draft Agreement, as presently written, facially conflict with the Fourth and Fifth Amendments.  In fact, the principles elucidated within these Amendments are such bedrock foundations to constitutional criminal law that they are widely recognized by lay people throughout American society.  Thus, the Draft Convention would likely not survive scrutiny by the Supreme Court when challenged, and major portions of the Act would be either heavily amended or deleted in their entirety.

This reading of the Supreme Court's possible future course of conduct is consistent with that body's longstanding principle when examining treaties called the "Charming Betsy Rule."  Basically, this rule states that the Court will try to construe domestic laws so as not to avoid international agreements.

Charming Betsy Rule when applying it to federal criminal law.  A reviewing court will give full force and effect to a treaty so long as the international agreement and its interpretations are consistent with constitutional principles.  Thus, in Ma v. Reno, 208 F. 3d 815 (9th Cir. 2000), the Appeals Court held that the indefinite detention of an extraditable resident alien was unconstitutional because it violated his due process rights.  The plaintiff was subject to deportation to Cambodia after serving a prison sentence; however, the United States had no extradition treaty with Cambodia, and the INS detained the plaintiff indefinitely until it could arrange his deportation.  The Ninth Circuit held this violated his substantive due process rights that he was granted once resident alien status was conferred upon him.  In a separate part of the opinion, the Ninth Circuit favorably commented on an amicus curiae argument that indefinitely detaining the plaintiff would violate the Charming Betsy Rule and directly conflict with United States' international agreements on fundamental human rights that banned arbitrary detention.

The Charming Betsy Rule has applicability to the brewing conflict on the Draft Convention on Cybercrime.  A likely government argument to any private citizen's challenge of the Act is that, according to the Rule, courts cannot interpret domestic laws to violate international agreements.  Thus, the Draft Convention, if passed by Congress, would constructively agree with constitutional principles of substantive and procedural due process.

However, the accused would have an equally valid counterpart argument under the Charming Betsy Rule as explained in the Ma opinion.  He or she could claim that the United States' signature on assorted treaties upholding fundamental human rights binds the federal government to recognize both substantive and procedural due process.  Thus, the federal government cannot enforce a prosecution under the Draft Convention when it violates existing federal law on these two basic principles.

Called "the doctrine of rebus sic stantibus," this doctrine stands for the principle that a nation who is party to a treaty can invoke changed circumstances as an excuse for invalidating its obligations under a treaty.  This principle was explained in the court case Trans World Airlines v. Franklin Mint, 466 U.S. 243 (1984).  There, the respondent sought compensation for lost cargo shipped by the petitioner; however, the petitioner shipper said its valuation of the cargo was fixed under a 1927 treaty that was substantially less than the amount claimed by the respondent.  The Supreme Court upheld the lesser valuation, finding that changed domestic valuation standards had no effect on still-enforceable international standards.

Convention on Cybercrime would, theoretically, have an argument that pending judicial review of the constitutionality of the Act's provision may preclude enforcing its terms under the doctrine of rebus sic stantibus.

Thus, the Supreme Court's ruling in Reid, the modification of the Charming Betsy Rule as explained by the Ninth Circuit in Ma, and a challenge to enforcing the treaty under rebus sic stantibus all highlight that international agreements, simply because they are passed and enforced by separate sections of the Constitution, cannot escape conforming with basic Constitutional principles.

Second, the provisions within the Draft Treaty on Cybercrime addressing extradition of suspects across international boundaries hold substantial enforceability problems because these also violate both constitutional and international principles.

Extradition of cybercriminals is generally addressed by Chapter III, Article 21 of the Draft Convention.  This portion of the Act basically states that all crimes highlighted within the Act are extraditable offenses.  Two clauses within this section do preserve state's sovereignty over its citizens.  Article 21, Subsection 4 does require extradition to conform to the legal standards of the requested nation, and Subsection 5 does reserve the right of a requested nation to refuse extradition, provided that it carry out domestic prosecution of the suspect for the same offense.

There are multiple aspects to the extradition problem that complicate interpretation of this issue.  First, a suspect wanted within the United States can either be a foreigner, a resident alien, or a U.S. citizen.  These classifications create distinctions relative to extradition and the law that applies to each category of person.  Second, there is the nature of the foreign warrant and whether it conforms to the principles of the Fourth Amendment.  Last, the rule of judicial non-inquiry factors into the analysis by precluding courts from investigating the general fairness of a foreign arrest warrant.

Certain constitutional principles apply to all persons within the United States' borders.  The Fourth Amendment, for example, applies to all persons present within the United States, regardless of citizenship.  Thus, in Parretti v.

Constitutional protections apply, obviously, to all Americans who are citizens by birth or have been naturalized.  This is also true of foreign nationals who enter the United States and become resident aliens. 29 However, resident aliens come under an added scrutiny by the courts once they are accused of crimes because their legal status in the United States becomes at risk.  Thus, a two-step trial arises to see if the resident alien is guilty of the accused crime and, if so, do they become deportable after prosecution.

The category of resident aliens will likely present the most problematic challenge for any extradition order processed under the Draft Convention on Cybercrime.  Courts will be faced with an allegedly valid extradition order issued by a competent court of another nation.  In certain instances, the charges will be clear-cut violations of law in most sovereign states under the treaty (i.e.- computer fraud or violation of international copyrighted material).  However, a certain number of these cases might fall under the categories where the laws may not reflect true criminal conduct (such as viewing adults, depicted as minors, engaged in sexual conduct) or where the evidence may have been obtained by standards that do not conform with American constitutional protections under the Forth and Fifth Amendments.  At this point, the rule of judicial non-inquiry factors into the analysis and complicates the issue greatly.

However, this rule is not absolute and does not bar all judicial inquiry.  As the court in Parretti explained, certain fact-specific cases or controversies can still be decided by courts when evaluating extradition requests.

Cir. 1986), the court refused to invoke judicial non-inquiry because the alien's offense in his foreign nation was based upon political speech, and the expected treatment awaiting him would violate basic humanitarian principles.

Thus, courts will be stuck between the proverbial "rock and a hard place" when trying to evaluate an extradition request for a resident alien under the Draft Convention on Cybercrime.  First, there is the inquiry of whether an alien can be stripped of his or her constitutional protections for offenses that may not be crimes, or be extradited to stand trial for offenses that utilized investigative techniques and procedures that facially violate the Fourth and Fifth Amendments.  An alien fighting such a request could reasonably claim the doctrine of judicial non-inquiry does not apply because the Draft Convention is unconstitutional and, thus, the exception as explained in Quinn applies.  Second, the court would have to perform an independent evaluation of the merits of the foreign warrant.  As explained in the Parretti decision, the court can ignore the rule of judicial non-inquiry to examine whether a warrant is based on sufficient probable cause.  A defendant can make a reasonable argument that, if a warrant issued under the Draft Convention is based on a crime that does not fit the definition of an offense (such a child pornography when the depicted image shows two consenting adults) or is based on evidence obtained by patently unconstitutional methods, then the foreign warrant does not satisfy the probable cause standards of the Fourth Amendment.  Judicial non-inquiry will not apply under such circumstances and may serve as a basis to defeat an extradition request.

Cybercrime has severe constitutional issues that greatly inhibit the document's chances of ever becoming enforceable domestic law.  Its blatant conflicts with the Fourth and Fifth Amendment, as well as the problems the document would have conforming with existing treaty law, preclude its incorporation into existing federal criminal and telecommunications law.  This begs a question:  why even bother presenting such legislation for the advice and consent of the Senate in the first place?

Simply, it is a controversial area that demands public attention and activity on politicians' parts.  Computer crime, fraud and online decency standards are all "hot topics" that are frequently seen within the press.  Also, computer users tend to be higher educated, relatively more affluent individuals who are more likely to vote.  This increases the likelihood that politicians will want to be more proactive about computer crime to appear responsive to the needs of prospective voters.

Press attention on the problem further fueled this growing societal worry.  Also, an increase in suburban drug use further incited the public's anxiety about a growing epidemic.  In response, the federal and state governments enacted a "get tough" stance on drugs and drug dealers, with well-known laws (such as the "three strikes and you're out" law or "death penalty for drug kingpins") supposedly acting as the "cure" for America's drug problem.

Internet criminals.  "Cybercriminals" are often personified within news articles as "shadowy" figures who dwell on the outer limits of the World Wide Web, as far removed from mainstream American society as the Medellin cartel cocaine dealers.  In fact, the "worldliness" of the Web and the ability of nations to communicate within seconds heightens fears of truly international criminals reaching into local neighborhoods.

Computer based crimes, such as the "I Love You" virus or the denial service attacks on major Internet vendors, receive front page press.  An obvious societal response would be for enactment of more rigorous criminal statutes to combat such offenses.  The Draft Convention on Cybercrime fits the mold of such legislation.

When you use the Internet to make purchases, do you really know what you are getting yourself into? When you click on the final "submit" button, have you made an offer to the Seller to purchase these goods, or have you instead accepted an offer made to you by the Seller on its website? Or, alternatively, have you done neither of these things? Is this the electronic version of "battle of the forms," yet made even more confusing and muddled because the current laws may not adequately address these issues? And what is the significance of an email confirmation in the realm of contract formation? When do you, as the Buyer, become bound by the legal terms and conditions set out by the Seller, and what exactly are the terms by which you are bound? Are you aware of these terms and when they become binding as you shop on the Internet?

Unfortunately, there are no clearly defined answers to any of these questions. Because Internet merchants all may have different design features in the ordering process, as well as different terms and conditions as to when contract formation occurs, many Internet consumers never know what terms and conditions they are being bound by, or when exactly they become bound by these terms. As a result, none of us may have adequate consumer protection for the contracts we make on the Internet. Furthermore, the laws that currently govern the sale of goods (contract law and Article 2 of the Uniform Commercial Code) may not adequately relate to Internet contracts and, therefore, do not fully protect Internet consumers.  Law reform groups, such as the American Law Institute ("ALI") have been making efforts to tailor the law to accommodate Internet transactions.  Two of the proposed laws are the Proposed Revision to Article 2 of the Uniform Commercial Code ("UCC") and the Uniform Computer Information Transaction Act ("UCITA").

This Paper will present an overview of the current law governing contracts, the proposed laws, and the adequacy of these tools in dealing with contracting over the Internet.  Part II will explore the issues that are raised when consumers contract over the Internet.  Part III will discuss the current contract laws, Article 2 of the UCC and the Second Restatement of Contracts, and their applicability to Internet contracting.  Further, Part III will discuss how case law dealing with "shrink-wrap" licensing may be relevant to the discussion on solutions in Internet contracting.

Part IV will evaluate the proposed laws, Revised Article 2 of the UCC and UCITA, asking whether these laws present answers to the questions raised in Part II.  Part V will address the arguments for industry self-regulation.  This Paper concludes that more government regulation is needed in the form of laws that provide better protection for consumers.

Contracts made over the Internet are called "click-through" contracts, because they are formed by a consumer's clicks as she navigates the website of merchant.(1) Because there is not a uniformity requirement for merchants in the design of their websites, each click-through contract a consumer makes may be logistically different. This logistical difference is generally known and accepted as commonplace by consumers. Most people recognize and accept the fact that requiring all merchants to follow the exact same design for the sale of goods would be stifle creativity and innovation.

However, the downside to the lack of uniformity is that, while a consumer navigates through a merchant's website, she may not know when she has reached "the point of no return" and has actually purchased the items in her cart. Also, because of the difference in navigability between sites, a consumer may not know how to remove items from her shopping cart or may place an order thinking that she removed certain items from her cart, but did not, in fact, actually do so.

Most websites are fairly clear in their design to allow a consumer to understand when her selections are considered complete, and her order is to be transmitted. Moreover, many merchants may use the same language in their sites to mean the same thing. A button labeled "Send" or a similar phrase is probably "universally" known to mean that clicking that button means transmitting your order to the merchant, while a button labeled "complete" or "proceed" is not quite as clear. These same buttons may be used on one site to mean that, by clicking, one has completed an order or is ready to move on to the next screen; on another site, clicking these same buttons may constitute one's transmittal of an order to the merchant.

Another issue in Internet contract formation is the significance of the consumer's order and when the Internet contract is actually formed. When the consumer clicks the "send" button and transmits her order to the merchant, is she making an offer to the merchant to buy the goods that are displayed on the website, or is she instead accepting the seller's offer of goods made on the website? Many merchants differ in their terms of what the transmittal of a consumer's order actually means, so that it is difficult for the customer to know if and when a contract has been formed. It is fairly clear when one shops in a "bricks and mortar" store that the merchant is making an offer, and when one tenders payment for an item, that constitutes acceptance.

Additionally, without information on when the contract between Internet merchant and consumer has been formed, the consumer does not know when the agreement between herself and the merchant becomes binding. When, for example, if at all, can the consumer make changes to an order she has already transmitted to the merchant? As stated before, some merchants state that no changes may be made to an order once it has been electronically submitted. However, for merchants who do not clearly explain this, is the consumer entitled to email or call the merchant to change or cancel the order once it has been placed, but before it has been shipped? Again, this is unclear, and these terms and conditions may not be adequately explained or even addressed on the merchant's website. Or possibly, they may be addressed, but "hidden" in links that are difficult to see or navigate.  If the consumer does find the "terms and conditions" page, she may not be able to print the page.  When the consumer does not have a hard copy of the terms, it may be difficult for her to contest or enforce the conditions.  If the consumer does not have access to the "terms and conditions" of a purchase, or did not have access due to poor navigability on the website, is that consumer still bound by those terms and conditions.

Another problem with the lack of uniformity in terms and conditions between merchants' web sites is that they often have different terms on how they deal with fraudulent or unauthorized use of a consumer's credit card. And once again, most sites do not even offer their terms on these matters to consumers, other than explaining that the transaction (the transmittal of credit card information) will occur over a secure line. Of the merchant sites that do offer terms on their websites, or links to them, there are two common guarantees. The first guarantee is that the merchant will protect (not hold the cardholder liable) against fraudulent use of the consumer's credit card. The second kind of guarantee is that the merchant will protect against unauthorized use of the consumer's credit card. The distinction between the two is important. Fraud is a legal term and a tort action; unauthorized use is a much broader term and may provide more consumer protection. And as aforementioned, if the customer cannot or does not see the terms and conditions regarding fraudulent/unauthorized use, do those terms become part of the bargain?

One last issue is the problem of bringing a consumer claim against an Internet vendor. As a result of the current ambiguities and problems for consumers in the world of Internet contracts, one would expect to find myriad lawsuits in this area. But because the amounts of the claims are relatively low, particularly compared to the cost of litigation, most claims are never brought, and, therefore, very little precedent is set.  Even when claims are brought, what is the forum?

Article 2 may provide some answers for questions regarding which terms will control in a Web site user agreement. (24) The two relevant provisions are warranty disclaimers and choice of forum.(25) Article 2 may strike down the former, while upholding the latter. (26) U.C.C. section 2-316 requires that warranty disclaimers may be effective through writing, but the writing must be conspicuous. (27) The U.C.C. defines "conspicuous" as "written that a reasonable person against whom it is to operate ought to have noticed it." (28) The requirement of conspicuous writing was included in Article 2 to protect buyers from "unexpected and unbargained language of disclaimer." (29) In a Web site user agreement, the disclaimer itself may not be hidden, but the link to view the disclaimer may be inconspicuous.(30) While section 2-316 does not specify whether notice (here, the link) of the disclaimer must be conspicuous, such a requirement is consistent with the policy behind section 2-316.(31) A reasonable person will not be able to review the disclaimer if she does not have notice of such provision or does not click on the link.(32) In addition to defining "conspicuous," section 1-201 provides several ways for a merchant to make a warranty disclaimer clause known to buyers.(33) The language could be in larger type, or it could be in a different type font or color.(34) Using this definition, a link at the bottom of the page that is buried in the middle of several other links in small type would probably violate the "conspicuous" requirement of Article 2.(35) Therefore, the warranty disclaimers would not be enforceable against the consumers.

For the same reasons, many commentators feel that the Restatement approach is inadequate law to guide the uncharted territory of Internet transactions. (55) The Restatement, however, does raise the additional question of when a consumer purchasing goods on a web site should know that her conduct constitutes an offer and acceptance. Of course, this begs the question for the critics who want legislation to answer this question.

Using a mouse to click on the button is analogous to opening the software envelope.  Like shrinkwrap contracts, click-wrap contracts are fraught with similar legal issues and, hence, similar problems.

However, much of the uncertainty present in e-commerce transactions is caused by the peculiar characteristics of the Internet.  Often the web page that contains the "I accept" button does not have a print button handy. (74) This can make it difficult for a consumer to contest the content of a perpetually changing page. (75) Therefore, while the following cases may provide some guidance to click-wrap contracts, Internet contracting may have some unique problems that are not present in shrinkwrap contracts.

Perhaps ProCD and Gateway can serve as a model for Internet contracting.  One commentator has suggested that the ProCD approach of requiring the consumer to assent to the terms before the consumer has access to the goods (in ProCD, the software) should be required by legislation.

More commonly, however, lawyers and academics interpret these cases as standing for the general proposition that "click-wrap" contracts are valid, regardless of the uncertainty about when the contract was formed and even what the terms of the contract may be. (101) Prior to these cases, court have held that shrinkwrap licenses are unenforceable, under a variety of theories.

License terms need to be presented to the consumer in a conspicuous manner, either before or after the order is placed and submitted. (105) The terms do not need to be presented prior to payment but may be presented to the consumer upon receipt of the goods. (106) Additionally, it should be clear to the consumer what she needs to do to indicate her acceptance of the contract.

The proposed revision would have codified the outcome of the ProCD case and would have provided a model for enforceable shrinkwrap and click-wrap contracts. (122) Consider ongoing contract relationships between Internet merchants (such as Internet Service Providers or "ISPs") and consumers.  May these merchants change the terms of your service without your consent?

Additionally, the revision inserts much needed language, reflecting the changes that have come about in Internet contracting.  For example, the revision would authorize offer and acceptance by an "electronic agent," which is "a computer program, or electronic or other automated means, used by a person to initiate action, or to respond to electronic record or performances, on the person's behalf without review or action by an individual at the time of the action, response, or performance." (128) Further, the revision allows for the use of an "electronic record." (129) Many of these helpful provisions are now wrapped into the current proposed legislation:  the Uniform Computer Information Transactions Act or UCITA. (130) This legislation has a more narrow focus than the proposed Article 2B and, therefore, may be more helpful and relevant to e-commerce.

Although it appears that using UCITA would help to force Internet merchants to inform consumers of the terms and conditions of their contracts, UCITA is not without criticism. Many opponents feel that some of the terms in UCITA actually limit consumer rights.  Although UCITA is designed to protect consumers and business mass-market licensees, some feel that it creates a disadvantage for those consumers who individually contract with software publishers.

This is particularly true of the European Union, which is very consumer protection oriented, and feels that there should bee stricter government regulation to protect less powerful transacting parties in contract situation. (147) The fact that the legal systems of other nations may not accept the laissez-faire principals advocated by the United States (particularly evident in UCITA) may lead to problems in the global marketplace; if other nations impose different standards on their merchants, it may leave US businesses at a disadvantage. (148) Commercial law reform in the area of e-commerce may therefore begin to inhibit innovation in the global electronic marketplace.

There are some critics of the proposed legislation who believe that the current law is sufficiently flexible to deal with Internet transactions.  As a matter of fact, some believe that the open-ended structure of the current Restatement and the U.C.C. is preferable to more government regulation.

As the law currently stands, both merchants and consumers are contracting in a state of uncertainty.  While this does not allow a business to plan and limit its liability, it may produce a desirable result: fear on the part of the merchants.  When the law is vague and fuzzy around the edges, businesses may be overcautious in their behavior because they are not confident about the location of "the line."  Perhaps consumers may be protected by the blurry state of the law.

Additionally, the case law method will allow development of principles, without freezing the law in our current state of technology, which inevitably will be different in a year.  Further, businesses have an interest in promoting Internet transactions, as these contracts may provide an additional source of revenue for the companies.  It is in the best interest of Internet businesses to secure consumer confidence, by structuring transactions in a way that is fair to consumers.  Also, some critics feel that it is preferable to let e-commerce develop with very little government regulation, so that the nascent Internet marketplace can fully develop.

Instead of legislation providing for contract avoidance because of electronic error, a way for companies to handle software downloads to avoid consumer mistake is to include a suicide program with the software.  The program will automatically erase or disable itself if a code is not provided for the software within a certain amount of time.  Such a program would eliminate any doubt about the intention of the consumer.  While this solution may be effective, it does not provide that all software companies will include the suicide program.  Indeed, the issue is whether the government should mandate such a solution or whether businesses can voluntarily implement solutions if they so desire.

In other words, the bargaining power between the consumer and the businesses contracting over the Internet is so great, that the need for appropriate legislation is even more urgent.  UCITA is a step in the right direction, as research continues on the best possible solutions to the questions raised by Internet contracting.

Uniform Domain Name Dispute Resolution Policy to address conflicts between domain name holders and trademark owners.(9) In addition, in November, 1999, Congress enacted the Anti-cybersquatting Consumer Protection Act to combat cybersquatters.(10) This notes explores the scope of trademark protection over the Internet. Part I of this note introduces concepts relevant to traditional trademark law. Part II examines the pinnacle case analyzing "cybersquatting" through dilution. Part III details the new Anti-cybersquatting Consumer Protection Act and recent cases decided under the new law. Part IV describes the Uniform Domain Name Dispute Resolution Policy and examines decisions following the policy.

As a defense, under the ACPA, the alleged cybersquatter may show reasonable grounds for its fair use of the domain name.(73) Remarkably, the ACPA may not aid all trademark owners.(74) Trademark rights are not an absolute property right; consequently, several companies own concurrent rights in the same mark.(75) As a result, if two or more individuals own rights in a trademark, a finding of "bad faith registration" will be unlikely.(76) Nevertheless, the ACPA remains an important tool in protecting trademark owner's rights.(77) Moreover, the Uniform Domain Name Dispute Resolution Policy provides yet another powerful weapon to combat cybersquatting.

Consequently, several companies and celebrities have used the ICANN procedure to resolve their domain name disputes. Only months ago, famed singer Madonna secured her personal name as a domain name.(109) One wonders whether the "real" Madonna, should she resurrect, may have a legitimate interest in the domain name as well. In any event, for trademark owners, the ICANN procedure has become a favorite weapon against cybersquatters; however, the unauthorized use of trademarks as domain names is only one source of Internet-related trademark litigation.

To navigate the immense and complex waters of the world wide web, users can locate websites by either typing a specific web address (Uniform Resource Locator or "URL") into a web browser to access a site directly, or they can utilize a "search engine" available on the web to search for sites by keywords and phrases.(110) Search engines use software called "web crawlers" to search for web pages by reading their source code (Hypertext Markup Language or "HTML").(111) After a user enters particular keywords or phrases, a search engine scans the world wide web for sites that contain those terms, and it returns a list of web addresses in which the search engine found a match.(112) The criteria or algorithms used to rank and sort search results vary among search engines and may include such factors as the frequency of words on a web page, the location of the words on the page, the HTML title (text used as the title of a page in search engine listings), and meta-tags (terms used describe contents of a page, see discussion infra).(113)Search engines often sell advertising space on their search result pages; these "banner ads" are designed to entice users to link to a site operated by the advertiser.(114) To guaranty the effectiveness of advertising on their result pages (and to charge a premium for advertising space), search engines program their servers to display preselected banner ads in correlation with "key" search terms, or keywords.(115) For example, a search engine might be programmed to display a particular car manufacturer's banner ad on the results page of any search for "new cars." Trademark issues arise when search engines program their servers to identify trademarks used as search terms and display particular banner ads sponsored by a party other than the trademark owner.

Thus, in regard to keyword advertising, where search engines use terms that are not identified with their own goods and services and are also used in the English language, a finding of infringement is unlikely. In addition, a finding of dilution is also unlikely where keywords are not associated with the goods and services of a search engine.

Because of the explosive growth of the world wide web, the ability to locate and sort web pages among the millions in existence is paramount. Luckily, the nature of web pages lends itself to relatively quick and easy sorting. This is due to the fact that web sites are constructed using words, specifically HTML code. This source code provides display commands to a web browser that in turn converts the code into viewable web pages.(124) Among the lines of code that provide the structure of a web page are words called "meta-tags."Meta-tags are merely identifiers that provide information about a web site's content and are not visible when normally viewing a web page (although users may be able to see a site's metatags by utilizing a web browser's built-in function for viewing source code).(125) Web page designers use meta-tags as tools of association, providing descriptive words so that search engines can identify their sites.(126) Search engines in turn provide web addresses to users who have used the corresponding meta-tag word in their search.(127) Thus, if the word playboy is included in a site's HTML code as a meta-tag, though not visible as text, a search using the word playboy will come up with that particular web page.

The court granted a preliminary injunction prohibiting Calvin Design Label from using the trademarks on several grounds.(134) On the meta-tag issue, the court held that Playboy Enterprises was likely to succeed in proving trademark infringement and unfair competition based on "repeated use of the PLAYBOY trademark in machine readable code in [Calvin Design Label's] Internet Web pages, so that the PLAYBOY trademark is accessible to individuals or Internet search engines which attempt to access [Playboy Enterprises] under [Playboy Enterprises'] PLAYBOY registered trademark."(135) In other words, the court found that unauthorized use of trademarks to divert users to a web site operated by someone other than the trademark owner was likely to confuse consumers.

Web surfers looking for Brookfield's "MovieBuff" products who are taken by a search engine to "westcoastvideo.com" will find a database similar enough to "MovieBuff" such that a sizeable number of consumers who were originally looking for Brookfield's product will simply decide to utilize West Coast's offerings instead.

In general, trademarks used as meta-tags will constitute infringement where they divert users to web sites operated by someone other than the trademark owner (Playboy Enterprises v. Calvin Design Label, Niton Corp. v. Radiation Monitoring Devices), and where their use causes "initial interest confusion" (Brookfield Communications, Inc. v. West Coast Entertainment Corp.). On the other hand, use of trademarks as meta-tags may be permitted where there is a descriptive use or fair use of a mark (Playboy Enterprises v.

Over the past two years, trademark owners have gained several new methods of enforcing their trademark rights. The Uniform Domain Name Dispute Resolution Policy addresses conflicts between domain name holders and trademark owners regardless of jurisdictional issues. The Anti-cybersquatting Consumer Protection Act allows for both in persona and in rem jurisdiction and provides greater protection than dilution by shielding "famous" and "distinctive" marks. However, if two or more individuals own rights in the same trademark, these two new legal weapons will provide little guidance. Nevertheless, traditional trademark laws are useful to trademark owners when resolving Internet-related trademark issues. Courts have found that by "squatting" on a famous mark, a cybersquatter eliminates the mark's use by its owner to identify goods or services on the Internet and dilutes the mark. In addition, trademarks used as meta-tags will constitute infringement where they divert users to web sites operated by someone other than the trademark owner and where their use causes "initial interest confusion." However, a finding of dilution will be unlikely where keywords in a search engine are not associated with the goods and services of a search engine. In addition, good faith and descriptive uses of trademarks as meta-tags does not amount to infringement.

Today, traditional trademark doctrines and Internet specific laws merge as weapons against trademark infringement, dilution, and cybersquatting. While trademark owners have been somewhat successful in protecting their trademark rights over the Internet, trademark rights are not absolute. By operation of law, more than one entity may have rights in a mark or a fair use to use a trademark owned by another. Therefore some disputes will ultimately be resolved outside of the courtroom and without the aid of arbitrators.

Nonetheless, courts havebeen hesitant to outlaw new technology" merely because many people use itas a tool for infringement." "Only when the technology is not capableof legitimate uses does it make sense to outlaw it."

Though the Copyright Act does not expressly provide for contributory or vicarious copyright infringement, courts have long recognized such claims as a means for holding third parties liable for the directly infringing acts of others.

The act also shields the manufacturers and distributors of taping equipment from claims of contributory infringement, as long as they pay royalties to the music industry as set forth in the statute and include serial copy management systems that prevent the devices from making copies from copies.

The statute provides "safe harbors "for ISPs in four situations. First, section 512(a) limits liability in a transitory digital network "when the ISP is acting as a data conduit, that is, merely transferring... infringing material through the network."(42) Second, section 512(b) limits liability for system caching "as long as the ISP is uninvolved inthe selection, modification, or other interference with the transmitted material."

As mentioned above, the music industry has been dramatically affected by the recent advances in digital technology and the use of the Internet, though potentially all copyrighted works are at risk of being unlawfully copiedand disseminated over the Internet. While the Internet allows artists to distribute their music electronically at significantly lower costs than the distribution methods traditionally used, it also allows for easy infringementof their copyrighted works, with little control over the infringing behavior.

These technologies cannot create more control over a copyrighted work than the Copyright Act intended to provide. (63) Thus,the rights management systems will have to allow for fair uses and will haveto provide free access to works that have since fallen in the public domain.

Napster willfully engaged in contributory and vicarious infringement of their copyrighted works.(76) Not only does Napster make available, through its system and services, plaintiffs' copyrighted sound recordings for copying and downloading, but the company is fully aware that "virtually all of the reproductions and distributions it enables and encourages are infringingand in violation of federal copyright...laws."

These web sites engage in online piracy by using compression technologies, such as the MP3 technology, that compress the size of the music file so that it can easily and quickly be copied and downloaded over the Internet.

Thus, to avail itself of the safe harbor protections, Napster must first prove that it is a "service provider." Once proven, Napster must then establish that it satisfies the five requirements of section 512(a).

Napster alleges that it is a service provider for purposes of the safe harbor in section 512(a). (124) First, Napster maintains that it transmits, routes, or provides "connections for digital online communications," as required by section 512(a), because it acts as a browser and connects the users' hard drives to one another for the transmission of MP3 files.

Service providers found within this safe harbor are exempt from "monetary liability" and are shielded from injunctions. (134) Napster contends that since it is a "service provider" and since it satisfies the five requirements of section 512(a), it should fall within the safe harbor, and thus, remain exempt from monetary liability and shielded from injunctions.

Napster alleges that section 512(a) applies to its entire system due to thefact that its "information location tools . . . are incidental to its corefunction of automatically transmitting, routing, or providing connectionsfor the MP3 files users select." (136) For example,a search engine like "Yahoo!" would fit under section 512(d) and not section512(a) because its search engines rely on the "human judgment and editorialdiscretion" of its editorial staff, and thus, are not incidental to its corefunctions.

In response to Napster's motion for summary adjudication of the safe harbor provision of the DMCA, the record companies argue that Napster does not fall within the section 512(a) safe harbor provision on two grounds.

As required by section 512(n), each function performed by a service provider must be analyzed separately to determine if it "meets the requirements of the safe harbor provision applicable to that function."

"the Napster server conveys [Internet] address information to establish a connection between the requesting and host users, the connection itself occurs through the Internet." (174) In contrast, the legislative history of section 512 "demonstrates that Congress intended the 512(a) safe harbor to apply onto to activities 'in which a service provider plays the role of a conduit' for the communications of others."

The record companies submitted to the court a listing of over two hundred sound recordings that remain available for download on Napster that are copies of sound recordings commercially released by the record companies.

One moderator questioned whether stating "Napster was about 'free music'" was a wise thing to do: "[A]dmitting that we know Napster is used for the transfer of illegal MP3 files might not be the best thing to do...I mean... obviously people are going to use it forthat purpose... but...we might not want to actually say we know that...*shrug* just semantics I guess.... but eh... being sued can be a bitch...." (206) Shawn Fanning replied that this was an "excellent point" and that moderators should "try to avoid discussions similar to this... you should all be very aware of what you say... (it appears my hypocrisy knows no bounds)."

"receives from the infringement of plaintiffs' music on the Napster service is both enormous and quantifiable." (216) For example, it has already received over $13 million form a venture capital firm.

Napster's growth has arisen from what economists call "network effects" and "positive feedback" ... the more users who log on to Napster and offer their own MP3music collections for others to copy, the greater the number of desirable files that are available to others, and the more Napster becomes attractive to otherprospective users.... Napster intends to build a massive user base "community"that, once drawn into "the Napster community" by the attractiveness of plaintiffs'copyrighted works, can be commercially exploited by Napster....Thus, Napster'sgrowth has largely if not exclusively been due to the fact that it facilitatesthe unauthorized trading of the valuable intellectual property of plaintiffsand the content holders on a vast scale.

Napster "specifically reserves 'the right to refuse service and terminate accounts of [its] direction, including, but not limited to, if Napster believes that user conduct violates applicable law or is harmful to the interestsof Napster, its affiliates, or other users, or for any other reason in Napster'ssole discretion, with or without cause."

In fact, the results of one expert survey indicate that 22% of Napster users no longer buy CDs or buy fewer CDs, while 41% of its users seemed to indicate that they are using Napster as a substitute to buying CDs.

Studios, Inc. it is a staple article of commerce and should not be enjoined, this doctrine does not apply to Napster. (256) First, the doctrine does not extend "to products specifically manufactured for counterfeiting activity, even if such products have substantial noninfringing uses." (257) Here, because the system was created to allow users to engaged in the exchange of pirated music, the doctrine cannot apply. (258) Moreover, unlike Sony, Napster's "contribution to the infringement is more than solely manufacturing a product,"(259) and courts have "rejected the expansion of the doctrine beyond mere manufacturers."

Record Companies, has not been properly established.(282)Hence, Napster argues that the Plaintiffs have "failed to carry their burden of proof by establishing that every substantial use of Napster will harm their markets."

Napster argues that under Sony, the Court held that "where a technology functioned as a tool for infringement but was capable of significant non-infringing uses . . . supplying the technology to consumers does not violate the law."

In its appeal, Napster alleges that its services fall within the "safe harbor" protection afforded by section 512(d). (313) Section 512(d)(1)(C), provides that "even if a service provider obtains actual or constructive knowledge of an infringement, the safe harbor is still available if the service provider act expeditiously to remove, or disable access to, the particular allegedly infringing activity or material."

On appeal, the record companies argue that the district court was correct in finding that they were likely to succeed on their contributory and vicarious liability claims and that a preliminary injunction was necessary.

In addition to reasserting its previous arguments made before the lower court,the record companies also argue that the stay of the preliminary injunctionshould be lifted. (317) The "District Court did notenjoin a technology - it enjoined a business practice that adapts and implementsa routine file transfer system to violate the law on an unprecedented scale." (318) Contrary to Napster's claim, it did not create the peer-to-peertechnology.(319) Rather, that infrastructure has existedsince the "inception of the Internet ...."

Web entrepreneurs have long been touting the Internet as a significant money-making force. (329) What remains to be seen is whether the major recording labels will be able to "get over their fear that online piracy will destroy the industry" and recognize the vast power of the Internet.

Under the terms of the agreement, Bertelsmann will loan Napster an undisclosed sum of money to convert the company to a new secure, membership-based distribution service "that will compensate recording artists, record companies, songwriters and music publishers for swapping their works over the Internet."

Napster officials have also mentioned the possibility of placing new "time-limit" technologyondownloadedrecordings.(351) If this new technology is implemented,members who pay their subscription fee will be able to permanently download files, while time limits will be imposed on digitized recordings downloaded by non-members, which would then cause the recordings to "lose their utility after a certain period."

Internet industry has, perhaps unsurprisingly, been quick to voice its skepticism that the deal will work. First, industry analysts claim Napster won't be able to make any money off the $4.95 monthly subscription fee, which will allow members to download all the music they want.

"initiatives that allow legal file sharing which respects the artists, record companies, and other rights owners," privately some were quite upset that their co-plaintiff "had broken rank without warning .. . and breathed new life into Napster just as its legal fortunes seemed so precarious."

Despite these critics' concerns, some industry insiders are saying the Bertelsmann-Napster deal "could turn out to be a model" for the four other major record labels that have maintained their suit against Napster to follow their example.

Although Napster attorney Laurence Pulgram doesn't think the Bertelsmann-Napster dealwill affect what the Ninth Circuit ultimately decides to do, he does think"it may be the basis to have more productive talks with other people."

Ever since the first full-length song was distributed over the Internet sixyears ago, the five major record labels have been "worrying about the potential for piracy [and] arguing among themselves about the best technology for selling music as downloadable software files." (388)In response, nearly two years ago, the recording industry announced the Secure Digital Music Initiative(SDMI) (389) - as an "effort to work with technologycompanies to create a standard for delivering music over the Internet withoutfear of piracy or copyright infringement."

This technology serves two important functions. If a user attempts to make an illegal copy of the work, a large message stating "unauthorizedcopy" will be attached to it, thus "destroy[ing] the marketability of the work."

As such, many Internet users mistakenly believe that "everything availableover the Internet, including music, is free."(397) Thus,the recording industry, which is highly dependent upon record sales for revenue,necessarily has reason to fear that "music fans on the Internet, accustomed to utilizing the vast resources, products and services at no cost, will chooseto obtain unauthorized music for free, rather than paying for legitimate copies."

"solution" not only seems rather simplistic, but also appears to do nothing to address the root of the problem. Indeed, some are saying that even if Napster's ingenious system hadn't come on the scene, "copyright infringement in the digital age is so widespread that enforcement is nearly impossible."

In what appears to be an attempt to discourage its users from downloading songs that haven't been licensed by artists or recording companies, the online music company EMusic Inc. (438) recently announced that it will soon begin using new technology "designed to hamper distribution of its songs over the controversial song-swapping service Napster."

Ultimately, many believe that although the new MP3 technology "may have momentarily escaped the purview of copyright law," this area of law "remain[s] resilient to recenttechnological advances by constantly modifying itself."

No action may be brought under this title alleging infringement of copyright based on the manufacture, importation, or distribution of a digital audio recording device, a digital audio recording medium, an analog recording device, or an analog recording medium, or based on the noncommercial use by a consumer of such a device or medium for making digital musical recordings or analog musical recordings.

A "service provider" is defined as an "entity offering the transmission, routing, or providing of connections for digital online communications, between or among points specified by a user, of material or the user's choosing, withoutmodification to the content of the material sent or received."

Under these additional requirements a service provider must have:"(A) adopted and reasonably implemented, and informs subscribers and accountholders of the service provider's systems or network of, a policy that providesfor the termination in appropriate circumstances of subscriber and accountholdersof the service provider's system or network who are repeat infringers; and (B)accommodates and does not interfere with standard technical measures."

"Napster itself provides no MP3 files directly to any of its users. Napster's servers do not store any MP3 files and do not copy any of the MP3 files transferred among its users. Transmission of MP3 files do not even pass through Napster's servers. Instead, files reside on the computers of Napster users, and are transmitted directly between those computers."

See id . "The music piracy on Napster is such common knowledge that virtually all of the countless news articles about Napster recount how easy it is to find all the works of world's leading recording artists." See id. at 12 .

See id . at 26. Napster executives have written in an internal strategy document under its Goals section: "Napster brings about death of the CD...Record industry may be unwilling to support this transition (gut their bottom line) ... Record stores (Tower Records) obsolete." Id.

Hilary Rosen, presidentand CEO of the RIAA). "We are suing a company that is stealing work that does not belong to them. They cannot build a multi-billion dollar business on the backs of other people's works."

Segal, supra note 329 . HillaryRosen, President of the RIAA, warns that the Bertelsmann-Napster deal "shouldn'tbe seen as the company breaking with its fellow major record labels. Rather. . . the deal is consistent with the industry's ongoing position that labelsshould be compensated for the exchange of music for which the hold the copyrights."

According to Ms. Rosen, if anything, "the deal indicated hypocrisy on the part of Napster for arguing in court that it did not need to obtain licenses from copyright holders, but then signing a deal to obtain those licenses."

Holson, supra note 333 . Manymembers of the on-line community are critical of SDMI copyright management specifications and fear that "the music industry will use SDMI standards toleverage its distribution power and to maintain control.

Previously, a publisher had limited control over the content once it was distributed.But digital rights management allows the publisher to impose certain limitations.The recipient of a forwarded newsletter, for example, might not be able toread it without being prompted to subscribe. Or the publisher might chose to disallow the forwarding or printing of the newsletter altogether and allowaccess only to the subscriber - and for a limited period of time. The digitalrights management, the publisher can specify usage conditions and change themat any time.

Even Hilary Rosen, Presidentof RIAA, has pointed out that the recording companies' attempts to collectroyalties for its artists but yet "still allow consumers to have a Napster-likeexperience" will be a quite a balancing act. Id.

They include the use of domain names, Meta tags, hyperlinks, framing and good old fashioned cases of false designation, sponsorship, origin, unfair competition, and dilution. Traditional trademark infringement actions are brought under the Lanham Act. Section 32 provides a cause of action for infringement of registered marks, while Section 43 covers unregistered marks, claims for dilution and now cybersquatting.

A usual instance of trademark infringement with regards to a domain name is where a person establishes a domain name (usually more than one) on the Internet that is another's famous trademark, all along hoping that he will be able to sell the domain name back to the mark's owner at a large profit. A typical case is Panavision Int'l, L.P. v. Toeppen, 141 F.3d 1316 (9th Cir. 1998) where the defendant had registered the plaintiff's registered Panavision trademark as www.panavision.com. The same defendant had also registered dot coms for Delta Airlines, Neiman Marcus, Eddie Bauer, Lufthansa and others.

Similar to the activity described above, which has been referred to as cybersquatting, some are engaging in an activity dubbed typosquatting. Typosquatting is the registration of a domain name that is likely to be a typographical error entered by someone attempting to go to a specific web site. For instance,  ayhoo.com is a likely typographical error if you were attempting to go to  yahoo.com.

The ACPA, the amendment to the federal trademark act which is discussed fully below, was enacted by Congress in 1999 in order to provide additional remedies to trademark holders and celebrities. The key to prosecuting an ACPA claim however, rests with a finding of bad faith. Trademark holders who cannot show bad faith must resort to traditional methods of trademark infringement.

It appeared to Congress that infringement actions based upon dilution did not create a sufficient remedy for the domain name registration abuses. The ACPA basically provides for protection of trademark holders from the bad-faith registration or use of domain names that are confusingly similar or identical to the registered mark. It also provides for in-rem jurisdiction over the domain name, where personal jurisdiction can't be obtained.

The ACPA was intended to aid trademark holders and celebrities in their attempts to enforce their rights with respect to domain name violations. The cornerstone of the ACPA is bad faith. Without it, a trademark holder is left with traditional methods of trademark infringement that are not as friendly to a trademark holder because of the lack of in rem jurisdiction and a statutory fine.

The ACPA suggests, but does not limit the ways the courts may find bad faith. As noted below in Sections (B)(i)(A)(I)-(IX), the act identifies nine factors that aid the court in determining the existence of bad faith. The first is whether the alleged offender has any intellectual property rights in the trademark. This suggests that if a person has some legitimate right to use the mark, the court should decline to find bad faith. The second factor is where the domain name consists of the registrants name or nickname. This was the case in a domain name dispute regarding the recording artist Sting and another person who had always been called Sting who had registered the domain name www.sting.com. The arbitration panel found in favor the non-famous Sting and allowed him to keep the domain name. The third factor is the defendant's prior use of the domain name in connection with the goods or services associated with the trademark. A finding of the third factor may not appear to weigh heavily one way or the other. The gist is that there are times when a registrant may have lawfully used the mark legitimately, but is not doing so now. The court really must determine what effect the prior lawful use may have on the registrant's intent. The fourth factor suggests that if the defendant is allowed to use the mark itself in the web site, then it may not be appropriate to find bad faith. This could come up where a descriptive trademark has acquired secondary meaning and become registerable. The fact that it acquired secondary meaning does not preclude others from using the mark in a non-trademark descriptive sense. As such, it may not be bad faith to register the domain name that is identical to a mark that you have permission to use. The fifth factor really gets to the heart of bad faith. It involves the offender's state of mind and if the court were to find that he intended to divert customers or tarnish the trademark, etc. then bad faith would most likely be found. The sixth factor allows the court to find bad faith by analyzing what the registrant has done or attempted to do with the domain itself. Should the registrant offer to sell it to either the mark owner or a third party without ever having used the domain name, the court can infer bad faith. Interestingly enough, the court may also consider the registrant's prior conduct that would allow the court to conclude what his intentions were.

The seventh factor is related to quasi fraudulent conduct by the registrant in providing false or misleading information to the domain registrar. Again, the court can consider the defendant's prior conduct in this regard to determine the existence of bad faith. The eight factor is very telling and not likely to be a problem (in the opinion of this author) in the future. It stems from domain name speculation, where at the onset of the World Wide Web, people would register multiple (and sometimes hundreds of) domain names that were identical or confusingly similar to existing famous trademarks. The ninth and final factor allows the court to consider the strength of the mark. It refers to that section of the Lanham Act that deals with famous marks. This means that the court can and should consider whether the mark is widely known and easily recognizable.

While the ACPA lists factors that the court can and should consider to assist in making a determination of bad faith, the act forbids the court from making a finding of bad faith should it determines that the defendant had a reasonable subjective belief that he was entitled to use of the domain name.

Under the ACPA, the owner of a trademark "may file an in rem civil action against a domain name in the judicial district in which the domain name registrar, domain name registry, or other domain name authority that registered or assigned the domain name if certain conditions are present.

The first condition is that the domain name itself infringe on the trademark owners rights in that trademark. Once the first condition is met, the trademark holder must then demonstrate either that it is not able to obtain personal jurisdiction over a proper defendant or the defendant cannot be located after due diligence.

Basically, an in rem proceeding under the ACPA can be brought in any judicial district where the domain name registrar or registry is located or where the documents that indicate control and authority over the domain name are deposited with the court. This allows a plaintiff to bring an action anywhere if the domain name registrar is willing to deposit the documents in the court where the action is brought. The act of depositing the documents with the court is in essence a submission to the court's jurisdiction.

Once the in rem complaint is filed and provided to the registrar, the registrar must deposit the documents that establish its control over the domain name with the court. It is then subject to a sort of standing order that precludes the registrar from transferring, suspending, or otherwise modifying the domain name. However, the registrar cannot be liable for injunctive or monetary relief unless it has acted in bad faith or reckless disregard, which would include a willful failure to comply with previously issued court order.

A trademark holder may elect between actual damages and statutory damages. The statutory damages are an amount between $1,000.00 and $100,000.00 per domain name, once the requisite findings are made. In addition to the monetary damages, the plaintiff may be entitled to an injunction and the defendant will likely be required to transfer the domain name to the plaintiff.

A closer look at the statistics provided by ICANN may suggest a problem with the process. Out of 1,486 proceedings that have been decided, only 307 have been decided in favor of the registrant. Further, there have been 2,585 domain names that have been challenged and only 395 have been favorable to the registrant.

The article also points out that there were more than twenty federal trademark registrations that were not owned by Hearst. The problem with this decision lies in the non-infringing manner that "esquire" can be used.

Several of the decisions under the UDRP have involved celebrities. One in particular involved the registration of the domain name www.sting.com. The musician Sting filed a complaint against the person who had registered Sting.com in 1995.

The panel(40) then went on to find in favor of the respondent who had been using the nickname Sting for several years. Madonna was later awarded www.madonna.com. The Sting and Madonna cases are distinguishable really only in that the registrant of sting could show legitimate use of the sting nickname prior to the domain name registration.

Also, Madonna had registered that name as a trademark with the USPTO. In another case involving a celebrity, the panel found that actress Julia Roberts had common law trademark rights in her name was entitled to the www.juliaroberts.com domain name.

One example of this was in another case involving Playboy. An Italian magazine publisher distributed a magazine titled Playmen. Playboy filed suit for trademark infringement and asked for an injunction to prevent Playmen from being distributed in the United States. Playboy was awarded an injunction in 1981.

Enter the internet. In 1996, the Italian publisher posted the Playmen mark on its web site in violation of the 1981 injunction. The judge, in discussing the ramifications of the case stated "The Internet is a world-wide phenomenon, accessible from every corner of the globe. Tattilo (The Italian Publisher) cannot be prohibited from operating its Internet site merely because the site is accessible from within one country in which its product is banned. To hold otherwise "would be tantamount to a declaration that this Court, and every other court throughout the world, may assert jurisdiction over all information providers on the global World Wide Web." Such a holding would have a devastating impact on those who use this global service. The court then found that "while it has neither the jurisdiction nor the desire to prohibit the creation of Internet sites around the globe, it may prohibit access to those sites in this country. This certainly illustrates what will be a future problem that will have to be dealt with in courts around the world.

Trademarks can be infringed on the internet by those who seek to profit from the goodwill associated with the trademark of others. This can be accomplished by trying to pirate domain names, using trademarks as meta tags, improperly linking, and framing. In addition, a web developer could just put a trademark logo right smack in the middle of a web site, that would be no different than if the site owner had put the logo on his front door. The laws have been amended to alleviate the domain name issues and traditional actions for infringement, unfair competition and dilution should be sufficient protection for trademark owners. A possible solution may lie in the development of new software that is capable of searching the internet for registered trademarks. The bottom line is that the internet remains in its infancy and all of the issues discussed above must be and will be dealt with in a manner that is fair and balanced for all involved.

In recent years patients have become increasingly concerned about their medical care. A 1999 study indicated that as many at 98,000 people die due to medical mistakes each year.[1]  This figure caused an uproar among both patients and medical personnel.[2]  The medical field is almost entirely self-regulating, the exception being medical malpractice claims, with physicians relying on peer review to critique their colleagues actions.[3]  With the current figures regarding medial errors, Congress and state legislatures have been forced to revisit options to decrease the number of mistakes.

One potential option would be to require the patient to establish the existence of a doctor patient relationship before access is permitted. This would confirm the necessity of having the information in order to give informed consent. And such a remedy would limit the disclosure of personal information to only those persons with a legitimate need for the data. The problem, however, is the difficulty in creating a system to monitor this.

One thing that is clear: there needs to be a better definition of what information is relevant and what should be posted to balance the need for patients to give informed consent with some respect for the physician's privacy.  Any changes must recognize the influence telemedicine and cybermedicine will have on the future of medical care and access to medical information.

Many state statutes presently address only off-line stalking, [21] yet the emerging trend is toward modernizing statutes to address on-line stalking as well. For a more complete discussion of existing laws, see Cyberstalking Legislation, infra.

Soon after California enacted its legislation, the other 49 states and the District of Columbia followed with their own version of stalking laws. Many states enacted laws similar to California's, with the credible threat, intent and ability, and causation of fear elements.

The reaction by both state and federal legislators to high profile stalking incidents has been swift. Within three years all states had enacted legislation that criminalized stalking, and within six years Congress enacted federal laws making interstate stalking a federal crime. During the early 1990's the Internet was less prolific, and the focus of initial anti-stalking legislation failed to encompass on-line threats. The language in most statutes was not broad enough to cover the online threats described in Section I., supra. However, by the late 1990's cyberstalking was becoming a well-known phenomenon and states and the Federal government began to enact legislation that would fill in the gaps in existing stalking legislation.

These expanded versions have merely broadened the definition of credible threat to include those communications made via a computer. With the exception of the broadened definition, the laws have remained the same, and all previous elements of stalking remain necessary to prove guilt.

First, a person sent a message. Second, the person's intent was to intimidate the retailer. Finally, the purpose of the threat was to cause damage to property of the person, i.e. the money is the property of the retailer and returning it would be damaging.

These provisions afforded stalking victims a higher level of protection than is found in the new law. Experts and legislators assert that these provisions are especially important in the case of stalking victims because after arrest in cases like these "the stalker may become more dangerous."

Section 264 makes it a crime, among other things, to repeatedly harass another person, or anyone known to them, through either direct or indirect communications. [140] In interpreting the law, both the Manitoba Court of Appeals and the Supreme Court of Canada have recognized "that the offense created by section 264 is complete when a threat is made." [141] The courts defined a threat as "a tool of intimidation which is designed to instill a sense of fear in its recipient." [142] Thus a person who sends emails to another person that instill fear and intimidation in that person would be guilty of "criminal harassment."

Cyberstalking is just one of many issues that governments around the world will tackle in the 21st century. As with any issue, it is important to understand the magnitude of cyberstalking so that law enforcement officials and legislators can effectively deal with it. As was discussed supra, statistics on cyberstalking and stalking are unreliable. Anecdotal evidence suggests the problem is real and growing. Additionally, organizations like CyberAngels claim to be fielding as many as 500 or more complaints daily. Rather than guessing or using unreliable extrapolations, an effort on a state and/or federal basis should be conducted to learn of the true magnitude of the problem. This will lead to solutions that are more effective.

It seems appropriate to address computerized communications that are intended to threaten, harass, intimidate and harm individuals given the widespread use of computers and the Internet. The expansion of existing stalking laws has been the most widely used approach by states, and perhaps the most effective solution to the cyberstalking problem. Those states that have crafted new computer communications laws must be particularly careful not to run afoul of the First Amendment.

Cyberstalking is a far reaching problem that exists well beyond the borders of the United States. Jurisdictional issues may confront states and victims as they try to thwart cyberstalkers. Hopefully, many of these jurisdictional issues will be resolved by the new federal cyberstalking law. As jurisdictions work together, the end-result should be a reduction in the prohibited use of electronic communications to make threats or harass others. This is good for victims, good for the Internet and society.

Research has shown that some stalkers remain interested in their target(s) for years, even after they have been prosecuted, convicted and incarcerated for stalking. A civil protection order would permit a Federal court to maintain jurisdiction over a convicted stalker after the completion of the sentence imposed for the crime, both to reduce the threat of future stalking by the defendant and to provide an enforcement mechanism should the order be violated.

For many years, the courts have recognized that Freedom of Speech has some limits. With apologies to the esteemed Justice Holmes, the title of this paper refers to one of the earliest cases that addressed this recognition. In 1919, Justice Holmes offered the opinion that "the most stringent protection of free speech would not protect a man in falsely shouting fire in a theatre and causing a panic." [FN2]Since that decision, the courts have struggled with what limits, if any, should be placed on free speech in the face of changing technologies and social values.

The question that this paper explores is whether questions of free speech online; a.k.a. on the Internet, should be treated differently than free speech has been treated off line. In other words, is there something so unique about the "clicks" world of the Internet that would warrant different treatment of 1st Amendment Freedom of Speech issues than that found in the "bricks" world? To fully explore this question, Part One of this paper will briefly review the history and tools of the Internet; Part Two will review 1st Amendment Freedom of Speech issues and limits to it in the bricks world; Part Three will review the current issues and case law related to Freedom of Speech in the clicks world including the policy concerns related to those issues; Part Four will review potential legislative and non-legislative solutions to those policy concerns; and Part Five will offer a conclusion.

The Internet began in the late 1960's as a means to facilitate communications between the military and those conducting military research in the event normal channels of communication were interrupted due to nuclear war. The Internet is a network of computer networks. [FN3]The network is made up personal computers and computers that function as servers or high-capacity information storers. Companies, called Internet Service Providers (ISP's), and institutions lease phone lines and maintain servers which are connected to other servers via phone lines. [FN4]Access to the Internet can be free or the ISP can charge a monthly fee. There are no real physical boundaries on the Internet. Once on the Internet, an individual can send and receive information to and from all over this country and the world.

Websites (also called webpages) are set up in the World Wide Web which is a hypertext system, without boundaries, providing unlimited links to other websites. [FN7] Websites can also be directly accessed by entering specific Web addresses, known as Uniform Resource Locators (URL's), into the computer's browser. [FN8] When an individual accesses a website, they can get text documents, pictures, forms, sounds, files, and multimedia applications. [FN9] Websites can be foreign or domestic; commercial or non-commercial; they can be set up and maintained by individuals, educational institutions, charitable groups, political groups, companies, etc.

As important and fundamental as freedom of speech is to Americans and our ideals of democracy, not all speech is protected by the 1st Amendment. Many years ago, the Court recognized that limitations are allowed on "speech that advocates conduct inimical to the public welfare." [FN13] More recently, the Supreme Court held that it "in different contexts, has consistently held that government may directly regulate speech to address extraordinary problems; where its regulations are appropriately tailored to resolve those problems without imposing an unnecessarily great restriction on speech." [FN14] The dilemma the courts face is to determine what speech falls under the protection of the 1st Amendment and what speech does not.

In general, limits to the content of speech in the bricks world center around cases which involve laws against obscenity or indecency, threats of violence, and defamation. Even though there are different types of cases involved with widely different fact patterns, there are some commonalities in the court's approach to the constitutional issues posed in them. For one, it is well settled that the standard courts must use to determine the constitutionality of a law that is a content-based restriction on speech, is one of strict scrutiny. In addition, laws that restrict the content of speech are presumptively invalid. [FN15] To survive strict scrutiny, the government must show a legitimate, compelling interest or objective and that the law that they have in place is sufficiently tailored to achieve that legitimate interest in the least restrictive way. [FN16] If the law is overbroad or vague or there are other alternatives which will achieve the government's objective and are less restrictive, the law will be declared unconstitutional.

Another legitimate government interest is the protection of its citizens from violence. This legitimate government interest has translated into the passage of laws designed to punish those who make threats of violence. As with restrictions to the content of speech of a sexual nature, the courts have struggled with the standard to use to determine what is a threat, unprotected by the 1st Amendment, and what is pure speech protected by the 1st Amendment.

While the Watts Court did not really define what a true threat was, lower courts have basically defined it in one of two ways, using Watts as a blueprint. The Second Circuit held that "so long as the threat on its face and in the circumstances in which it is made is so unequivocal, unconditional, immediate, and specific as to the person threatened, as to convey a gravity of purpose and imminent prospect of execution, the defendant may be punished for his speech." [FN44] On the other hand, the Ninth Circuit has said that speech is outside 1st Amendment protection if a "reasonable person would foresee that the statement would be interpreted by those to whom the maker communicates the statement as a serious expression of intent to harm or assault." [FN45] The Second Circuit holding appears to place more emphasis on the proximity of the words spoken to some sort of action taken than that of the Ninth Circuit.

The 1st Circuit was followed by the 4th and 11th Circuits in upholding the constitutionality of the statute. The 4th Circuit, on November 22, held that the law was tailored as narrowly as possible to meet the government's compelling interest in banning child pornography. The Court noted that, whether virtual or real, child pornography had the same effect on child molesters so that the government's interest was just as compelling whether the child pornography was virtual or real. [FN98] With this split among the Circuits, it is likely that this statute will eventually end up before the Supreme Court for a final determination on its constitutionality.

The California penal code, in Section 288.2, prohibits sending harmful material to a known minor with the intent to seduce the minor. [FN100] This statute has been upheld as constitutional by California appellate courts because it was aimed at the act of attempting to seduce a minor not at regulating any speech involved. In the strict scrutiny analysis, the appellate court noted that "the only chilling effect of Section 288.2 is on pedophiles who intend that their statements will be acted upon by children. [FN101] In another case, the California appellate court, in rejecting a constitutional challenge to the statute, found that the statute had knowledge and intent elements which ensured that the statute was not impermissively overbroad. In other words, the statute was written so that it did not infringe on adult's rights to use the Internet to transmit and receive constitutionally protected material. Before an adult could violate the law, "the sender must know the recipient is a minor, must know the transmitted material is harmful, must intend to arouse the minor's sexual desires, and must intend to seduce the minor." [FN102] The California statute has not faced a challenge in Federal court as yet.

New York state law prohibits the knowing transmission of sexually explicit communications to minors with an intent to lure them into sexual activity. [FN103] The New York Court of Appeals found that the statute did not violate the 1st Amendment because it was narrowly tailored enough to meet its compelling objective of preventing the sexual abuse of children without going too far. The court determined that "an invitation or enticement is distinguishable from pure speech." [FN104] This statute has also not faced a challenge in Federal court.

A Wisconsin statute made it a crime to transmit harmful material to a minor which the state Supreme Court determined impermissibly chilled protected adult speech. [FN105] Using Federal case law, knowledge of the recipient's age must be an element of the offense since the statute covers material that adults have a right to send and receive to each other; i.e. everything but obscene material. The Court found that this very simply written statute, chilled 1st Amendment protected speech by shifting the burden to the defendant to prove knowledge of the recipient's age. [FN106] Under Wisconsin law, lack of knowledge can be used as an affirmative defense but only in cases where the defendant has personally met the recipient face to face. The court noted that Internet contact was not face-to-face and that the kind of age verification needed to satisfy the affirmative defense was difficult, if not impossible, to get on the Internet. [FN107] Without a way to satisfy the affirmative defense on the Internet and prove the age of who they are communicating with, adults could be forced to radically limit their rights to communicate about non-obscene material with other adults to avoid criminal prosecution.

It appears that the courts are giving such deference to the Internet that any new legislation that attempts to limit its content to any substantial degree is likely to fail. But, even as most federal and state efforts to limit harmful material on the Internet drop like flies, it is still important to remember that obscenity laws and child pornography laws are still in place and apply in full force to the Internet.

Federal statutes have also criminalized certain behaviors using the Internet that may include pure speech or expression. For example, 18 U.S.C. 875(c) makes it a federal crime to transmit any communication in interstate or foreign commerce creating a threat to injure the person of another. [FN114] This statute has been used to prosecute a man in Maryland for sending threatening emails to a school official and another man who was found guilty of sending threatening emails to a federal judge. [FN115] The law was challenged in the second case with a claim that the man's email communications were protected under the 1st Amendment. The 9th Circuit Court of Appeals found that the trial court had properly applied the true threat analysis found in Watts and upheld the conviction. In another case, a California man was prosecuted under a Federal civil rights statute for sending "hate" messages over the Internet to specifically targeted individuals. [FN116] Again, careful drafting that tied the speech to specifically defined criminal conduct that the statute sought to eliminate or punish resulted in the law being upheld.

The Internet has also become a prime mechanism for certain hate groups to spread their message. There are web sites, chatrooms, etc. dedicated solely to this goal. The content of most of these communications is protected because blanket statements that express ethnic hatred or bias aren't actionable unless they rise to the occasion of threats or intimidation that are prohibited by Federal civil rights laws. [FN117] While government efforts to regulate "hate" on the Internet have been largely unsuccessful because of 1st Amendment guarantees, watchdog groups have achieved some success and these will be discussed more fully in Part Four.

Some doubt that the holding in this case will survive if the 1st Amendment challenge is ever heard before the Supreme Court. Specifically, the jury in the case was not given a "speech-protective instruction consistent with Brandenburg." [FN124] That instruction would have required the jury to consider whether the speech in question incited or produced imminent lawless action and was likely to actually incite or produce such action. [FN125] That standard would have been much harder to reach in this case than the Watts "reasonable person" standard and a different outcome would have been likely under Brandenburg.

While this paper has focused on government efforts inside the United States to regulate the content on the Internet, it is worth looking at some of the issues going on outside the United States. In doing so, it is critical to keep in mind that most countries do not have the same constitutional guarantees of freedom of speech and expression that we do in the U.S.. No where has this become more apparent than in the recent legal battle between Yahoo and France over the content on Yahoo that is available to citizens of France; content that is illegal under French law but no where near illegal under U.S. law.

The elements of defamation are no different on the Internet than they are in the bricks world. Libel is still libel, or to paraphrase how one author put it, a lie is still a lie whether published on the Internet or by some other means. [FN137] However, there are three general areas that make the issue of defamation on the Internet a little different. First, the ease of communication associated with the Internet can make it easier to commit libel, especially in a chatroom, bulletin board, or message board environment. If one thinks back to the earlier discussion of the different standards applied to the analysis depending on whether the person was a public or a private figure, this is not hard to see. For a private figure, the standard is reasonable care such as an ordinary reasonable person would use to insure the accuracy of material presented as fact - mere negligence. [FN138] Unless you guarantee that everyone you say something about is a public figure or everything you say can be considered harmless or parody or satire, the ease with which you can publish information on the Internet should give cause for concern to those who make possibly defamatory statements.

Cases involving domain names can also have 1st Amendment implications. Network Solutions has faced suits for denying requests for both top level and second level domain names. In Name.space, Inc. v. Network Solutions, Inc., the court held that three letter generic Top Level Domains were too short to be considered protected speech but the court pointed out that future, longer ones might be. [FN156] More recently, in National A-1 Advertising, Inc., the Court held that second -level domain names, unlike web sites, chatrooms, and newsgroups, were not public forums for debate and were not entitled to 1st Amendment protection. [FN157] Based on the reasoning of these two different courts, this does not appear to be a settled issue.

It should come as no surprise that major policy concerns and goals still exist today when it comes to protecting children from harmful violent and sexual material on the Internet. These concerns and goals clash with another which is to keep the Internet as free from government regulation as possible. Throw in a policy concern and goal of protecting the speech rights of Americans under the 1st Amendment and it's easy to see that there are no easy answers. Current efforts to address the various policy concerns and goals are essentially divided into two areas: Legislative and Non-Legislative.

Legislatively, Congress and the states continue to debate different alternatives to try and shield children from harmful material on the Internet. The focus on this debate is in cyberzoning, designed to segregate harmful material in certain areas on the Internet, and in the use of mandatory filtering and blocking in libraries and public schools.

Mandating a specific domain for pornographic material would also put the U.S. Government at odds with the philosophy behind ICANN's formation. While few doubt that the U.S. lacks the "raw power" to do this, the fear is that other governments would follow the U.S.' lead which would lead to a dramatic increase in government interference world-wide. [FN169] Most believe that increased attempts at Internet regulation will stifle its growth and potential uses.

The Commission did recommend that the government look into new legislation which would treat "mouse trapping" and "deceptive metatagging," done to lure children to view the adult sites, as deceptive trade practices. [FN182] Also, it was recommended that the government provide resources to enforce existing obscenity and child pornography laws more vigorously and that the government study and evaluate technological tools like filtering, labeling, and rating. [FN183] Another major focus on the group was to encourage the adult-oriented material businesses to do a better job of self-regulation. Specifically, they need to self-label to make filters more effective, end spamming, develop better age-verification techniques, and eliminate teasers. [FN184] This year was the Commission's first report so it remains to be seen how effective or influential it will be.

Although not directly charged with regulating the Internet per se, ICANN does have a tremendous influence on it by virtue of their role in assigning domains. As discussed earlier, the creation of a .xxx domain to aide in cyberzoning would require international agreement. ICANN recently rejected this suffix as well as a .kids domain which was to provide a safe domain for children. Thus far, ICANN has avoided domains like this that it finds "troublesome" because of concerns about who determines what is on them and how to verify that the users are really adults or children. [FN185] These are some of the same issues that U.S. courts have struggled with and ICANN seems unwilling, at this point, to enter the fray when it comes to issues that seek to influence the content of the Internet.

Thus far, most industry actions seem largely reactionary. More proactive activities such as an industry-wide rating system and content codes or tagging have been suggested. However, the Internet is composed of so many different service providers from so many different countries that getting the consensus needed to make things like these effective would be difficult to do.

Any attempt to regulate content on the Internet through legislative means will continue to face an uphill battle in this country. Unlike other new technologies, the Supreme Court set the tone for Internet regulation early on and there has been no deviation from it. While that tone could change over time, thus far the message from the Court has been clear: Protecting children is a compelling government objective but it will not trump the free speech rights of adults unless the strict scrutiny analysis is satisfied. Since that standard is very difficult to meet, we must explore other ways to meet this important objective. Self-regulating activities by the ISP's and Internet businesses will provide part of the solution while the continued development and use of filtering technologies can provide another piece. None of these things will replace the role of the parent in protecting and teaching their children. The Internet is not a babysitter and the government is not a parent.

A domain name is the "word address" that people use to find pages on the Internet. A registry of domain names is maintained by a registrar, which translates the word name into the number address where the page is located on the Internet. An example of a word domain name is <www.amazon.com>, which is owned by "amazon.com" an on-line bookstore (which, if you are reading this paper, you probably already knew!).

Mr. Boyd, it seems, also owned over fifty other domain names, many including the names of other movie stars like "alpacino.com" and "madeleinestowe.com" and had offered the "juliaroberts.com" domain name for sale on e-bay, an online auction site.[2] He was not using any of the celebrity domain names as addresses for fan web sites or anything having to do with the celebrities. The registration, or ownership, of a domain name that is the same as or confusingly similar to a trademark or a famous name, for the purposes of selling it back to the "rightful" owner, or to use it to mislead Internet users into visiting the web site, is known as "cybersquatting," and is an increasing problem for trademark owners and celebrities.

Until recently, trademark or service mark owners whose marks were being infringed by cybersquatters typically sought redress through traditional trademark remedies in court.[3] Alternatively, if a cybersquatter registered a domain name that was identical to a registered mark, the registered mark owner could use a dispute resolution policy promulgated by Network Solutions, Inc.

This paper provides an overview and analysis of ICANN's domain name dispute resolution plan. Part II provides a look at the background and evolution of the policy. Part III walks through the requirements of filing a complaint and how a case proceeds under ICANN's plan. Part IV analyzes how well the plan is working and how it can best be utilized. Finally, part V offers suggestions for proactive approaches to domain dispute prevention, rather than resolution.

Because the registrant is bound by the UDRP under the registration contract and because the evidence is "heard" through the submission of documents only, the complainant does not have to "get jurisdiction" over the respondent.

In addition, the arbitrators have identified "respondent's failure to make good faith use of the Domain Name" without explanation for that failure[36]; respondent's failure to present any evidence in its defense[37]; making the domain name available for auction on an on-line auction web site[38]; providing an e-mail link on the web page for anyone to offer to buy the domain name, not just the complainant or a competitor[39]; registering the domain name close in time after an announcement of a new marketing campaign/ logo[40]; and being a member of the same geographic and industrial community as a complainant[41] as additional indicia of bad faith by the respondent.

Because the UDRP is still relatively new, the extent to which courts will defer to the decisions of UDRP panels is still unknown. At least one United States District Court has decided that the UDRP decisions are not binding, although the court declined to decide how deferentially it would view a panel decision.[45] In Weber-Stephen v.

UDRP decisions are not binding. If, however, the Policy is going to be truly meaningful, courts should consider the administrative decisions with some degree of deference. Unfortunately for a winning complainant, if a losing respondent files a court challenge to the administrative decision within a certain period of time, the domain name registrar will not impose the panel's decision to transfer or cancel the domain name until it is notified of resolution of the challenge.[55] Therefore, if a UDRP panel has correctly determined that a respondent's registration and use of a domain name is infringing, it would hardly be appropriate for a rightful mark owner/ complainant to have to await another determination by a court that the panel's decision was correct before having the domain name cancelled or transferred. Similarly, if a UDRP panel determines that a mark owner/ complainant is, in fact, guilty of reverse domain name hijacking against a respondent with legitimate rights to the domain name, should that Complainant get a second bite at the apple by filing a complaint and having a trial (or at least summary judgment hearing) in Court?

Act,[57] a judge may only vacate an arbitration award if it finds that the arbitrator(s) engaged in some kind of misconduct or in the event of some kind of arbitrator bias.[58] Whether a United States District Court, for example, should give UDRP decisions the same deference as that granted to arbitrations governed by the Federal Arbitration Act would be a matter for Congress to determine in adopting such a law.

In addition to the issues of precedent and free speech raised above, the UDRP presents a question of whether its advantages outweigh its disadvantages for resolving domain name disputes. One way to approach that question is in light of the policy rationales behind the UDRP. This section considers two policy rationales for the UDRP and analyzes whether they are being met.

An efficient dispute resolution plan helps to even out the balance of power between trademark owners and cybersquatters by decreasing the leverage that cybersquatters have. In the past, a trademark owner could either pay an inflated purchase price to a cybersquatter or expend resources on a court action.[85] Under the UDRP, dispute resolution is far less expensive than court, allowing a trademark owner to reject a cybersquatter's inflated sale price and use the UDRP instead of court.

Even though cybersquatters may misdirect some Internet users looking for a particular business on line at "trademark.com," most Internet users can ultimately find the business through a search engine. Therefore, not being able to find a company at "trademark.com" is at worst an inconvenience for most Internet users. If, however, domain name dispute resolution is long, costly and inefficient, then those costs are likely to be passed on to the user, either in the form of actual cost of product, or in time spent searching for the right web page.

Thus, the sunrise +20 plan probably does not adequately address all of the intellectual property issues that arise with the opening of the new generic top level domains. The difficult task for ICANN, through DNSO, is to balance the competing needs of trademark owners and domain name owners with legitimate rights to own and use their domain names, while remembering that internet users are also relying on the domain name system to help them navigate the world wide web.

The Domain Name dispute problem demonstrates the increasing tendency to consider trademark rights as being closer and closer to a property right rather than as primarily a method of designating source. At common law, trademark protection only existed with respect to the commercial activity and could not be "appropriated in gross" without the context of appurtenant goods or services.[109] Under this scheme, trademark protection helps to promote commercial competition by encouraging competitors to use marks to distinguish quality of goods or services without allowing any one competitor to gain a monopoly on that good or service while protecting consumer expectations.[110] However, as trademark law has been codified, merged into causes of action for unfair competition and evolved to include a "trademark dilution" cause of action, a trademark becomes more like property. Because a mark can carry substantial benefits like consumer good will, it is justifiable for trademark and service mark owners to work to protect their marks from even the possibility of confusion by consumers. This tension between adequately protecting trademarks while maintaining the identification purpose of trademarks manifests clearly in the domain name dispute arena. So far, the ICANN UDRP seems to strike the right balance, allowing a quick, inexpensive and efficient way for trademark owners to protect their marks from third parties with no legitimate claims to the mark. By putting the entire burden of proof on the trademark owner/ complainant, the UDRP keeps trademark owners from being able to change its mark into a property interest by just taking a domain name away from domain name owner with legitimate claims to the name.

Intellectual Property Organization (WIPO). Under the Rules, either party may elect that the matter be heard by three neutrals, rather than the single, default neutral. If a single arbitrator hears the dispute, or if the Complainant elects a three-member panel, then the Complainant is responsible for paying all of the fees. If the Respondent elects a three-member panel, then the Respondent becomes responsible for one-half of the panel fees, but the Complainant still must pay the filing fee in addition to the other half of the panel fees. See Rules, supra, note 13, Rule 6b-c.

UDRP, supra, note 12, Part 4.a.iii. UDRP neutrals have been fairly liberal in interpreting what constitutes "use" of a domain name, including finding that offering the domain name for sale to the complainant constitutes a use. See e.g. Word Wide Wrestling Fed. Entertainment, Inc. v.

Amendment. As speech, the program should be protected from restriction by the statute. The defendants further argued that the copy protection for the movies was not an effective technological measure and should not fall under the auspices of the DMCA. Finally, the defendants argued that DeCSS could be used for a fair use exception to copyright prohibitions and that a complete restriction of DeCSS would not allow for fair use.

The idea of "music sharing" had simple roots in a college dormitory but grew into one of the most fascinating lawsuits in history. This paper examines how the music producing giants were able to completely kill one of the most visited internet sites in history, why the 9th Circuit Court of Appeals may have been wrong in its decision to uphold an injunction against Napster, and what the future may hold for Napster.

In the beginning, there was the free exchange of albums, tapes, and eventually compact discs. It was common for one friend to make a tape of a popular hit for another. Fanning and Parker, however, took this a few steps further. They determined that the internet should become a vehicle for the ultimate way to "borrow" a friend's music. Sitting in their college dormitory at Northeastern University, the young Fanning and Parker created a code by which he and his friends could "swap" music via their computers.

The idea grew exponentially when Fanning and Parker obtained capital and formed Napster, Inc. Located in San Mateo, California, Napster has treaded some very rough waters recently and its future is all but dead.

Napster technology has been described as the very basic of internet technology. Lewine, Alan, Napster, Copyright and the Pig Encoder, 6 Cyber. Law. 2 (2001). Napster technology is based on what is known as a peer to peer model. Id. Instead of having a commercially available link to the internet, such as AOL or Earthlink, the Napster software links the individual user's computers to one another and allows file sharing or swapping.

Furthermore, "as a result of the emergence of Internet web sites that allow the free, unlicensed trading of copyrighted musical works, it has been predicted that record companies will lose $3.1 billion in potential record sales by 2005." Theft or Innocent Trade Over the Information Superhighway. To add gas to the already heated fire, it is estimated that there were over 1 billion files available for sharing when Napster was in its prime. CNN.com, Napster, The Revolution.

Napster users do not take their compact discs purchased at the local music store and "share" them in the traditional sense. The digital images stored on a compact disc must first be converted to a file that can be stored on the hard drive of a computer. Currently, the most efficient storage method is through MPEG technology.

Id. The quality of an MP3 file is inferior to the quality of a compact disc. The ease of use of MP3 files (coupled with the free use provided by Napster ), however, makes it a much more convenient way to obtain and store music.

When the recording industry declared war on Napster, there was one word that kept appearing: "COPYRIGHT." The recording industry stated in no uncertain terms, and the Ninth Circuit agreed, that Napster was violating its copyrights.

With the dawn of the printing press came the need to protect the developers of novel ideas, creations and works of art. Lewine, Alan, Napster, Copyright and the Pig Encoder, 6 Cyber. Law. 2 (2001). The ability for anyone to copy and mass distribute the ideas of others became very simple with the advancements made following the printing press. Thus, the development of copyright laws under the old common law. Id. There was a need, however, to allow people to use information and ideas in a non-infringing way. This concept led to the formation of "fair use," which was developed as an exception to the copyright laws. Id.

The United States Constitution provides that congress has the right to "promote the progress of science and useful arts, by securing for limited times to authors and inventors the exclusive right to their respective writings and discoveries." U.S.

During the 19th Century, however, music was recognized as a "useful art" within the meaning of the Constitution. Id. To show exactly how far copyright law has come, particularly in the field of music, we need only examine the anger of composer Sir Arthur Sullivan (of Gilbert and Sullivan) at the invention of the piano player. The piano player was a playback method that was programmed with sheets of perforated paper that, when programmed correctly, allowed the piano to play music. The actual paper was not a duplicate of the composition and did not, therefore, fall under the protection of copyright law. The United States Supreme Court in 1908 determined that there was no violation in a similar case. Id. Congress' response to this decision was to change the law, thus creating modern copyright law.

The original goals of these Acts were to "provide economic incentives necessary to stimulate the producer, and thereby benefit the public, without overprotecting the author and thus restricting public access to copyrighted works." Id. Fair use was developed as an affirmative defense to copyright infringement to ensure that these goals were met. Subsequently, Congress codified the "fair use doctrine" in section 107 of the 1976 Copyright.

Fair use was developed under common law. There are no "bright-line" tests, and no case is precisely the same as another. Fair use is designed to shrink and expand as the situation calls. For instance, the case of Sony Corp. v. Universal City Studios, Inc., the Supreme Court had the opportunity to apply fair use in the context of home recording of television programs. The makers of the now antiquated Betamax machine were sued for infringement by the producers of television programs broadcast over the public airways. The Court determined that the non-commercial nature of the records and the fact that it could not be proven that the programs were even kept after being watched one time or sometimes not at all. One observation made by the Court was that excising the use of a copyright "requires a difficult balance between the interests of authors and inventors in the control and exploitation of their writings and discoveries on the one hand, and society's competing interest in the free flow of ideas, information and commerce on the other hand." Sony Corp. v. Universal City Studios, Inc.

The Court further noted that granting an injunction to the manufacturer's for "contributory liability" for copyright infringement would be judicially unmanageable because this theory of liability would be too broad with respect to staple items of commerce. Id. The Court lists typewriters, records, cameras and photocopy machines as examples of the types of items that would be "staple articles of commerce." Id.

Furthermore the Court notes that it is the legislature's job to dictate how far to expand copyright protection. Id. The Court cites to five cases that stand for the proposition that "sound policy, as well as history, supports our consistent deference to Congress when major technological innovations alter the market for copyrighted materials." Id.

It must be noted that the Court predicates its opinion on the fact that there are several non-infringing uses for the Betamax. Injunction would be inappropriate since the usefulness of the machines go beyond the infringing activity. Id.

The Court again had the opportunity to explore fair use in the musical setting in Campbell v. Acuff-Rose Music, Inc.. There, the controversial rap artists, Luke Skyywalker and the 2 Live Crew were being sued by the producer of Roy Orbison's song, "Oh Pretty Woman." Luther Campbell wrote and the band recorded, a parody of Orbison's song and called it "Pretty Woman." The Court held that taking a substantial part of a copyrighted piece for purposes of parody was not a violation of the copyright statutes. The Court called Campbell's work "transformative" of the original and therefore did not fall into the realm of infringement. Id.

MP3.com did not deny that its purpose was commercial in nature (they gained their revenues through advertising proceeds and not through subscription fees). MP3 asserted that they were merely repackaging the music already legitimately owned by the consumer into a new package to be stored and easily transported on a computer hard drive.

A mere five months after the first Napster customer arrived at the site, a group of over eighteen recording companies filed suit against the ill-fated internet start-up company. This group was led by the Record Industry Association of America, which is quite a powerful force in the Napster arena. It is well documented that many of these record companies have plans of their own to open Napster-like websites. Lewine, Alan, Napster, Copyright and the Pig Encoder, 6 Cyber. Law. 2 (2001).

At the forefront of the attack by artists against Napster was Metallica, a "head banging" rock band. The next to join the fray was Dr. Dre, a gangster rap artist. In 2000 Shawn Fanning told Rolling Stone that "he played guitar in a cover band, bashing out Metallica and Zeppelin tunes.

Now that he's getting sued by Metallica, it's painful for him to talk about how much he loves their music. When asked which Metallica songs he covered, he goes on the defensive. 'I better not say,' he muses, deadpan. 'I don't recall whether I had their written permission.' " Rolling Stone.com: News, The Most Dangerous Man in the Music Industry.

Metallica, Dr. Dre Ends "Beefs" with Napster. The agreement basically prevents Napster from allowing sharing of files without specific permission directly from Metallica and Dr. Dre. Furthermore, Metallica and Dr. Dre agree that they will provide Napster with music that can be shared without violation.

Additionally, any decisions about which files are downloaded is purely at the discretion of the users. Finally, Napster stated that there is no modification of the downloaded files. Napster went further to explain that it meets each of the five conditions of this safe harbor provision and is, therefore, immune from liability.

Act clearly provides immunity for services which merely serve as conduits for the passage of information. She stated that the passage of MP3 files does not occur through Napster, but that Napster enables or facilitates connections. Therefore, she held that Napster did not fall under this safe harbor provision. Id. Judge Patel further found that there is only a minuscule policy protecting against repeat offenders.

Although the District Court distinguised Napster from Sony, the facts in both cases are similar. In Napster, as in Sony, there was a product that allowed duplication of copyrighted material. There was also a product in Napster and Sony that allowed for other uses besides duplication of copyrighted material. Finally, there is time shifting/space shifting in both Napster and Sony.

In fact go to any one of the web sites linked below and you are bound to find your fair share of opinions about what the future holds. Below is an analysis of the latest Order signed by Judge Patel and some summaries and analyses of recent articles expressing those opinions.

Today, Judge Nixes Napster Comeback, for Now. Napster officials have stated that the current technology is 99% effective in blocking the exchange of copyrighted material . Following the issuance of this Order by Judge Patel, Napster attorney's quickly stated that they would appeal this ruling to the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals. Id..

Napster has been considered an end-run around a record industry that is drastically out of touch, that has gotten away with putting out crummy products, sold at exorbitant prices, with utter disregard for consumers and artists alike. The record industry did not learn from Napster.

It was in the record business' best interest to demonize Napster. Napster users covered the full socioeconomic demographic gamut, from executives downloading tunes to be stored on their companies' huge drives and lawyers keeping MP.3 files on their firms' computers to teens downloading music instead of doing homework.

Over the last two months, Vivendi Universal has spent roughly $400 million purchasing nearly a half dozen sites in an attempt to build what looks like to be the industry's largest music portal. Most recently, on May 20, it bought music web site MP3.com for $372 million. The purchase of MP.3 brings an industry-approved technology for storing and streaming songs to customer's computers. A major reason for Vivendi's sudden online interest is competition. Other music companies have been busy testing the online waters themselves.

The average number of files being shared on Napster's MP3-swapping service has fallen 90 percent in the three months since the court-mandated filters were installed to block the trading of copyrighted music. The drastic fall-off in shared files can be blamed on the filters Napster was forced to install after Judge Marilyn Hall Patel ordered the company to block copyrighted music. The total number of files downloaded in May was only 360 million, which is down from 2.79 billion in February, an 87 percent decrease.

With the development of data services for mobile networks, can a Napster-like service could develop along the airwaves and threaten the music industry again. So will there be a mobile Napster? The answer is almost certainly no. Although a successful mobile service might, for example, allow customers to select songs and send them to friends' mobile phones as sound greetings, possibly combined with a personal message, mobile internet access will remain costly and, in the short term, will offer only limited bandwidth.

Napster continued its efforts to rein-in its free-wheeling Internet music bazaar Thursday by signing a deal with Loudeye technologies for a system that will keep track of the music that crisscrosses cyberspace on the Napster network. Loudeye's fingerprints will ultimately help Napster track millions of unique music files on the Napster service. Protecting copyrights and paying royalties to the recording industry is critical to Napster's future since the music industry took legal action against Napster for abetting record piracy and cheating both recording labels and artists out of rightful royalties.

BMG Entertainment, EMI and Warner Music, that would result in the companies' releases being licensed for use on Napster. The labels, however, have insisted that the arrangement will not go into effect until Napster deploys technology that will definitively protect copyrights.

Now, Napster has reorganized itself along more conventional business lines and has agreed to pay a license fee for access to music tracks. The deal apparently hinges on whether Napster can devise a system to prevent music being passed on free of charge to third persons.

"The film studios fought the VCR companies tooth and nail before home video took off." Now the movie businesses are reaping the benefits of VCR's and making more money on the renting of their movies than viewing it at the theater.

The advent of digital music, once thought to be the "death knell" for record labels will actually propel them to higher profits in the future, but only if they adopt strategies pioneered in the film industry.

Last year, more than 50 million people downloaded music from Napster, and neither the record industry nor the artists received a penny. It seemed that Napster represented the revolution in distribution that the internet promised, making available back-catalogue tracks that firms had deleted or didn't promote.

Napster's fans, who include Prince, Madonna, and Courtney Love, did not share the industry's outrage at the brainchild of Shawn Fanning. This year, Fanning's labors, honed in a college room, have been emasculated and colonized. The record companies, who sued Napster every which way, have further reined in the company. Last November, Bertelsmann broke with the four other major record companies to drop its action and form a license deal with Napster. Three weeks ago, EMI and AOL Time Warner followed suit.

What the major record companies hope to gain from Napster is specific knowledge of its subscribers' musical preferences. "Marketing to music fans has been terrible. Record shops are lousy at this. The significance of the alliances with Napster is that the major labels have now got a database with 50 million people' music preferences.

Yet somewhere in Britain, the counterculture dream still lives. A web site called Espra promises to deliver what Napster couldn't: guaranteed anonymity for users. The British-funded site promises "to propagate itself across the world and ruthlessly devour the hegemony of the music distributors."

Espra believes musicians can survive on what it calls the "gift economy," where fans voluntarily supporting their favorite bands via a "tip" facility built into the site. If that sentiment catches fire, music moguls may suddenly find another war on their digital doorstep.

All over the web, the big music companies are swallowing up the file-sharing websites and programs that had been created to undercut them. By the summer's end, the "new" Napster.com will go commercial. MusicNet.com will begin selling online the music of BMG Entertainment, EMI Recorded Music and Warner Music Group. Pressplay.com, formerly known as Duet, will begin selling the digitized tunes of the Sony and Universal music groups.

Since the Rio's debut in 1998, digital music players of many stripes and styles have cropped up. In only a few short years, this market has exploded. But questions remain: Are these products selling, and will the market have a sustainable growth in years to come? Industry observers say that the digital music, once scorchingly hot, has in the last few months cooled off dramatically. Napster, the ubiquitous MP3 file-sharing service, is down if not quite out, and now comes word that Microsoft Corp. may no longer support MP3 files in future versions of its windows media players.

Even as attention focused on quashing Napster by legal means, Internet pirates had already graduated to trading movies illegally at a rate up to 5000,000 each day, according to a new report. That gives Hollywood studios the daunting task of essentially trying to stop a leaking dam from bursting while scrambling to find ways to deliver their products safely to paying customers.

The popularity of song-sharing on Napster or downloading bootlegged movies proves that people want to get entertainment online, regardless of its legitimacy. Compared to Napster, it is far more difficult to thwart the passage of bootlegged movies because the posting of encrypted movies on networks that have no central authority can be anonymous. In addition to movies, researchers were surprised to find trading of television shows intercepted off satellite transmissions between the networks and their affiliated stations.

A report today by the Webnoize digital entertainment intelligence firm says that the latest version of Napster's file-sharing browser, version 2.0 beta 10.3, comes with music-fingerprinting technology installed. On its web site, Napster states that the new application "incorporates new file identification technology,' and that "this new version of the application will allow Napster to continue complying with the court's injunction while also improving the Napster experience." Napster's site also encourages users to download the new beta version soon. "In order to comply with the court order, we'll soon be disabling previous versions of the Napster application," the site says. It gives no date for blacking access to older versions.

Napster earlier secured a licensing deal with MusicNet, EMI< BMG, and Warner Music, on the basis that it is able to introduce a secure method for charging users. Napster is betting that users will be willing to pay for the service which used to be free.

The assortment of articles above does not lend much help predicting the longevity of Napster. The future predictions vary from making analogy's with the online service to VCR's (claiming the record industries will make more money off Napster that the actual record sales) to it will never work or make any money whatsoever.

One thing is certain, Napster will not go down without a fight. However, the latest news, (all being within the last weeks) indicates that Napster may survive in a symbiotic relationship with the record companies. However, even as the firm was celebrating its licensing agreements, legal troubles continue to dog Napster, which also was hit with yet another copyright infringement suit yesterday by the Beverly Hills group that runs the Academy Awards.

Vice President of AIM states that "Napster gives the independent artists more exposure." "What is great about Napster is that it is the modern version of word of mouth, and that is what sells records for us. The kind of fan-to-fan communication that used to happen in record stores and people's bedrooms now happens on Napster."

The software includes a filter to block copyrighted tracks from being distributed freely. Previous versions of Napster software no longer will work. Napster states that they are making this change as part of their ongoing effort to comply with the court's orders.

The immediate results has been as sharp decline in the number of tracks available for download. "Users of the new client were sharing an average of 1.5 songs, down from a peak of 220 songs per user in February.

Earlier this month, the Fraunhofer Institute and Thomson Multimedia unveiled MP.3Pro. According to its creators, the format reduces data at a ratio of 20:1, which makes the files about half the size of MP3s without sacrificing audio quality.

The question is whether or not MP3Pro will be successful. On the one hand, there are already billions of MP3files that are compatible with the new format. On the other hand, the landscape in the online music world is vastly different than it was just a few years ago, particularly in the wake of Napster.

Downloads from Napster will never take off, because the quality is so poor. True, MP3's are fine for playing over your PC, however, they are no match for the clear and detailed music that arrives on audio compact discs. Or are they?

The new MP3Pro will be arriving soon, and not only are sound quality close to CD quality, but they take up half the size of song files recorded with the current MP3 format. This is all done by digital compression. Digital compression is a vital technique for minimizing amounts of data needed to transmit music, data, pictures, and videos across a network like the internet. With the increase of sound quality, if Napster does survive their latest lawsuits, it will certainly prosper.

Sony Music and Universal Music announced Duet, a digital music service that will package their content sound applications and distribute private label versions on affiliate web sites. Yahoo has agreed to launch the Duet driven service this summer.

As a result, there will be more consumer confusion, particularly as format battles arise and the labels experiment with subscription fees versus a la carte download fees, neither of which as proven successful.

It had the easiest interface and all the relevant titles in a single place with a single technology formal. Now we are going to have a matrix, with mix and match label alliances based on different flavors of services."

Although record labels are using Duet and MusicNet, I do not have much expectations. Major labels do not get it" and have the attitude that someone has got to pay for this. I doubt that MusicNet and Duet will allow users to download, but only listen.

Meanwhile, the stodgy record labels have the door wide open (CDs are easy to copy and post online) and are foolishly trying to stop song sharing in court rather than serving it up the consumer's way and taking in some money, the industry is throwing more money at legal battles.

The only way recording industries are going to win this battle is to open its licensing procedures and participating fully in he distribution trend. They are going to have to acknowledge that they are not going to make the money they once did.

The entire problem with the Napster case is simple. Whenever there is new technology, those most readily effected go into panic mode. When the first song was played on the radio, the record industry took it by storm.

"What is great about Napster is that it is the modern version of word of mouth, and that is what sells records for us. The kind of fan-to-fan communication that used to happen in record stores and people's bedrooms now happens on Napster." Id. These latest deals are another "step in bringing Napster back to life," said analyst Phillip Leigh, senior vice president of Equity Research for Raymond James Financial Inc. Id.

Warner Music, on the basis that it is able to introduce a secure method for charging users. Id. Napster is betting that users will be willing to pay for the service which used to be free. However, many believe finding people to pay for the service will be a difficult task. Id. For instance, one past Napster user created a web site named "napstersucks.com" supposedly while he impatiently waited four full hours trying to download the same song, although no such domain name was found.

Napster believes it will succeed with splitting profits with recording companies and artists. However, even as the firm was celebrating its licensing agreements, legal troubles continue to dog Napster, which also was hit with yet another copyright infringement suit July 3, 2001, by the Beverly Hills group that runs the Academy Awards. Business and Finance (June 26, 2001). Certainly, whether Napster survives will be decided in the next few months.

Model?", 15 J. Marshall J. Computer Info. L. 203, 1997.) The basis for his conclusion is the economic argument that when a person in one State purchases an item from a retailer in another State, that purchase displaces the tax revenue that would have been generated in the purchasers State if the purchase had been made at a traditional retailer. He concludes that the Internet will cause such a displacement and cause serious difficulty.

Whether that displacement will occur or whether changes in the physical presence requirement for taxation need to be made are beyond our scope here, but this does serve as a model for abstraction. Forte's consideration of how mail orders are taxed now, what the implications might be, and what changes in the current system might be called for represents the abstract approach to examining this issue. Here he concludes that the sheer volume of transactions might mandate a change in the current laws, but he does not call for an Internet tax or any particular regulation of transactions based on the manner in which the order is placed.

ALI-ABA 185, 2001.) because gambling has long been considered a matter morality to be regulated by State governments, and it is not generally considered to be an expression of ideas for the purpose of allowing free speech. In regulating gambling as a form of communication, the government can use the commerce clause of the constitution . (U.S. Const., Art I). to justify its regulating, whereas, the Federal Government has refused to classify gambling as speech and provide it First Amendment protection.

Quite the opposite, federal courts have always had the authority to adjudicate interstate matters by virtue of their diversity jurisdiction, and congress has the authority to regulate interstate communications and trade by virtue of the Commerce Clause. (U.S. Const., Art I). What is at issue here is the substantive law to be used in resolving such disputes, and what restrictions can be placed on matters such as speech and criminal behavior, which are not traditionally considered to fall under the Commerce Clause.

Instead of specifically attempting to regulate the Internet, the section remains based in interstate transportation. This latter approach has led to more successful legislation than directed Internet statutes.

U.S. 121, 1959.) This is problematic for two reasons: It creates a double standard since an individual who used a conventional telephone call or letter would not have the same exposure, and it creates a vastly enlarged possibility for double jeopardy.

Federal statutes in many cases limit or eliminate a State's ability to legislate on the same issue. Federal statutes which are written to supercede a State's law could be enforced despite the sensibilities of that State's courts or legislature and would prevent those courts and legislature from ruling on the issue. For example, a Federal law limiting the extent of free speech while attempting to regulate access to pornography would prevent a State from providing greater protection to web site operators within its geographical boundaries. Even though the State's constitution might provide for a greater protection of speech.

By virtue of the Internet's fault tolerant method of flexible routing and hub based structure, communications between two parties in the same State might in fact travel through a telecommunications hub in another State. For example, a bet placed by a resident of Nevada via the Internet to a Nevada based casino might physically travel through a router in San Jose, California.

Interstate for the purpose of legislation. If such a classification is made and used as the basis for Federal statutes, the Federal Government could give themselves license to control all matters where State police power is normally involved, simply because it was conducted on the Internet.

Augusta National, Inc. to Network Solutions, Inc., the registrar of the domain name "masters.com", triggering Network Solutions' dispute resolution system, was sufficient contact to allow personal jurisdiction over the subsequent suit for the domain name, in a California court. In reversing the district courts decision that California did not have personal jurisdiction, the appeals court held that the Georgia golf club that held the "Masters" trademark, and sent a letter to the registrar of Internet domain names challenging California computer services company's use of the "masters.com" domain name purposefully availed itself of privileges of conducting activities in California. The company was thus subject to specific jurisdiction in Network Solution's resulting declaratory judgment action, because the letter targeted a California company, and the letter forced the company to either bring suit or lose control of its website. In addition, the club demonstrated no hardship or any other specific factor suggesting that jurisdiction in California would be unreasonable.

In addition to the fears of stifling free speech and the growth of the network, the Federal Government needs to carefully consider the impact of rushing to create a separate Internet jurisdiction on States rights under their Constitutions and police powers.

At one point and time the internet was a vehicle for obtaining information, many people referred to ISPs as Information Service Providers instead of Internet Service Providers.. People used their ISP's content as the "internet". Today, the internet has become one of the most dynamic sources of information and mechanisms for communications. Not only do 300 million people surf the over one billion web pages, but they are able to communicate via e-mail, Instant Messangers, Net-to-phone devices, video cameras, etc. Because of the explosive growth, constant innovations and the unique nature of the internet, the law has lagged behind in being able to deal with the myriad of issues that are raised. One thing that helped promote the growth of the internet is the fairly cheap access to computers and the internet itself.

Providers. Where these dial-up connections travel across more than one network, a financial obligation known as Reciprocal Compensation is generated between telephone carriers. Since there is a massive volume of internet traffic there is a corresponding hefty payment of reciprocal compensation. This has led to court filings, increased lobbying efforts a heated debated as to what should be compensable for inter-carrier traffic.

The last clause of this section gives the FCC authority to preempt any state or local action that violates (a) or (b) of section 253. Congress was granting substantial authority to the FCC to preempt state or local actions that prevented competition in telecommunications service.

While the Act permits a wide scope of compensation arrangements (including voluntary "bill-and-keep" arrangements), ILECs generally pushed for a reciprocal compensation scheme based on per-minute traffic and negotiated for relatively high compensation rates (which were supposed to be cost based) because they apparently expected to be net-terminators.

ISPs are considered a sub-class of enhanced service providers (ESPs). The FCC treats ESPs "like end-users rather than long-distance carriers." therefore they do not pay the per-minute access charges that long-distance companies pay to local telephone companies.

The Local carrier that had to terminate the call receives no revenue from the customer but has costs associated with transporting and terminating the telephone call. Reciprocal compensation was designed to correct this imbalance by having the originating Local carrier compensate the terminating carrier for the use of its network.

The ILECs started withholding payments to CLECs arguing that these calls were interstate and not local. When you look at it, an Internet communication does not necessarily have a point of "termination" in the traditional sense.

Circuit Remanded that decision, but left open the possibility of ISP bound calls being exempt from Recip Comp. Congress has started legislation to end Recip Comp on Internet bound telephone traffic. Though far from resolved, it appears that Recip Comp's days are numbered as it relates to ISP bound traffic.

A cap will be imposed on total ISP-bound minutes for which a local exchange carrier (LEC) may receive this compensation equal to the number of ISP-bound minutes for which that LEC was previously entitled to compensation, plus a ten percent growth factor.

It makes sense to compensate carriers for imbalances resulting from terminating more calls than you are originating from another carrier. There is no technical difference between a voice call and a call via a modem. A better way to remove the high Recip Comp payments is for the ILECs to charge high usage customers a premium. The internet is an optional (luxury) item, there is no reason for low usage customers to have to subsidize the use of high usage customers - which is effective what is happening. Having usage based rates would incent the appropriate consumer to find alternative means to connect to the internet. It would also remove the role of the government and put the decision in the hands of the market. Recip Comp will eventually be eliminated on ISP bound traffic - though not through market forces. It appears that this result will be due more to an effective and no doubt well funded, lobbying campaign by the ILECs than sound reasoning by Congress or the FCC.

Although security measures and policies can be difficult to implement and may be inconsistent they are imperative to a corporations security scheme in order to show that the corporation is exercising a reasonable standard of care in providing adequate computer network security.

Passwords are the most important yet most vulnerable element of computer security because users tend to be careless with their passwords. This problem can be fixed easily if corporations encourage employees to use passwords that rare not easily guessed. Corporations should also advice users to memorize passwords and not leave them laying around.

Administrative controls are the procedural mechanisms for the company's security policy. Administrative controls include, but are not limited to, establishing a separate security apparatus in a corporation, educating employees about computer security, posting the corporations security policies, performing background checks on employees who have access to sensitive information, protecting against computer viruses, ensuring the corporation has insurance against data disaster or virus attacks, and ensuring the physical locations of computers and other sensitive components are secured.

Firewalls are hardware and software devices that link a computer network to the Internet and prevent unauthorized access. Firewalls show that a corporation exercised reasonable care in protecting its computer network by isolating a corporate computer network from the outside world by monitoring and restricting all incoming and outgoing communications and by regulating remote dial-in access.

Encryption refers to any algorithm applied to a digital message which scrambles the plain text message, rendering it meaningless to anyone who does not have the key to decrypt the message. Encryption protects the integrity and confidentiality of a corporation's data and ensures its authenticity, whether it is stored or transmitted across communication channels. A corporations use of encryption technology is essential to show the corporation exercised due care in securing its communication lines to and from its computer network.

Monitoring computer network access is essential and any attempt to access computer files or programs should be logged for future reference, and all suspiciously accessing should be reviewed and if necessary, terminated.

This paper provides an overview of adoption services and laws in the context of cyberspace.  The first part of the paper describes the current status of adoption including statistics on prevalence and costs.  Next, the paper reviews existing laws regulating adoption, including interstate and international transactions.  Finally, discussion focuses on the risks and benefits associated with Internet adoption services.  In particular, the final section of this paper addresses the adequacy of existing laws to protect the interests involved in Internet adoptions, and whether this situation demands new law.

Some prospective parents prefer not to use an agency.  Instead, these individuals may arrange the adoption directly with the birth parent, or may retain the services of an "intermediary" or "facilitator" to help negotiate the adoption. (34)  In the latter cases, attorneys, doctors and clergy are often selected as intermediaries.  But professional "independent adoption facilitators" do exist, and perhaps because of a few bad apples, are often pejoratively referred to as "baby brokers." In fact, it was a professional facilitator who negotiated the ill-fated "Internet twins" adoption.

The content of the adoption websites varies greatly. (41)  Adoptingonline.com, adopting.com and adopting.org are just a few of the thousands of online adoptions services offering a wide variety of services designed to facilitate parent child matching and provide adoption support.

Currently, there are relatively few federal laws governing adoption.  Adoption is primarily regulated by state statutes, which vary greatly.  This lack of uniformity contributes to the frustration and delay experienced by many adoptive parents.

It is unclear at this point, whether the Bush Administration will continue or expand the efforts of the previous administration.  Because the language of the Memorandum, the ASFA and Adoption 2002 speaks so specifically about children in public welfare and foster care systems, it is unclear whether a similar mandate exists for the private adoption industry.  Further, it may be too early in the Bush Administration to determine whether the Clinton mandates will be followed or expanded.

Interstate adoptions must satisfy the laws of both the sending and the receiving states.  Thus, vast differences in adoption laws between states confuses and frustrates an already emotional situation.  The Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children ("ICPC") may provide some answers.

A discussion of the laws in each state would exceed the scope of this paper.  For that reason, and because the authors and likely audience of this paper reside in Georgia, Georgia's adoption laws are described here as an example of one state's approach to these issues.

Most of the legislation related to adoption aims to encourage adoption, protect children and simplify the process.  It has been suggested that the Internet may serve to effectuate those goals.  But some would ask, at what cost?

Because the same sort of issues discussed in this section are also likely to arise in the context of Internet adoption, the laws of the applicable state are likely to apply to Internet adoption as well.  The Internet, however, will increase the need for consistent laws in both interstate and intercountry adoptions as it increases the potential for people in various states and countries to find one another.  As discussed above, while there are a few federal laws governing adoption, each state has the power to promulgate its own laws to govern the adoption process; therefore, the success of these actions will depend on the particular state's laws where the incident occurred. (120)  Ideally, the lack of uniformity among the state statutes could be alleviated by the adoption of the Uniform Adoption Act of 1994 by all of the states.  Another possible means of accomplishing the cohesive regulation of the adoption process would be to add more substantive material to the procedurally focused Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, which has already been adopted in all fifty states.  One substantive component that a restructuring of this legislation should include is a provision for the regulation of the advertising of children for adoption.  Further, merely increasing awareness of the ICPC would improve the situation through enhanced state compliance with the existing regulations.

There is also an increased potential for fraud to occur, (124) for example, when con artists pretend to be birth mothers and request that the prospective parents send money for food and then change their email address so that they cannot be found. (125)  Fraud may also occur when dishonest agency representatives either misrepresent or do not disclose physical or psychological problems of the children that they are trying to place. (126)  In addition, there are many disreputable facilitators or agencies that request that adoptive parents pay large amounts of money for a child that may not even exist. (127)  Finally, the Internet may increase the potential for "bidding wars" over a child, (128) as is illustrated by Case Study 1, infra, Part 3.C.2.a.

There is also the potential issue of unequal bargaining power between the prospective adoptive parents and the brokers or natural parents in such an emotionally charged event.  The prospective parents are often so desperate to have a family that they are very vulnerable and easily taken advantage of by dishonest birth mothers, facilitators, or brokers. (132)  Even the names of the websites are often designed to affect the emotions of the prospective parents (e.g., "A Bond of Love," "And Baby Makes Three," "A Cradle of Hope," and "A Helping Hand").

Internet adoption offers numerous advantages to the adoption process including the increased accessibility of prospective adoptive parents to the adoption agencies and facilitators, as well as to the children waiting to be adopted.  The rise of these services on the Internet allows single persons, older persons, and unmarried or homosexual couples a better chance at locating a child to adopt.  Finally, Internet adoption offers the advantage of decreasing adoption costs and waiting times.

Along with the advantages of online adoption come a number of potentially severe problems.  Internet adoption provides a forum for the extortion of prospective parents, and it has the increased potential for misrepresentation and fraud in the adoption process.  In addition, the use of children's photographs and information on some agencies' websites provides pedophiles surfing the net access to and the opportunity to potentially misuse this information.  In addition to the dangers presented by the misuse of Internet adoption, issues also arise because Internet adoption is a forum in which so many different areas of law intersect (contracts, torts, family law).  When these laws conflict, what is the hierarchy?  Which law should apply?  Also, because the majority of the law governing the adoption process is promulgated by the states, and because the Internet makes it much more likely that interstate and even intercountry adoptions will be occurring, there is an increase in the problem of determining which state's laws should apply to the process, both generally and when a dispute arises. Because of the distinct increase in potential dangers presented by Internet adoption, as well as the increase in conflict of laws issues, there is a need for new and further regulation of this process.

Byette supra note 1 (stating that because of its speed and lack of regulation, the Internet is "an ideal medium not just for making successful matches, but for unethical preying on desperate families").

The goal for every child in our Nation's public welfare system is permanence in a safe and stable home, whether it be returning home, adoption, legal guardianship, or another permanent placement.  While the great majority of children in foster care will return home, for about one in five, returning home is not an option, and they will need another home, one that is caring and safe.  These children wait far too long typically over 3 years, but for many children [,]  much longer to be placed in permanent homes.  Each year State child welfare agencies secure homes for less than one-third of the children whose goal is adoption or an alternate permanent plan.  I know we can do better.

Now, Internet users can find a variety of businesses represented on the Internet through a simple search. Such businesses include: clothing retailers, book dealers, law firms, home businesses, telecommunications companies, travel related groups, and virtually any other business that one can imagine.

Gambling is one of the oldest businesses in history, and while the industry has always been around, it wasnt until the twentieth century in which gambling really took off. A dreamer named Bugsy Siegel took the gambling concept a step further and built the Flamingo Hotel in the desert  town of Las Vegas, and for decades, Vegas was about the only legal option  for gamblers.

The Internet now offers cheap and easy access to a concoction of gambling services. Thanks to the Internet, gamblers no longer face the necessity of flying to Las Vegas to play the slots, driving to the nearest authorized track to play the horses, or even walking to the corner store to play the state lotto. Rather, with a simple search over the Internet, gambling sites are easy to find, and registering with such sites is relatively simple.

While all of this may sound enticing, there are several concerns about the growth of Internet gambling. Concerns to society include gambling addiction, gambling by minors, increased crime, and threats to the integrity sporting contests. Furthermore, there are many issues concerning the honesty and fairness  of Internet casinos; claims of cheating are prevalent in the Internet gambling  business, and have included: (a) site providers' failing to pay off winners;  (b) site providers' failing to return money paid up front and never gambled;  (c) site providers' failing to explain games appearing to be rigged; and (d) site providers' disappearing with investors money.

The remainder of this paper will focus on the process of gambling online, the legality of Internet gambling (both state and federal), debt issues created by Internet gambling, enforcement issues, and the debate over the viability of any regulation or ban on Internet gambling.

Thus far, Internet gambling has been lucrative due to its easy access, ease of use, and the convenience of placing wagers from the comfort of ones home. Internet gamblers find online casinos in much of the same way regular Internet users find their sites. Online casinos can be located though search engines, online  advertising, SPAM e-mail, word of mouth, and a variety of other ways.

Do to the complexity and continuing evolution of the Internet, the legal issues surrounding gambling on the Internet are equally intricate and still developing. Gambling laws have traditionally been left to the states, and all but two states (Utah and Hawaii) have some form of legalized gambling.

This section will begin with a look at federal government regulation, including both current and proposed legislation aimed at Internet gambling, move into how certain states have addressed  Internet gambling issues, and conclude with a look at jurisdictional challenges.

Within the federal structure of Internet gambling regulation, there are two categories: first, there is the application of existing law to Internet gambling, and second, there are the proposed attempts (which have failed to date) to deal specifically with Internet gambling.

In U.S. v. Cohen,29 the co-owner and operator of an off shore gambling business, licensed and located in Antigua, was indicted for alleged violations of the Wire Act arising from accepting bets from the United States over the Internet and telephone.

He further argued that he did not violate the statute because betting was legal in both New York and Antigua. However, his defenses were rejected, and a federal jury in New York convicted him of violating the Wire Act.

IGPA was introduced in 1999. Sponsored once again by Senator Kyl, the bill, as reintroduced, "would expand and/or clarify definitions within the statute to include the technology of the Internet and all forms of gambling."

There, the circuit judge prohibited the tribe from taking any bets or wagers from Missouri residents. After a lengthy jurisdictional issue, the case went back in Missouri state court. Missouri argued that the bets occurred in Missouri and were therefore illegal. On the other hand, the tribe argued that the bets occurred on its reservation lands and therefore are only subject to regulation under the federal Indian Gaming Regulatory Act (IGRA).

Overall, the state of Missouri has not been entirely successful  at enforcing their prohibition rulings. Interactive Gaming still maintains  a gambling site, but now it uses fake money. Nevertheless, Interactive Gaming did sell its offshore Internet gaming sites in December of 1997, partially  due to legal actions by the state of Missouri and the U.S. Justice Department.

New York has also joined the list of states  who have sued Internet gambling websites. New York has followed the lead of others in strategizing that if they can show that the overseas Internet gambling sites are targeting users in their state, then their state has jurisdiction  over them.

Later, in 1999, the New York Supreme Court held that the act of entering a bet and transmitting the information from New York via the Internet is sufficient to constitute gambling activity within New York State.

While Floridas actions seem tough, most agree that they will not be able to enforce its strict ban on Internet gambling. According to one bookmaking consultant, Joe Gallagher, "here we have a state that is in a lottery business, a state that licenses jai alai, dog racing, horse racing, and poker--and it is going to tell you, you can't call Antigua to place $50 on the Super Bowl."75  Similarly, it is also unlikely that Western Union will be able to enforce its own ban on wire transfers to offshore casinos. As soon as a site like Rollers hears of the wire transfer ban, it will simply tell its gamblers to place a false name on the transfer application.

Caribbean  nations welcome online gambling operations, and as of late Australia and Great Britain have also gotten into the act. Additionally, the way that these online casinos are structured leads to the all important issue of where the betting actually takes place; that is, is the bet placed from the bettors computer in Oklahoma, or does the event actually take place somewhere offshore?

Essentially they argue that since the computer servers  to which wagers and wagering information are transmitted are located offshore,  the gambling also occurs offshore and therefore, their activities must be  deemed legal since the Internet casino is legally licensed offshore.

Another very interesting issue raised by Internet gambling is the enforceability of debts created by such activity. While online casinos almost never allow players to wager on credit, debt can still be created though Internet gambling via credit cards. As explained, the use of credit cards is the most prevalent method for gamblers to fund their online gambling account. The intermediary electronic account service used by online casinos goes through a financial institution that is a member of a credit card association such as Visa or MasterCard. The account is governed by a merchant agreement by which either the casino or the electronic account service provider pays a percentage of its credit card revenues to the merchant bank.

With the ease of a couple of clicks, and with dollar bill  signs in their heads, naturally, many people have over extended their credit,  lost everything they put in, and are left with insurmountable debt. This possibility was realized in 1997 by a California woman named Cynthia Haines, as she quickly accumulated nearly $70,000 in blackjack, poker, and other gambling debts using a mix of credit cards and online gambling web sites.

However, in a noble response to Providian's attempts to collect, Haines instituted a counterclaim, arguing that credit card companies were "engaging in unfair business practices and aiding and abetting a crime by giving online wager houses merchant accounts to process bets for customers who live where the activity is outlawed."94  Specifically, Haines claimed that: (a) because Internet gambling is thought to be illegal; and (b) California has a recognized policy against judicial enforcement of gambling debts; she should (c) not be forced to pay her respective creditors debts associated with Internet gambling.95   As a result,  in what began as an ordinary creditor collection activity, Providian v.  Haines96  has inadvertently turned into a precedent setting case with the potential to turn the Internet gambling industry on its heels.

A separate and distinct question from the legality of Internet gambling is the issue of enforcement. One major issue of enforcement surrounds the ability of our system to gain physical control over the individual operators of online casinos. This is important, because many critics of the Internet gambling legislation feel that the only way to ever actually stop these sites will be to make sure that the owners and operators are behind bars.

Because a vast majority of online casinos are located  in the countries that license Internet gambling, and because these countries  actively solicit this business in pursuit of potentially substantial revenues,  these countries have a strong vested interest in providing Internet gambling  operators with a safe, extradition-free haven.100     Without these enforcement mechanisms, any domestic government prohibition  of Internet gambling, it is argued, would merely be a threat placing form  over substance.

Other enforcement mechanisms focus on the gambler's access  to the gambling site. Many federal and state gambling prohibitions focus on the activities of the gambling business, as distinct from the activities of the gambler.

ISP providers. Filtering is seen as especially important for cyberspace, where the costs of information production and dissemination are extremely low, and thus information overload is a serious concern.

On the other hand, while the employment of filtering technology  is a potent weapon for blocking access to Internet gambling by United States  citizens, there would still be ways to get around this filtering. For instance,  a potential gambler could work around an ISP's use of filtering technology by accessing the Internet through an ISP located somewhere outside of the United States.107  Those ISPs would, in all probability, not be using the same filtering technology because they would not be subject to the same requirements imposed upon domestic ISPs. However, even if a few isolated individual users had the knowledge and determination to access the Internet through an offshore POP, the cost of accessing the Internet through a long-distance toll call or other means would probably serve as an adequate disincentive to most local gamblers.

In addition, prosecutors could also seek a court order revoking  the Internet casinos website's registration, as well as prohibiting the operators of the Internet gambling website from registering any additional sites. Securing such an order, however, requires certain logistical considerations.

A separate method for severing access to an Internet gambling  website would be to utilize an enforcement provision already available under  the Wire Act,  specifically, 1084(d). For example, Florida Attorney General  Robert A. Butterworth issued a 1084 notice to Sprint in order to terminate  the toll-free telephone service used by the Maliseet Indian Tribe to operate a telephone sports wagering business that was available in the State of Florida.

That is, in order for United States residents to gamble,  Internet gambling businesses must be capable of receiving and processing payments from persons within the United States. Currently, an intermediary third party is facilitating the transfer of funds between the gambler and the website operator.

The future of Internet gambling is anything but set in stone.  Many opponents of Internet gambling point to the many possible harms that  already do, and will continue to, flow from its existence. While regulation or an all-out ban seems ideal, others argue that due to the nature of the internet and the gambling industry, any attempts at regulation will have a minor impact.

The Anti-SPAM Act takes care to limit the applicability to the persons initiating the e-mail, thus immunizing the ISP. One of the most important provisions of the Anti-SPAM Act is that it requires an initiator to provide a valid return address as well as accurate routing information, something many spammers refuse to do. This will make spammers accessible and deter them from using this method of advertising. However, one loophole for potential spammers is a "pre-existing business relationship" with the addressee. If an end-user has business with a website within five years, and the website sends clear and conspicuous notice of an opportunity not to receive further messages, that company may send that end-user unsolicited e-mail. The new bill would also allow consumers an opportunity to opt-out of receiving further communication.

In essence, most of the bills are just different ways of expressing the same idea. So, it may be prudent for Congress to analyze all of the bills and create a law that would encompass all of the other laws' attributes without violating constitutional rights. However, all of these federal bills concerning SPAM are still pending.

This is evidenced by the fact that during our composition of this paper there was a very important case that came out of the state of Washington concerning the constitutionality of the local SPAM law.

SPAM legislation. It is surprising that four years after the first state approved legislation, approximately 2/3 of the states have not followed suit, our own Georgia being one of that number. Is it a sign that SPAM is not being taken seriously? Is it a sign of legislative and public apathy?

Granted, cyber law is a new and confusing area of the law although branching off from traditional areas such as contracts, property and constitutional law. The internet is a different playing field where unfortunately many of the answers will not come without more turf broken in and a few games lost. Legislators are cognizant of the issues but as with so many other issues in the cyber arena, they grapple with SPAM laws in light of First Amendment considerations. Tennessee, a state in this study has a preemption clause provision in its SPAM statute. Thus, it appears there is at least some anticipation of federal legislation in the area. Jurisdictional issues on the cyber waters are so mirky that federal legislation might be the only means of clearing them. The FTC is currently playing watchdog but conclusive legislation would provide guidance to the states who either have already (sometimes unconstitutionally) or have not reached this issue.

While it is incumbent on us to acknowledge both sides of the fence, spammers and anti-spammers, we are somewhat biased as end-users and not advertisers. Perhaps our perspective will change if we ever have the need to send out bulk e-mail in our own businesses (wherein we would still not find it burdensome to clearly label and would most likely welcome receipt of replies because the business would be legitimate). From this vantage point, however, spamming is rather annoying. It has taken the "fun" out of checking e-mail for many of us. Coming home to ten pieces of junk mail in the snail mailbox and finding thirty more in the electronic mailbox after long days at work and school, do not spam-friendly authors make.

ISPs have generally been very responsive to harassment complaints against users, often terminating the account to remove access. However, the relative ease with which an account can be established allows the cyberstalker to move to another ISP or to simply register with the same ISP under another assumed identity.

In the case of Dellapenta (above), a 50 year old man was able to convince chat room participants that he was a 28 year old woman who fantasized about being raped. He was convincing enough to persuade at least six men from the chat room to visit the woman personally.

In addition to legislative efforts to control cyberstalking, local law enforcement and the internet community have developed their own crime-fighting strategies. This section will focus on the efforts of each of these groups, including federal and state agencies, and ways in which the internet community has responded to cyberstalking.

The Woodside Agency ad's header information matched the header of one of the false postings falsely attributed to Hitchcock. Another member, who lived in the area where the Woodside Agency was located, routinely drove by the business to see who the principles were. Several members submitted writing samples to the agency to see if the agency representatives were discriminating in their selection of writers. After comparing notes, the members concluded that the agency didn't turn away any submissions, and requested funds from each of them in exchange for "representation."

Investigation and Technology Unit within the police department in an effort to train police officers and prosecutors in the workings of chat rooms and e-mail. The unit also emphasizes ways to obtain and preserve computer evidence. Likewise, Los Angeles has established the Stalking and Threat Assessment Team, which combines members of the police department and district attorney's office for the investigation of cyberstalking cases.

Industry. The report highlights the gaps in existing federal law with respect to cyberstalking and recommends that technology-neutral legislation be enacted to fill those gaps. A comprehensive list of federal statutes related to cybercrime and the internet is available on the DOJ's website.

Many will be lured by the promise of wealth and ease of doing business at the expense of the goodwill associated with a recognized provider of similar services. Moreover, on the World Wide Web, all consumer-driven traffic is routed based on domain name alone. A recognized symbol or slogan carrying substantial secondary meaning, while recognizable on a roadside billboard, serves no useful purpose there unless it is assigned to a button on a keyboard or attached to a link from a search engine. In short, a domain name more so than any other potential mark associated with a product or service, may control that producer's profitability in cyberspace.

Thus the early phenomena of marking served as a quality control mechanism leading to a body of common law designed chiefly to protect the consumer who could accurately estimate the quality of goods prior to purchase, thereby reducing transactional costs.

Circumstances indicating registration of a domain name primarily for the purpose of selling, renting, or otherwise transferring that registration to the complainant who is the owner of the trade or service mark or to a competitor of that complainant, for consideration in excess of your out-of-pocket costs related to the domain name.

Internet users to your web site or other on-line location, by creating a likelihood of confusion with the complainant's mark as to the source, sponsorship, affiliation, or endorsement of your web site or of a product or service on your web site.

Litigation may be chosen as an alternative to the described arbitration proceedings or a suit may be filed by a respondent following an adverse determination in the arbitration setting. A 10-day grace period follows the arbitration determination prior to the implementation of any remedy so as to allow for appropriate filing should a remedy at law be sought. In either setting, the complaining party pays all fees and no domain name transfers or changes in registrars are allowed during a pending administrative or legal proceeding. All remedies are stayed pending a final determinative outcome to the dispute.

Whether a plaintiff has made a prima facie showing that the state long-arm statute reaches the nonresident defendant given the cause of action alleged and the nature of the nonresident's contacts with the state, and Whether the exercise of personal jurisdiction in the circumstances is consistent with the Due Process Clause of the Constitution.

Therefore, the court held that the defendant's registration of a domain name with a Virginia corporation, without more, was not sufficient to subject it to suit in Virginia. The substance of the contract's negotiation and execution did not suggest any purposeful intent to direct its activities to Virginia as required to satisfy due process. Further, the court held that the nonresident owner of an allegedly infringing domain name did not direct its activities at trademark owner's home state so as to subject it to personal jurisdiction on grounds that injury was caused there. Therefore, the court granted defendant's motion to dismiss.

The defendant filed a motion to dismiss claiming lack of jurisdiction and failure to state a claim. The court held that based on the Massachusetts Long-Arm Statute and its Due Process analysis, that it did have jurisdiction over the case.[19] The Plaintiff moved for a preliminary injunction to stop defendant from using the domain name. In granting this motion, the court analyzed the sufficiency and the likelihood of success of Plaintiff's claims.

The origin of the name ... derived from a childhood memory he had of his uncle's farm in upstate New York. As a youngster, Michael owned a dog named Spotty. Because the dog strayed, his uncle took him to his upstate farm.

The court found this explanation to be "more amusing than credible", and found that Omega had registered "sportys.com" with the intent of entering "into direct competition with Sportsman's in the pilot and aviation consumer market." Therefore, the court affirmed that Omega had acted in bad faith.

The bill is carefully and narrowly tailored, however, to extend only to cases where the plaintiff can demonstrate that the defendant registered, trafficked in, or used the offending domain name with bad-faith intent to profit from the goodwill of a mark belonging to someone else. Thus, the bill does not extend to innocent domain name registrations by those who are unaware of another's use of the name, or even to someone who is aware of the trademark status of the name but registers a domain name containing the mark for any reason other than with bad faith intent to profit from the goodwill associated with that mark. H.R.Conf.Rep.

However, it can be argued that this "narrow" legislation is being used by large corporations as a means of intimidation, and by the courts to stifle entrepreneurship. In a most recent case, Virtual Works, Inc. v.

Internet Service Provider (ISP), registered the domain "vw.net", and used it for over two years as a part of their ISP business. When Virtual Works began to receive multiple offers for the domain from Volkswagen dealers, they offered it to Volkswagen. The court found that this offer, combined with the fact that Virtual Works was aware of Volkswagen's mark when they registered the domain, amounted to bad faith intent to profit. The court even went so far as to say that this bad faith (such as it was) took Virtual Works out of the "safe harbor" provision of the ACPA, which states that if the registrant reasonably believes that his use of the domain is a "fair use", that bad faith "shall not be found" [21].

The Internet is a vast frontier of ideals as well as information.  Often one can be confused with or construed as the other.  Ease of access to the Internet leads many who would otherwise remain silent to voice their thoughts to the world at large.  Anonymity allows people to voice opinions and/or seek advice on matters they may be too embarrassed or scared to do in person or if their identity was known.  They can gain valuable information and advice on topics such as Aids, rape, abuse or sex.

Many use chat rooms and bulletin boards set up by ISPs.  These forums usually focus on narrow categories, where like-minded people can associate and share information and ideals.  Some forums focus upon specific companies, where stock information, company actions, company personnel, and other things are discussed.  While most of this information is harmless, helpful, or fact based information; some are criticisms, or even worse, confidential and false information.  This latter group is commonly known as cybersmearing.

Current and former employees use forums to voice grievances or to act as whistleblowers by posting confidential company information, including trade secrets.  Some comments are directed at company employees, such as CEOs, who are also personally attacked.  Companies, as recourse of this cybersmearing, file suits against these negative posters.  As is most things touching upon the Internet, these claims are a new frontier for courts.

In the beginning ISPs handed over information when presented with a subpoena.  Most did not question them and even more importantly, did not notify the user of the lawsuit.  Many have changed this practice.  AOL now gives users two weeks to challenge the subpoena.  Yahoo! gives fifteen days notice, and EarthLink 10 days.  FN  [4] .  The posters are also fighting back.  Furthermore, courts are beginning to impose procedures and guidelines for issuing subpoenas, as they balance the right to participate online anonymously with the right of the injured party to have redress for their grievances.  This paper will look at this issue of using subpoenas to break down the walls of anonymous speech on the Internet, largely by focusing on relevant court cases.  It will look at the First Amendment right to anonymous speech and freedom of association.

Deciding to sue the poster is only the first step.  In their article, Jay Eisenhofer and Sidney S. Liebesman, offer some sage advice.  They say deciding where to sue can be hard to determine without knowing the posters' identities.  They advise using a state court, unless there is a federal question, since diversity of citizenship is harder to prove.

Once a company uncovers disparaging comments, the situation does not always end in a trial. Companies must determine the benefit of pursuing the suit and weigh its potential costs against the potential returns.

FN  [20] .  As stated above, many believe that companies only file suits to stop unflattering comments.  In one instance, before a lawsuit was filed there were 419 posts on an AOL message board.  They dropped to 39 before AOL pulled the message board because of an impending legal action.  FN  [21] .  Looking at the context and general understanding of message boards as places for opinions and spontaneous comments, it is unlikely that many readers will accept the messages as fact.  FN  [22] .  This raises the question whether the postings are even actionable since they are only opinions.

Many John Does are beginning to fight back.  They raise defenses such as relevance, privacy and freedom of speech.  FN  [25] .  Some put up web sites telling about their plights and exchange information with others through message boards and chat rooms.

French fought back and in his answer raised several affirmative defenses, counterclaims and third party claims against Itex and some of its executives.  He sought damages for more than $1.5 million, receivership for the exchange and injunctive relief.

Through the use of chat rooms, any person with a phone line can become a town crier with a voice that resonates farther than it could from any soapbox.  Through the use of Web pages, mail exploders, and newsgroups, the same individual can become a pamphleteer. FN  [35] .

Courts have held that there is a constitutional right to anonymous speech on the Internet, largely based upon McIntyre v. Ohio Elections Commission, which is becoming the "ovular" case for this issue.  In McIntyre the Supreme Court ruled that an Ohio ordinance banning anonymous political documents was unconstitutional because it was too broad and not narrowly tailored toward its goal of preventing fraud.  FN  [36] .

It is beyond debate that freedom to engage in association for the advancement of beliefs and ideas is an inseparable aspect of the `liberty' assured by the Due Process Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment, which embraces freedom of speech . . .Of course it is immaterial whether the beliefs sought to be advanced by association pertain to political, economic, religious or cultural matters, and state action, which may have the effect of curtailing the freedom to associate is subject to the closest scrutiny.  FN  [40] .

The issue of using subpoenas to overcome anonymity of Internet users is fairly new.  So far only a few courts have addressed the issue.  Of those that have, all have acknowledged a right to anonymous speech on the Internet.  Most have focused upon the role of the EPCA, the right of privacy, and the procedures for or the appropriateness of disclosure.

One of the first courts to set up a test for the issuance of subpoenas during the discovery process was the Northern District of California in Columbia Insurance Co. v. Seescandy.com.  FN  [75] .  The complaint was for trademark infringement by the defendant's registration of the domain names "seescandy.com" & "seecandys.com".

Although there is a traditional reluctance against allowing claims against anonymous parties, the court held that the need to remain anonymous in online forums had to be balanced against the need to know identity in order to seek redress for grievances.  FN  [76] .

First, the plaintiff should identify the missing party with sufficient specificity such that the Court can determine that defendant is a real person or entity who could be sued in federal court . . . This requirement is necessary to ensure that federal requirements of jurisdiction and justifiability can be satisfied.

Second, the party should identify all previous steps taken to locate the elusive defendant.  This element is aimed at ensuring that plaintiffs make a good faith effort to comply with the requirements of service of process and specifically identifying defendants.

Third, plaintiff should establish to the Court's satisfaction that plaintiff's suit against defendant could withstand a motion to dismiss . . . plaintiff must make some showing that an act giving rise to civil liability actually occurred and that the discovery is aimed at revealing specific identifying features of the person or entity who committed that act.

Duces Tecum to America Online, Inc also balanced the right to anonymous speech against the right to seek redress for wrongs.  FN  [79] .  The court also required the plaintiff to present a "true rather than perceived, cause of action."

There is an interesting twist in this case.  The plaintiff, rather than the defendant was requesting to remain anonymous.  The court allowed them to proceed anonymously since it would not unduly burden the public right of access to monitor court proceeding and the Court, the posters and AOL now had enough information to identify the plaintiff.  FN  [83] .

Another unusual aspect of this case is the fact that the ISP attempted to quash the subpoena, rather than the actual anonymous posters.  The court held they had standing to represent the Does under NAACP v. Alabama, since their failure to do so may jeopardize their business since subscribers would seek service elsewhere, if the ISP was unable to adequately protect their identity.

BNA Highlights bhighlig@bna.com gives an abstract of daily news articles concerning all areas of Internet law. BNA also provides links to the web sites of organizations interested in the topic and the media coverage FN [96].

This right, however, is balanced against the right of an injured party to seek redress for wrongs.  Courts are beginning to fashion and implement tests that must be met, before a subpoena can be issued.  It is very likely that every court will either adopt these tests or else fashion guidelines of their own.

These guidelines will also prevent an increase of cases in already overcrowded dockets.  High profile cases will educate the general public of things to avoid, and thus help to alleviate the number of suits.

As the number of cases increases, defendants and Internet users may band together to fight companies and demand better legislation to protect their rights.  Organizations such as the ACLU and others will in all probability join them, giving support when and where needed.  Otherwise defendants may find they are unable to afford to fight back in the court system, in which case companies will be able to chill speech.

In re Subpoena Duces Tecum to America Online ISPs may also begin to fight subpoenas, in order to protect their client base and to relieve themselves from the growing burden of answering subpoenas.  ISP clients may begin to demand restriction agreements or at least notification of a subpoena and a chance to challenge it.  ISP on the other hand may provide more explicit warnings and guidelines of what is or is not appropriate that users must agree to before entering certain types of chat rooms or message boards.

On the other hand, companies will fight for less restriction and more access to user identities.  As restrictions on their ability to seek redress in court increases, they will likely turn to computer programs which will allow them to strip identification protections.

Hate Groups and hate based organizations can be found extensively on the   Internet and there are virtually no restrictions on the material posted on  their web sites.  Because the  Internet is virtually accessible to all, and is an unregulated environment,  it allows hate groups to   spread their influence without restriction from the government.

Sites tend to move from server to server or shut down without notice, so they can be hard to locate.  Larger groups such as the Ku Klux Klan can recruit new members in an inexpensive and efficient manner and smaller groups with less money and less national exposure can easily introduce themselves to anyone.  With new technology, Internet users can access speeches and rallies and read literature that previously  had to be personally delivered or delivered by mail.  Hate purveyors can anonymously email each other,  and by using list serves containing thousands of names, can send unsolicited   hate material to individual mailboxes.

The most outraegous aspect of these hate sites is the candor with which they express their hatred.  An internet site called www.jewwatch.com is determined to keep a close watch over Jewish individuals  and their organizations world wide.  The site www.godhatesfags.com depicts the head of Matthew Sheppard bouncing in  flames and keeps a running count of how many days that he has been in   hell.  If you have the ability to listen to sound on your computer,  you can even  hear a voice that is supposed to be that of Sheppard's crying  out for help  from hell.

The  World  Church of the  Creator's web page includes a children's section  which offers coloring pages, games, puzzles, and other similar activities  with hate based messages. In addition to hate based groups, movements such  as the Holocaust Denial Movement are also  using the Internet to spread their messages.

Hate Speech is comprised of verbal, pictorial or symbolic expressions of  hatred against racial, religious, or ethnic groups, homosexuals, and women.   Boundaries of the First Amendment are   at the center of the legal debates  about free speech and hate speech.  While free speech is considered to be a fundamental right, the Supreme Court has never held that the Constitution  establishes an "absolute" right     to free speech.  The Court has even protected some types of speech,    such as political speech, more than others,  such as obscene or commercial   speech.   The Court has also upheld time,   place, and manner restrictions regulating speech.  But, the Court has    consistently held that   restrictions on speech cannot be content or   viewpoint  based.  Individuals have the right to speak, and in  some cases demonstrate   their opinions even if those opinions are unpopular   and hate motivated.  However, when such "free speech" crosses the line   and becomes a terroristic   threat or an incitement to violence, the   courts have stepped in and punished the speaker.

Amendment provides "Congress shall make no law...abridging the freedom   of speech, or of the press; or of the people peaceably to assemble, and to   petition the government for a redress of grievances."

Fighting words, which are "scurrilous epithets, delivered in person to the  listener, which are likely to cause an average addressee to retaliate against  the speaker," are not protected under the First Amendment.

The cross burning violated   a Minnesota ordinance which made it a crime  to place on public or private   property any symbol or object which would cause anger, alarm, or resentment   on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, or gender.

Based on this case, hate crime statutes that criminalize   bias motivated speech or symbolic speech, are unlikely to survive constitutional  scrutiny because government cannot prohibit only the content specific  fighting words which they dislike and cannot create laws designed to punish  only certain  viewpoints.

A common legal response to hate motivated crimes is sentence enhancement for crimes in which a hate based intent can be proven. As an example, see the Anti Defamation League's "Model Hate Crimes Legislation," and the ADL's side-by-side comparison of state hate crime statutes.

Wisconsin v. Mitchell, the Supreme Court unanimously upheld a Wisconsin  statute which provides for an enhanced sentence where the defendant "intentionally  selects the person against whom the crime [is committed] because of race,  religion, color, disability, sexual orientation, national origin, or ancestry  of that person."

It has proved very difficult to place restrictions on what people can post,    deliver, receive, and discuss via the Internet.  Some states have passed   laws that place restrictions on what people can send over the internet,  mostly  to punish for and prevent people from harassing or threatening people  by way of the Internet.

One area that prosecutors have been successful in, is the transmission of  terroristic threats over the Internet.  However as the following case  illustrates, the threat must be a "true threat," it must be directed toward an individual or group of  individuals and must be imminent.

While the site did not directly urge anyone to harm the doctors, doctors  that appeared on the list were being targeted for violence and many were killed by snipers or assassins.  Further, the list of names was altered every time a doctor was killed or injured.

FACE allowed for almost unlimited  civil liability  for protesters interfering with people entering and  leaving abortion clinics, and the plaintiffs claimed that the ACLA was in  violation of this statute.

The District Court permanently enjoined the ACLA from publishing such posters  and from contributing information to the web site if such information was  intended to harm.  The District Judge found the posters and the web  site to constitute  "true threats,"  using the applicable test of  whether "a reasonable listener would interpret [the statement] as communicating  a serious expression of an intent to inflict or cause serious harm on or to the listener; and the speaker intended that the statement be taken as a threat that would serve to place the listener in fear for his  or her personal safety, regardless of whether the speaker actually intended to carry out the threat." 16  The District Court did not rely on the Brandenburg test or the "fighting words" exception to grant the injunction.  The Court relied on a level less than incitement and granted an injunction with no direct proof of intent.  The case resulted in a jury award of $107 million.

Watts v. United States, which ruled that for violent speech to be  a  "true threat" it must be direct and immediate.  The Court found that   the content of ACLA's speech did not incite imminent lawless action even  though doctors appearing on this list were assassinated by followers of the  ACLA and its Nuremberg Files.   This decision is further proof that the majority of cases of online hate speech remain protected under the  First Amendment.

Mindspring (the Internet Service provider for the ACLA web site)  shut  the site down citing breach of contract.  When the ACLA went  to Plebian, an upstart Web hosting company to get their site running  again,  it  too shut down the site. This shows that even where the law allows  such "free speech," the public does not want forums such as these to be available and the servers will respond.

The emails were traced back to Machado and he was arrested and prosecuted for civil rights violations.  Machado's first trial resulted in a deadlocked   jury with 9-3 in favor of acquittal.  In his second trial, it took the  jury less than a day to find him guilty on two counts of civil rights violations.  The conviction carries a maximum one year prison sentence, but the prosecution  also recommended as a part of sentencing that Machado take anger and racial  tolerance counseling, that he not be allowed on the UCI campus, that he have  no contact with any of the victims, and that he be banned from any computer  usage including the Internet.  The judge did not follow the prosecution's  recommendation and instead sentenced Machado to time served (he had already  spent more than a year in jail awaiting trial).

The Court said that Johnson went too far with  his threats  and that they were not protected under the First Amendment.   In this  situation, Johnson offered money to anyone that would kill certain named individuals.

In Response to the growing number of hate sites on the Internet, several private groups have started to take action.  The Anti Defamation League  keeps up with existing hate sites on the Internet and   focuses on educating people about the dangerous consequences of such sites.    In addition, The ADL in conjunction with Cyber Patrol, provides Hate Filter software.  This software acts   as a gatekeeper to block web site of individuals or groups that, in  the judgment  of ADL, advocates hate, bigotry or violence.  The Hate  Filter provides  parents with a tool to block their children from accessing such sites.   In addition, which a child tries to access one of the restricted sites the  software automatically provides links to ADL pages which explain the effects  of prejudice and bigotry.  The Internet  Watch Foundation also provides filtering soft ware.

"that   the Internet has done for hate groups what the printing press had done for   literature."  In addition the Southern Poverty Law Center takes on "pioneer"  cases in the area of civil rights.  The Simon Wiesenthal Center also tracks and keeps records of hate groups and their activities.

However, because Americans as a people value the right of free speech, many   times the good has to be accepted with the bad.  The creation of the   Internet only expounds upon the problems that the Courts have to face in  interpreting new law and respecting precedent.

The Internet, while providing a wealth of information at the touch of a few buttons, can also provide an inexpensive and efficient means for bigots to spread their hate.  Before the Internet, these hate groups had to   recruit by handing out literature, holding rallies, or by word of mouth.

Today, they can reach people quickly and massively, and perhaps even more disturbing anonymously.  Just as the Ku Klux Klan wears hoods to hide    their identity, now hate purveyors can hide behind anonymous email addresses    and web sites.  They can and try to reach children and anyone who will   listen.

But, legally not much can be done to quiet these groups.  The law is pretty clear.  Most speech of this type is protected unless it poses   a clear and  present danger and/or the speech consists of fighting words.   While there are a few federal juries that have punished individuals for sending  threatening emails, it takes a great deal to cross that legal line.   The threats must be direct and immediate.  The "Nuremberg Files" case  shows just how far a group can push the bounds of the First Amendment.   The ACLA web site might not have directly and explicitly told people to kill  these abortion  doctors, but they provided the needed information and  painted these doctors  as war criminals that needed to be punished.   But, in the end the law  protected them.

Johnson.  Additionally,  if members of hate groups or individuals who use the Internet to encourage  hate, actually commit a hate motivated crime, their Internet activity can  be used against them as evidence to enhance their sentence.

Because the Internet is a new field of communication, the law must catch up with it.  Many states have reacted by passing laws preventing people from sending threats and harassing messages to  people via the internet.

But there  remains a high threshhold, and there remains a vast amount of hate speech  on the Internet.  Every person has a right to choose  his beliefs, but  encouraging hate which in turn encourages violence,  should be of concern to all.

The increase in the cost of medicine, the long wait for a doctor's appointment, and the treatment of patients by medical practitioners has led many consumers to find their physician a mouse-click away.  Like many traditional brick and mortar businesses, medical care is finally coming to the Internet.  Health-care websites have been in existence for years, however, the presence of websites that offer services comparable to traditional doctor consultations are something new. As the Internet expands into all parts of our life, it is logical that the health-care industry would follow. The challenge for the legal community is fitting the practice of medicine over the Internet into the current legal construct or adjusting the legal system to accommodate the practice.

Cybermedicine can be categorized in three ways, starting with the actual diagnosis of illnesses to the distribution of information. Many sites such as www.webmed.com and www.drtango.com only offer medical information.  Other sites such as www.123skindoctor.com offer free consultations and sell medicine.

Although services performed by cyberdoctors are gaining increased popularity, many cyberdoctors are wary about the legal ramifications of practicing medicine over the Internet.  The preoccupation with liability felt by some cyberdoctors is exhibited at www.askthedoctor.com.

Cybermedicine has incredible advantages. It creates a competitive atmosphere for the health-care industry.  Cybermedicine can also be much more cost effective than the typical doctor's visit by offering patients the opportunity to buy medicine at a reduced price.

Telemedicine is not widely accepted or used; currently only twenty-five percent of the entire medical community utilizes this practice. Nevertheless, it has been estimated that the telemedicine global industry will grow almost forty percent a year for the next ten years. In the United States telemedicine is expected to make-up 15 percent of the health care expenditures market by 2010.

The American Telemedicine Association, which can be visited at www.atmeda.org, is an organization that was developed to serve as an advocate for the usage of telecommunications to serve consumers and assist health professionals.

It is a unique organization that links e-health companies, telecommunication companies, government organizations and consumers into one forum. Access to health-care has been facilitated by the joint efforts of companies and organizations, such as the American Telemedicine Association.

Nielsen, who was stationed at the Amundsen-Scott South Pole Research Center, found a lump in her breast. Dr. Nielsen was forced to perform a needle biopsy on her tumor by video conferencing with experts from the United States, due to the impenetrable winters in Antarctica. For almost five months, Dr. Nielsen consulted with experts by e-mail and videoconference. This allowed Dr. Nielsen to eventually perform surgery on herself after supplies had been air dropped.

As of date there has been no litigation involving cybermedicine, telemedicine provides a glimpse into how cybermedicine will develop and how courts will handle claims dealing with cybermedicine malpractice. In fact, there are cybermedicine companies, such as www.askthedoctor.com that are waiting for telemedicine legal disputes to be solved in order to proceed with their cybermedicine plans. Such sites feel that cybermedicine is so closely related to telemedicine that once a clear legal position is taken with telemedicine, that the same position will apply to cybermedicine.

The problem with issuing an online prescription stems from the fact that the patient is not physically examined and the inability to verify the patient's medical history. There is also worry over misdiagnosis or abuse by the patient.

One of the biggest issues arising from Internet pharmacies is the potential for medical malpractice stemming from the liability of the prescribing doctors and online pharmacies. Medical malpractice has two basic requirements.

Many times, a doctor can be held liable for not acting upon a patient's request for medical attention, if the patient thought that there was a doctor-patient relationship.  For example, if a cyberdoctor fails to respond to a request for medical attention and the patient suffers injury, it is possible that a doctor-patient relationship would be deemed to exist and the physician would be held liable.

Also a scenario can be envisioned where a cyberdoctor is on vacation and the patient believing that he or she will receive a timely response suffers an injury because of the cyberdoctor's failure to respond.

The doctor breaches his or her duty of care when he or she fails to perform in the same manner that a reasonably careful physician would in the same situation.[xxii]  In cybermedicine that standard has not been determined because a medical malpractice case has not yet been brought against a cyberdoctor.

It could be argued that a cyberdoctor has a higher standard of care to the patient because the patient has not been physically examined. On the other hand, it can be argued that because the doctor has not seen the patient, that the doctor's duty is not as strong.  In regard to the same argument, contributory negligence by the patient could be established.  The fact that the patient knew the doctor would not personally see him or her may raise the issue that the patient knew the treatment was not in accordance with traditional standards.

Although, there has not yet been a medical malpractice suit against a cyberdoctor, there certainly will be one in the near future.  Thus, the court will have to face jurisdictional questions such as, where does the malpractice actually occur.  A determination would have to be made between the doctor's state, where the advice was given, or the patient's state, where the injury occurred.

Since the doctor-patient relationship is contractual, this could be settled at the outset by an agreement of both parties to disclaimers dictating which law would be used and under which jurisdiction.

Credentialing is a process that requires that the health-care organizations verify certain background information of their doctors. This information includes verification of graduation from medical school, residency, and participation in internships.  It also includes a background check on malpractice suits. This information can be found in a database known as the National Practitioners Data Bank ("NPDB").  Health-care organizations are able to contact this database electronically and receive instant information about their doctors.

Approval by the JCAHO means that the facility follows minimum standards in verifying the doctor's background. No cybermedicine site has been accredited by the JCAHO; consequently this casts a shadow of doubt and incredibility on the backgrounds of the cyberdoctors.

Although it seems logical that cyberdoctors would attempt to receive credentialing by the JCAHO, cybermedicine has yet to address the question of whether the Internet companies providing medical care have to comply with the JCAHO standards of credentialing.  However, if an Internet company fails to provide the necessary credentialing information and the doctor commits malpractice, the Internet company may be held liable if the doctor had problems in his or her background, such as the lost of a medical license due to a prior malpractice suit.  If the doctor commits malpractice again through cybermedicine, the patient could sue the website based on the argument that had the website credentialed the doctor according to normal standards, that they would have found out that the doctor should not have been practicing law. This area is another area of potential liability and will have to be addressed in the future.

Cybermedicine does have a great potential for good in making our system more effective and accessible.  Although, there are some pitfalls in cybermedicine, they do not necessarily outweigh the advantages.  Cybermedicine faces many challenges, one of which is how to create a standard of care. The standard of care could be adopted from the traditional standards of pharmacies, doctors and other health-care providers, but there are different issues confronting the analogy of each standard with cybermedicine.

Cybermedicine does not simply entail a doctor-patient situation; rather it is expanded to include issues from pharmacies, and non-doctors such as, nutritionists and herbalists. It also includes electronic and technology issues, such as privacy and the transportation of medical advice electronically.

Cybermedicine is very exciting and will probably drastically change the medical industry. However, a lot depends on how much cybermedicine is regulated and how much liability a cyberdoctor incurs. If cybermedicine is allowed to grow without regulation, it will most likely become one of the largest industries in the United States.

Copyright law was spawned from the intersection of law and technology; and it has evolved with each new technological innovation. In the past, however, the technological innovations that affected copyright laws primarily involved improved means of copying the original work. As such, copyright law has traditionally concentrated on forming a protective shield around the original work. The advent of the Internet, however, has presented a unique challenge for copyright law. Not since the printing press, the original catalyst for copyright law, has a technology so dramatically improved the ability to distribute copies of information. As this paper outlines, the Internet has prompted an expansion of copyright law beyond the traditional protection of an author's expression and into the realm of prior restraint of tangentially related ideas and technology.

Traditional copyright law started in England in response to the technological innovation of the printing press. After the advent of the printing press the mid 16th century, the British Crown typically vested ownership of written works with the publishing house rather than with the author.[1]  By the early 18th century, however, the British government had enacted The Statute of Anne, which gave ownership rights to the authors who created the work.  In Article I, Section 8, Clause 8 of the United States Constitution, America's founding fathers followed the British lead and granted the federal government the power to protect the ownership rights of authors and inventors.[2] Shortly after the passage of the U.S. Constitution, however, congress passed and the states ratified the first ten amendments to the Constitution, also known as the Bill of Rights.

Since that time there has been an idealogical clash between the copyright clause of the Constitution and the rights granted by the First Amendment to the Constitution. Normally, an Amendment modifies or limits the powers previously granted in the Constitution or earlier Amendments.[3]  In this case, however, the First Amendment and the copyright laws enacted pursuant to Article I, Section 8, Clause 8 have danced a careful balancing act throughout their legal history.[4] On the one hand courts recognize that the First Amendment's right of free speech is one of the most vital rights to our republic. It fosters an open marketplace of ideas that promotes the free exchange of opposing views. On the other hand, Congress has recognized that financial incentives to create technology and "useful arts" is also vital to encouraging progress. Congress responded to the tension by creating different types of intellectual property with differing lengths of government granted monopoly status as incentive to innovate. Patents are typically strongly protected, but narrow in scope and relatively short in duration. Copyrights, on the other hand, were given somewhat weaker protection in exchange for a broader base of coverage and a longer life span. One of the principle differences in scope are that ideas can be patented, but not copyrighted.[5] The effect of this difference was that patented ideas would be released to the public domain after a comparatively short period, whereas the idea behind the copyrighted expression would be immediately available to others while the protected expression enjoyed a comparatively long monopoly period. Congress was seeking to balance the level and duration of monopoly protection against the need for ideas to be publicly available and aid in furthering technological progress.

In the Sony case the Court found that the practice of "authorized time-shifting," i.e. recording a program in order to watch it later, was a legitimate fair use that satisfied the standard.[10]  Recent cases under the newer Digital Millennium Copyright Act also deal with the balance between the copyright holder's legitimate needs and the needs of others, but to date none of the cases have reached the level of addressing substantial non-infringing uses. Indeed, from the recent cases it appears that the balance that the Court sought in Sony may have tipped so far towards the copyright holders that the substantial non-infringing uses test may be only available in the furthest reaches of copyright law.

People should not be put in a position of wondering whether or not their speech will land them in court, or worse, in jail. As the Supreme Court noted in Brockett v. Spokane Arcades, Inc., "an individual whose own speech or expressive conduct may validly be prohibited or sanctioned is permitted to challenge a statute on its face because it also threatens other not before the court - those who desire to engage in legally protected expression but who may refrain from doing so rather than risk prosecution or undertake to have the law declared partially invalid."[48]  Both Felten and Sklyarov appear to be well situated to mount a facial challenge to the DMCA. That may be at least part of the reason that the copyright holders in both cases have backpedaled from any legal action. A successful First Amendment challenge to the DMCA could be devastating to the newly enhanced copyright powers that the recording, publishing, and movie industies currently enjoy.

As word spread about DeCSS, other sites began to link to Johansen's site and some webmasters posted the entire code on their own sites. Needless to say, reaction from the movie industry was swift and fierce. Two legal battles concerning DeCSS began in the United States; one on the each coast. Not only were the suits filed on opposite sides of the country, but the plaintiffs also invoked different branches of intellectual property in their quest to stifle DeCSS.

Although the trial court agreed with DVDCCA and issued a preliminary injunction, the appellate court reversed on First Amendment issues.[64] The court determined that the DeCSS code did not fit into any of the narrowly limited classes of unprotected speech; it was not obscene, profane, libelous, or fighting words.[65] Since it was excluded from protection and it contained a communicative or "speech" component, the DeCSS code was deemed to be protected speech.[66] The court noted that since the Uniform Trade Secrets Act is codified as state law, any protection it provided was trumped by the First Amendment protections of the U.S. Constitution.[67] The court also noted that the injunction's prohibition against future disclosures of DeCSS amounted to a prior restraint on speech and as such was "highly disfavored and presumptively unconstitutional."[68] Much like the chilling effect in the Felten case, "the 'special vice' of a prior restraint is that it suppresses expression not only directly, but also by 'inducing excessive caution in the speaker.'"[69] The court concluded by noting that while Bunner could not be held liable under trade secret law and that a preliminary injunction could not be used to restrict him from disclosing DeCSS, copyright violations were another matter altogether.[70] Presumably DVDCCA will take the court's hint and invoke the DMCA rather than state trade secret law in the next round of suits.

In addressing the first part of the quote above - that decryption programs can be rapidly spread throughout the world and that every recipient can then decode DVDs at will - the court dismisses the defendant's argument that the doctrine of fair use allows owners of DVDs to make copies for their personal use and enjoyment.[81] The court held that nothing in the fair use doctrine required legitimate users to be able to copy original works in either the same quality as the original or in a medium as easily manipulated as the original.[82] In the court's view, as long as you can point a video camera at the screen while the DVD is playing and make fuzzy, grainy, poor sound quality copies, the court is satisfied that your fair use rights are intact.

What the court doesn't address, however, is that by banning the distribution of DeCSS they are not only granting monopoly powers to the copyright holders of the movie, but also to the people who license the copy protection technology. Under the court's ruling there is no requirement or even promise that the technology to decode DVDs will be licensed on all platforms. Johansen's original intent in creating DeCSS was to provide Linux users with a way to view DVD movies on their Linux-based computer systems. DVDCCA could easily strike a deal with a competing operating system manufacturer, e.g. Microsoft, and allow Microsoft either early or exclusive access to decoding technology. Linux, with it's open source base, will nearly always be at a financial disadvantage when compared to for-profit operating systems such as Microsoft Windows. This copy-protection pseudo-monopoly is not related to the original artistic expression protected by copyright law. In fact, it wasn't even part of the careful balancing of limited time monopolies in exchange for publication of idea and expression that has traditionally be the basis of all intellectual property rights.

Later the court notes that "[t]he digital world ... creates a very different problem. If ... materials are posted on one web site and other sites post hyperlinks to the first site, the materials are available for instantaneous worldwide distribution before any preventive measures can be effectively taken."[83] Again, the court seems concerned principally with the ease of distribution aspect of the Internet more than the decoding capabilities of DeCSS.

Given that all computers store information in digital form and that nearly all modern electronic devices contain at least one microprocessor or programmable chip, it is difficult to imagine what sort of electronic device isn't covered by the above definition. Certainly all modern computers, stereos, DVD/CD players, cellular phones, PDAs, calculators, etc. are covered. In addition, so are most modern input and output devices such as scanners, keyboards, monitors, printers, etc. In fact, every new car sold in America is covered as well. Effectively every piece of electronics sold would have to be modified to include "certified security technologies" that are designed to prevent the device from being used to violate a copyright.

The SSSCA attempts to resolve the "instantaneous worldwide distribution of information" problem presented by the Internet by moving the protection one step up the chain. The DMCA attacked the distribution network, whereas the SSSCA targets the distribution end-points. By mandating that all electronics equipped with a microprocessor must contain government sanctioned copy protection mechanisms, the threat posed by DeCSS-esque publications on the web would be greatly curtailed. Unfortunately, however, the current wording of the bill is so broad that it the only feasible implementation would require inclusion of the copy protection mechanism on the actual microprocessor itself. Since a bare microprocessor such as the Pentium easily qualifies as a "device ... that is designed, marketed, or used for the primary purpose of ... processing ... information in a digital form," even the chips themselves must contain the "certified security technology" in order to pass muster and be saleable.

An interesting secondary effect of the bill, perhaps an artifact of Disney's strong backing, is that the bill codifies the "time-shifting" fair use of the Sony decision in a unique way. Television, cable, and satellite broadcasters would not be allowed to employ copy protection methods that prevented viewers from making copies of non-premium programming for later viewing.[92] Premium channels, such as Disney, would be allowed to copy protect their broadcasts to prevent time shifted viewing. Perhaps in response to the proliferation of devices like Tivo or even the new ReplayTV device that allows you to email recorded programs to your friends, Disney and the SSSCA seem intent on taking us back to the pre-VCR days of network executives dictating our viewing times and schedules.

The DMCA has pushed copyright protection beyond protecting the author's expression and created a weapon of prior restraint for publishers. Traditional copyright law protected only the expression of an idea. Utilitarian features and the ideas behind the expression were not protected. Congress had struck a balance between various forms of intellectual property, civil rights, and promoting the "progress of science and the useful arts."

Into this finely balanced field came the DMCA. Copyrights were given patent-like powers to block other forms of expression. In fact, since patents can only block subsequent patents that utilize the claimed components of the original patent, the DMCA blocking powers are actually well beyond those of patents. Copyright holders can block technologies completely unrelated to the author's original expression, whereas patent holders can only affect other inventions that in some way utilize the patent holder's invention. Effectively, under the DMCA copyrights gain the strength of patents but retain the broad protections and long life of traditional copyrights. In fact, in yet another boon to copyrights, the DMCA also increased their life span by 20 years.  Although the Constitution provides for protection for "limited times," corporate copyright holders such as Disney seem to be intent upon stretching out the protection indefinitely. Ironically, just about the only thing that the DMCA doesn't give added protection to is the idea behind the author's original expression. That idea, unlike ones related to the copy protection scheme, remains freely available in the marketplace of ideas.

No one challenges a copyright holder's rights to their property. But, under traditional copyright law, their property is limited to their expression of an idea. They have no property rights in the idea itself. They certainly have no property rights in ideas unrelated to their expression. Under the DMCA, however, copyright holders have gained the power to exclude others from ideas and expression unrelated to the their original copyright.  If the right to exclude others from use isn't a property right, what is it?

The World Wide Web has given us access to information and a quick and useful method for communication with people of all ages and nationalities all over the world.  Among other things, the Internet, through its e-mail, chat rooms, Web sites, and message boards, has provided easy ways to view, buy, sell, and exchange pornographic material.  As cyberspace has matured, lawmakers have begun to pay more attention to the access children have to harmful material such as child pornography.  Indeed, online child porn has become a big business.  According to U.S. Solicitor General Theodore Olson, about 28,000 commercial pornography sites are readily available to children and sexually explicit adult material both online and off has become an $8 billion per year industry.  (See Reuters, Supreme Court Hears Internet Pornography Law Case).

The Act also included a provision establishing the Commission on Online Child Protection to study ways to reduce access by minors to material defined as harmful to minors.  The Commission looked at the effectiveness and accessibility of various child-protective methods, including "filtering and blocking services; labeling and rating systems; age verification efforts; the possibility of a new top-level domain for harmful to minors material; "greenspaces" containing only child-appropriate materials; Internet monitoring and time-limiting technologies; acceptable use policies and family contracts; online resources providing access to protective technologies and methods; and options for increased prosecution against illegal online material."  (See COPA Commission Report, Executive Summary).

In 1999, the COPA Commission presented its conclusions.  Rather than finding a single solution, the Commission recommended a combination of public education, consumer technologies and methods, increased enforcement of existing laws, and industry action to protect children.  (Id.).

Proponents of the Act claim that pornography is readily available and accessible to minors on the Internet and that Congress has a compelling interest in protecting minors from exposure to it.  Opponents claim that the law, if enforced, would cause Web sites to create screening devices involving credit cards and adult access codes to verify age - a costly proposition to Web site operators.  Opponents are concerned that "the least tolerant community would get to set the standards on the Web," in determining what is considered "harmful to minors." (See Reuters, Supreme Court Hears Internet Pornography Law Case).

"a) whether the average person, applying contemporary community standards would find that the work, taken as a whole, appeals to the prurient interest, b) whether the work depicts or describes, in a patently offensive way, sexual conduct specifically defined by the applicable state law, and c) whether the work, taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value."

Under this test, speech that is legal in one community, but deemed obscene in another, generally is not protected by the First Amendment.  The Court's decision in this COPA case may turn on how a community standards test can be visualized for the world-wide Internet community, or on whether some sort of national standard can be articulated.  (See Nonprofits' Policy & Technology, Child Online Protections Explained).

Passed in 1996, the Child Pornography Prevention Act (CPPA) makes the possession, production, or distribution of child pornography a criminal offense punishable with up to 15 years jail time and a fine.  However, through the way it defines "child pornography," this law makes the possession or production of computer-generated images unlawful, including "morphed" and computer-generated images that only appear to depict minors engaged in sexually explicit conduct.  It is also unlawful to advertise or promote material "to convey the impression that it is or contains a visual depiction of a minor engaging in sexually explicit conduct."

Proponents of the Act assert that realistic images of children engaging in sexually explicit conduct, whether or not actual children were used to create the images, are still detrimental in that they can seduce children into participating in sexual activity and stimulate an abuser's sexual appetite.  (See Declan McCullough,  Debating the Ban on Virtual Porn,Wired.com, and CPPA ).

Opponents of CPPA, including free speech groups, have argued that there is no victim, since no real child was involved in creating the image.  Opponents also fear that CPPA could have the effect of "criminaliz[ing] the use of fictional images . . . images that are, or can be, entirely the product of the mind . . ."  (See Virtually Illegal,).

As Internet use becomes more prevalent, lawmakers will have to balance protecting children from viewing harmful material with protecting the expression of free speech.  As three recent federal acts (COPA, CPPA, CIPA) demonstrate, this area of the law is far from settled and fine-tuning will continue to be necessary.  The only thing certain is that a flurry of lawsuits will follow future attempts to regulate sexually explicit material on the Internet.  The upcoming year promises to be an interesting one for the area of First Amendment law and the Internet, as we await two Supreme Court decisions that could have profound effects on Internet protection laws.

I2. However, the rapid development of the internet and computer technology has thrust telemedicine into a new age of affordability and ease of use. I3. The obstacles facing telemedicine pioneers have been significantly reduced and the technological support systems like the National Information Infrastructure are propelling telemedicine toward a brave new world of that will likely redefine the health care system in a dramatic fashion.

The primary focus of telemedicine today appears to be on the reductions in health care costs. The American Telemedicine Association (ATA) boasts that the set-up costs for a typical telemedicine effort has declined from $300,000 in 1994 to less than $5,000 in 1999. Q3. The ATA describes the proliferation of telemedicine as a world-wide phenomenon where countries with remote populations have sought to use telemedicine as a vehicle for delivering health care. Scandinavia and Norway are identified as countries who have widely deployed telemedicine systems. Other countries pursuing telemedicine projects include France, the United Kingdom, Japan, Australia, and Canada. Q4. The ATA also describes the utilization of telemedicine in the United States. Standard telemedicine practices in the U.S. include teleradiology (transmission of medical images to a radiologist for interpretation) and remote patient monitoring. Q5. Beyond these limited activities, the bulk of telemedicine applications appear to be focused on government based programs that address unique populations - correctional care, health care support for front line soldiers, health care support for astronauts, and, to a limited degree, hard to reach rural populations. Q6.

As with most legal issues, the technological boom associated with e-technology has outstripped the traditional frameworks designed to insure certain standard levels of quality in our health care system when addressing telemedicine. The basic problem associated with insuring the quality of care in telemedicine was articulated by William K. Hubbard, Associate Commissioner for Policy, Food, and Drug Administration when he stated that "nobody has explicit authority to take over this problem and solve it." Q13. This lack of central authority has lead to a patch work of activity at the state, federal, and professional levels to begin to address the need for a legal framework designed, in part, to insure quality of care.

These agreements include the use of warning labels, the announcement of this decision to consumers, the offer of full refunds to consumers for the purchase of the products, and the prohibition of health claims related to specific products without credible information. Q19. While Operation Cure.All represents a positive step towards assuring the quality of telemedical information, Federal government agencies continue to be constrained by a lack of legal authority to address many of the Internet related health problems. Even with this latest round of enforcement actions, the collaborating international, federal, and state agencies were only able to address the fraudulent claims of six companies on the web - a number that would seem to be less than the proverbial "drop in the bucket. As Federal and state agencies struggle with the limitations of existing laws to address the quality of medical information via other part of the federal government seem to be plodding slowly towards a consensus about insuring quality generally.

While these reports were important for establishing a framework, the ultimate problem remained unresolved - there was little to no evaluation information available regarding the quality of care associated with telemedicine.

Federal Strategy Is Needed to Guide Investments. As one would expect, the report provided no new revelation on the issue of quality of care. The report acknowledged a growth of telemedicine funded projects in at the state and federal levels as well as the private sector. however, it also noted that the lack of a government wide strategy hindered the effort to maximize the benefits associated with these efforts included scientific support for the anecdotal examples used to demonstrate improved quality of care through telemedicine. Q25. This report provided four principle findings: (1) telemedicine investments were significant but difficult to quantify in total; (2) there was no Federal strategy to maximize the value of these investments; (the benefits of these investments were largely unquantified; and there were numerous existing barriers to the wide spread adoption of telemedicine. Q26. Despite acknowledging the lack of evaluation data on quality of care, the GAO's report recommendations focused primarily on process oriented goals aimed at standardizing the Federal approach to telemedicine. Q27.

HRSA's Office for the Advancement of Telehealth (OAT) promote the use of technology to deliver state of the art health care to medically underserved and isolated communities. The focus OAT's efforts in s on the expansion of technology into rural areas for the purpose of improving access to health care. The quality of that increased care has yet to be evaluated.

In October 1996, NLM funded 19 multi-year telemedicine projects intended to serve as models for cost, quality, and access to health care utilizing the IOM framework. The 19 grantees were engaged in projects that address telemedicine across geographic locations and populations. Only a portion of the final grantee reports are available and the results from those studies explicitly address quality of care appear limited and preliminary.

Like the government sectors of our society, the mainstream medical organizations are slowly recognizing the need to establish guidelines and frameworks for the provision of health care via the Internet. The most recent effort to establish standards for telemedicine was announced January 2001 by the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Health Care Organizations (JCAHO). JCAHO revised their telemedicine standards by defining telemedicine, and establishing the applicability of standard credentialing and privileging processes to practitioners of telemedicine. JCAHO also established the permissible use of telemedicine links for diagnosis and treatment in accordance with the commonly accepted quality standards. Q31. These standards establishes the means to credential and privilege a telemedicine practitioner and allow for the diagnosis and treatment of a patient via telemedicine links so long as that treatment meets accepted quality standards. Q32.

Resolution H-480.969 established a policy that state and territorial health boards should establish full licensing requirements for those seeking to practice telemedicine and urged the nationals medical specialty organizations to develop and implement practice parameters and guidelines for telemedicine.

AMA adopted a resolution in 1999 supporting the use of the Internet for perceptions but only after appropriate safeguards had been adopted to insure high quality medical care. Q33. The AMA pledged to work with state medical societies to uphold local standards of medical care and to work at the state level to develop model state legislation to establish limits on Internet prescribing. Q34. Finally, the Mayo Clinic, an early player in telemedicine, adopted a comprehensive Telemedicine Consensus Statement. This statement included an explicit call for additional research on the quality of care in telemedicine. Telemedicine Consensus Statement Telemedicine and Access to Care, First Mayo Telemedicine Symposium, Oct. 1993.

It seems unlikely that the traditional formulas for medical liability Standard of Care, Duty, Breach, and Damages will change significantly to accommodate telemedicine. However, how that formula is applied may vary considerably in the absence of legislative direction. What is clear at this point is that quality of care is a secondary priority for most policy makers who are more intent to expand access and increase cost savings. What is equally clear is that the issue of quality care will overcome the other policy considerations at some point in the future and we will need a strong and knowledgeable leadership capable of making difficult decisions that balance quality with the other policy considerations in a way that truly helps those in our population who need it the most.

An inherent aspect of quality in health care is the need for a consumer's confidential medical information to remain private while simultaneously being accessible to health care providers. Privacy concerns over patient medical information have increased with the growth of the internet and the subsequent electronic record keeping and data transmission. While the increase in technological means of recording and transmitting data opens the door to vast possibilities for health care improvement, it also enables the misuse of health care data with an ease and enormity of consequences never experienced in the days of paper records and non-electronic transmissions of data.

Benefits of Electronic Record Keeping and Data Exchange The boundaries of medicine are expanding at an incredible rate due to the advancements in technology enabling many innovations in reference to medical education, research, and treatment. As with all industries, the health care industry is finding numerous ways to utilize the internet and electronic means to instigate much-needed improvement in a variety of areas such as the collection, organization, and maintenance of information.

The national trend is for providers and plans to use electronic means for health data storing and transmission resulting in substantial sums being invested into the health care industry. Investment in information technology in 1996 by the health care industry reached an estimated $10 billion to $15 billion. P3.

Just imagine walking into a Doctor's office for the first time and not being asked to fill out reams of forms so that they can garner a basic understanding of your medical history - this will be one benefit of the substantial investment the health care industry continues to expend on information technology in the form of electronic record keeping and transmission. Your prior physician would simply need to push a button and your medical history, from your date of birth forward, would be transmitted to your new physician. Further, public health agencies and research centers could utilize electronically compiled data to identify public health concerns in a more timely and efficient manner. Researchers could access data on their specific research topic from around the world and share knowledge to arrive more speedily at solutions. Yet with the ease this power of effortless transmission of large amounts of data provides comes a formidable responsibility to protect the privacy of electronically gathered and transmitted confidential medical information.

Borenstein also suggested that medical records need unique privacy protections involving even more stringent protections for the disclosure of records dealing with mental health due to the "real threat of discrimination against people whose treatment for mental illness becomes known." P14.

The implications of quickly expanding technological means being used within the health care field affects not only those specifically working with the electronic realm of the information, but also those who create and use the information along the way. While the advent of computerized data compilation and sharing has a plethora of possible positive results, consumer belief in the lack of privacy protection for their computerized information, whether due to mistaken release or flagrant disregard for their privacy, is not strong. A 2000 survey indicated that 75% of consumers seeking health information on the Internet are concerned or very concerned about the health sites they visit sharing their personal health information with a third party without their permission. P17.

The health care providers in turn must utilize that information in a professional manner to diagnose and treat the patient. The payors then can use the information to reimburse the patients. Additionally, accurate records of health issues may be utilized by society to target specific problem areas. Yet in order for this system to operate properly, the patient must be able to trust that those to whom she releases her private information will not share that information improperly. P18.

However, patients are not the only ones utilizing evasive tactics due to the concern about keeping health information private. The Association of American Physicians and Surgeons found that 78% of its members reported keeping information out of a patient's record due to concerns over privacy, and 87% reported that a patient had asked them to willfully withhold medical information from their records due to privacy issues. P21. It is estimated that around 150 people have access to a patient's medical record during the course of a typical hospitalization. This is the key to addressing patient's privacy concerns. Although most patients perceived unauthorized access to medical records as one of their primary concerns, it is inappropriate access and health care employees who should be the focus of their attention. Health care organizations can protect their systems with the most technologically advanced security systems on the market. However, these same security systems can not protect the patient from having their sensitive medical information posted on the Internet.

While the goals of HIPAA reflect Congressional intent to regulate and improve the dissemination of personal medical information in electronic form, there are many situations in which HIPAA does not apply and some privacy advocates assert that the public will become more confused by incomplete regulations than they are without any regulations. The Health Privacy Project (HPP is a group "dedicated to raising public awareness of the importance of ensuring health privacy in order to improve health care access and quality, both on an individual and a community level") located on the web at www.healthprivacy.org, released a report on November 19, 2001 funded by the Pew Internet & American Life Project regarding HIPAA that asserted: (1) the regulation does not apply to most health web sites, (2) different rules may apply to different sites offering the same services, and (3) even at web sites owned or operated by organizations that are covered by the privacy regulation, it is ambiguous which activities at those sites are subject to the regulation. P27. HPP's report specifically addresses whether the personal information of the 65 million Americans who have sought health information on the internet is sufficiently protected.

In a statement accompanying the release of the report, HPP indicated, "Many probably assume that the personal information they provide to health web sites is covered by the new regulation, and they are wrong...Specific activities...may be covered by the new regulation at one site and unregulated at another...The burden will be on consumers and web site operators to determine which web sites must comply with the regulation." P30.

While HIPAA's application to confidential medical information in the form of electronic record keeping encompasses many of the foreseeable problems with unauthorized access and dissemination of this form of electronic information, its relevance to the internet is not exceptionally clear or encompassing. The difficulty of reconciling quality with access encountered by many of those involved in the health care field, from patients to providers, also surrounds the government as they try to keep up with applying appropriate regulations to the steadily expanding technological realm. As the ability to use information speeds up via electronic means, society's ways of regulating and controlling electronic information assimilation, compilation, and transfer must keep up with this advancement. Congress must exercise their authority to protect patients' privacy by legislating in response to and anticipation of technological advancements.

Through technological advances, most software provide ways to authenticate the user. It is customary for employees to sign-on to systems using their user id and password. Additionally, behind the scenes there are additional security features at work granting or denying access to users through access control lists (ACLs). ACLs allow system administrators the ability to limit or expand an employee's access based on the permissions established in the software. Even though these security parameters are available some companies are not utilizing them to there fullest potential. Furthermore, even when the permissions are granted properly, employees circumvent the security in place by leaving their terminals signed and confidential information laying on desks and counters for unauthorized people to view.

A10. The term smart card has been used to describe a class of credit-card-sized devices with varying capabilities: stored-value cards, contact less cards, and integrated circuit cards (ICC). All of these cards differ in functionality from each other and from the more familiar magnetic stripe cards used by standard credit, debit, and ATM cards. It is the ICC that is of most interest to the computer industry because it is able to perform more sophisticated operations, including signing and key exchange. A11.

Privacy and security concerns can be lessened with the implementation of biometric technology. Biometric identification uses mathematical algorithms to identify authorized users through physical characteristics. The hand, eye, voice, finger print, and signature are all examples. By storing a mathematical representation on file and comparing it to the mathematical algorithm taken at the time of identification, biometric technology is a reliable alternative to traditional access control mechanisms.

Hand Geometry: The hand contains nine distinct points that can be used as a template for comparisons. A hand geometry system can measure the distance between fingers, the space between knuckles, and even vein patterns. A13. Increasing the number of hand characteristics used will dramatically decrease people being mistakenly verified ("false positives"). Hand geometry systems are very quick and do not require a lot of storage and is used when a very small number of people need to maintained within the database. A14.

Facial Recognition: Facial recognition system is another biometric technology on the market today. These systems use facial bone structure and heat patterns to develop templates for comparisons. The accuracy of face recognition is rather low and false readings can be obtained in many cases if a person wears glasses, alters the length of their hair, or if the lighting changes. A15.

Voice Verification: Voice patterns are also used within biometric technology. Many HMOs and banks are currently piloting this technology. A16. Although voice verification systems tend to be more reliable than facial recognition, false readings can occur with changes in voice patterns (e.g. common colds, sinus infections, etc.).

Signature Verification: The signature contains approximately six variable global features. Consequently, spacing, position, stroke and shape can be used as a template for comparisons. Much work has been done with this technology, however, the fact remains that signatures can be easily duplicated. A18.

Fingerprints: Fingerprint systems is the most well-known form of biometrics and has been used for many years. The fingerprint can be captured by a template or a minutiae based matching. A minutiae based fingerprint measures the smallest detail of the finger (such as, ridge endings or ridge bifurcations). These systems are very reliable, cost effective and has a high degree of acceptance by the public. A19.

Data Privacy prohibits the transfer of personal information to non-European Union countries that do not meet the stringent European standards for privacy protection. A26. Furthermore, some states have passed laws requiring managed care organizations to hold medical information confidential by protecting it against public exposure. Common law remedies are also available against practitioners who unreasonably publicize a patient's private information: breach of confidentiality, invasion of privacy, breach of contract and breach of fiduciary relationship. Further, confidentiality agreements expressly created by employers or implied by the American Medical Association (AMA) require employees, physicians and other health care providers to protect medication information from unnecessary and unauthorized disclosure.

Lastly, although past congressional efforts have stalled A27, additional legislation is pending to protect a patient's health information. A28. Legislators and national policy makers are accelerating their efforts and focusing attention on consume privacy concerns through holding hearings, introducing legislations and conducing outcome studies, research and public health initiatives. A29.

Reduced reimbursement and capitalization are forcing medical practices to search for new ways to improve access, efficiency, increase revenue, and lower costs. However, these health care organizations and providers are also being required to collect more detailed information to demonstrate outcomes and analyze costs in support of negotiations with managed care organizations. Information technology has played a key role in striking a balance between these two competing interests. However, the proliferation of technology have increased the complexity of those services and heightened consumer privacy concerns. To further exacerbate the things, technology, Medicare and the aging population are fueling increased health care costs. CO1.

In the 1950's, hospitals measured costs by a simple method of totaling all expenses for the year and adding a margin for capital purchases, then dividing by the patient days to arrive at the hospital room rate. CO2.

Using this method, hospitals were able to spread the costs of increased technology costs and newer services to all patients by including it into the patient's room charge. However, this method of cost distribution did not take account for individual consumption levels. Not all patients use the same services equally or evenly. This varied consumption scheme forced hospitals to move a more complex billing scheme causing patient's statements to become long and making cost comparisons/audits difficult for the hospital. In this phase, hospitals billed the patients some costs for individual expenses plus the room rate.

Although theoretically the simple method of the 1950's is being used, today's method of calculating the per diem rate has had a counter productive effects on health care related costs. The increase in health care costs is largely associated with the aging population and Medicare's per diem rate scheme. Medicare has divided medical services into 456 diagnostic related groups (DRGs). Managed care organizations or health care providers are paid a predetermined lump sum for services according to the DRG. Medicare's per diem rate is determined based on a scheme outlined by the federal government and is not negotiated with individual physicians. Further, physicians must negotiate separate fee contracts with medical insurance companies using a separate per diem rate. Consequently, there is a constant conflict between hospital administration (view patients as straight line expenses) and health care providers (view patients as customers to be served).

The end result is hospital rates and insurance premiums are increasing substantially while hospital benefits are lowered. During the last 30 years, consumer confidence in the privacy of their medical information has decreased while costs have increased. Medical costs in 1960 were 6% of our GNP. Today, medical costs are almost 12%. Consumers have experienced large increases in premiums for their health insurance. So much so, 17% of the population cannot afford health insurance. CO3.

The universal access to health care information which telemedicine offers will continue to develop the standard of care into not only a nationalized standard, but possibly a universal standard, leading to the best in health care becoming widespread and prevalent. While this access must be tempered by legislation protecting the privacy of confidential medical information, the possible improvements to the health care system via telemedicine are endless. C1. Using electronic means to share data about patients, treatment options, research, and enumerable other aspects related to health care delivery is rampantly becoming the standard for the health care field. "Telemedicine is becoming an integral part of health care delivery in diverse settings. It is breaking down boundaries between different types of health care providers, revolutionizing health care delivery, improving and facilitating care for underserved and difficult to manage populations and enhancing discourse between patients and providers." C2.

See United Healthcare September 2001 Newsletter. Yet with this benefit of savings comes the responsibility of protecting the medical information being passed electronically. HIPAA was designed to assist the advancement of a uniform electronic health information system while simultaneously protecting consumers' privacy.

Currently, there is no comprehensive federal law that protects the privacy of a patient's medical records. The Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA) was enacted in 1996 by Congress to fill this significant gap in the federal rules. What is generally referred to as HIPAA is actually the ironically titled "Administrative Simplification" title of a much larger statute amending the Social Security Act, and dealing with healthcare insurance portability and Medicare fraud and abuse.

Transaction Standards: includes the basic transactions associated with an insured patient's participation in a health plan, from entering the plan through receiving reimbursements for care. The amount of paper-based and computer processing presently associated with these transactions is staggering. Administrative costs of the current system may account for more than 20 percent of the total healthcare cost in the U.S.

Section 262 of HIPAA requires covered entities to maintain reasonable and appropriate administrative, technical, and physical safeguards...to ensure the integrity and confidentiality of "protected health information"...to protect against any reasonably anticipated...threats or hazards to the security or integrity of the information; and...unauthorized uses or disclosures of the information; and...otherwise to ensure compliance with this part by the officers and employees of such [covered entity]. 42 U.S.C. 1173(d)(2). The security standards will have an enormous impact and compliance will require expensive new hardware and software systems. To make matters worst, the two year implementation deadline will prove far too short for efficient, cost-effective implementation of the complex new business processes.

However, failure to comply with HIPAA privacy and security standards may also make those who handle health care information in electronic form potentially liable under tort law, including invasion of privacy (publication of private facts, false light and unauthorized commercial use), defamation, and fraud.

There is also potential exposure under consumer fraud statutes. Further, depending on the circumstances, there may be various potential causes of action for breach of contract. Public companies in the healthcare industry face additional exposure from shareholder suits if they fail to implement adequate information security programs.

These regulations seek to provide the country with a basic set of national privacy standards that establish ground rules and a privacy framework necessary to instill consumer confidence in the health system. By instilling confidence, regulators hope to encourage individuals to fully participate in the health care system, presumably increasing preventive health efforts and decreasing health care costs overall. See 65 FR 82462, 45 CFR Part 160 and 164, Thursday December 28, 2000. Generally, individual patients, the subjects of the protected health information, will utilize the rights provided by HIPAA.

Currently, there is no federal law granting patients the right to obtain their medical records. Although the majority of states provide patients the right of access to some of their medical records, very few do so in a comprehensive fashion. In fact, some states have no such statutory right of access. The HIPAA regulations establish a number of specific rights regarding personal medical information. These rights are designed to provide an increased level of consumer control over personal medical information.

Communications - Consumers can request that medical institutions contact the consumer regarding medical information in a confidential way (i.e. at work or via mail). Health care institutions are required to comply with all reasonable requests.

Consumer Rights - Health care providers are obligated to provide consumers with a paper copy of their rights under HIPAA upon request even if this information is available via other sources like the internet.

Action - Third-party beneficiary clause, giving the patient a private right of action against the covered entity and its business partner if the "protected health information" has been wrongfully disclosed.

HMOs, and high risk pools. Entities exempted from these regulations include employers who sponsor these group health plans, small self-administered employee health benefit plans (less than 50 participants), workers compensation plans, and government plans that only incidentally pay for medical care.

This category is defined as an entity that translates health information received from other entities to or from the standard format required for electronic transactions. An example of this would be a health provider who transmits a claim to a clearinghouse in order to process the information into the format necessary for reimbursement from a health plan.

The regulations are designed to cover a broad range of providers including practitioners and providers of health supplies. Entities specifically exempted from this definition include blood banks, sperm banks, and similar organizations.

This prong requires that a provider transmit identifiable health information using computer based technologies. Applicable transfers include use of the internet, intranet, a private networking system, or the transfer of magnetic tapes and discs.

Exempted from these regulations are providers who operate in an out-of-pocket basis including internet pharmacies that accept only credit card payments (but no insurance payments) for prescriptions purchases.

The regulation defines health information as any recorded or oral information: a. concerning the past, present, or future mental or physical health of a person, b. health care provision to the person, or c. payment for health care.

Any medical information which identifies or can reasonably used to identify the individual is protected health information. Medical information that has been "de-identified" does not fall under the privacy regulation (information may be de-identified by the removal of identifiers such as a patient's name, address, social security number, etc.).

Covered entities are the health plans, health care clearinghouses, and health care providers discussed above. The reason this seemingly obvious element is included is to address situations in which an individual provides a non-covered entity with personal medical information (i.e. if an individual fills out a health assessment survey when donating blood to the Red Cross, the information given in the health assessment survey is not covered by HIPAA).

In the past, consumers had a false sense of security regarding their private medical information. The traditional mechanism for maintaining this information was a hard paper copy filed away in the local doctor's office or hospital. Now, the health care industry is increasing its reliance on electronic storage of medical records. Your records can be shared with hundreds of people with the mere touch of a button.

Council, the health care industry invested between $10 and $15 billion in information technology in 1996 alone. The internet offers our society some unique opportunities to improve the delivery and quality of health care via the internet. According to the National Research Council, the internet holds great potential to improve health by enhancing communications and improving information access for care providers, patients, health plan administrators, and public health officials. The proliferation of online medical databases provides even the most remotely located physician the opportunity to access and learn new medical techniques. The tracking of disease incidences through disease registries provides state and federal officials the ability to target programmatic and financial resources to areas hardest hit by specific diseases.

Those arguing against HIPAA assert that it is too burdensome and costly for the health care industry to comply with the privacy regulations. Estimates of possible cost to the industry vary depending on who you ask (i.e. HHS = $17 billion, AHA = $22 billion, BCBS = $40 billion). The large cost arises out of the need for new personnel to hire and train, including privacy officials, as well as the subsequent cost of implementing policies and procedures in regards to the new information technology.

The promise of improved access and treatment must be balanced by the rights of individuals in our society to control what we know about them and how we use that information. The effort must be directed at striking a balance between multiple competing health camps: patients interested in privacy, public health interested in improving communal health standards, medical insurers interested in lowering costs, and medical providers interested in saving individual lives.

On September 11, 2001, our country witnessed the most vicious act of war ever committed on American soil. Terrorists launched air attacks on Washington, D.C. and New York City, using civilian airplanes as missiles to plunge into the Pentagon and to bring down both of the World Trade Center towers. A third airplane was also overtaken, but was apparently brought down in Pennsylvania by a few brave souls who challenged the attackers. Wide-eyed in the wake of the mass murder and destruction, we retreated to our homes to wait, to watch, to wonder  what was next? Determined to never again be caught by a surprise attack, the American government launched an offensive, not only in the deserts of Afghanistan, but here in our homeland. President Bush established the Homeland Security Council, charged with the task of fighting terrorism head on. (Executive Order No. 13228, 66 FR 51812, October 10, 2001. U.S.

Hacking is costly in terms of both the clean-up process after a cyberattack and in day-to-day security and prevention measures. Hacking bears similarity to other criminal phenomena in terms of prohibited behavior and the potentially large costs, but it has attracted special attention because of the novelty of cyberspace as a medium and the requirement of specialized regulations. (Id. at 174).

The definition of cyberterrorism is very broad, including "the use of computing resources against persons or property to intimidate or coerce a government, the civilian population, or any segment thereof, in furtherance of political or social objectives." (Clifford A. Wilke, "Infrastructure Threats from Cyber-Terrorists" (visited Feb. 12, 2000)). Cyberterrorism may be further down on our own anxiety lists because cyberattacks generally don't kill people. Many of us have been victims of cyberattacks. You may be familiar with worm attacks, which are used to overload the system by having the program reproduce itself on the server; domain-name-service hijackings, which are used to prevent Internet users from gaining access to a particular Internet site by rerouting all inquiries from that site to a completely different location; logic bombs which are programs that when triggered may disrupt the entire computer system by making the entire disk unreadable; or mail bombings bombarding a specific e-mail account with thousands of messages to shut down the recipient's e-mail server or e-mail access. E-mail attacks may also involve Trojan horse programs attached to e-mails that when run, can disrupt the user's PC or the entire network, or are designed to self-replicate themselves by automatically e-mailing a copy of the attacking message to everyone in the user's e-mail address book. (David Hueneman, "Privacy on Federal Civilian Computer Networks: A Fourth Amendment Analysis of the Federal Intrusion Detection Network", 18 J. Marshall J. Computer & Info.

One of the most frightening aspects of cyberterrorism is that virtually any coward can commit an act. Unlike the suicide missions of the terrorists on September 11, cyberterrorism can be accomplished remotely and anonymously. Anyone can be a cyberterrorist, from a disgruntled employee to a foreign spy, a fraud perpetrator, a political activist, a conventional criminal, and even a juvenile with a little bit of computer knowledge. With the growth of the Internet, the pool of potential cyberterrorists has grown and hacker tools and information are now readily available online. (Calkins, 89 Geo. L.J. at 176).

Cyberterrorism is made even more convenient by the fact that it is cheap in comparison to the extensive and expensive terrorist operations we've seen in previous history, requiring only a telephone, a computer, hacker software, and a modem. Examples of more serious acts of cyberterrorism include a sabotage of the stock exchange, the disabling of power and phone utilities, altering drug formulas at pharmaceutical plants, adjusting pressure in gas pipelines to cause valve failure, scrambling the software of major financial institutions, hospitals, or large corporations, and disrupting air and railroad traffic control.

All states currently have computer-crime-specific laws that mostly mirror the federal regulations. (Calkins, 89 Geo. L.J. at 184). State and local law enforcement authorities also face additional challenges in that they are less likely to have the training, interest or the resources to pursue hackers. (Id.) Given that the Internet is not confined to any one region, jurisdictional problems also arise in prosecuting hackers.

Given the immense threat of cyberterrorism, the federal government has acted to fend off any attacks. In 1984, Congress criminalized unauthorized computer use by passing the Counterfeit Access Device and Computer Fraud and Abuse Law.

The Act calls for the creation of an Electronic Crimes Task Force for the purpose of preventing, detecting, and investigating various forms of electronic crimes, including potential terrorist attacks against critical infrastructure and financial payment systems. (Pub.

Non-government "protected computers" are covered by the statute if a person "knowingly causes the transmission of a program, information, code, or command, and as a result of such conduct, intentionally causes damage without authorization, to a protected computer," or if an outsider "intentionally accesses a protected computer without authorization," and as a result, "recklessly causes damage" or merely negligently "causes damage."

Damage under the statute can be the loss of $5,000 over a year, any actual or potential modification or impairment of medical examination, diagnosis, treatment or care, physical injury to a person, or a threat to public health and safety.

What is not addressed, however, is the hacker who does it just for "fun" or just because he can. Somewhere in the middle is the religious or political activist who does it as an outcry and statement of his own personal belief.

Without first detaining the offender, it is difficult to know whether there is the statutory mens rea under the CFAA. As a practical matter, it is likely that the offender would first be arrested and his intent would be resolved through interrogation and further investigation before proceeding to a criminal trial.

Given the limitations on law enforcement, under the CFAA, only a handful of hackers would be prosecuted. There are over 50 million American computers connected to the Internet and falling under the statute as "protected computers".

The fact that most information technology is developed, controlled and owned by private business means that implementing security against cyberterrorism requires collaboration between business and government. In light of recent events, there will likely be less resistance to government interference for the sake of national security. We have already seen conflict over the balance of governmental interests and individual privacy interests. However, we have also witnessed the damage that can be down when our defenses our down. Faced with the reality of our own vulnerability, building a solid offense against cyberterrorism is the only way to ensure our security.

Anyone who has access to the Internet can participate, and most auction sites require bidders and sellers to register basic information (name, address, phone number, e-mail address) before participating. There are basic rules that govern how the auctions are to be conducted and disclaimers to reduce the liabilities that can ensue from things gone wrong.

On an international level, the International League against Racism and Anti-Semitism filed a lawsuit in Paris, France against Yahoo! for illegally hosting on-line auctions of Nazi paraphernalia. In France, the selling or displaying of items that incite racism is illegal. The League wants the court to fine Yahoo! $96,000 a day for each day that it fails to make Nazi auction paraphernalia inaccessible to surfers in France and its territories.

Yahoo! is a U.S. based site that is accessible to countries all over the world, and the question here is: should Yahoo! be responsible for the illegal conduct that occurs on its auction site or should sellers be subjected to the laws of the countries in which their activities are deemed illegal?

But auction sites like eBay insist that they cannot be held liable for the actions of its users for two main reasons: immunity under the Communications Decency Act and the Digital Millennium Copyright Act.

In addition, the Act lists the following as the elements of notification of a claimed infringement: physical or electronic signature of the owner of the exclusive right or authorized person, identification of the copyrighted work claimed to have been infringed, sufficient identification of the material claimed to be infringing, information sufficient enough for the service provider to contact that party (i.e. complainants name, address, phone number), statement of complaining party of good faith belief in the mater asserted, and statement verifying the accuracy of the information in the notification.

In that case, the plaintiff owned the copyright to a motion picture, and upon discovery that pirated copies were being sold on eBay, plaintiff sent a cease and desist letter to eBay advising the site of what was going on.

In taking facts like this into consideration, the DMCA encourages online auction houses to turn a blind eye to illegal activity in order to escape liability. Online auction houses prefer to self-regulate, but since self-regulating may open themselves to liability for the fact that they would have knowledge of the illegal activity, then they find it is best to regulate as little as possible. The safe harbor clause of the DMCA only serves to perpetuate the problems that copyright owners face in the age of anonymous infringement.

The DMCA only requires self-regulation when the service provider has received substantial notification of a violation. eBay currently offers an escrow service whereby the buyer, seller, or both pay a fee to have an escrow company be the middle man in the transaction. However, since eBay already acquires a percentage of the sale, this should be a free service to encourage all buyers and sellers, not just those involving large transactions, to participate.

Resolving disputes that occur online are difficult due to there being no established guidelines to address these disputes. [67] eBay currently has a online dispute resolution program through a third party called Square Trade. Unfortunately, nothing is resolved if the other party refuses to respond.

Initially, the Information Age brought us computational power.  Using vacuum tubes to function as simple binary logic gates, solutions to vast mathematical algorithms and logical structures, practically intractable as manual problems, became possible.  Data could be organized into information and applied to create knowledge with incredible speed and accuracy.

As capacity has exponentially grown, and physical size and cost have as rapidly declined, datawarehouses in the image of widget warehouses have begun to be a necessary element of information and knowledge management strategies for organizations of all types.  Today, it is far more expensive to gather data and information than it is to store it essentially indefinitely.  Not surprisingly, it did not take long before the sheer volume of data and information presented new challenges related to the dissemination of this information at the appropriate time to the appropriate decision maker.

This is the most recent promise fulfilled by the Information Age - almost instantaneous and effortless dissemination of our information stores to users of informational resources nearly anywhere in the world.  As the Internet Age has been ushered in, we no longer wait days or even weeks for sales figures from a Chinese affiliate to be couriered across the ocean.  We can now reliably transmit data and information to colleagues half way around the world with less effort than it would take to walk the documents across the hall.  The power of this chapter of the Information Age has shrunk the globe and, to a great extent, leveled the playing field between those that previously might have been labeled "information-haves" and "information-have-nots."

Power comes with a price.<![if !supportFootnotes]>[5]<![endif]>  In the packet-switched, largely anonymous world of the Internet, we have little control over the possible circuitous route that our communications might take through the highly interconnected morass of routers and switches that make up the "web" of the Internet.  Indeed, the packets that are the result of our communication being divided up into manageable "chunks" for delivery may be mixed with the packets of many other sources of communications.  It has become somewhat difficult to insure that a message is received by the intended recipient, and only by the intended recipient.  In trade for virtually instantaneous information distribution, we find ourselves in the sometimes-precarious situation where traditional notions of privacy are hard to maintain.

With each major revolution, society has embraced change for its obvious benefits, paying scant attention to the predictable harms that would follow.  For example, the Industrial Age promised greater production and efficiency, lower cost goods and a dramatic increase in our standard of living.

This article examines the interaction between the power offered by Internet and the privacy price that we may ultimately have to pay.  In this state of the debate, the full complexity of the interaction is difficult to delineate, and yet the issue deserves our full attention.

The article begins with a look at that which we seek to protect - privacy, first through the looking glass of its legal treatment in the United States and secondly, in the context of private means of privacy protection.  Next, the article considers the manner in which the Internet has facilitated the possibility of privacy encroachment.  First, private encroachment, largely orchestrated by commercial concerns employing such mechanisms as data mining and "cookies" is examined.  Then the article explores the benefits and the dangers of public encroachment, by law enforcement and military organizations, using such devices as web bugs and the infamous Carnivore.

In Section III, the article looks at encryption - one possible means of combating this encroachment, both for the noble reasons of protecting proprietary information and individual privacy, and the not-so-noble reasons related to the facilitation of criminal and war-like activities.  Recent events have provided a rare context for the discussion in Section IV, which considers the manner in which Internet proliferation and policy attempts to protect privacy have facilitated the activities of domestic and international terrorists.  Finally, the article concludes with a brief discussion of the manner in which traditional models of public safety and national security fall short in the troubling context of a world where our enemies are many and difficult, if not impossible, to identify.  The current state of affairs calls for a return to unitary principles, a clear distinction between the public and private roles in bringing about the realization of these principles, and a comprehensive re-thinking of the means that will be employed to accomplish these goals.

Who could deny that privacy is a jewel? It has always been the mark of privilege, the distinguishing feature of a truly urbane culture. Out of the cave, the tribal tepee, the pueblo, the community fortress, man emerged to build himself a house of his own with a shelter in it for himself and his diversions. Every age has seen it so. The poor might have to huddle together in cities for need's sake, and the frontiersman cling to his neighbors for the sake of protection. But in each civilization, as it advanced, those who could afford it chose the luxury of a withdrawing-place.

What is it about privacy that makes it one of the most revered privileges throughout the passage of history?  Why is it that we view a violation of privacy as one of the most serious forms of trespass that a man can transgress on another?  And why is it that, given these strong feelings, so seemingly universally held, that legal protections of privacy are so fragmented and often ineffectual?

Fourth Amendment apply to activity on the Internet depends on whether there is a reasonable expectation in that Internet activity.  This turns, in part, on how protected information on the Internet is (the less protected, the less expectation of privacy).  There is an ongoing debate.  Many Internet users want their Internet activity to be private and to be protected from interception, disclosure, and misuse.  However, it is also recognized (even by some of those desiring privacy) that there may be little or no privacy on the Internet.  Considering the ability of outsiders to intercept or gather information from Internet users, the "no privacy on the Internet" view seems persuasive.  This issue is discussed extensively below.

Fourth Amendment protection on the Internet is the fact that any information transmitted to another person can be disclosed to the government without implicating the Fourth Amendment.<![if !supportFootnotes]>[14]<![endif]>  Because the Internet almost invariably involves exchange of information between Internet participants, the information is potentially freely available to the government by obtaining it from the other party to the exchange.

The rules arguably are no different in the case of encrypted documents. The government can compel you to turn them over.  The problem from the government's point of view is that the encrypted documents are worthless unless they can be decrypted.

Given modern electronic encryption technology such decryption is likely impossible without the decryption key.<![if !supportFootnotes]>[18]<![endif]>  Testimony about the incriminating contents of encrypted documents cannot be compelled because that would violate the Fifth Amendment.  Thus, encryption would seem to be an effective way for a person to keep incriminating documents from being used against them.  This is one of the reasons the government has fought so long for weak encryption and key escrow.

The case of encrypted documents appears to be analogous. Without knowing their contents, the government can only suspect that they contain relevant information and can only speculate about what that information is. Thus, it could be argued that forcing a person to turn over the key to encrypted documents has a testimonial aspect, as in Hubbell, and should be protected by the Fifth Amendment.  A relevant issue is whether possession of the key, and acknowledgement of that possession by turning it over, has testimonial dimensions.  If the key can be protected, then encryption would seem to provide a way of extending Fifth Amendment protection to one's electronic documents.

Amendment protection of decryption keys has little relevance to Internet communication.  Many web sites conduct transactions with their visitors. When we order a book from Amazon.com<![if !supportFootnotes]>[27]<![endif]> or buy plane tickets at Expedia.com<![if !supportFootnotes]>[28]<![endif]> we go through a process of providing personal information and credit card information.  To protect customer information, the majority of these transactions are conducted using encrypted communications.  This encryption is "behind the scenes" and the customer may not even realize encryption is taking place.  The purpose of this encryption is to prevent anyone who intercepts the web traffic between the site and the customer from being read.  The customer does not have the key.  The web site must, of course, decrypt the information once it is received in order to carry out the transaction.  Such "transactional" encryption arguably provides little or no Fifth Amendment protection.  Further, even encrypted Internet communications between private individuals may not benefit from Fifth Amendment protection because the decryption key for such communications will be in the hands of the recipient of the communication and not just the author of the communication.

Generally, the Fifth Amendment does not protect voluntary communications made to others.  Once you send your personal information to a web site, the Fifth Amendment does not prevent the web site from disclosing, or being compelled to disclose, that information.  The web is not you and disclosure of the information is not considered to be testimony by you.  Further, if the Internet communication is legally intercepted, by use of a wiretap warrant, for example, the communication is not protected by the Fifth Amendment because, it was voluntarily made.<![if !supportFootnotes]>[29]<![endif]>  The situation for encrypted web transactions is no different than regular commercial transactions.  A merchant can be compelled to disclose any information you may have given them.

This authority gives the FTC broad powers to act when consumers may be harmed.  For example, the FTC stepped in when a bankrupt Internet company tried to sell its database of consumer information (which was contrary to the company's privacy policy).<![if !supportFootnotes]>[49]<![endif]>  The FTC has taken the position that use of consumer data in violation of a company's statements to consumers about how the data will be used can constitute an unfair trade practice.  But FTC enforcement in many cases provides only theoretical protection since the FTC does not have the resources to police all of the data and all of its uses.

Mozelle W. Thompson took a stroll last summer through the Silicon Alley Street Fair, a celebration of New York City's dot-coms back when they had something to celebrate. His T-shirt and shorts belied his high office as a member of the Federal Trade Commission, the federal agency that has taken the lead in consumer privacy protection online. He met the chief executive of a high-technology company that gathers personal data on Internet users, a man who was, Mr. Thompson said, "treating people as data instead of treating people as people."

Privacy policies of individual companies are the only significant checks on the mining of data we leave behind in our travels on the Internet.  But this is not very effective.  For example, Earthlink, a major Internet service provider, makes efforts to protect the privacy of its customers.

"We do believe that privacy was a very, very large component of that," Ms. Caplan said. "We had not seen this kind of movement before the privacy initiative." It remains to be seen, however, whether that will translate into more customers for Earthlink.

However, incentives for Internet service providers seem to weigh more heavily in the other direction.  The customer information that their servers gather in the course of providing access to millions of Internet users is very valuable and the revenue streams that can be generated from offering this information for sale can often mean the difference between viability of their business model and failure.  Most often, it is simply too attractive to resist.

As more people learn about how their privacy is invaded by the public and private sectors, more options develop for privacy protection.  Although the law in this area is far from settled, privacy advocates have developed ways of blocking, circumventing, or at least delaying privacy invasions.  The first part of this section will briefly explore opting out, anonymous e-mailers, and cleaning cache and hard drives.

While the average Internet users may not be equipped (with knowledge or money) to establish firewalls and privacy protecting software, there are several basic privacy protection methods even the least savvy users can try.

Some Websites offer an option of opting-out of datamining, targeted ad delivery, profiling, and other online information collection.  Typically, you will still receive a cookie from the site, but that cookie will not track your online activities.  Instead, the cookie is a blank stand-in for the information-tracking cookie you would normally receive when visiting a site.<![if !supportFootnotes]>[55]<![endif]>  But note that privacy advocates say blocking cookies entirely is a better practice than opting out because the cookie could "be reset to a unique value again."  In addition, if you go through and delete all your cookies, the next time you visit a site you will (involuntarily) opt back in.

For those who are more concerned with protecting their identity than regulating how their information is used, anonymizing services offer the opportunity for unidentified Internet use.  In addition to the anonymizing services detailed below, privacy advocates recommend using a secondary free e-mail account when registering with online sites.

Some services also provide anonymous e-mail so that companys can't collect your primary address when you contact them.  For a listing of anonymous e-mailers, see http://www.epic.org/privacy/tools.html.

Some people feel in the current climate of terrorism that personal privacy should give way to small intrusions for the public good, and ask,  "why worry about government surveillance if you have nothing to hide?"  However, many people seek anonymity in order to express themselves freely, to offer unacknowledged help or guidance, or to simply maintain a sense of personal seclusion.

Despite some charges to the contrary, anonymous Web surfing is not the sole province of crackers, script kiddies, vandals and Net terrorists.  Anonymity also serves whistle blowers, free speech advocates, people investigating sensitive information, and those just looking for a little elbowroom from dataminers and marketing interests.

As objectionable as this may be, the combination and analysis of such data presents additional problems.  In raw form, the data is dispersed and disorganized.  This disorganization should be a great barrier to effective use of the data, whether for legitimate or illegitimate purposes.  But such data represents a gold mine to businesses and individuals who know how to access it and who know how to use it.  Many companies have recognized this and developed software and systems for shifting, categorizing, organizing and interpreting databases and data streams.<![if !supportFootnotes]>[80]<![endif]>  These systems and software "mine" useful data from raw or varied data sources in a process referred to as "data mining." Most data mining systems are marketed as a way companies can organize their own data, but most such systems can be, and are, used for mining other people's data.

Why does this matter?  An individual visit to an individual web site is unimportant by itself; and most people would not worry if that one, isolated visit were recorded somewhere. Who would know to look for it?  How could anyone make use of that one bit of information?  Data mining makes it possible for many individual site visits and many individual actions to be collected and combined into a whole that may tell someone far more than most of us would be comfortable with.  The power comes from effective accumulation of the data.

ECHELON is the term popularly used for an automated global interception and relay system operated by the intelligence agencies in five nations: the United States, the United Kingdom, Canada, Australia and New Zealand. ... According to reports, it is capable of intercepting and processing many types of transmissions, throughout the globe.

Historically, data encryption has been used primarily to protect diplomatic and military secrets from foreign governments. It is also now used increasingly by the financial industry to protect money transfers, by merchants to protect credit-card information in electronic commerce, and by corporations to secure sensitive communications of proprietary information.

Computer encryption is based on this same practice, only instead of twirling a ring or counting ahead in the alphabet, complicated mathematical algorithms are used instead.<![if !supportFootnotes]>[142]<![endif]>  The purpose remains constant: to ensure that only those people with the key have access to the encoded information.

Today, encryption technology has a multitude of uses outside the military context - secure online purchasing, protecting confidential e-mails (for law firms, for example), avoiding business espionage, and many more.<![if !supportFootnotes]>[148]<![endif]>  People who use encryption may have something they wish to keep secret, or may simply desire confidentiality in their correspondence. "Ordinary mail that goes in an envelope can be tampered with.  It sometimes happens.  But there's no feasible way to scan the contents of all the letters that move through the postal system every day.

The issue of how the Fifth Amendment applies to encryption keys can be analyzed using a hypothetical.  Federal law enforcement agents suspect John of possessing incriminating documents.  Assume for the sake of this hypothetical that the federal agents have probable cause to believe this and have obtained a valid warrant to search John's house and computer and to seize the computer and any files on the computer.  The federal agents conduct the search and do not find the documents but do find a number of encrypted files on John's computer.  The files have been encrypted using John's own encryption program.  The encrypted documents can only be decrypted with a key known to be written on a piece of paper inside an uncrackable safe.  Assume the key is too long for John to have memorized.  The federal agents know John has the only key to the safe, but do not know where it is.  The agents suspect that the encrypted files are the incriminating documents (and assume that the original search warrant gives them the right to access the contents of the encrypted files).

The government would like to decrypt the files (and let's assume they cannot break the code).  So, the government would like to have John's assistance in decrypting the files (they have no other choice given the facts of the hypothetical).  In this case, the federal agents could simply compel John to produce the key to the safe (that is, they could serve him with a subpoena to produce the key to the safe).  As with the documents, the key to the safe is not testimonial.<![if !supportFootnotes]>[153]<![endif]>  There is simply no aspect of such a physical object that is the testimony of its possessor.

In the hypothetical, there are no similar issues regarding the key to the safe.  The federal agents know that John has the key, so his production of the key does not involve any issue of existence, control, or authentication of the key to the safe.  Thus, John cannot resist the subpoena by invoking the Fifth Amendment.  The agents will get the key, decrypt the files, and discover their contents.

Changing the facts a bit, assume the situation is the same as above except that the decryption key is known only to John and no physical copy of the decryption key exists (that is, the key is only in John's brain-there's no safe involved).  Again, the government would like to have John's assistance in decrypting the files.

"[S]ociety could create law enforcement and protective systems that are highly, if not perfectly, efficient--such as cameras that catch every speeder on every road but keep no record of the law abiding - but who would want to live in such a society, even assuming that such a scheme passed constitutional muster?"<![if !supportFootnotes]>[198]<![endif]>  Only time will reveal the full implication of Sept. 11 on Internet privacy and privacy in general, whether privacy will be permanently or temporarily infringed, and whether the Internet, which originally offered increased anonymity and privacy, will evolve to hamper personal liberties.  "There are limits beyond which we will not go in the war against terrorism. Those limits, as yet unknown, will be fixed by the American people.

Admittedly, this article raises more questions than it answers.  When considering questions such as the balance between gains in public safety and national security against possible costs in privacy, there does not seem to be a magical algorithm that offers solutions.

This article has investigated the privacy that we hold so dear; both in the light of legal protections and avenues that private citizens may employ to be proactive in the protection of their privacy.<![if !supportFootnotes]>[201]<![endif]>  We have seen how the power of advancing technology has facilitated nearly instantaneous communications, but threatened to rob these communications of essential privacy.<![if !supportFootnotes]>[202]<![endif]>  We have defined and described additional technologies that have developed in response to privacy threats - tools like encryption and steganography that were intended to provide a means for safely sending secure messages over the web of the Internet.<![if !supportFootnotes]>[203]<![endif]>  Regrettably, recent history has demonstrated how the power of such technological tools can be corrupted to serve the illicit means of those with ideologies violently opposed to ours.<![if !supportFootnotes]>[204]<![endif]>  And finally, we have reported some of the early responses of our government and others influential in our society, responses that have left some students of the law and public policy with the feeling that they are "Too Much, Too Late."<![if !supportFootnotes]>[205]<![endif]>  One thing is for certain.  We are left with the conclusion that these questions are of the most difficult type that our democracy will face.  Shrewd adversaries have left us questions the value of our most fundamental civil rights.  Ad hoc, knee-jerk responses will not suffice.

To address this complex myriad of issues, we must be willing to wipe the slate clean - to return to the proverbial tabula rasa.  We must retreat to first principles and refuse to let our most important decisions be based upon foundations that were constructed hundreds of years before the glowing green screen of the first personal computer ever saw the light of day.

We must revisit our legal, economic, and social regimes, rethinking how we protect data, promote economic growth, ensure the effectiveness of law enforcement, and respond to an attack when lacking critical decisional facts.

Do we ultimately find ourselves in similar territory with regards to this disturbingly similar question?  Are we forced to recognize that, "at present, due to technological limitations," there is no means to prevent the use of anonymization and encryption by criminals and terrorists, and that as a result, our personal privacy may not be protected?  Or is it more palatable to suggest that,  "at present, due to technological limitations," there is no means to prevent the use of anonymization and encryption by criminals and terrorists without encroaching on our personal privacy, and that as a result, our public safety and national security against cyber-crime and terrorists attacks may suffer?

U.S. international and security policy ... has as its primary goal the preservation of what we might call "the Fifth Freedom," understood crudely but with a fair degree of accuracy as the freedom to rob, to exploit and to dominate, to undertake any course of action to ensure that existing privilege is protected and advanced.

While not easy to swallow, we must not lose sight of the fact that the attitudes that shape our policies with regard to information, privacy, and the manner in which we define terrorism, are products of cultural relativism.

There are those that believe that the United States has been as guilty as some that we now seek to protect ourselves against.  One man's revolutionary is another man's traitor.  Heroism is to one man as treason is to another.

In America, what we ultimately stand for are the rights and freedoms that so many before us have died to secure and to protect.  Benjamin Franklin once said, and we paraphrase, that he who is quick to give up freedom in exchange for security, deserves neither freedom, nor security.

Finally, it should not be lost in the analysis that the laws we seek to craft are themselves part of a body of knowledge formulated in response to data and information with regard to social mores, human behavior, and the structure of incentive and consequence.  Laws are institutionalized knowledge.  In this sense, the task may not be circular, but it is certainly recursive.  The content and deployment of data and information will, at least to some extent, be contained by policy inspired laws which themselves depend upon the availability of data and information.

As a communication medium, the Internet allows any individual to publish globally, without the fact-checking and editorial controls normally present in traditional large-scale media outlets.  Although this certainly has benefits, the fact remains that some speech crosses the line between proper and unfair (e.g., defamation), and the potential for causing damage increases with the size of the audience.  And, of course, there is computer crime, a term often meant to include both hacking (computer abuse affecting the confidentiality, integrity or availability of data) and the use of computers to facilitate traditional offenses (e.g., Internet fraud and the distribution of child pornography).  Significantly, in both civil and criminal cases, the Internet's attributes of global connectivity and lack or traceability may allow speech or action without accountability, no matter how harmful the consequences.  Id.

In order for a court to hear a dispute, the court must have jurisdiction over the person.   Personal jurisdiction or in personam jurisdiction is "the power which a court has over the defendant himself and a court that lacks personal jurisdiction is without power to issue an in personam judgement."1   In order for a court to exercise personal jurisdiction, there must be a legislative grant by statute that authorizing the court to exercise jurisdiction over the defendant.   All states have long-arm statutes which define what actions by out of state parties will confer jurisdiction to a court in the state.   See Georgia's Law.     Even though a statute may authorize jurisdiction, the exercise of jurisdiction may not contravene the Constitution of the United States, in particular, the Due Process Clause.

The Supreme Court held that the Due Process Clause of the 14th Amendment restricted the state's power to exercise personal jurisdiction. See Pennoyer v. Neff, 95 U.S. 714 (1877).   The State possesses exclusive jurisdiction over persons and property within its territory and no State can exercise direct jurisdiction and authority over persons or property outside it territory.2   Physical presence in the forum state was generally necessary to exercise personal jurisdiction over a defendant.

The ruling in Pennoyer worked well in the 19th Century because of the limits of the technology at the time to cross state lines, both communication and transportation technology.   In the 20th Century, with the development of communication and transportation technology, the law of Pennoyer proved to be too constricting.   Therefore, the Supreme Court had to again address personal jurisdiction and reinterpreted personal jurisdiction within the confines of the due process clause in International Shoe v. Washington, 326 U.S. 310 (1945).   The court held that a state could exercise personal jurisdiction over out of state parties when those parties have "certain minimum contacts with [the state] such that the maintenance of the suit does not offend traditional notions of fair play and substantial justice."3   Courts must consider not only the amount of the out of state party's contacts with the state but also the relationship between the contacts and the claim being asserted.

The Internet is the world largest computer network and has made it possible for any business with a web site to participate in the global marketplace.   The Internet has created a "virtual state" or really a "virtual nation" that is not controlled by a set of universal laws.   The courts are now trying to apply legal doctrine founded in the 20th century to problems arising in the 21st century.   The Internet is a tremendous technological advance that has created a "new state" of doing business, such as shopping from home, soliciting business, and conducting business through the World Wide Web.   Establishing personal jurisdiction in the "real world" is well settled in all states based upon their long-arm statute, as well as precedents from their courts interpreting the statute; however, how should these principles be applied to Internet contacts in cyberspace.   The concern for the courts is how to apply jurisdictional legal doctrines to contacts made between parties primarily through the Internet and should the concept of minimum contacts survive in cyberspace litigation.

Since the Supreme Court has not addressed the issue of personal jurisdiction with regard to Internet contacts and Internet business, the district courts and appellate courts have been left to analyze the issues based upon the aforementioned precedents.   The courts have varied on their analysis and decisions depending on whether the defendant is a business or individual as well as whether the conduct was passive or active.

The type of web site can be a factor for the court in deciding if the contact is "active" toward the forum state.   A passive web site provides information in a "read-only" format.   There is not an exchange of information between the user and the company/entity hosting the web site.   An interactive web site encourages the user to enter identifying information and/or providing background information.   An interactive web site not only provides information to the user but also accepts information from the user to better meet the user's needs.   There is not a bright line rule as to how the difference should be applied, it is at least a factor to be considered when analyzing the electronic contacts.

In analyzing the first prong, the court determined that Patterson had "purposefully availed" himself of the privilege in the Ohio forum because he had entered into a contract with CompuServe which required Patterson to type "agree" on his computer in Texas and transmit the agreement electronically to Ohio.18   The contract stated that Ohio law would govern; therefore, Patterson could have reasonably anticipated being haled into court in Ohio.   The court listed several determinative factors to conclude that Patterson purposefully availed himself of privileges in the Ohio forum.19   First, the court relied on Patterson's repeated transmissions of his software to CompuServe in Ohio through electronic means.   Second, Patterson marketed the software on CompuServe's system in Ohio.   Third, Ohio subscribers had accessed and used Patterson's software.   Finally, Patterson created this arrangement by reaching out to CompuServe's home and was benefited through this relationship.20   In other words, Patterson actively sought out CompuServe to host his product and reaped the benefits in the fees generated by the relationship.

The reasonableness prong was also satisfied.   Patterson had substantial nexus with Ohio through the Internet, had benefited from his connection with Ohio, and had entered into a contract stating that Ohio law applied.23   Patterson could have anticipated being haled into court in Ohio based on these factors alone; however the court stated that Ohio has a strong interest in resolving the dispute because an Ohio company has the potential of suffering a tremendous financial loss.   "Someone like Patterson who employs a computer network service like CompuServe to market a product can reasonably expect disputes with that service to yield lawsuits in the service's home state."24   The court did not think it was a burden for the Texas resident to go to Ohio to defend the lawsuit.

By using contacts that exclusively occurred in the electronic context, the court is expanding the power of courts to find in personam jurisdiction as well as expanding the minimum contacts analysis.   In the electronic contact analysis, the principle being stressed is the active contact by the defendant.   In order to meet this active contact criterion, the non-resident defendant's electronic activities must be purposefully directed into the forum state and related to the cause of action.

The court, citing Burger King  Corp, considered the following factors "1) the burden on the defendant, 2) the forum's interest in resolving the dispute, 3) the plaintiff's interest in receiving convenient and effective relief, 4) the interstate judicial system's interest in obtaining the most efficient resolution of controversies, and 5) the shared interest of the several states in furthering fundamental substantive social polices."27   The fact that the defendant company was larger than the plaintiff company, as well as the fact that the plaintiff's role in the case was involuntary, weighed in favor of granting jurisdiction in Oklahoma.28   More importantly, the injury occurred in Oklahoma and therefore, Oklahoma has a manifest interest in providing redress for its citizens.   In this case, the defendant's electronic contacts were purposefully, although not intentionally, directed into the forum state and were directly related to the cause of action.   If the defendant had corrected the error sooner, it is unclear if the Oklahoma court would have found that personal jurisdiction existed.

The automatic reply electronic mails sent by Cybergold were enough for Missouri to determine that Cybergold had purposefully directed its advertisements to Missouri.   This automatic component does not have a screening device to restrict or discriminate to whom Cybergold would provide its service.33   This automated component is considered active contact and enough to find it proper to exercise personal jurisdiction.   There is no discussion as to how Cybergold, Inc. availed itself of Missouri laws.   The court held that the exercise of jurisdiction is proper under Missouri law because a tortious act was committed outside the forum state which as an effect in the forum state.34   This rationale would mean that Cybergold could be haled into court in any jurisdiction in the United States where someone is harmed by web site.   The outer limits of this rationale have not been tested; however, it appears to be a stretch by the court to call electronic mailing an "active" contact because for a user to be on the mailing list, the user submits the electronic address.   The court seem to stretching the concept of who is reaching out of it home forum.

The court concluded that the defendant committed a tortious act (the alleged trademark infringement), which resulted in an injury to the plaintiff in New York.   The harm is the result of confusion and deception of New York computer users.44   The court felt that it was foreseeable that the web site would have consequences in New York because the web site stated that it could help customers "across the United States."45   For some reason, the defendant did not challenge the substantial revenue prong of New York's long-arm statute so the court exercised personal jurisdiction within the statute.

In another case, a New York court refused to exercise jurisdiction based solely upon the defendant's web site accessibility in the forum state in In Hearst Corporation v. Goldberger, 1997 WL 97097.   This case also involves a claim of trademark infringement.   The defendant operated a web site called "esqwire.com" and the plaintiff is the publisher of Esquire magazine.64   The defendant's web site is passive and only has an announcement that it plans to offer legal support services.65   The court held that this web site was analogous to an advertisement in a national magazine, which is not targeted toward the residents of any particular state.66   The court also stated that the tortious act portion of the long arm statute did not purport personal jurisdiction in this case because for it to apply the defendant must either 1) regularly transact business or "derives substantial revenue from goods used or consumed or services rendered, in the state, or 2) expects his act "to have consequences in the state and derives substantial revenue form interstate or international commerce."67   Since the defendant's web site did not sell a product or service, the tortious act portion of the New York long arm statute did not apply.

The Inset  case clearly falls in the middle of the continuum between active and passive conduct.   The conduct is not passive because the web site allowed users to interact; however, the level of interaction is not clear.   The web site was not active enough to say that Instruction Set purposely availed itself of the laws of Connecticut.   The web site was not directed to influence Connecticut residents and there was no evidence of transmissions or mailing of Instruction Set's goods into Connecticut.   The court  finds that personal jurisdiction existed on the possibility an Internet user in Connecticut accessed the web site.

The courts have applied the requirements of International Shoe and its progeny to electronic contacts with the forum state.   When determining whether a defendant should be haled or not haled into the forum state, the courts main concern has been to decide if the defendant has purposefully availed itself to the forum.   The minimum contact test has been found in most cases to require more than simply posting a web site that is accessible by residents in the forum state.   In order for a defendant to purposefully avail itself to the privileges of the forum's laws, the defendant is required do more than create a web site for the stream of internet commerce.

On one end of the spectrum are situations where the defendant clearly does business over the Internet, like the situation in CompuServe.   Exercising personal jurisdiction over the defendant is proper and does not offend traditional notions of fair play and substantial justice.   A passive web site that does nothing more than make information available to those who are interested in it is not sufficient enough for exercising personal jurisdiction, like the situation in Bensusan.   The middle ground is where the web site is interactive and a user can exchange information with the host.   In these situation, asserting jurisdiction should be determined by looking at the level of interactivity as well as the commercial nature of the exchange of information that occurs on the web site.   It is in these situation where the court look to "more" than just publishing a web site and placing on the world wide web or "stream of commerce."

In determining how much more is required, the courts have looked to several factors including the type of web site.   If the web site is passive, in that it simply provided information for the user to access, the majority of the courts have held that this does not meet the purposeful availment requirement.   Only the court in Inset  held to the contrary and this should be considered an anomaly in the context of personal jurisdiction cases.   Another factor considered is the cause of action and if the contacts with the forum state are related to the cause of action.   The tortious effect line of cases dealt with this aspect of personal jurisdiction and in most situations required more than simply posting a web site.   Finally, the active pursuit of business in another jurisdiction is enough to meet the purposeful availment requirement of the personal jurisdiction precedent provided thus far by the Supreme Court, as seen in the CompuServe case.

Since electronic communication is the reality of the 21st century, where does this leave companies and individuals as they try to structure their electronic activities so that they are not haled into court all over the nation or world.   It seem counter productive to the "global marketplace" theory; however, web site publishers must realize that an interactive web site that solicits and receives business in a forum state will certainly raise a red flag to the courts in the forum state.   The distinctions the courts are placing on passive and interactive web sites seems to be a major factor in determining if the defendant has purposefully availed itself of the laws of the forum state.   In reality, this is not a very good distinction on which to place the threat of being haled into court in a forum state.   A passive web site has the same potential of having customers outside its home state as an interactive web site.   A user can still contact the publisher of the passive web site by phone to place an order or conduct other business.   Also, the threshold level for what is considered to be an interactive web site does not conform to reality.   It seems a stretch of the imagination to call an automated reply electronic mail system interactive.   The system simply sends electronic messages to subscribers who have requested the information.   By caring this rationale further, every solicitation by electronic mail could be seen as the sender purposefully availing itself of the forum state.   This could prove to be a huge liability for large companies that send electronic "junk mail" solicitations.   The fact that the user has to enter an electronic address means that the user initiated the contact with the company and this fact should play a role in determining if company purposefully availed itself to the privileges of the forum state.

The tortious effect test also has some problems that need to be worked out.   State law of corporations handles the corporations within its physical boundaries.   The state requires that the company have an unique name within that state; however, it does not require a different name that all corporations in the United States.   The problem of the "same name" companies is that the Internet does not have physical boundaries.   The allegation of trademark infringement is the principal cause of action to address this concern.   The tortious effect is when an out of state party's action cause harm in the forum state, which in this situation is the trademark infringement.   As the case of Cybersell  suggests, it is difficult to say that a company without any knowledge of the other's existence had purposefully availed itself of the forum state.   The "cybersquatting" context is the best way to use the tortious effect test because the cybersquatter is aware of the company's trademark as well as where the company is located and should anticipate being haled into court there.

The issued raise with Internet technology and personal jurisdiction are not easily answered; however, they should not be left to a case by case analysis.   The current law of International Shoe and its progeny has given the courts a base line for determining when exercising personal jurisdiction is within the confines of the Constitution; however, how to apply these concepts to electronic communication is a daunting task and the Inset  anomaly is just the beginning.   As seen in the reinterpretation of personal jurisdiction within the confines of Due Process Clause in International Shoe from its original position in Pennoyer, the Supreme Court will have to provide new legal doctrine to deal with the reality that the Internet is the new way to conduct business in the 21st Century.

This statute appears to encompass all types of cyberstalking, however, it is unclear whether it would apply where a person harasses another by posting messages on a message board duping others to harass or annoy another.

This statute appears to be all-inclusive because it covers not only harassment initiated and sent by the perpetrator, but it also includes harassment that may not be sent by the perpetrator, but nonetheless was caused by the perpetrator.

The Arkansas statute provides that a person commits the offense of unlawful computerized communications if he sends a message to the person and that message threatens to cause physical injury to any person or damage to the property of any person or that message uses obscene, lewd, or profane language, and he has the intent to frighten, intimidate, threaten, or harass the person.[31] This statute appears to be limited to threats and obscene language. It is unclear whether or not harassing electronic communications lacking these two elements would fall under this statute. It is also unclear whether or not this statute would include electronic communications that were not sent by the perpetrator but that were caused to be sent by the perpetrator.

This statute clearly limits the crime with the requirement of a threat. This statute would not cover electronic communications that are harassing, but do not include a threat. It is also unclear whether or not this statute would include electronic communications that were not sent by the perpetrator but that were caused to be sent by the perpetrator and the communication included a threat.

It appears that this statute is not all-inclusive because of the requirement that the victim be in reasonable fear of his safety. This would not include communications that are harassing but not threatening.

Maine's statute provides that the crime of stalking includes communicating by electronic means with a person with the intent to harass, annoy or alarm that person.[41] This appears to be all-inclusive, however this statute is unclear whether or not communications that are caused by the perpetrator is included in the crime of harassment.

This statute provides that a person may not use electronic mail for a communication made with intent to harass a person by sending, lewd, lascivious, or obscene material.[42] It appears that this statute limits the crime and would not include communications that do not include lewd, lascivious, or obscene material but is otherwise harassing.

Massachusetts' statute provides that a person is guilty of stalking when, through electronic mail or internet communications, he willfully and maliciously engages in a pattern of conduct which alarms or annoys that person and would cause a reasonable person to suffer emotional distress and makes a threat with the intent to place the person in eminent fear of death or bodily injury.[43] This statute limits the crime of stalking and would not include harassing communications unless it includes a threat. This statute is also unclear whether or not communications that are caused by the perpetrator is included in the crime of harassment.

Under this statute a person is guilty of a crime when that person sends electronic communications to an individual that is continued without that individuals consent or in disregard of that individual's expressed desire that the contact by avoided or discontinued.[44] This statute appears to include most types of cyberstalking, but it is not clear whether or not it would include message board harassment.

This statute appears to require the inclusion of some threatening language in the communication, but is unclear. This statute is also unclear whether or not communications that are caused by the perpetrator is included in the crime of harassment.

In New Hampshire a person is guilty of a misdemeanor when he sends electronic mail with the purpose to annoy or alarm another, having been previously notified that the recipient does not desire further communications, communicates with that person, when the communications is not for a lawful purpose or constitutionally protected.[46] This statute appears to be intended to police the use of spam. However, it appears that the statute covers most of the types of cyberstalking, but it is unclear if it would cover message board harassment.

The New York statute provides that a person is guilty of aggravated harassment when the person has the intent to harass, annoy, threaten or alarm another and the person communicates or causes a communication to be initiated by electronic means with another person in a manner likely to cause annoyance or alarm.[47] It appears that this statute is all inclusive, including live chat harassment, message board harassment and e-mail harassment.

This statute appears to cover all types of harassment sent by the perpetrator, however, it is not clear whether the statute includes message board harassment where the perpetrator does not actually send the harassing communications but causes the communications to be sent.

This statute appears to cover all types of harassment sent by the perpetrator, including message board harassment where the perpetrator does not actually send the harassing communications but causes the communications to be sent.

Under this statute a person is guilty of disturbing the peace when he, with intent to terrify, threaten, harass or annoy, makes contact by means of electronic communication with another and makes any request that is obscene, lewd or indecent.[55] It is also a crime to threaten to inflict injury or physical harm to the person or property of any person.[56] It appears that this statute limits the crime of cyberstalking by requiring an obscene, lewd or indecent request. It is also not clear whether the statute includes message board harassment where the perpetrator does not actually send the harassing communication but causes the communications to be sent.

It appears that this statute limits the crime with its requirement of obscene language or threat of an illegal or immoral act. However, it does appear to cover message board harassment where the perpetrator does not actually send the harassing communication but causes the communications to be sent.

The use of this statute is limited by the requirement of a threat or obscene, lewd, or profane language. It is not clear whether the statute includes message board harassment where the perpetrator does not actually send the harassing communication but causes the communications to be sent.

The use of this statute is limited by the requirement that a person experience emotional distress. Beyond that, it appears to include most all types of communications sent by the perpetrator. However, it is unclear whether the statute includes message board harassment where the perpetrator does not actually send the harassing communication but causes the communications to be sent.

This definition appears to include all types of cyberstalking, including message board harassment where the perpetrator does not actually send the harassing communication but causes the communications to be sent.

This bill makes the unlawful use of computerized communication systems for the purpose of harassing another person a misdemeanor, and makes the sender's property subject to forfeiture.[62] This bill appears to include all types of cyberstalking, including message board harassment where the perpetrator does not actually send the harassing communication but causes the communications to be sent.

Internet or Internet services, and computer bulletin board services or other electronic forms of communication as "cause of conduct" in the Kansas stalking statute.[63] This bill redefines the phrase "cause of conduct" to encompass all types of cyberstalking.

This bill redefines the crime of stalking to include electronic mail.[64] A second bill adds the making of a credible threat to the crime of stalking, including those made through electronic communication.[65] It appears that the use of this bill would be limited to cyberstalking that includes a threat, and it is unclear if the statute includes message board harassment where the perpetrator does not actually send the harassing communication but causes the communications to be sent.

It appears that this bill encompasses most types of cyberstalking, however, its is unclear whether the bill includes message board harassment where the perpetrator does not actually send the harassing communication but causes the communications to be sent.

This bill appears to include all types of cyberstalking, including message board harassment where the perpetrator does not actually send the harassing communication but causes the communications to be sent.

This bill specifies that electronic communication is contact for purposes of stalking and includes electronic threats within the crime of harassment.[68] The use of this bill as a statute is limited by the requirement of a threat. It is unclear whether message board harassment would be included in the scope of the definition of the statute.

This bill amends the meaning of communication within the stalking statute to include electronic means including electronic mail and the Internet.[69] This bill appears to include all types of cyberstalking, including message board harassment where the perpetrator does not actually send the harassing communication but causes the communications to be sent.

This bill includes electronic communications within the definitions of harassment.[70] This bill appears to include all types of cyberstalking, including message board harassment where the perpetrator does not actually send the harassing communication but causes the communications to be sent.

The purpose of this bill is to strengthen the stalking law to include harassment by computer.[72] This bill appears to include all types of cyberstalking, including message board harassment where the perpetrator does not actually send the harassing communication but causes the communications to be sent.

Look up your username and domain and obtain information on your file by using "Finger".[79] Change information you do not want others to see. You can try a Finger search by visiting http://www.rickman.com/finger.html or http://www-bprc.mps.ohio-state.edu/cgi-bin/finger.pl.

In the end, there are only thirty-three states with cyberstalking laws on the books. Eight states are attempting to address the issue with bills pending in the legislature, but nine states have yet to bring the issue to the table. Why have the States waited so long to enact laws prohibiting cyberstalking on the Internet? Is it a sign that States are not taking cyberstalking seriously? Cyber law is a young area of law and at times the connection between "cyberspace" and "reality" can be hard to find. It is through education and awareness that legislators will bring the issue of cyberstalking to the forefront of their agendas.

While there are many States that have enacted cyberstalking statutes, many of the statutes do not encompass broad enough elements to include all types of cyberstalking. Many States limit the ability to prosecute under these statutes by requiring threatening or crude and obscene language. Other States limit the ability to prosecute under these statutes by requiring the harassing communications to be sent directly by the perpetrator, leaving victims of harassing e-mail from message boards with falsified postings with no recourse against the perpetrator.

The Federal government has also attempted to put laws on the books that would make cyberstalking a federal crime. These statutes, like the various States' statutes, are limited in their ability to capture all types of cyberstalking under their strict requirements. These statutes need to be evaluated to determine how they can be amended to better serve the needs of people who are victims of Internet harassment.

This paper discuss the history of cyber-porn, whether there is a Constitutional right to be able to view such materials, a discussion of some of the problems with the pervasiveness of such materials, as well as the role the government has played in attempting to regulate it, and where the regulation (self) of this medium is heading.

"the average person, applying contemporary community standards" would find that the work, taken as a whole, appeals to the prurient interest; second, whether the work depicts or describes, in a patently offensive manner, sexual conduct as defined by the applicable state law; and third, whether the work, taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value. Once characterized as obscene, the material receives no First Amendment protection. Id.

Like the Internet, the issue of e-commerce taxation is very broad in scope, at once encompassing the world and individual users.  Taxation issues "include income taxation, sales and use taxes, value-added taxes, Internet access, and other telecommunications taxes and fees." <![if !supportFootnotes]>[11]<![endif]>  This paper focuses on the limits placed on sales and use taxes in e-commerce transactions and Internet access taxes.  Specifically, this paper reviews the law governing Internet taxation in section II.  Section III addresses the explosion of e-commerce and the debate surrounding the tax issue.  Section IV examines proposals currently being considered to resolve the Internet taxation problems.

It is important to note that the moratorium is not an outright ban on Internet taxes.  Rather, it limits states' authority to require companies to collect sales and use taxes on online transactions, when the tax is multiple or discriminatory, and on Internet access service - the fees Internet Service Providers like AOL and EarthLink charge subscribers for accessing the Internet.

For example, a use tax might be imposed when someone buys a car in, say, Alabama, but registers the car in Georgia.  The state where the consumer will use the car may typically impose a use tax.  If a consumer buys a shirt from the mall, he pays a sales tax.

For all practical purposes, sales and use taxes represent a distinction without a difference. The issue is that the simple scenarios above become infinitely more complicated when thousands of jurisdictions, all with different tax laws, try to collect on Internet transactions.

E-commerce erased the old model of face-to-face contact between a vendor and consumer.  Online retailers capitalized on the global nature of the Internet, which allowed them to expand their businesses into any market where a delivery truck could go.  That ease of remote selling, however, complicated the tax issue.

Process Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment and created an unconstitutional burden on interstate commerce in violation of the Commerce Clause. <![if !supportFootnotes]>[58]<![endif]>  The court noted that for a state to avoid invading the exclusive authority of Congress to regulate trade between the States, the state tax falling on interstate commerce can only be justified as designed to make such commerce bear a fair share of the cost of the local government whose protection it enjoys. <![if !supportFootnotes]>[59]<![endif]>  Similarly, with regard to Due Process, for a state to impose the burdens of collecting use taxes on interstate sales, the Constitution requires "some definite link, some minimum connection, between a state and the person, property or transaction it seeks to tax." <![if !supportFootnotes]>[60]<![endif]>  That link has been found where an out-of-state retailer had some agents in state or maintained retail stores in state. <![if !supportFootnotes]>[61]<![endif]>  "But the Court has never held that a State may impose the duty of use tax collection and payment upon a seller whose only connection with customers in the State is by common carrier or the United States mail." <![if !supportFootnotes]>[62]<![endif]>  The court held no such link existed between the state and National, where National maintained no office, had no agents or solicitors, owned no property, and had no telephone listing in Illinois, and where all contacts which the firm had with the state were through the U.S. mail or common carrier.

In Quill, the U.S. Supreme Court held that while states may meet the Due Process requirement of minimum contacts, under Commerce Clause requirements, states may still be precluded from requiring out-of-state retailers such as catalog companies and Internet merchants to collect taxes unless they have a physical presence in the state creating a substantial nexus with the taxing state.

The U.S. Supreme Court held that that mail-order business did not need to have physical presence in state in order to permit a state to require the business to collect use tax from its in-state customers, but physical presence in the state was required for the business to have a "substantial nexus" with the taxing state under the Commerce Clause.

"Barnes & Noble, Inc. uses an entity to isolate its physical contacts with a state so it will not be subject to a collection obligation for its on-line retail sales.   Barnes & Noble operates a wholly owned subsidiary, Barnes&Noble.com, to conduct its on-line book sales.  Barnes&Noble.com remits sales tax only for New Jersey, New York, and Virginia.

Congress could eliminate such manipulation and confusion by taking action and establishing by statute limits on state's sales and use tax collection requirements in the time it has bought by extending the moratorium.

Those opposed to lifting the moratorium say forcing online merchants to comply with the taxing systems of thousands of jurisdictions will stifle development of the e-commerce industry. <![if !supportFootnotes]>[93]<![endif]>  Additionally, catalog companies do not have to pay taxes where they don't have a physical presence, so neither should online retailers, the argument goes.  Add to that the fact that online sales account for a small percentage of overall retail sales, and moratorium supporters claim taxing an industry segment already weakened by a poor economy would be penny wise and pound foolish.

By passing an extension of the Internet Tax Freedom Act, Congress has bought itself another two years to work on the problem of when and how states should be able to require remote retailers to collect taxes on online transactions.  As states face budget shortfalls, and are forced to drain cash reserves, more pressure is on to find a solution.  More states already are looking for ways to collect elusive use taxes directly from consumers.  At the same time, the e-commerce industry is feeling the effects of a crippled economy and will likely put more pressure on Congress to come up with ways to jumpstart, or at least not harm, business growth.  Any solution will likely be a compromise.  However, the most compromising thing Congress could do is kick the issue further down the information superhighway, and pave the road with more uncertainty.

The gargantuan growth of the Internet and the revolution of the telecommunications industry in the Internet age with accompanying technological developments have resulted in a significant challenge to state and local taxing schemes.

This era of change has brought forth problems that may not be solved through traditional regimes of taxation. The very foundation of law and the very core concepts of taxation may need to be changed in order to address the economic challenges posed by an exponentially growing Internet and the phenomenon of electronic commerce. The state and local policy makers and government authorities are extremely concerned that the tax revenues that they rely on will disappear as electronic commerce grows. On the other end, businesses are concerned that notions of taxation based on archaic concepts that underlie taxation will curtail the progress of E-commerce because of overly oppressive tax imposition. [1]. These concerns have led Congress to pass the Internet Tax Freedom Act [2] that specifically limits certain state taxes on E-commerce for a temporary period of time. The reprieve of the moratorium will hopefully allow the government time to study the nature of the Internet beast in order to develop viable E-commerce tax solutions [3]. The associated problems of the Internet are particularly apparent in light of sales and use taxation which is a significant source of revenue for states and localities.

Almost every state in the United States imposes a sales tax. An examination of Georgia sales and use tax statutes provides an example of how sales tax is imposed in most states. As in most states, Georgia imposes a sales and use tax on "the retail purchase, retail sale, rental, storage, use, and consumption of tangible personal property" under O.C.G.A.  48-8-1.

"Use" is defined as "the exercise of any right or power over tangible personal property incident to the ownership of the property including, but not limited to, the sale at retail of the property in the regular course of business."

Taxable items may be subject to tax unless specifically exempted or excluded by law. For example, services and resale items are exempt from sales and use tax. Other examples of exempt transactions may be sales to the government or other transactions particularly excluded or exempted.

For sales or use tax to be imposed, the transaction involved must be taxable. The Georgia Department of Revenue, which carries out the sales and use taxation powers provided to them by the Georgia General Assembly, mandates that taxable sales must occur within a local jurisdiction. When the title of ownership of tangible personal property is transferred in a Georgia jurisdiction, a taxable transaction has occurred. A taxable transaction is not deemed to have occurred if the tangible personal property is ordered and mailed and delivered to a purchaser that is outside of Georgia because the presumption is that the jurisdiction where the property is received is the taxing jurisdiction. [11]. In regards to use tax, the lessee or owner of tangible personal property, even if that property is derived outside of Georgia, is subject to use tax if the first instance of use, consumption or storage of the property occurs within Georgia. [12].

These clauses provide that the requirement for state taxing jurisdiction is that there must be a concrete relationship or at least some minimal connection between the state and the taxpayer [14]. The term for the aforementioned relationship is "nexus", which refers to the justification of state taxing authority because a taxpayer or their activities derive the benefits or opportunities of transacting business within that state. If the state provides no benefit to the taxpayer, then their taxing authority is not justified. [15].

For there to be nexus, two tests must be met. Does the taxpayer have minimum contact with the taxing jurisdiction so that they may be subject to tax? [16]. And, does a minimum contact exist between the taxing state and the activity that they seek to tax. The Supreme Court has held that not only must there be minimal contact between the taxpayer and the taxing state, but a connection between the activity itself and the taxing state in order to establish jurisdiction. [17].

Although these two questions are similar, the difference between the two inquiries is extremely important when examined in relation to the constitutional limits of state taxing authority of E-commerce. [18].

A Supreme Court decision that lays out the cornerstones of state and local taxation and related constitutional restraints is Quill Corp. v. North Dakota [19]. Though the main issue involved in Quill was taxation of an out-of-state mail order business, the implications of this recent case in relation to taxation of Internet transactions make this a seminal E-commerce tax case. [20]. Quill is an Illinois mail order business that solicits sales of tangible personal property in North Dakota via mail order catalogs. They also offered some software to their customers that could be used to place orders with them directly. Per the facts, Quill had no actual physical presence in North Dakota. They did not have outlets or sales representatives within the state.

The main issue the Court had to tackle was whether a company, whose only contact with the state was by mail or common carrier, had nexus with the state which would render them taxable for use tax purposes. The Supreme Court held that substantial presence is required for taxability under the Commerce Clause of the Constitution. If substantial presence requirements are met, then the taxpayer is required to register with the taxing state, collect use tax and distribute that tax to the taxing jurisdiction. The provisions of the Due Process Clause require minimal presence within the taxing jurisdiction for taxation to be constitutional, and would allow a jurisdiction to require taxpayers provide information about their activities within the jurisdiction. In Quill's case, the Court held that the Due Process clause did not bar taxability because they had minimal presence in North Dakota. [22]. However, the Court rendered the tax at issue unconstitutional as a burden on interstate commerce, and as such, in violation of the Commerce Clause. The requirements of substantial nexus were not met under the facts in Quill. [23].

The Constitution, nexus and interstate activities were also examined in an older Supreme Court case, Complete Auto Transit, Inc. v. Brady, [24] that puts forth a four prong test for tax constitutionality.

Mississippi imposes sales tax on the privilege of doing business within the state. In this case, the taxpayer is a corporation that transports automobiles via motor carriers. The motor vehicles are assembled outside of the state, shipped to Jackson, Mississippi and then loaded and distributed throughout Mississippi to dealers by the appellant. [25].

Per the State Supreme Court, Geoffrey had two types of intangibles located in South Carolina. The trademarks and trade names were located in South Carolina because Toys R Us used them there. The accounts receivable that resulted from the royalty agreement were located in South Carolina to the extent the underlying sales occurred there. The court said the presence of these intangibles in South Carolina was sufficient to establish nexus under the Due Process Clause and Commerce Clause of the U.S. Constitution.

In light of the almost lightening speed of Internet transactions, can one reasonably track whether a business has purposefully availed themselves of the benefits of a particular state? If a business exclusively performs sales via a Web site, then have they availed themselves of the benefits of a state for taxation purposes, particularly when the customer seeks the sale via the Web site and not through direct solicitation within the state? If a percentage of a company's business occurs in sales to customers in a particular state, they may be held accountable for a percentage of tax for conducting that business, but how may this percentage be calculated?

If sales tax is based on where title is transferred to the consumer, then how difficult may this be when dealing with an Internet sale? If tangible personal property is taxable, then is computer software considered tangible personal property?

The questions that arise in relation to taxation of E-commerce are constantly multiplying and any possible solution in light of the current taxation scheme may be so complicated that the application is not viable in today's economy. All of this coupled with the subjectivity of state application that may extend a state's taxing authority to the limits of, if not beyond, constitutional restarints have many business and policy makers increasingly perplexed and concerned about the problems arising in the current and future digital age. The current law seems to either give jurisdictions the power to tax that would lead to oppression of E-commerce or, in other regards, may leave them unable to tax items that would normally have been taxable.

The Internet is a network of computers that are connected through lines of data and various digital, wireless systems. It began as a tool for the military and rapidly grew from its advent in the 1960s to a social phenomenon.

Over 36% of households within the United States have computers with Internet access. This percentage is expected to grow to 98% with the advent of Internet connections though television access. The growth in the number of Internet users is also amazing. On a global basis, the number of potential Internet users is equally staggering. [32].

A true attempt to solve the E-commerce problem will not be possible until the nature of the beast is examined. The definition of E-commerce is "the ability to perform transactions involving the exchange of goods or services between two or more parties using electronic tools and techniques."

On-line catalogs that enable customers to choose and purchase products; computer software which can be downloaded though electronic means; pictures that may be purchased and digitally transferred to the customer; online information databases and information services available though the Internet and through traditional telecommunications services; professional services (e.g., medical, legal, business consulting, etc.); videoconferencing services; securities trading; financial services such as offshore banking, credit card payments and incorporations. [34].

First, businesses are provided with a new way to solicit, sell and deliver services and products to the consumer. The main implication of this change is that the cost of establishing operations is relatively low and the Internet allows a more widespread global arena which businesses may use to advertise, sell and deliver their products and services. The relative ease and minimal expense of doing business online will allow even small operations to quickly expand into interstate and global operations. The Internet also allows for removal of some of the middlemen since the original source of goods can arrange to sell and deliver the product to consumers without intermediaries.

Second, the Internet provides businesses with revolutionary new ways to communicate and structure their business operations. It provides a tool for businesses to use to either communicate internally through private networks or though public networks. Either option allows for a more streamlined communication system. The new efficiency allows businesses to operate 24 hours a day, and enables them to use less decentralized means to structure their business operations so that multiple locations can more easily collaborate to produce and deliver a product. [37].

From a tax perspective, the above two changes in the way business is done raises multiple issues. First, users of the Internet do not know where the information they want comes from or the path that it takes from origination to end-user. The business of the Internet is often a business without location.

Often, the key players are intermediaries that cannot control the flow of information that runs through their computers. As information flows throughout jurisdictions, it is more difficult to determine where business activity occurs in order to assess which jurisdiction may have the authority to tax. [38].

Also, there is no viable way to identify the users of the Internet in light of the weak requirements for proof of identity. Internet addresses and domain names are not good indicators of key players since relationships between the computers are not apparent; furthermore, new computers can be easily added that can be readily recognized anywhere else on the Internet.

The requirements for registration are not difficult to meet and the introduction of new controllers to a site may be readily performed. The removal of intermediaries also removes the "speed bumps" that would normally trigger taxation. Tax is administered at certain points for purposes of reporting and withholding.

Electronic payment systems may displace the use of cash, credit cards and checks that currently account for over 90% of the means for funding payments. These systems may potentially create new forms of currency since the value of money may be represented digitally. This type of digital money may easily be processed and transferred throughout the world in moments.

Though some would argue that these issues are similar to the traditional issues that arose with mail-order catalog business transactions, the impact of the speed, mobility, efficiency, and technology of the Internet provides a more daunting and immediate tax administration problem. To accommodate these changes, tax administration must be developed in new ways. The underlying concepts of various types of taxation must be reassessed. In various schemes of taxation, the tax imposer must be able to identify a taxable event, to identify and measure the income produced from an event, or to determine the consumer and the provider and where title transfers. These concepts must now be applied to the Internet in order to determine how and where taxable events occur and by whom. [41].

One of the main problems of E-commerce taxation is the difficulty determining where the customer is located and whether the business or vendor has nexus with the taxing state or authority. Suppose there is a business that distributed software to a customer via the Internet who pays for the transaction by a credit card or some form of E-money. The business sells their product throughout the United States and worldwide. They have a physical presence (offices & employee locations) in New Mexico and California and they purchase their Internet access and server space from a business in Oregon.

They also have servers located throughout the world and in a number of states. Since they are physically located in New Mexico, their order form identifies New Mexico as the state where sales tax would be applicable.

Another problem is determining whether the transaction involves a taxable product or a non-taxable service. Suppose a company provides photo-processing services to their customers via the Internet. The customer provides the company with film for processing and the company develops the film, converts it to a digital image, and e-mails the digital photos to their customer.

Are they providing a service, selling a tax-exempt intangible, or selling a product of tangible personal property? Should concepts of equality be adopted; in other words, should sales tax be collected because the digital photos should be deemed the equivalent of a tangible physical photo? If the company and their customers were located in other countries, would they be expected to owe international taxes or U.S. sales taxes? How would such an example affect a state's sales and use tax base? In the era of increasing sales of information and digital products, how can state's tax such transactions particularly in light of businesses that will seek change their business from providing taxable products to providing non-taxable intangibles, information or services. [45].

Another problem is determining whether alternate nexus rationales may apply to a business. Suppose a gift card business had previously sold their products to customers within California from its one existing location within California. In light of the business and expansion potential of the Internet and online sales, the gift card company enters into an agreement with a virtual mall. The gift card company outsources company A to help them with their Internet set up and to administer product searches, orders, payments and advertising in multiple online malls. Company A is located in Michigan. Can Company A be considered an agent of the gift card company so that nexus may be established in Michigan? Can the activity of Company A be considered solicitation, and can their activity provide nexus of the Gift Card Company in other states? [46].

The above issues are just simple questions that arise from everyday, run-of-the-mill E-commerce operations, yet these simple scenarios and transactions bring forth almost countless issues that threaten to disable current state and local taxing schemes or, conversely, to potentially oppress commerce if the current tax regimes are extended to allow for multistate taxation.

Obviously, the states may potentially lose much needed revenue from sales tax proceeds that they need to manage their affairs. These proceeds had been derived from traditional brick-and-mortar operations. With the advent of the Internet, the nature of the beast has changed and the apparent solution is to extend state taxing authority to encompass E-commerce transactions.

However, the transactions that states now seek to tax have traditionally been non-taxable under the black letter law of most state statutes and under common law. The Supreme Court has not provided a bright-light test to tackle these problems, but the holdings recognize that a company's activities may be taxable even if there is no physical presence within the state.

There are two sides to the coin of E-commerce taxation. To tax or not to tax? That is the question. If states extend their authority to tax E-commerce, intangibles and services, then they may impede to flow of commerce, business development, information flow, and all the elements of freedom that have been necessary for the Internet to flourish. The extension of state authority may also cripple and oppress most businesses that transact business throughout the nation and the world. These businesses may not be able to handle the financial and administrative burden of tracking where they may have established nexus and to which state they may owe taxes, and in what proportion tax is owed. The other side of the coin leaves states with dwindling revenues and may significantly impede their ability to tax Internet transactions which grow in number at a significant rate in the present day and in the future.

The ITFA is premised in the simple notion that information should not be taxable. This notion has had significant implications and consequences during the advent, development, and ongoing growth of the digital economy.

Internet to develop and grow, they are interested in protecting E-commerce from multiple and discriminatory taxes since E-commerce is particularly vulnerable to these types of taxes in a way that normal, traditional commerce is not. The streamlined methodology of the Internet, the decentralized business model, and the far-reaching flow of commerce make those who conduct business online particularly susceptible to taxation from multiple states and localities. A single transaction could potentially result in multiple attempts of taxation from various tax authorities. The ITFA is intended to protect the flow of commerce and to avoid businesses and taxpayers from being assaulted with multiple and unexpected taxes from governments for which they were not even aware they were subject. [49].

Since its introduction, the ITFA has undergone many changes as a result of negotiations with state and local government authorities. The original legislation was changed to accommodate many of the concerns that were raised by state government leaders. The end result is a compromise between the market and the state so that the growth of the Internet may be protected without eroding state and local tax revenues. Some of the changes were the shortening of the moratorium to three years, providing a moratorium on specific Internet activities as oppose to a broad limitation of all Internet taxation, and the creation of a commission devoted to the study of E-commerce and the state and local taxation issues related to E-business and the new economy. [50].

The three year moratorium allows for a tax break from state and local taxation of Internet access from October 1, 1998 to October 21, 2001 (moratorium has been extended as of August 2001). A grandfather clause was incorporated to allow some states to continue taxing Internet access so long as the tax was "generally imposed and actually enforced" [51] on providers of the Internet before the date the moratorium was enacted.

The Act also disallows the introduction of new, discriminatory tax imposition on customers and businesses involved in E-commerce transactions based on extended interpretations of the nexus requirement. The moratorium also covers goods and services that are provided solely via the Internet and do not have an equivalent via offline sources. [53].

The ITFA also requires the development of a temporary Advisory Commission on Electronic Commerce. This Commission is required to study the issues that arise in relation to E-commerce and reports to Congress as to whether a tax should be imposed on E-commerce, and how the tax may be enacted so that it is not special, multiple, or discriminatory. State and local tax authorities are provided with a voice in this Commission and Congress will retain the discretion and authority to alter or toss the proposals provided by the Advisory Commission. [54].

E-commerce or access to the Internet. Further, the Act calls on the President to work zealously to prevent the imposition of tariffs and discriminatory taxes from other world organizations such as the EU and WTO. The Commerce Department is required to provide reports to Congress if any hindrances of American businesses transacting electronic commerce abroad occur. [55].

There are four versions of the ITFA that are currently in development as possible permanent legislation. The versions of the Act from the House Committee, Senate Committee, and the Senate have provisions that would allow for a broad prohibition of state and local taxes on Internet use and on-line service transactions and communications. These versions then put forth a listing of specific taxes that may be imposed. The fourth version from the House is more specific in its prohibition and lays out six categories of prohibited state taxation which are: "taxes on Internet access; taxes on online services; multiple taxes on electronic commerce; discriminatory taxes on electronic commerce, and two specific types of taxes on data traffic and data carrying capacity that have never been used in this country."

The federal government seeks to curtail any impediment to E-commerce through taxation by enacting the ITFA. Not only was Congress sensitive to state and local concerns, they have enacted a means to assess the issues involved in E-commerce so that a viable solution may be developed.

Party. The "Cyber Tea Party" has been dubbed one of the most revolutionary moves for the government. Supporting views of the ITFA respect the government's willingness to pass up a large source of revenue for the interests of E-commerce and the good of the new American digital economy. One concern raised is that a side-effect of the Act is an unusual business hay-day (e.g., porn sites can be tax free) and in the short 18 months the Commission has to examine E-commerce, they are developing the future of Internet taxation and paving the path of E-business. [57].

Another criticism of the Act is that it will erode state and local tax revenues and shift taxes to lower income households. The rationale of this argument is that the moratorium will negatively impact a wide range of existing states and local taxes. Current sales and use taxes account for an average of 25% of most state revenues that are dedicated to programs such as education, health and welfare. The current moratorium, and possible permanence of the moratorium, will result in movement from traditional "main street" operations to the Internet. Though E-commerce may flourish, it will be at the cost of current businesses that will lose profits to online vendors. Affluent households that can afford computers and modems will be the main beneficiaries of the moratorium. The burden of taxes will shift to lower-income households since they will be the remaining consumers of traditional sales transactions and telecommunications. Ultimately, the enactment of the ITFA will perhaps prevent the government from reaching a viable compromise with the market place. This phenomenon may occur since the federal legislation has removed the much of the incentive for negotiations between state governments and business organizations towards an equitable solution. [58].

Despite the fears associated with the ITFA, some argue that its application is much narrower than widely believed. First, the legislation does not prohibit states and localities from imposing new sales and use taxes on other types of E-commerce such as "electronically delivered software, information, music, or other products sold as end products to ultimate customers." [59].

The legislation also does not prohibit new or current sales tax imposition on business inputs (e.g., tools and services used by businesses in creating their products). Nor does the legislation prohibit sales and use taxes on items ordered on-line but delivered via conventional means. [60].

Arguably, the main restriction of the Act is the prohibition of multiple or discriminatory taxes on E-commerce. Discriminatory taxes are taxes on E-commerce that would not normally be taxed if the transaction involved traditional non-electronic means of delivery. For example, if a state exempted sales tax for the traditional delivery of canned software, then they would be prohibited from imposing sales tax on the same canned software if it was delivered to the end user via electronic means. On the same token, a state may not impose sales tax on a vendor that accepts orders for services and products online without imposing the same tax on mail order vendors.

The reception of the ITFA has been mixed. Though the online business world supports the legislation, state and local authorities are concerned about current and future impacts of their taxing power. One thing is for sure, the moratorium is just a quick, temporary solution to a far-reaching problem.

Arguably, the moratorium applies to a very narrow category of taxes. The restrictions of taxation on remote vendors is not a phenomenon of the ITFA, but of the decision in Quill. Though extending the moratorium will not solve the issues at hand, it will still allow states and localities the ability to impose use tax on qualifying taxable purchases by remote vendors. [63].

The third approach is to develop a federal standard that will unify the concept of nexus for sales and use tax purposes. Federal legislation could come up with a laundry list of activities that may create nexus and these activities would apply to all vendors throughout the United States.

If such a use tax methodology is allowed, the potential tax revenues may be staggering. The federal government should consider a mandate to limit the increase in revenues, such as a lower tax rate. [65].

Another alternative is to create a third party tax collector to collect sales and use tax and remit them to states and even localities. For this to work, sophisticated technology would need to be employed as a tool as well as some standardization of state taxing schemes. Though this may seem like a good option, setting up such a system will be extremely difficult.

Another possible solution is to reverse the current methodology for sales and use taxes. Instead of making the location of the customer the location of the taxing jurisdiction, the taxing jurisdiction could be the location of the vendor. Therefore, the vendor would apply sales tax every time they made a taxable sale and the rules of the tax jurisdiction where the vendor is located would apply. Problems with this model would be that identifying the location for tax purposes would still be difficult, particularly when a vendor has multiple locations. This will particularly be the case for software sales or sales that involved multiple individuals in many locations. Benefits to this approach would be that customers would be neutral as to where they purchased an item and states would compete for vendors to create or relocate operations to their state through tax incentives or a lowered tax rate. [68].

Another solution is a one-rate-per-state sales and use tax system. Many argue that simplification of the tax system is the best solution and that reform has been a long time coming and now would be the perfect opportunity.

At most, 50 tax rates would replace the 7,500 or so sales and use tax schemes in the United States. Though this system would be more streamlined and easier to manage, there are obstacles. First, states and localities would have to rearrange their intergovernment finance systems. Second, there may be strong opposition until the highly controversial issues of remote vendor sales and use tax imposition are resolved. [69].

Though many of the proposed approaches will meet with resistance, most of the parties involved concede that the current scheme is not equipped to deal with the issues presented by E-commerce and that tax reform is necessary. Despite the efforts of the Advisory Commission on Electronic Commerce, it will probably be years before a viable solution can be adopted.

The system will certainly be rough around the edges, but the common trend is the need for simplicity and more uniformity. Whether simplicity will be provided by more federal legislation or uniform state adopted sales and use tax regimes remains to be seen.

Though many current sales and use tax systems are parallel in their approach in identifying taxable events and types of taxable transactions that are subject to sales and use tax, there are thousands of state and local tax regimes throughout the United States. The very core of the various taxing systems have been shaken by the revolutionary new economy and the way that business is being done in the digital age. The Supreme Court has put forth a standard for taxation that is commensurate with the Constitutional safeguards of Due Process and the Commerce Clause, but even these standards cannot give state and local taxing authorities the guidance to deal with E-commerce taxation issues.

The issues that are born from the Internet beast are growing almost as quickly as the World Wide Web. Not only has this communication tool grown exponentially in the last 10 years, projected growth figures indicate that the growth of the Internet into every individuals' lives, even on a global basis, will continue. Rapidly developing technology, new business models, and the growth of transactions on-line are even changing the nature of E-commerce everyday. The rules of law and the policies of states and localities cannot keep up with this ever-changing environment.

The federal government has sought to promote the growth of the Internet without significantly upsetting current state and local taxing systems by adopting and extending the tax moratorium provided by the Internet Tax Freedom Act. Though this Act has been criticized, it is a method that allows a reprieve from pressing tax issues while the federal government examines the problem and attempts to discover solutions. The main consideration is to avoid hindering Internet and E-commerce growth. The crux of the ITFA is to prevent states and localities from imposing multiple or discriminatory taxes. Despite these restrictions, states and localities may still impose use tax and change the way that they impose sales and use tax as long as the changes are in accord with the mandates of Federal legislation.

Many solutions have been proposed and are being considered by the various tax authorities. The common thread is the need for more simplicity and uniformity of tax systems. Where the taxes come from and how they will be administered remains to be seen, but a major reform is anticipated.

Content providers need to control access to their copyrighted material in order to realize the full value and compensation for their work. In other words, content providers must constantly be vigilant against online piracy.

However, in order to achieve those goals, it is important to protect copyright owners? interests to ensure that they continue to reap value for their work as in incentive to continue developing and publishing their ideas.

IDEA 335, 359 (1998). For these reasons normal copyright infringement liability rules would be unduly burdensome and unfair when used against ISPs in this situation because punishing the ISPs would not really eliminate online piracy, would hurt the public by restricting access to materials online, and would do great harm to an industry whose true potential is only just being realized. However, applying a rule barring ISPs from facing contributory or vicarious liability for copyright infringement does not reach a fair result for the public and copyright holders. This is so because online infringement is a serious social problem and, as is the general rule in copyright infringement, all actors involved should be made to shoulder responsibility. Moreover, ISPs do derive some economic benefit from the infringing activities of their subscribers, and thus shielding them from liability and allowing them to profit from this situation without imposing liability reaches an inequitable result.

However, after examining some of the cases legislated before and after the passage of the DMCA it becomes clear that a better method for discouraging online piracy and allocating liability is still required.

The decisions appeared to be inconsistent and left little certainty for service providers about what their liability would be for actions committed by subscribers. Congress had just passed the Commnications Decency Act, but its implementation was delayed until the courts could decide its constitutionality. Part of that law would eventually be held unconstitutional. See Reno v. ACLU, 000 U.S. 96-511 (1997). At that time, service provider liability for acts committed by users had implications only for commercial entities who were "in the business of" providing Internet access. These entities include online service providers - those who provide content through proprietary networks in addition to Internet access, which is provided through the same networks - and Internet service providers - those who provide direct access to the Internet and usually have content provided in a central location, often a Web site, that anyone can access.

The Act sets forth procedures that a copyright holder must follow in notifying an ISP of the presence of possibly infringing materials. In addition, the DMCA requires an ISP to formulate and implement a policy of notifying its subscribers of its policy to disconnect any user who infringes the copyrighted materials of another.

Napster claimed no participation in the choice of materials downloaded by its users. It also claimed that its system did not modify the content of the transmission. Finally, the Napster stressed that at no time during the transfer process were files copied. Thus, based on these reasons, Napster asserted that under the DMCA it could not be held liable for the infringing acts of users.

Under this category, Napster would have avoided liability only if complied with section 512 (c) of the DMCA. Thus, Napster would have been required to show that: (1) it did not have actual knowledge or awareness that the material or activity is infringing; and (2) upon obtaining such knowledge or awareness, acts expeditiously to remove, or disable access to, the material.

Second, Napster would have had to show that to the extent that it had the ability to control infringing activity, it did not receive a financial benefit directly attributable to the infringing activity. Finally, Napster would also have had to show that upon notification of claimed infringement, it responded expeditiously to remove, or disable access to, the material that was claimed to be infringing. Under this standard it is unlikely that Napster would have prevailed because even if Napster did not actually know of instances of copyright infringement, sufficient red flags were available to impute constructive knowledge of infringing activity, thereby disqualifying Napster from protection under the DMCA.

DMCA, an ISP is shielded from liability for copyright infringement arising from storing or displaying infringing material if it meets the following conditions. First, if after being notified of infringing material, the ISP shows that it did not have actual knowledge of the infringing material, or that it acted expeditiously to remove or disable the infringing material upon being informed of its presence. Second, the ISP must show that it did not receive a direct financial benefit from the infringing activity in cases where the IPS has the right and ability to control such activity.

As a result, there will probably be very few ISPs that would risk potential copyright infringement liability when they merely have to pull the plug on any pirate users on their systems. Moreover, by shifting the cost of policing the Internet to copyright holders, the DMCA effectively places the costs associated with policing the Internet on the parties more capable of doing so, namely, copyright holders.

Allowing people who did not create, develop, or contribute to the creation and development of new work to profit from the sale or distribution of the work is unfair to the original author or creator and is detrimental to the public interest in the encouraging the creation of new work.

It also controls the flow of information and commerce across continents, borders, and cultures. Private persons use the Internet for mundane simple tasks such as sending e-mail or to access their medical records at a pharmacy.

This would result in fewer Internet access options for the public and possibly higher connection fees, which would result in crippling this medium as a means for the free flow of information and commerce.

And it is this latter use of cookies that have web "surfers" and privacy advocates concerned and asking questions such as:  Whose hands are in my computer's cookie jar?  Do they not have to obtain my permission before collecting and analyzing my cookies?   What if I object to their collecting information I deem personal?  What extent of information do they have on me?  Is this not invasive to my privacy?

Cookies are also extremely beneficial to many web sites that depend on advertising, especially those offering free services, since these small files allow the sites to determine what advertisements are being clicked on and seen by users.[8] However, cookies are also used by entities other than the operator of the Web site visited.

A cookie file is NOT a secret way for a web server to find out everything about you and what you have on your hard drive. The ONLY way that any private information could be in your cookie file would be if you personally gave that information to a web server in the first place and it decided to put that information into your cookie file for some reason. Also, each cookie is marked with information about what web server it's for; Netscape Navigator does not send any cookies to any web server they're not for. There is absolutely no way for a web server to get access to any private information about you or your system through cookies. Also, there is no possible way that a virus could be spread through the use of cookies.

Despite the fact that cookies can enhance a user's internet experience,  internet privacy advocates object to cookies for a wide variety of reasons, especially today, with the increase of the Internet's usage.  While advocates of cookies point to their benefits - sites are able to collect information about your preferences and respond by providing information more tailored to your needs - privacy advocates allege everything from invasion of privacy to stalking.

Profile-based advertising marks a sharp departure from traditional business practices which allowed companies to advertise products and services and still permit consumers to retain some privacy. In the world of radio, television and print advertising, for example, information flowed freely from businesses to consumers but little personally identifiable information was ever collected. However, in the online arena, each ad viewing and consumer inquiry about a product may quickly become incorporated into a detailed profile that will remain hidden from the consumer.

And while this compilation of information, primarily intended for website design and the placement of banner advertisements, might only lead to a nuisance to most (i.e., increase in junk e-mail or snail-mail), there are more serious concerns for potential abuse. For example, while a web site's developing of highly detailed profiles of user search patterns may be harmless, the reselling of these profiles might prove a serious invasion of user privacy, potentially providing more about the user than normally provided to the traditional mail company, (i.e., your name and address if you purchase something) if any form of identification were linked to them.

The safety of personal information stored on the user's hard drive has also been of concern in the cookie debate.  Concerns have been raised about the possibility of cookies being written that would allow access to other information that the user has stored.  And while these concerns have been quelled by cookie experts as being impossible, security experts recently discovered a hole in Microsoft's Internet Explorer Web browser 5.5 and 6.0 - one which compromises personal user information.[21] The security vulnerability was made public November 9, 2001, by Online Solutions, a Finnish security company that decided to publicize it after Microsoft failed to do so.  The flaw, which Microsoft rated as a high risk, could allow an outsider to break into users' cookies and steal or alter information such as email account names, passwords, and credit card numbers.  Microsoft responded in its security bulletin, by stating, "An attacker could attempt to maliciously exploit this vulnerability by hosting a page with a maliciously crafted URL" and "[i]n addition, it is possible to alter the contents of the cookie.

Another concern is that much of the act of placing cookies on the user's computer is done without his consent.  Some may argue that since most browsers today enable a user to disable cookies completely or allow him to choose which ones to accept, not using this option is de facto consenting.  Furthermore, since multiples varieties of cookie blocking software is available today, by not utilizing such software, a consumer is consenting to being tracked by the cookies.

But how can the user make a conscious choice if he does not know cookies exist, what they do, or how they work?  And even if a browser may alert a user when he is being offered a cookie, the information in such an alert may tell him little about what is actually being stored.

There is little way to decipher what information is to be stored in these cookies, although presumably it would have recorded the site where the cookie was offered, what advertisement was currently on display, and whether or not the ad had been accessed.  And in addition to the cryptic nature of cookie alerts, it is not always clear from where the cookie is being sent, i.e. is the cookie coming from the ad-serving company or the website visited itself?  For example, in cookie alert above the "clubs.yahoo.com" server was clear, but on more crowded sites where multiple cookies are offered, the identity of the cookie may become blurred.

Another theoretical argument against requiring consent is the assumption of risk argument - consumers are assuming the risk that their online privacy could be attacked while engaging in an activity on the internet.  Further explained, a consumer has some form of notice of harm when a web site he visits identifies him and his preferences upon each subsequent visit to the site.  However, should a user assume that by merely surfing the web and visiting different sites he has in some way consented to having third parties rifle through his hard drive? Finally, assuming consent has been given, is a user, by allowing cookies on certain sites, granting a blanket authorization to an ad-serving company to accumulate different elements of data about him from several other different web sites, combine it, sift through it, and develop a highly detailed profile of him to be sold to any interested buyer?

Due to the many issues stated above, cookies have been a topic of controversy for a number of months both in the news and in and public discussions.  However, plaintiffs and privacy groups are now making their way into the courtroom arena and are asserting, based on decades-old laws (e.g., federal wiretapping and data-storage access laws), that cookies violate a person's online privacy by tracking and recording their movements.  The following are a few statutes that some plaintiffs are relying upon to assert their claims against these online marketers.

Under this act, a person is forbidden to access, obtain, or alter a computer or information therein without authorization. Protected computers include any computers used in interstate commerce or communications (essentially any computer connected to the Internet). Violations of this law carry both criminal and civil penalties (damages are limited to economic losses).

Congress passed this act in 1998 to protect the privacy of children under the age of thirteen, while they are surfing the web. It restricts the collection of the child's first and last name; home or other physical address; e-mail address; telephone number; and Social Security number. The Act also requires each web site operator to obtain verifiable parental consent before collecting, using, or disseminating any of the restricted information.

Some states such as Georgia have enacted laws that seem to address and prohibit the use of computers to access cookies without authorization.  Although, enacted in 1991 by the Georgia Legislature, GA St. 16-9-93, "Computer Crimes Defined; Exclusivity of Article; Civil Remedies, Criminal Penalties," does not seem to have been used by plaintiffs in asserting claims against web sites using cookies.[43] Nevertheless, Section 16-9-93(c) Entitled "Computer Invasion of Privacy," provides: "Any person who uses a computer or computer network with the intention of examining any employment, medical, salary, credit or any other financial or personal data relating to any other person with knowledge that such examination is without authority shall be guilty of the crime of computer invasion of privacy."  Civil remedies include recovery of damages and the cost of the suit; and criminal penalties consist of a fine not more than $50,000, or imprisonment not more than 15 years, or both.

Thus, if one fashions an argument that information such as names, email addresses, home and business addresses and telephone numbers is indeed personal, and companies' cookies are accessing this information, then one might seek to use this statute to impose civil remedies and/or criminal penalties against such companies or their representatives.

On March 1, 2000, the updated Data Protection Act 1998 went into effect and enabled individuals in the UK to take legal action against those who process data about them without their consent.[45] The legislation makes cookie technology illegal unless users are clearly told how the information is being used.

The court held that because DoubleClick-affiliated Web sites had granted DoubleClick permission to access the communications passing between the Web sites and the Web site users, DoubleClick's access to those communications was not unauthorized under the ECPA or Wiretap Act. Furthermore, the CFAA claims were dismissed because plaintiffs were unable to show the minimum amount of damages required ($5,000) for recovery under the statute.

This case too, involved the placement and accessing of cookies by a party known to the defendant, Intuit, Inc., a Web site operator.  Plaintiffs alleged that Intuit violated federal statutes when it placed cookies on Plaintiffs' hard drive upon their visiting a web site of Intuit, Quicken.com.[53] [54] As to the plaintiff's CFAA claim, the court, similar to the DoubleClick court, dismissed it because the plaintiff did not sufficiently allege facts showing the requisite amount of economic damages, $5000.  The court also dismissed the FWA claim because for the plaintiffs' failure to support the claim that the defendant intercepted e-communications for the purpose of committing a tortious or criminal act and failure to show that they suffered any damage.

However, the court allowed the ECPA claim to stand, finding the complaint sufficient to state a claim for unauthorized access to data on the plaintiffs' computers.  Additionally, the court rejected the defendant's contention that it was a "user of that service" under the statutory exception to the ECPA.  Rather, the court construed the "person" as the affected user, in contrast to the court in DoubleClick, which construed the relevant "entity" as the DoubleClick-affiliated Web site.

The plaintiffs alleged that the defendants violated their rights to free speech, due process, and equal protection based on the First and Fourteenth Amendments of the United States Constitution.  The publisher and editor of the "Putnam Pit," was denied access to a copy of the electronic computer files concerning information about parking tickets issued by the City and access to all cookie files in the City's computers in an attempt to show that City computers were used for purposes inconsistent with government functions.  The city disallowed the inspection request claiming that based on Microsoft's definition of a "cookie" file, a "cookie" is neither the property of the City nor a public record.[56] Finding for the defendant, the court stated that the city had a legitimate governmental interest and a rational basis for their decision and granted the defendants' motion for summary judgment on the plaintiffs' claims.

Defendant RealNetworks, Inc. under federal and common law, alleging trespass to property and violations of the ECPA and CFAA. When users downloaded RealNetworks' software, they were required to register with the company and as result, a cookie was placed on the their hard drive.

Plaintiffs claimed that RealNetworks' software products secretly allowed RealNetworks to access and intercept users' electronic communications and stored information without their knowledge or consent.  The plaintiffs sought "equitable and monetary relief; including an order to advise consumers whose confidential data has been disclosed; how to prevent further disclosure; the destruction of all data collected and shared; $10,000 in damages per class member; and reasonable attorney's fees."  The court granted RealNetworks' motion to stay the matter and enforce arbitration, finding that the End User License Agreement required arbitration of the dispute.

Here, the Plaintiff brought claims against Avenue A, an ad-serving company, alleging violations of the CFAA and the FWA due to Avenue A's use and placement of cookies on plaintiffs' computers.[59] The court dismissed the claims under the CFAA because the plaintiffs were unable to meet the threshold amount of damages ($5000) sustained as a result of Avenue A's actions.  The Plaintiffs' claims under the FWA were dismissed based on similar reasoning used in DoubleClick - because Avenue A's client web sites gave Avenue A permission to review the communications between those sites and the plaintiff users related to their use of the sites.

A Cook County, Illinois, State's Attorney filed suit on December 5, 2000, against Clearstation and Doubleclick alleging that the sites were misrepresenting their cookie policy and compromising consumer privacy rights.[60] The state contended that while Clearstation's investment analysis web site claims that long-term cookies would not be used, the site used cookies for up to one year and failed to disclose the use of cookies by third party advertisers in its privacy policy.

It was also contended that advertising technology provider DoubleClick's cookies use detailed information in an alphanumeric data stream that can be monitored for up to 30 years despite suggesting to consumers that its cookies were limited to generic information only.  Civil penalties of up to $50,000, changes in the defendant's cookies policies, and the deletion of improperly collected data were among the remedies sought.

While courts have thus far been able to pigeonhole new online privacy issues into existing laws, some groups still have argued for and proposed specific technology-independent laws to govern data collection, and use and disclosures of personal information on the Web.

Nevertheless, it is not surprising that advertisers and marketers have reacted defensively to proposed legislation that would limit the use of cookies on the Internet. The following are examples of the various proposed legislation.

This was a proposal set before the Internet Engineering Task Force establishing guidelines for the use of cookies by Web sites.[64] RFC 2109, in addition requiring the user be notified of the cookie, set forth certain circumstances under which cookies could be set and the information that they could contain.  RFC 2109.7.1 further provided that while a server could create a cookie to track the path of a user through the server, it must have given the user control over the cookies he deemed to be an intrusive accumulation of information.  Accordingly, advertisers objected to this proposal arguing that under this scheme, they would no longer be able to track browsers throughout a site, or through multiple websites served with banner advertising companies and create their user profiles.  Fortunately for the advertisers, browser manufacturers whom had been asked to redesign their software to reject cookies by default did not support RFC 2109 either.  Netscape and Microsoft Internet Explorer among some of the manufacturers, instead designed their software to allow users to reject cookies if they chose, leaving the default to accept cookies.

Rep. Gene Green, D-Texas, introduced this legislation that would require Web sites to obtain consumer consent before tracking visitors and to explain their privacy policies in non-legalese English.  On February 14, 2001, it was referred to the Subcommittee on Commerce, Trade, and Consumer Protection.  Specifically, if enacted, this act would require the Federal Trade Commission (FTC) to write regulations making it unlawful for an operator of a Web site or online service to collect, use, or disclose personal information concerning an individual (age 13 and above).  The operator or service would also be required to protect the confidentiality, security, and integrity of personal information collected from individuals. Furthermore, it would prohibit any Web site or Internet service provider (ISP) from allowing a third party to attach a cookie in order to develop a personal profile on an individual without allowing him to opt out first.  Finally, ISPs would be prohibited from selling transactional information as a means to satisfy creditors, without providing a process for individuals to opt-out of the disclosure of such information.

In July, 2001, the U.S. Senate introduced this legislation which, if passed, would require wireless technology providers to notify customers regarding their collection of information policies on collecting call-location data, specifically the types of information collected, the purposes for which it's used, how it's stored and who can access it. The providers also would be required to obtain prior customer consent before disclosing or selling such information.

Discontent with proposed legislation and the potential for litigation to shape the rules of online advertising, the industry has recently began attempting self-regulation by implementing privacy policies and third party privacy seals.  And while many companies have posted privacy policies on their sites, others have additionally, contracted with independent entities, such as TRUSTe, to monitor their compliance with their privacy policies.[68] TRUSTe, an independent, non-profit privacy organization designed to "build users' trust and confidence on the Internet," implements a privacy program, a "trustmark" to quell users' concerns over privacy and indicate Web sites' desire for self-regulated information disclosure standards.  The "trustmark," a seal awarded by TRUSTe to Web sites that adhere to established privacy principles and agree to oversight and consumer resolution processes, signifies to online users that the Web site will openly share, at a minimum, what personal information is being gathered, how it will be used, with whom it will be shared, and whether the user has an option to control its dissemination. Based on such disclosure, users can make informed decisions about whether or not to release their personally identifiable information (e.g. credit card numbers) to the Web site.

Department of Commerce "to develop a self-regulatory regime governing NAI companies and the practice of online preference marketing (OPM), which is sometimes called 'profiling.'" The purpose of this regime is twofold: first, to disclose to the general public their collective and respective data collection-and-use practices, and second, to allow consumers the ability to opt out of certain uses of the information they collect.

As legislation continues to develop, claims proceed against marketers and sites tout self-regulation as the answer, what can the user do to manage his cookies?  The following are a variety of ways that the user may proceed with caution while others are attempting to serve him cookies.  But user be warned: using software to combat cookies could also be self-defeating because without cookies, some sites might not operate effectively or cause difficulties in online shopping.

In addition to advice in many technical publications on the proper methods to delete cookie files, there are a plethora of software packages available on the internet, including shareware that are designed to allow a user's computer to automatically delete, reject or simply monitor cookies.  For more information see http://cookiecentral.com.

For example, a browser can provide the user's IP address and host name of the browser host, which can be used to determine what part of the world he lives in, what company she works for (if she browses from the office), and sometimes even her name.  To combat these problems and cookies, a user can surf anonymously with via anonymizing proxies.[73] Identical in most respects to ordinary Web proxies, these proxies accept users' requests for URLs, fetch the URLs from the remote servers, and return the documents to the user.  However, unlike ordinary proxies, these actively modify the outbound requests and inbound documents. On the outbound leg, identifying information such as cookies, referrers, and the user-agent field are deleted or forged. On the inbound leg, requests to set cookies and, optionally, other things that the user might not like, such as banner ads and JavaScript, are silently deleted. Some anonymizers even allow a user to set up a completely fictitious identity, complete with a functional but anonymous email address, to give to sites that request personal information.

If the user is truly concerned with online privacy and simply does not trust the cookie file in his browser, he can delete it anytime.  However, this process seems relatively futile given that the browser will create a new cookie during the user's next session.

Most browsers now come equipped with the ability to delete/reject cookies or warn the user of incoming cookies.  For example, Mozilla, the browser for Red Hat Linux (7.2) now has a "Cookie Manager" screen where the user can view the source and contents of all of the cookies on his system.[74] He can delete individual cookies as well as block specific (the block appears to block owners, not visited sites) sites from sending him cookies.

As with many issues involving the Internet today, cookies are a hotly debated topic - some want to bake them and others want to burn them. And although cookies have been in use behind the scenes for quite some time - years, in fact - Internet users have recently become more alert and knowledgeable about them and the Cookie Monster. Only time will tell if proposed legislation or self-regulation will allow cookies to remain a part of the Internet Landscape. Nevertheless, until that point, Internet users should be educated as to the nature of cookies, who uses them and for what purpose, and what their realistic privacy alternatives are. Until Internet privacy standards are adopted, an informed decision is the best option.

The Internet is an international system that contains no boundaries nor any centralized control over the content transmitted. Because its concept is a decentralized system of computer communication designed to withstand nuclear attack, the Internet is not capable of being controlled by any one organization or government. [2] Its structure allows individuals to transmit any type of information with few repercussions, and raises unique issues when computers can access other computers around the world in a matter of an instant.

This paper is intended to be an overview of the issues surrounding the international regulation of content on the Internet, and as such should be regarded as an illustration of the dynamics that affect internet governance as opposed to an in depth evaluation of every aspect of these issues.

The United States has explored various ways to regulate internet content including self regulation, application of existing laws re: obscenity to the Internet, and adoption of the new laws to regulate internet content.

Decency Act (CDA) to specifically combat obscenity and pornography on the internet. [5] The CDA was an attempt to criminalize online communications that were legal in other media, specifically communications that might be deemed "indecent" or "patently offensive" to minors. The day after President Clinton signed the bill into law, a lawsuit was filed to contest its constitutionality under the First Amendment.

Therefore, in Germany, the rights to free speech can be overridden if their exercise is considered a threat to Germany's fundamental constitutional structure against totalitarianism. While Germany is also concerned with pornographic content on the Internet, it also has a significant concern regarding the availability of pro-Nazi material.

Singapore wants to be the "information technology hub" for Asia, but, through regulation, wants to rid the net of content that "threatens public order and national security, religious and racial harmony, and morality."

Law (ECBL) establishing the Information & Communications Ethics Office, which has broad powers to censor. Its censor powers includes material on bulletin board services, chat rooms and other public domain services that "encroach on public morals," "may harm youths' character, emotions and the sense of value," and "may cause a loss of national sovereignty."

ISPs are required to give its members reasonable information and tools to make an informed decision about filtering. The Act also requires ISPs to remove or block objectionable material from Australian sites and to block access to similar sites overseas, or face heavy fines.

This year, Afghanistan's ruling Taliban movement banned the use of the internet and ordered religious police to punish users according to Islamic law. [37] Taliban leader Mullah Mohammad Omar indicated that only his headquarters in Kandahar would be allowed access to the Internet and would screen all material posted by government departments. The ban was reportedly enacted to stop access to vulgar, immoral and anti-Islamic material. [38] After the War on Terrorism, it will be interesting to see what Internet regulations are in store for Afghanistan in the near future.

As you can see, every country has its own set of values and its own specific approach to regulation. Currently, a universal model for Internet regulation does not exist. The following are various methods employed throughout the world to regulate Internet content.

To prevent transmission of undesirable content, some governments stall the material in transit. Censors then scan the content for terms or displays previously defined as undesirable and block such content from being transmitted to the Internet user. This requires the ISP to use only government provided phone lines and to register with the government. Internet traffic is routed through gateways where police monitor transmissions and block access to specific banned sites. This method of censorship can cause significant delays and impede access to and flow of information, creating a block for nations wanting to use the Internet for technological advantage.

Commentators have described the use of PICS as merely privatizing Internet censorship. "The only difference between government regulation and a private rating system under PICS is who is deciding what we see. With PICS, there is increased danger because the government can be held accountable under the constitution but a private party may not be held to as high a standard.

Under such regulation, many countries would be banned from the free exchange of information, ideas and messages that are valuable to the progress of society. [58] With varying governmental concerns and interests, coming up with a global regulation strategy would be a nearly impossible task.

An Multinational approach is based on the premise that all nations agree that some form of Internet regulation is necessary to reduce intolerable information on the internet. The Multinational approach would first create an international committee to design a flexible regulatory structure - one that would recognize the varying degrees of national regulation.

The framework of this approach would consist of a governmental agency working in concert with ISPs. [59] Each country's government would chose the level of regulation based on its value system. The ISP would block sites at a government's request, it would not be responsible to censor. This approach focuses on what the Internet user is offered.

One commentator from the Munich summit reported that "the conference was divided evenly between the European view that the Internet is to be policed by traditional authorities in accordance with the laws applying locally, and the American position that market-driven solutions should be permitted time to develop." [65] An acceptable international solution is not likely to emerge quickly.

Internet activities have in some cases been the sole basis for findings of jurisdiction by foreign sovereigns, resulting in a departure from traditional geographical restrictions on jurisdiction. Jurisdiction is defined as a "government's general power to exercise authority over all persons and things within its territory; a court's power to decide a case or issue a decree; a geographic area within which political or judicial authority may be exercised." [67] The geographical references in this definition seem to be contrary to the eroding effect Internet cases have had on jurisdiction based on geographical boundaries.

Third, passive Web sites make information available to whoever may be interested including those in foreign jurisdictions. They typically do not have interactive components and therefore do not establish personal jurisdiction.

Jurisdiction is often asserted for the first category of cases, the second category of cases is where the split in the courts exists and for the third category of cases jurisdiction is rarely asserted. Even with this "sliding scale" in place the difficult distinction between active and passive activities has resulted in ambiguous jurisdictional law coming from these cases. While lower courts tend to agree that creating and hosting a web site is not sufficient activity to establish general jurisdiction across the country, they disagree on whether the presence of and disputes arising from a web site sufficiently establish specific jurisdiction.

The US has recently enacted legislation to protect activities of ISPs indicating a trend toward ISP protection. This is achieved by categorizing the individual functions of an ISP so that the activity can be deemed either active or passive. [78] This assists courts in determining where the conduct fits in the "sliding scale".

International law, which has established prescriptive, adjudicative and enforcement jurisdiction standards, has also been challenged by the intricacies of the Internet. [79] Traditionally, European exercise of jurisdiction has not been as encompassing of non-residents as the United States use of long arm statutes to establish jurisdiction.

Based on the varying national values and regulation methods as well as the unsettled jurisdictional issues, it is unlikely that there will ever be one universal model for regulating the Internet. It has been argued that there should not be because one universal model could not adequately protect the interests of countries with opposing values on access and limitation to access of content via the Internet. There is also concern that if any single country were to take unilateral action, the vitality and freedom of the Internet would be jeopardized.

Alternately, an argument has been made for instituting a separate and unique jurisdiction for "cyberspace" with its own set of global values, regulations and laws. The fact remains that global electronic communications have created new spaces which bind users around the world and which require the evolution of distinct and new rule sets.

The CDA criminalized the knowing transmission of obscene or indecent material to any recipient under the age of 18, as well as the sending or displaying of patently offensive material in a manner that is available to a person under the age of 18.

Taliban leader Mullah Mohammad Omar said his headquarters in Kandahar was the only authority allowed to access the technology. Only a tiny fraction of Afghanistan's 21 million people has access to telephones, so the ban will make no difference to most people. The Taliban has also banned television, cinema and music under its unique law aimed at creating a pure Mohammadan state free of non-Islamic influence.

Patients, notes with the tremendous growth of gambling opportunities in the  last several years and access to computers available to children, steps  should be taken to protect them from easily accessible virtual casinos.

With its boarderless nature,  gambling over the Internet has presented difficult jurisdictional questions  and uncertainty over what types of Internet business activities are sufficient  to allow a state to assert personal jurisdiction.

Inc. MasterCard International, Inc., and other credit cards and issuing banks,  alleging, among other things, that the debt she incurred was unenforceable and void as an illegal contract, and that the credit cards and banks had participated   in and profited from unfair business practices.

The question in this case is whether a forum selection clause mandating that claims be brought in Virginia should be applied to appellant's purported class action involving consumers' attempts to register for and use Verizon Internet Services, Inc.'s ("VIS") digital subscriber line ("DSL") service.

We hold that enforcement of this clause is reasonable and that  all of appellant's claims fall within the scope of the clause.   Consequently, we affirm the trial court's order dismissing appellant's suit.

According to appellant, activating the DSL service involved a period of lengthy delays.   Once the service was activated, "customers have experienced frequent and lengthy disruptions in service, and the service has operated at speeds much lower than promised."   Appellant himself alleges that he signed up for DSL service in August 2000 and was promised activation would occur on August 14, 2000.   However, he never actually received the service on that date or afterwards and finally canceled the service in December 2000.

To become DSL subscribers, customers must agree to all the terms of the Agreement, including the forum selection clause.   The clause is found in the final section of the main text of the Agreement, which, when printed out, totals thirteen pages (including two lengthy appendices).

Appellant contends that he would be deprived of his day in court because of his inability to file a class action in Virginia.   According to appellant, each person's damages are likely to be so small that the cost of litigating an individual claim in Virginia would exceed the claim's potential value.   Only through a class action, appellant argues, will customers such as himself have a viable option for seeking relief from VIS' alleged misconduct.

The trial court agreed with appellant that the forum selection clause's reach was unclear.   It noted that the choice of law provision preceding the forum selection clause dealt only with the Agreement,   [FN16]  while the limitations provision following encompassed all claims related to the Service.

Noting that "the [forum selection clause] itself does not define the scope of its applicability," the trial court concluded that, based on the surrounding language, the clause could reasonably be interpreted as applying only to disputes concerning the Agreement or as applying to all claims between the parties.

"[F]orum selection clauses enhance contractual and economic predictability, while conserving judicial resources and benefitting commercial entities as well as consumers."   Booker, supra,  781 So.2d at 424-25.    While they will not be held applicable when enforcement is unreasonable or the claims in question are beyond the clause's scope, no such circumstances are present here.

Plaintiff David DeJohn ("DeJohn") tried to purchase certain domain names for $50 each from defendant The .TVCorporation, International (".TV") by going though defendant Register.com, Inc. ("Register.com"), which is a domain name registrar.  A "domain name" is another term for an internet address, and a "domain name registrar" is an entity that sponsors domain name applications.

FN3.  The choice of law provision of the Register.com Agreement provided that an applicant's "rights and obligations and all actions contemplated by [the Agreement] shall be governed by the laws of the United States of America and the State of New York, as if the Agreement was a contract wholly entered into and wholly performed within the State of New York." In addition, the Agreement provided that, "with respect to any dispute over [the applicant's] domain name registration, any action to enforce [the Agreement] or any matter relating to ... use of the Register.com site shall be brought exclusively in the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York, or if there is no jurisdiction in such court, then in a state court in New York County."

As a term and condition of the Register.com Agreement, DeJohn was also required to agree to the terms of the .TV Registration and Services Agreement (".TV Agreement"), which was incorporated by reference.   [FN4]   The .TV Agreement contained a choice of law clause indicating that California law would apply to any dispute under the contract and a forum selection clause requiring any suit arising from the contract to be brought in a federal or state court in Los Angeles, California.

Agreement stated that the contract was "governed by the laws of the State of California."  Additionally, the Agreement provided that an applicant consents  "to the exclusive jurisdiction of the federal or state court in Los Angeles  County, California ... for any and all claims or disputes against"

Shortly after DeJohn submitted his applications, Register.com sent him e-mail messages indicating that he had successfully registered the requested domain names.  These messages were sent in error, as Register.com was unable to register five of the six domain names requested by DeJohn for $50 each.

Upon receiving notice of the rejections from .TV, and within 72 hours of  DeJohn's submission of his applications, Register.com notified DeJohn that his applications were unsuccessful and refunded his money.

DeJohn asserts that an implied contract was created when Register .com accepted his offer to register the domain names at $50 each.  He contends that this implied contract--not the Register.com Agreement--governs his relationship  with Register.com. He then argues that Register.com breached this implied  contract when it failed to register the requested domain names.

On the other hand, Register.com maintains that the Register.com Agreement became effective when DeJohn clicked the box on its website indicating that he read, understood and agreed to its terms.  Thus, Register.com argues that  the written Register.com Agreement, and not any alleged implied contract, governs its relationship with DeJohn.  Register.com also asserts that, even if some  sort of an implied contract existed, it does not supercede the written Register .com Agreement because the Register.com Agreement contains an integration clause.

Since DeJohn has not alleged a breach of the actual Register.com Agreement itself, Register.com contends that his breach of contract claim fails to state a claim upon which relief may be granted.  In addition, Register.com asserts that the claims against it should proceed in the Southern District of New York pursuant to the contract's forum selection clause and thus moves for dismissal under  Fed.R.Civ.P. 12(b)(3)  based on improper venue.

Before the court can address the merits of these arguments, it must first determine what law governs this diversity action.  According to Register.com, New York law applies because the Register .com Agreement contained a binding choice of law clause.   [FN6]   DeJohn argues that choice of law in the contract must yield to the law of the forum state, and relies exclusively on Illinois law to support his claims.

DeJohn asserts that Register.com violated an implied duty of good faith  and fair dealing.  As noted above, DeJohn argues that an implied contract to this effect was created when Register.com accepted his domain name registration applications.  Register.com maintains, however, that when DeJohn submitted the five domain name applications at issue in this case, he agreed to be bound solely by the terms of the Register.com Agreement.

In addition, the contract expressly provides that it is the "exclusive agreement" between the parties which could not be modified by DeJohn "except by means of a written document signed by both [DeJohn] and an authorized representative of Register.com." As no such document was ever executed, DeJohn's implied contract argument fails.

L.Ed.2d 622 (1991)  (upholding a preprinted forum selection clause in part because  the plaintiff "retained the option of rejecting the contract with impunity").   DeJohn cannot get out of the contract now simply because he regrets his decision.  Accordingly, the court finds that the Register.com Agreement is a valid and enforceable contract.

In support of his claim that the Register.com Agreement conflicts with the .TV Agreement, DeJohn notes that Register.com's choice of New York law means that it irreparably conflicts with the choice of California law provision in the .TV contract.  In its brief, .TV offers to solve this problem by stipulating to the use of New York law.  Although the court appreciates .TV's efforts to simplify the choice of law issue, a party may not unilaterally change the terms of the contract for ease of subsequent litigation. Nevertheless, the conflict is not enough to jettison the entire Register.com contract since  the court can easily apply New York law to disputes about the Register.com contract and apply California law to disputes about the .TV contract.

Next, DeJohn argues that the Register.com Agreement is inapplicable because Register.com's allegedly wrongful acts fell outside the scope of the contract.  The Register.com Agreement encompasses "any errors, omissions or any other actions by any registry administrator arising out of or related to [an] application for and registration of, renewal of, or failure to register or renew a particular domain name."  In addition, the contract provides that "Register.com cannot guarantee that [an applicant] will be able to register or renew a desired domain name, even if an inquiry indicates that domain name is available, since Register.com cannot know with certainty ... whether there are  inaccuracies or errors in the ... registration or renewal process."  The plain language of the contract shows that Register.com expressly reserved the right to refuse to process a domain name application in the event of an error, including an error as to price.  Therefore, DeJohn's claims plainly fall within the scope of the contract.

DeJohn admits that the Register.com Agreement expressly provides that it supercedes all prior agreements, but argues that it does not address subsequent agreements between the parties.  He notes that the Register.com's e- mail confirmation messages indicated that a copy of the Register.com Agreement was attached, but that Register.com failed to attach the agreement.  Thus, DeJohn reasons that a "blank agreement" negated the Register.com Agreement so, in fact, there is no contract.  This is a creative but unsuccessful argument.  The Register.com Agreement plainly states that it "may not be modified ...  except by means of a written document" signed by both parties.

Register.com contends that venue in Illinois is improper based on the forum selection clause in the Register.com Agreement.  For a forum selection clause to be effective, the language delineating the choice of forum must be "mandatory rather than permissive."   See  Jockey Int'l, Inc.,  217 F.Supp.2d at 451.   Mandatory forum selection clauses are presumptively valid and must be enforced unless it is unreasonable under the circumstances.

Because the contract is valid and the forum selection clause is enforceable, venue in this judicial district is not proper.  When a case is brought in a district in which venue does not lie, the court may dismiss it or transfer the case to any district or division in which it could have been brought.

Because the court can readily address the merits of the other counts directed  at the defendants and has already familiarized itself with them, it will further judicial efficiency for this court to resolve those claims now instead of transferring this entire matter to New York. Accordingly, Register.com's motion to dismiss Count I (breach of contract) for lack of venue pursuant to  Rule 12(b)(3)  is granted without prejudice  to refiling it in the Southern District of New York. The court will thus not consider Register.com's alternative motion to dismiss this count for failure to state a claim upon which relief may be granted.

The court has already concluded that the Register.com Agreement was a valid and enforceable contract.  That contract expressly incorporated the .TV Agreement by reference.  Thus, the .TV Agreement is part of the Register.com Agreement and can potentially bind the parties.

According to .TV, DeJohn cannot get his domain names for $50 each because the .TV Agreement explicitly provided that the contract is "not effective until accepted by us.  We may accept or reject this Agreement for any reason, in our sole discretion."  Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement, "acceptance" means "registration of the domain name in .TV's registry or e-mail registration confirmation from .TV. The right to reject registration of a particular domain name is retained by .TV for thirty (30) days from receipt of payment."

In an effort to get around the contract's clear language, DeJohn claims that there was an implied contract requiring .TV to give him the domain names  at the price listed by Register.com. Even if the .TV Agreement was inapplicable--which  is not the case--the elements of an implied contract do not exist here..TV  did not offer to register the requested domain names at the fees listed on  the Register.com website.  At best, DeJohn made an offer, which .TV promptly  rejected.  A contract, express or implied, requires an offer and acceptance,  meeting of the minds, and payment of consideration.

In his brief opposing .TV's motion to dismiss, DeJohn for the first time argues that Register.com is .TV's apparent agent.  On this basis, he seeks to hold .TV responsible for Register.com's actions.  A party may not amend his complaint in a brief in opposition to a motion to dismiss.

The plain language of the .TV Agreement directly contradicts any inference  that .TV meant to give Register.com the authority to enter into a contract on its behalf.  To read the contract in the strained way suggested by DeJohn would require the court to ignore large chunks of unambiguous contractual language.  In addition, .TV did not accept any benefits of the contract between DeJohn and Register.com. Instead, .TV promptly rejected the domain name applications submitted by Register.com.

DeJohn concedes that the term "consumer" does not include persons who purchase merchandise for resale.  Nevertheless, he contends that his complaint did not allege that he intended to resell the domain names at issue in this case.  The complaint belies this assertion, as it seeks damages in the form of "potential lost sales and profits."  Complaint at  25.  The court is not required to ignore facts in the complaint that undermine the plaintiff's claim.   See  Scott v. O'Grady,  975 F.2d at 368.   The only logical way of reading the claim for damages based on potential lost sales is to construe it  as a claim for damages based on potential lost sales of the domain names. DeJohn is thus not a consumer and lacks standing to pursue a claim based on the Illinois Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Practices Act.

In any event, even if DeJohn was somehow protected by the statute, he still cannot prevail.  The alleged deception was the advertising of domain names to consumers for an incorrect price.  To the extent that the advertising was incorrect, it was done by Register.com, not .TV. DeJohn has not alleged that . TV advertised the domain names at $50 each, and any such allegation would be at odds with the fact that DeJohn was attempting to purchase the names through an Internet domain name registrar, not .TV directly.  Thus, DeJohn's claim against .TV for violation of the Illinois Consumer Fraud and  Deceptive Practices Act is dismissed with prejudice.

In his complaint, DeJohn alleges that he was confused when he received confirmation that he had registered the requested domain names but then was notified that his attempt to register those names was unsuccessful.

The allegations in DeJohn's complaint do not show a unity of interest between VeriSign and .TV. DeJohn does not allege that he had any direct dealings with VeriSign.  Instead, he merely identifies VeriSign as the corporate parent  of . TV and concludes that VeriSign exerts operational control over the sale  and distribution of .TV domain names.  On this tenuous basis, DeJohn asserts  that VeriSign is liable for breach of contract and violation of the Illinois  Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Practices Act and the Uniform Deceptive Trade  Practices Act.

Because the complaint does not contain any allegations subjecting VeriSign to potential liability other than the fact that it is .TV's parent, the claims   against VeriSign cannot survive a motion to dismiss.  In addition, any such claims would fail on the merits for the same reasons that DeJohn's claims against .TV failed.  The claims against VeriSign are, therefore, dismissed with prejudice.

Pollstar alleges that it created and developed up-to-the-day time sensitive concert information that was published daily on its web site-- www.pollstar.com--at great time and expense to itself.   Complaint,  5. By accessing the pollstar.com web site, an Internet user can download and use the timely and  up-to-date concert information pursuant to conditions of a license agreement.

Complaint,  8.   [FN1]   Pollstar alleges that Gigmania downloaded pollstar.com from the Internet and placed information that is copied from the pollstar.com web site on its web site at  www.gigmania.com.

Any duplication, transmission by any method, or storage in an information retrieval system of any part of this publication for purposes other than those stated above is strictly prohibited without the specific written permission of the publisher.   This includes, but is not limited to, transcription into any form of computer system for audio text, print or visual retrieval.   All rights under federal copyright laws and laws applicable to this License Agreement including any legal and injunctive relief will be strictly enforced.

Pollstar alleges that defendant has been appropriating Plaintiff's property and has therefore been engaging in unfair trade practices and unfair competition against Plaintiff to its irreparable harm.   Id.  at  23-24.

Finally, Pollstar alleges a breach of contract claim.   It alleges that any user of its pollstar.com web site is immediately confronted with a notice that use of the web site is subject to a license agreement, which is set forth on the web site.   Id.  at  26.   Pollstar states that by clicking on the access button to retrieve any of the information contained in the web site, Defendant agreed to be bound by the terms of the License Agreement.   Id.  at 27. Pollstar further alleges that since March 9, 2000 and before, Defendant has downloaded concert information from Plaintiff's web site and used the information for commercial purposes in breach of the contract.   Id.  at  28.   Finally, Plaintiff alleges that it has been harmed by Defendant's use of its information because it has lost sales of the information to commercial purchasers.   Id.  at  29.

Under  Federal Rule Evidence 201(d) , the court shall take judicial notice of adjudicative facts if requested by a party and supplied with the necessary information.  "A judicially noticed fact must be one not subject to reasonable dispute in that it is either (1)generally known within the territorial jurisdiction of the trial court or (2) capable of accurate and ready determination by resort to sources whose accuracy cannot reasonably be questioned."   Fed.R.Evid.

In the present case, some of the contents of the pollstar.com web site were alleged in the complaint.   In particular, the license agreement and its notice is mentioned in the Complaint.   Moreover, neither party disputes the web site's authenticity.   Therefore, the court can and does consider the pollstar.com web site in determining Gigmania's  Rule 12(b)(6)  motion.    [FN2]   The court need not consider whether a printout of a web site as that site existed on July 9, 2000 is "generally known" and "capable of accurate and  ready determination by resort to sources whose accuracy cannot reasonably be questioned."

FN2.  Pollstar is correct in stating that the printout of the pollstar.com web site provided by Gigmania to the Court did not exist at the time the Complaint was filed because the content of the web site is updated periodically by Pollstar.   However, Pollstar does not refute Gigmania's contention that the license agreement notice was in small gray text on a gray background.

These cases do not consider whether pleadings from an unpublished district court case can be judicially noticed.   Because there is no authority for judicial notice of pleadings in an unrelated case, the court declines to take judicial notice of the  Ticketmaster  pleadings.

With respect to the Copyright Office Circular 66, the court takes judicial notice of the circular.   Circular 66 informs the public that it can apply for copyright registration of online works made available over a communications network such as the Internet.   The Copyright Office Circular 66 is "generally known" and "capable of accurate and ready determination by resort to sources whose accuracy cannot reasonably be questioned" because it is contained in the United States Copyright Office.

Defendant acknowledges that Pollstar has pled sufficiently that it has collected information at some cost and that Gigmania is a direct competitor.   However, Gigmania contends that concert information is not highly time sensitive hot news as a matter of law. Furthermore, Gigmania argues that Pollstar has failed to effectively allege facts showing Gigmania is a free- rider whose activities threaten the existence of Pollstar's services.

Although the defendant is correct is stating that there is no case that has held that information of the kind at issue is protectable as "hot news," the court declines to decide this issue at the present time.

With respect to Pollstar's allegation that Gigmania is free-rider and that the free-riding threatened the existence of Pollstar's services, the Complaint pled sufficient  facts to support that allegation.

The Complaint alleges that Gigmania copied false concert information from the pollstar.com web site.   The Complaint also asserts that Pollstar profits from its activities.   Therefore, the Court concludes that Pollstar's common law misappropriation claim was pled with sufficiency as a "hot news" claim.

A state law cause of action is preempted by the Copyright Act if two elements are present.   First, the rights that a plaintiff asserts under state law must be 'rights that are equivalent' to those protected by the Copyright Act. Second, the work involved must fall within the 'subject matter' of the Copyright Act set forth in  17 U.S.C.

FN3.  In addition, Pollstar argues that its allegations set forth a claim of reverse palming off, thereby furnishing the "extra element" required to save the unfair competition claim from preemption.   However, Pollstar never specifically alleged a reverse palming off claim in its Complaint.

Express reverse palming off occurs when one party purchases or otherwise obtains a second party's goods, removes the second party's name, and then markets the product under its own name.   A defendant may also be  guilty of reverse palming off by selling or offering for sale another's product  that has been modified slightly and then labeled with a different name.

Gigmania contends that the breach of contract claim fails as a matter of law because Pollstar cannot allege the required contract element of mutual consent.   Viewing the web site, the court agrees with the defendant that many visitors to the site may not be aware of the license agreement.   Notice of the license agreement is provided by small gray text on a gray background.

In reaching its conclusion, the  ProCD  court considered transactions where the consumer purchases prior to getting the detailed terms of the contract.  Id.  at 1450.    The court noted that an insurance buyer remits the premium prior to getting the policy.   Id.  Likewise, a traveler pays for airplane ticket before she receives it and is bound by the terms of the ticket.

Id.  The court pointed out that "to use the ticket is to accept the terms, even terms that in retrospect are disadvantageous."   Id.  Similarly, the concert goer purchases a ticket that states that the patron agrees not to record the concert;  to attend is to agree.   Id.  Although it could be arranged so that every patron must sign this promise before purchasing the ticket, it would raise the prices, lengthen the ticket lines and prevent purchase of tickets by  phone or Internet.   Id.

In the present case, Pollstar alleges that users of the concert information are bound by the license agreement.   This license agreement is not set forth  on the homepage but is on a different web page that is linked to the homepage.  However, the visitor is alerted to the fact that "use is subject to license  agreement" because of the notice in small gray print on gray background. Since the text is not underlined, a common Internet practice to show an active link, many users presumably are not aware that the license agreement is linked to the homepage.   In addition, the homepage also has small blue text which when clicked on, does not link to another page.   This may confuse visitors who may then think that all colored small text, regardless of color, do not link the homepage to a different web page.

While the court agrees with Gigmania that the user is not immediately confronted with the notice of the license agreement, this does not dispose of Pollstar's breach of contract claim.   The court hesitates to declare the invalidity and unenforceability of the browse wrap license agreement at this time.   Taking into consideration the examples provided by the Seventh Circuit--showing that people sometimes enter into a contract by using a service without first seeing the terms--the browser wrap license agreement may be arguably valid and enforceable.

Plaintiff Register.com is one of over fifty domain name registrars for customers who wish to register a name in the .com, .net, and .org top-level domains.   As a registrar it contracts with these second-level domain ("SLD") name holders and a registry, collecting registration data about the SLD holder and submitting zone file information for entry in the registry database.   In addition to its domain name registration services, Register.com offers to its customers, both directly and through its more than 450 co-branded and private label partners, a variety of other related services, such as (i) web site creation tools;  (ii) web site hosting;  (iii) electronic mail;  (iv) domain name hosting;  (v) domain name forwarding, and (vi) real-time domain name management.   Register .com has invested over $15 million dollars in equipment, software, service fees, and human resources in designing, developing, and maintaining its website and the computer systems necessary to host Register.com's Internet-based services.  ( See  Gardos Decl.  6). It has also spent in excess of $25 million on advertising and brand promotion in the year 2000 alone, including through print, radio, and television media.

In order to give its customers control over their receipt of commercial solicitations, Register.com provides them with the opportunity to "opt-in" during the domain name registration process to receiving sales and marketing communications from Register.com or its co-brand or private label partners.

Customers who do not opt-in to such communications are not solicited by Register.com or its co-brands.   Significantly, Register.com's co-brand and private label partners have contracted with Register.com for the right to have  their services featured on the  www.register.com  website.  ( See  Mornell Decl.  18).

Defendant Verio is one of the largest operators of web sites for businesses and a leading provider of comprehensive Internet services. Although not a registrar of domain names, Verio directly competes with Register.com and its partners to provide registration services and a variety of other Internet services including website hosting and development.   Verio recently made a multimillion dollar investment in its computer system and facilities for its expanded force of telephone sales associates in its efforts to "provide recent domain name registration customers with the services they need, at the time they need them."  (Eden Decl.  31).

In providing query-based public access to registration data as required by Sections II.F.1 and II.F.4, Registrar shall not impose terms and conditions on use of the data provided except as permitted by ICANN-adopted policy.   Unless and until ICANN adopts a different policy, Registrar shall permit use of data it provides in response to queries  for any lawful purposes except to:   (a)  allow, enable, or otherwise support the transmission of mass unsolicited, commercial advertising or solicitations via e-mail (spam);   or (b) enable high  volume, automated, electronic processes that apply to Registrar (or its systems).

By submitting a WHOIS query, you agree that you will use this data only for lawful purposes  and that,  under no circumstances will you use this data to:  (1)  allow, enable, or otherwise support the transmission of mass unsolicited, commercial advertising or solicitations  via direct mail , electronic mail,  or by telephone ;   or (2) enable high volume, automated, electronic processes that apply to Register.com (or its systems).   The compilation, repackaging, dissemination or other use of this data is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Register.com.

To the extent that Register.com is using this legend to restrict otherwise  lawful use of the data for mass unsolicited, commercial advertising or solicitations by direct mail or telephone (and not just by electronic mail), it is ICANN's position that Registrar.com (sic) has failed to comply with the promise it made in Section II.F.5 of the Registrar Accreditation Agreement.

In late 1999, to better target their marketing and sales efforts toward customers in need of web hosting services and to reach those customers more quickly, Verio developed an automated software program or "robot."    [FN4]  With its search robot, Verio accessed the WHOIS database maintained by the accredited registrars, including Register.com, and collected the contact information of customers who had recently registered a domain name.   Then, despite the marketing prohibitions in Register.com's terms of use, Verio utilized this data in a marketing initiative known as Project Henhouse and began to contact and solicit Register.com's customers, within the first several days after their registration, by e-mail, regular mail, and telephone.

FN4.  Before the development of its search robot, Verio relied primarily on banner and print ads, and briefly on predictive dialing in its  marketing efforts.   Under the predictive dialing approach, Verio purchased potential customer leads, then contacted those leads by telephone, using a computer dialer and connecting the call to a telemarketer when a potential customer answered.  (See Ayers Depo. at 33-34, 75-76).

In general, the process worked as follows:  First, each day Verio downloaded, in compressed format, a list of all currently registered domain names, of all registrars, ending in .com, .net, and .org. That list or database is maintained by Network Solutions, Inc. ("NSI") and is published on 13 different "root zone" servers.   The registry list is updated twice daily and provides the domain name, the sponsoring registrar, and the nameservers for all registered names. Using a computer program, Verio then compared the newly downloaded NSI registry with the NSI registry it downloaded a day earlier in order to isolate the domain names that had been registered in the last day and the names that had been removed.   After downloading the list of new domain names, only then was a search robot used to query the NSI database to extract the name of the accredited registrar of each new name.

Register.com continued to get complaints about e-mail and telephone solicitations by Verio from its customers and co-brand partners through January.   In March 2000 Gaviser again contacted Eden to complain that Register.com was still receiving numerous complaints, including that a number of telephone messages similar to the following were left with Register.com customers:  "This is [name of telemarketer] calling from Verio regarding the registration of [customer's domain name].   Please contact me at your earliest convenience."  (Ex. 44 to Pl.'s Sept. 8, 2000 Motion).

Register.com complained generally that the use of its mark as well as the timing of the solicitations was harming its good will and specifically warned Verio that it was violating the terms of use it had agreed to in submitting its WHOIS queries by sending "mass unsolicited, commercial advertising or solicitations via e-mail (spam)."  (Ex. E to McPherson Decl.).

This dispute centers on both Verio's end use of the WHOIS data and its use of the automated search robot.   While Register.com acknowledges its obligation to  provide public access to its customers' contact information, it has developed "terms of use" which prohibit third parties, such as Verio, from using the contact information for any mass marketing purpose--whether by e-mail, regular mail or telephone.   Register.com also argues that the use of automated software to access the WHOIS database violates its terms of use and harms its computer systems.

Verio admits both the use of the WHOIS data for marketing purposes and the use of the search robot.   Verio also concedes that its end use of the information violates the marketing restriction imposed by Register.com, but argues that this restriction should not be enforced because-- at a minimum--direct mail and telephone marketing are permissible uses under the terms of the Accreditation Agreement Register.com signed with ICAAN.

FN6.  Verio contests Register.com's assertion that its particular use of e-mail to solicit Register.com's customers constitutes the "spamming" that is prohibited by the ICANN agreement.   The Court need not determine  whether Verio' e-mails constitute "spam" because it is Register.com's terms of use, rather than ICANN's, that are at issue here.   Register.com's terms do not specifically prohibit "spam", but rather simply prohibit the use of WHOIS data for mass, unsolicited e-mail.   Verio's e-mails clearly violate Register.com's terms of use.   Verio's unsolicited e-mail solicitations are "mass" by any definition of the term.   Even though the e-mails are not sent simultaneously with one mouse click, as Verio argues, they are sent in massive quantities over a short period of time, and thus fit the definition of "mass" e-mails.

The purpose of a preliminary injunction is to keep the parties, while the suit is pending, as much as possible in the respective positions they occupied when the suit began and to preserve the Court's ability to render a meaningful  decision after a trial on the merits.

Register.com imposes conditions on the access to and end use of data contained in its WHOIS database.   It publishes those terms of use on the home page of its Internet website and conditions entry into the WHOIS database on assent to those terms.   As noted above, Verio concedes that it violated Register.com's posted restriction on the use of WHOIS data for direct mail and telephone marketing purposes.   Verio contends however that violating  Register.com's restrictions on the use of WHOIS data for marketing purposes did not constitute a breach of contract for two reasons.   First, Verio argues that the promises Register.com made to ICANN in the Agreement have created a privilege in Verio to access the WHOIS database, and that it may interpose the Agreement as a defense to any claim by Register .com that Verio violated an access or use restriction broader than those permitted in the Accreditation Agreement.

One who has a right to the use of a facility of a public utility is  privileged to make any reasonable use of the chattels of the utility that is or is reasonably believed to be necessary to the enjoyment of the facility.

A privately owned and operated business ... which is engaged in regularly supplying the public with some commodity or service which is of public consequence [and] need ... The test for determining if a concern is a  public utility is whether it has held itself out as ready, able and willing to serve the public.

Register.com's terms of use.  Register.com's terms of use are clearly posted on its website.   The conclusion of the terms paragraph states "[b]y submitting this query, you agree to abide by these terms."  (Ex. 27 to Pl.'s Sept. 8, 2000 Motion).   Verio does not argue that it was unaware of these terms, only that it was not asked to click on an icon indicating that it accepted the terms.   However, in light of this sentence at the end of Register.com's terms of use, there can be no question that by proceeding to submit a WHOIS query, Verio manifested its assent to be bound by Register.com's terms of use, and a contract was formed and subsequently breached.

Register.com alleges that the breach has resulted in irreparable harm:  in lost opportunities to sell competing services to its opt-in customers, and to its reputation and good will with customers and co-brand partners, who have threatened to take their business elsewhere if Register.com cannot protect the WHOIS contact information.

The classic remedy for breach of contract is an action at law for monetary damages.   If the injury complained of can be compensated by an award of monetary damages, then an adequate remedy at law exists and no irreparable injury may be found as a matter of law.   However, the Second Circuit has recognized that even where damages are available, irreparable harm may be found where those damages are clearly difficult to assess and measure.   The Second  Circuit Court's opinion  Ticor Title Ins. Co. v. Cohen,  173 F.3d 63, 69 (2d Cir.1999)  captures precisely why damages in this case are incalculable and the harm resulting from the breach is irreparable.   The Court wrote, in finding irreparable harm resulting from the breach of a covenant not to compete in an employment contract, "[i]nitially, it would be very difficult to calculate monetary damages that would successfully redress the loss of a relationship with a client that would produce an indeterminate amount of business in years to come."    See  id.  at 69.

Register.com has demonstrated both a likelihood of success on the merits of its breach of contract claim with respect to Verio's use of WHOIS data for marketing purposes, and has demonstrated irreparable harm resulting from the  breach.   Accordingly, it is entitled to an injunction against any future use by Verio of information taken from its WHOIS database for marketing by e-mail, direct mail or telephone.

One who uses a chattel with the consent of another is subject to liability in trespass for any harm to the chattel which is caused by or occurs in the course of any use exceeding the consent, even though such use is not a conversion.

Register.com's posted policies and terms of use require a party who seeks access to its WHOIS database to agree that it will not "use this data to ... enable high volume, automated, electronic processes that apply to Register.com (or its systems)."   Register.com argues that use of a search robot is prohibited by that term of use.   The Court disagrees.

The temporal aspect of this term is important because it only bars future automated processes.   Although Verio uses an automated process to  collect  the WHOIS data, it does not then use the collected data to enable an automated process that applies to Register.com's systems.   Once Verio's software robot secures the WHOIS information from Register.com's systems, it has completed its automated process with respect to Register.com's systems. The robot does not then use that WHOIS data to "enable high volume, automated, electronic processes that apply to Register.com (or its systems)," it simply deposits the data into a database.

Although Register.com's evidence of any burden or harm to its computer system caused by the successive queries performed by search robots is imprecise, evidence of mere possessory interference is sufficient to demonstrate the quantum of harm necessary to establish a claim for trespass to chattels.

BE argues that its searches present a negligible load on plaintiff's computer systems, and do not rise to the level of impairment to the condition or value of eBay's computer system required to constitute a trespass.    However, it is undisputed that eBay's server and its capacity are personal property, and that BE's searches use a portion of this property.

Accordingly, Register.com's evidence that Verio's search robots have presented and will continue to present an unwelcome interference with, and a risk of interruption to, its computer system and servers is sufficient to demonstrate a likelihood of success on the merits of its trespass to chattels claim.

There is no adequate remedy at law for an ongoing trespass and without an injunction the victim of such a trespass will be irreparably harmed.   The  eBay  court specifically held that eBay was entitled to preliminary injunctive relief based on the claim that if such relief were denied, other companies would be encouraged to deploy search robots against eBay's servers and would further diminish eBay's server capacity to the point of denying effective access to eBay's customers.    See  id.  at 1071-72.

The same reasoning applies here.   Register.com, through Mr. Gardos, has expressed the fear that its servers will be flooded by search robots deployed by competitors in the absence of injunctive relief.   Register.com has therefore demonstrated both a likelihood of success on the merits of its trespass to chattels claim and the existence of irreparable harm, and is entitled to a preliminary injunction against Verio based upon that claim.

The type of harm that Register.com alleges is caused by the search robots, including diminished server capacity and potential system shutdowns, is better analyzed under   1030(a)(5)(C) , which specifically addresses damages to the computer system.

WHOIS database has diminished server capacity, however slightly, and could diminish response time, which could impair the availability of data to clients trying to get registrant contact information.   Moreover, Register.com has raised the possibility that if Verio's robotic queries of Register.com's WHOIS database were determined to be lawful, then other vendors of Internet services would engage in similar conduct.   This Court finds that it is highly probable that other Internet service vendors would also use robots to obtain this potential customer information were it to be permitted.

The use of the robot allows a marketer to reach a potential client within the first several days of the domain name registration, an optimal time to solicit the customer for other services.   In contrast, if instead of using a search robot the service vendor obtains registrant contact information pursuant to a bulk license, the vendor must wait to receive the information on a weekly basis.  As Eric Eden, the director of operation Henhouse wrote in an e-mail to a Verio employee "[c]onsistent testing has found that the faster we approach someone  after they register a domain name, the more likely we are to sell them hosting."  (Ex. 40 to Pl.'s Sept.

Because Register.com has demonstrated that Verio's access to its WHOIS database by means of an automated search robot is unauthorized and caused or could cause $5000 in damages by impairing the availability of data or the availability of its computer systems, Register.com has established both irreparable harm and a likelihood of success on the merits of its claim that Verio's use of the search robot violated   1030(a)(5)(C)  of the Computer Fraud And Abuse Act. Register.com is therefore entitled to injunctive relief based upon this claim.

Again, neither party disputes that Verio is not authorized under Register.com's terms of use to use the data for mass marketing purposes, and neither party disputes that Verio is authorized to obtain the data for some purposes.

However, Verio's distinctions between authorized access and an unauthorized end use of information strike the Court as too fine.   First, the  means of access Verio employs, namely the automated search robot, is unauthorized.   Second, even if Verio's means of access to the WHOIS database would otherwise be authorized, that access would be rendered unauthorized ab initio  by virtue of the fact that prior to entry Verio knows that the data obtained will be later used for an unauthorized purpose.

It does however dispute Register.com's claims that its customers were or will continue to be confused about Verio's relationship to Register.com because of Verio's marketing practices.   Verio also argues that if confusion occurred or is likely to occur in the future, it is not the type of confusion actionable under the Lanham Act.

Verio's subsequent solicitations violated the Lanham Act. While Verio's later phone solicitations did not mention the Register.com or "first step" marks, they did indicate that the caller from Verio was calling "regarding your recently registered domain name" or "regarding the registration of [domain name].   Please contact me at your earliest convenience ... If I don't hear from you in a couple days, I will call back."  ( See  Exs. 44 & 45 to Pl.'s Sept. 8, 2000 Motion).   Whether these solicitations violate the Lanham Act is a closer question.   Although Verio does not employ any of Register .com's marks in these communications, the Court finds that the phrasing does create the impression that the reason for the call is related to the registration of the domain name, rather than the solicitation of web hosting services for the new domain name.   The Court also finds that the impression that Verio telemarketers are calling because of some problem with the domain name registration could lead to confusion with respect to whether there is some affiliation or sponsorship between Verio and Register.com. In fact, Register.com presented evidence of actual customer confusion stemming from this practice.  ( See  Pl.'s Ex. 12 "The telephone message seemed to me to imply that there was some problem with the name I had just registered").   Accordingly, such phrasing violates the Lanham Act.

Register.com also seems to claim that Verio's solicitations violate the Lanham Act regardless of their content because of the short time between the customers' registration of a domain name with Register.com and the solicitation by Verio.   Register.com alleges that because of the timing its customers are under the mistaken impression that Verio is affiliated with Register.com and because of that give greater consideration to these solicitations than they otherwise would.

Register.com is correct that some of Verio's solicitations were in the past misleading on their face and violated the Lanham Act. Register.com is also correct that some of Verio's more recent solicitations, although they did not use any protected mark, created confusion as to whether Verio was calling because of some problem with the customer's domain name registration, which resulted in confusion with respect to whether Verio and Register.com were affiliated in any way.   Accordingly, the Court finds on the current record that Register.com is likely to succeed on the merits of its claims of unfair competition and false designation of origin under  43(a) of the Lanham Act with respect to any e-mail, telephone, or direct mail solicitation that uses the "Register.com" or "first step on the Web" marks or any similar marks. Register.com is also likely to succeed on Lanham Act claims claims based on Verio's solicitations that suggest that Verio is calling with regard to the  registration of the domain name or any problem arising from that registration. As more fully discussed in the context of the breach of contract claim, these Lanham Act violations may result in the irreparable harm of lost client relationships.

Accordingly, the Court enjoins Verio from any future use in its e-mail, direct mail, or telephone solicitations of the marks Register.com or "first step on the web" or any similar mark.   Furthermore, the Court enjoins Verio from indicating in any affirmative way that it is calling regarding the registration of the customer's domain name, rather than in regard to the provision of web-hosting or other services related to the domain name.

In support of its argument, i.LAN points to the purchase order associated with the transaction.   NextPoint, in response, points to the 1998 VAR agreement and the clickwrap license agreement contained in the software itself to reach a different conclusion.

Before turning to NextPoint's clickwrap license agreement, the stage must be set.   First, the Court will identify the set of rules by which to judge this dispute.   Next, the Court will examine what is at stake, in particular i.LAN's claim for specific performance and NextPoint's limitation-of-liability defense.   Finally, the Court will address the enforceability of the clickwrap license agreement.

The clickwrap license agreement states that it does not affect existing or subsequent written agreements or purchase orders.   [FN1]   The language might be  *331  read to mean that the clickwrap license agreement is a nullity if a purchase order already exists, but that reading is not the natural one. The natural reading is that to the extent the 1998 VAR agreement and 1999 purchase order are silent, the clickwrap license agreement fills the void.

At the same time, the Court will not overlook Article 2 simply because its provisions are imperfect in today's world. Software licenses are entered into every day, and business persons reasonably  expect that  some  law will govern them.   For the time being, Article 2's familiar provisions--which are the inspiration for UCITA--better fulfill those expectations than would the common law.  Article 2 technically does not, and certainly will not in the future, govern software licenses, but for the time being, the Court will assume it does.

More than anything else, i.LAN wants specific performance--in particular, perpetual upgrades of NextPoint's software and unlimited support.   Assuming the clickwrap license agreement is enforceable, NextPoint argues that the agreement prohibits specific performance as a remedy.   In the alternative, NextPoint argues that specific performance is inappropriate under the UCC.

PRODUCT."   Def.'s App. tab 8. From this provision, NextPoint concludes that money damages are the only possible remedy.   An equally plausible reading of the provision, however, is that the limitation only applies to "damages," not equitable remedies.   Indeed, section 6 of the agreement states, "[E]ach party shall have the right to institute judicial proceedings against the other party ... in order to enforce the instituting party's rights hereunder through reformation of contract, specific performance, injunction or similar equitable relief."   Id.  On balance, sections 4 and 6 cut against NextPoint's argument that the clickwrap license agreement prohibits specific performance as a remedy.

The scarcity of automobiles, which went no farther than to occasion considerable delay in delivery, is not sufficient basis for a decree of specific performance in favor of one who sought the completion of a contract for the sale of an ordinary passenger vehicle, and who showed no substantial harm of a kind of character which could not be adequately compensated by an award of damages in an action at law.

The materials were designed and made for use in the chamber of commerce  building;  they were limited in number and could not readily be used in any other building;  they could not have been purchased in the open market.   To have had them manufactured elsewhere would have caused serious delay in the construction of the building to the great damage of the contractor as well as of the owners.   The contractor would not have an adequate remedy at law.

Turning to the facts of this case, i.LAN makes three arguments why NextPoint's software is unique.   First, i.LAN argues that the software is copyrighted and took years to design.   The same could be said of any mass- produced item, however, and certainly a mass-produced item is the antithesis of the word "unique."   More importantly, NextPoint's software is one of several competing software packages in the market;  all run on ordinary computers and perform substantially the same functions.   Although these software packages may be copyrighted and the product of intense labor, they are interchangeable as a practical matter and thus none is unique.   Second, i.LAN argues that it  has tailored its business around NextPoint's software, thus making the software  unique to  it.    The UCC is sensitive to this consideration, but at the same time this Court will not conflate reliance with uniqueness.   Much as i.LAN may not want to, it certainly  could  purchase comparable software on the open market and reconfigure its systems to run that software, just as any person could buy such software and run it.   Finally, i.LAN argues that it does not know the number of software licenses it will need in the future to provide its rental services, so money damages would not adequately compensate it.   This argument is not that NextPoint's goods are unique, but that i.LAN had struck what it thought to be a unique contract:  for a mere $85,231.42 it would have unlimited copies of all of NextPoint's software forever.   The UCC, however, looks to the uniqueness of the goods, not the contract.

In sum, even if the clickwrap license agreement permits specific performance, and even if the Court were to enter judgment in favor of i.LAN, NextPoint's software is not unique or irreplaceable as a practical matter, so the Court would not award specific performance.

On the box containing the software, however, was a shrinkwrap license agreement which contained a provision limiting the manufacturer's liability to the price paid for the shipment.   The question for the court was whether to enforce the provision of the shrinkwrap license agreement limiting the manufacturer's liability.   The court held that the limitation of liability was not enforceable because it was merely a proposed agreement under  UCC section 2- 207  to which the reseller never agreed; the court refused to imply assent because the limitation of liability was material and  UCC section 2-207(2)(b)   does not allow material  terms to be added by implication.

Nov.17, 2000)  (Winslow, J.).   The UCC "shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies," which include "the continued expansion of commercial practices through custom, usage and agreement of the parties."   UCC  1-102 ,  Mass. Gen. Laws ch. 106,  1-102 .  "Money now, terms later" is a practical way to form contracts, especially with purchasers of software.   If  ProCD  was correct to enforce a shrinkwrap license agreement, where any assent is implicit, then it must also be correct to enforce a clickwrap license agreement, where the assent is explicit.   To be sure, shrinkwrap and clickwrap license agreements share the defect of any standardized contract--they are susceptible to the inclusion of terms that border on the unconscionable--but that is not the issue in this case.   The only issue before the Court is whether clickwrap license agreements are an appropriate way to form contracts, and the Court holds they are.   In short, i.LAN explicitly accepted the clickwrap license agreement when it clicked on the box stating "I agree."

To understand this holding requires a bit of background.   When NextPoint and i.LAN first formed their relationship, i.LAN signed the 1998 VAR agreement, which contains warranty disclaimers and limitations of liability nearly identical to those found in the clickwrap license agreement.

Finally, i.LAN had installed the software on many occasions before the transaction in 1999, and each time i.LAN necessarily ran across the clickwrap license agreement.   In short, NextPoint consistently included a warranty disclaimer and limitation of liability in every contract it made.

Indeed, the clickwrap license agreement specifically was intended to fill any gaps left by the 1999 purchase order.    See supra  p. 5. "There is a long tradition in contract law of reading contracts sensibly;  contracts--certainly business contracts of the kind involved here--are not parlor games but the means of getting the world's work done."   R.I. Charities Trust v.

Law and deceptive trade practices were properly dismissed as barred by the terms of the EULA and for failure to state a cause of action. The elements of a claim alleging deceptive practices are that the act or practice was misleading in a material respect and that the plaintiff was injured as a result ( see  Hart v Moore,  155 Misc 2d 203).  The plaintiff failed to allege that the defendant engaged in a materially misleading practice and thus his deceptive trade practice claim fails to state a cause of action.

The Supreme Court properly dismissed the plaintiff's cause of action alleging unjust enrichment. It is well settled that the existence of a valid and  enforceable contract governing a particular subject matter, such as the EULA in the instant case, precludes recovery in quasi contract for events arising out of the same subject matter ( see Clark-Fitzpatrick, Inc. v Long Is. R.R. Co.,  70 NY2d 382).

This is an appeal from a judgment of the Southern District of New York denying a motion by defendants-appellants Netscape Communications Corporation and its corporate parent, America Online, Inc. (collectively, "defendants" or "Netscape"), to compel arbitration and to stay court proceedings.   In order to resolve the central question of arbitrability presented here, we must address issues of contract formation in cyberspace.   Principally, we  are asked to determine whether plaintiffs-appellees ("plaintiffs"), by acting  upon defendants' invitation to download free software made available on defendants'  webpage, agreed to be bound by the software's license terms (which included  the arbitration clause at issue), even though plaintiffs could not have learned  of  the existence of those terms unless, prior to executing the download, they had scrolled down the webpage to a screen located below the download button.   We agree with the district court that a reasonably prudent Internet user in circumstances such as these would not have known or learned of the existence of the license terms before responding to defendants' invitation to download the free software, and that defendants therefore did not provide reasonable notice of the license terms.   In consequence, plaintiffs' bare act of downloading the software did not unambiguously manifest assent to the arbitration provision contained in the license terms.

We also agree with the district court that plaintiffs' claims relating to the software at issue--a "plug-in" program entitled SmartDownload ("SmartDownload" or "the plug-in program"), offered by Netscape to enhance the functioning of the separate browser program called Netscape Communicator ("Communicator" or "the browser program")--are not subject to an arbitration agreement contained in the license terms governing the use of Communicator.   Finally, we conclude that the district court properly rejected defendants' argument that plaintiff website owner Christopher Specht, though not a party to any Netscape license agreement, is nevertheless required to arbitrate his claims concerning SmartDownload because he allegedly benefited directly under SmartDownload's license agreement.

Defendants' theory that Specht benefited whenever visitors employing SmartDownload downloaded certain files made available on his website  is simply too tenuous and speculative to justify application of the legal doctrine that requires a nonparty to an arbitration agreement to arbitrate if he or she has received a direct benefit under a contract containing the arbitration agreement.

Specifically, plaintiffs alleged that when they first used Netscape's Communicator--a software program that permits Internet browsing--the program created and stored on each of their computer hard drives a small text file known as a "cookie" that functioned "as a kind of electronic identification tag for future communications" between their computers and Netscape.   Plaintiffs further alleged that when they installed SmartDownload--a separate software "plug-in"

In the time period relevant to this litigation, Netscape offered on its website various software programs, including Communicator and SmartDownload, which visitors to the site were invited to obtain free of charge.   It is undisputed that five of the six named plaintiffs--Michael Fagan, John Gibson, Mark Gruber, Sean Kelly, and Sherry Weindorf--downloaded Communicator from the Netscape website.   These plaintiffs acknowledge that when they proceeded to initiate installation [FN3]  of Communicator, they were automatically shown a scrollable text of that program's license agreement and were not permitted to complete the installation until they had clicked on a "Yes" button to indicate that they accepted all the license terms.   [FN4]   If a user attempted to install Communicator without clicking "Yes," the installation would be aborted.   All five named user plaintiffs [FN5]  expressly agreed to Communicator's license terms by clicking "Yes." The Communicator license agreement that these plaintiffs saw made no mention of SmartDownload or other  plug-in programs, and stated that "[t]hese terms apply to Netscape Communicator and Netscape Navigator"    [FN6]  and that "all disputes relating to this Agreement (excepting any dispute relating to intellectual property rights)" are subject to "binding arbitration in Santa Clara County, California."

FN3.  There is a difference between downloading and installing a software program.   When a user downloads a program from the Internet to his or her computer, the program file is stored on the user's hard drive but typically is not operable until the user installs or executes it, usually by double-clicking on the file and causing the program to run.

FN4.  This kind of online software license agreement has come to be known as "clickwrap" (by analogy to "shrinkwrap," used in the licensing of  tangible forms of software sold in packages) because it "presents the user  with a message on his or her computer screen, requiring that the user manifest  his or her assent to the terms of the license agreement by clicking on an  icon.   The product cannot be obtained or used unless and until the icon is clicked."   Specht,  150 F.Supp.2d at 593-94  (footnote omitted).

FN5.  The term "user plaintiffs" here and elsewhere in this opinion denotes those plaintiffs who are suing for harm they allegedly incurred as  computer users, in contrast to plaintiff Specht, who alleges that he was harmed in his capacity as a website owner.

FN6.  While Navigator was Netscape's "stand-alone" Internet browser program during the period in question, Communicator was a "software suite" that comprised Navigator and other software products.   All five named user plaintiffs stated in affidavits that they had obtained upgraded versions of Communicator.   Fagan, who, as noted below, allegedly did not obtain the browser program in connection with downloading SmartDownload, expressed some uncertainty during his deposition as to whether he had acquired Communicator or Navigator.   The identity of Fagan's browser program is  immaterial to this appeal, however, as Communicator and Navigator shared the same license agreement.

Although Communicator could be obtained independently of SmartDownload, all the named user plaintiffs, except Fagan, downloaded and installed Communicator in connection with downloading SmartDownload.   [FN7]   Each of these plaintiffs allegedly arrived at a Netscape webpage    [FN8]  captioned "SmartDownload Communicator" that urged them to "Download With Confidence Using SmartDownload!"   At or near the bottom of the screen facing plaintiffs was the prompt "Start Download" and a tinted button labeled "Download."   By clicking on the button, plaintiffs initiated the download of SmartDownload. Once that process was complete, SmartDownload, as its first plug-in task, permitted plaintiffs to proceed with downloading and installing Communicator, an operation that was accompanied by the clickwrap display of Communicator's license terms described above.

"webpage" or "page" is used to designate a document that resides, usually with other webpages, on a single Internet website and that contains information that is viewed on a computer monitor by scrolling through the document.

SmartDownload was that no clickwrap presentation accompanied the latter operation.    Instead, once plaintiffs Gibson, Gruber, Kelly, and Weindorf had clicked  on the "Download" button located at or near the bottom of their screen, and  the downloading of SmartDownload was complete, these plaintiffs encountered  no further information about the plug-in program or the existence of license  terms governing its use.   [FN9]   The sole reference to SmartDownload's license terms on the "SmartDownload  Communicator" webpage was located in text that would have become visible to plaintiffs only if they had scrolled down to the next screen.

FN9.  Plaintiff Kelly, a relatively sophisticated Internet user, testified that when he clicked to download SmartDownload, he did not think that he was downloading a software program at all, but rather that SmartDownload "was merely a piece of download technology."   He later  became aware that SmartDownload was residing as software on his hard drive when he attempted to download electronic files from the Internet.

FN10.  In the screen shot of the SmartDownload webpage attached to Weindorf's affidavit, the reference to license terms is partially visible, though almost illegible, at the bottom of the screen.   In the screen shots attached to the affidavits of Gibson, Gruber, and Kelly, the reference to  license terms is not visible.

In sum, plaintiffs Gibson, Gruber, Kelly, and Weindorf allege that the process of obtaining SmartDownload contrasted sharply with that of obtaining Communicator.   Having selected SmartDownload, they were required neither to express unambiguous assent to that program's license agreement nor even to view the license terms or become aware of their existence before proceeding with the invited download of the free plug-in program.   Moreover, once these plaintiffs had initiated the download, the existence of SmartDownload's license terms was not mentioned while the software was running or at any later point in plaintiffs' experience of the product.

The use of each Netscape software product is governed by a license agreement.   You must read and agree to the license agreement terms BEFORE acquiring a product.   Please click on the appropriate link below to review the current license agreement for the product of interest to you before acquisition.   For products available for download, you must read and agree to the license agreement terms BEFORE you install the software.

Agreement (excepting any dispute relating to intellectual property rights) shall be subject to final and binding arbitration in Santa Clara County, California, under the auspices of JAMS/EndDispute, with the losing party paying all costs of arbitration.

Unlike the four named user plaintiffs who downloaded SmartDownload from the Netscape website, the fifth named plaintiff, Michael Fagan, claims to have downloaded the plug-in program from a "shareware" website operated by  ZDNet, an entity unrelated to Netscape.   Shareware sites are websites, maintained  by companies or individuals, that contain libraries of free, publicly available  software.   The pages that a user would have seen while downloading SmartDownload  from ZDNet differed from those that he or she would have encountered while  downloading SmartDownload from the Netscape website. Notably, instead of any kind of notice of the SmartDownload license agreement, the ZDNet pages offered only a hypertext link to "more information" about SmartDownload, which, if clicked on, took the user to a Netscape webpage that, in turn, contained a link to the license agreement.   Thus, a visitor to the ZDNet website could have obtained SmartDownload, as Fagan avers he did, without  ever seeing a reference to that program's license terms, even if he or she had scrolled through all of ZDNet's webpages.

SmartDownload, but instead operated a website from which visitors could download certain electronic files that permitted them to create an account with an internet service provider called WhyWeb. Specht alleges that every time a user who had previously installed SmartDownload visited his website and downloaded WhyWeb-related files, defendants intercepted this information. Defendants allege that Specht would receive a representative's commission from WhyWeb every time a user who obtained a WhyWeb file from his website subsequently subscribed to the WhyWeb service.   Thus, argue defendants, because the "Netscape  license agreement ... conferred on each user the right to download and use  both Communicator and SmartDownload software," Specht received a benefit under that license agreement in that SmartDownload "assisted in obtaining the WhyWeb file and increased the likelihood of success in the download process."

This benefit, defendants claim, was direct enough to require Specht to arbitrate his claims pursuant to Netscape's license terms. Specht, however, maintains that he never received any commissions based on the WhyWeb files available on his website.

In the district court, defendants moved to compel arbitration and to stay court proceedings pursuant to the Federal Arbitration Act ("FAA"),  9 U.S.C.  4 , arguing that the disputes reflected in the complaints, like any other dispute relating to the SmartDownload license agreement, are subject to the arbitration clause contained in that agreement.   Finding that Netscape's webpage, unlike typical examples of clickwrap, neither adequately alerted users to the existence  of SmartDownload's license terms nor required users unambiguously to manifest  assent to those terms as a condition of downloading the product, the court  held that the user plaintiffs had not entered into the SmartDownload license  agreement.   Specht,  150 F.Supp.2d at 595-96 .

The district court also ruled that the separate license agreement governing use of Communicator, even though the user plaintiffs had assented to its terms, involved an independent transaction that made no mention of SmartDownload and so did not bind plaintiffs to arbitrate their claims relating to SmartDownload.

The FAA provides that a "written provision in any ... contract evidencing a transaction involving commerce to settle by arbitration a controversy thereafter arising out of such contract or transaction ... shall be valid, irrevocable, and enforceable, save upon such grounds as exist at law or in equity for the revocation of any contract."    [FN11]    9 U.S.C.

Defendants argue on appeal that the district court erred in deciding the  question of contract formation as a matter of law.   A central issue in dispute,  according to defendants, is whether the user plaintiffs actually saw  the notice of SmartDownload's license terms when they downloaded the plug-in program.  Although plaintiffs in their affidavits and depositions generally swore that they never saw the notice of terms on Netscape's webpage, defendants point to deposition testimony in which some plaintiffs, under repeated questioning by defendants' counsel, responded that they could not "remember" or be entirely "sure" whether the link to SmartDownload's license terms was visible on their computer screens.   Defendants argue that on some computers, depending on the configuration of the monitor and browser, SmartDownload's license link "appears on the first screen, without any need for the user to scroll at all."   Thus, according to defendants, "a trial on the factual issues that Defendants raised about each and every Plaintiffs' [ sic  ] downloading experience" is required on remand to remedy the district court's "error" in denying defendants' motion as a matter of law.

FN12.  Later, when Judge Hellerstein suggested that it was "an issue of fact ... to be tried" whether plaintiff Fagan downloaded SmartDownload from Netscape's webpage or from the ZDNet shareware site, defendants' counsel stated:  "I am not sure there is an issue of fact.   It is sort of a summary judgment kind of standard."   Still later, counsel remarked:  "I think we established that there really is no genuine issue that Mr. Fagan got his smart download [ sic ] [by visiting the Netscape webpage from which  he] fairly had notice that there was a license agreement."   Defendants' position that there was "no genuine issue" regarding reasonable notice of the existence of the license terms is consistent with this Circuit's standard for determining whether a trial is required on the issue of the making of an arbitration agreement.

In sum, we conclude that the district court properly decided the question of reasonable notice and objective manifestation of assent as a matter of law on the record before it, and we decline defendants' request to remand for a full trial on that question.

FN13.  The district court concluded that the SmartDownload transactions here should be governed by "California law as it relates to the sale of goods,  including the Uniform Commercial Code in effect in California."

Downloadable software, however, is scarcely a "tangible" good, and, in part because software may be obtained, copied, or transferred effortlessly at the stroke of a computer key, licensing of such Internet products has assumed a vast importance in recent years.   Recognizing that "a body of law based on images of the sale of manufactured goods ill fits licenses and other transactions in computer information," the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws has promulgated the Uniform Computer Information Transactions Act ("UCITA"), a code resembling UCC Article 2 in many respects but drafted to reflect emergent practices in the sale and licensing of computer information.   UCITA, prefatory note (rev. ed.

We need not decide today whether UCC Article 2 applies to Internet transactions in downloadable products.   The district court's analysis and the parties' arguments on appeal show that, for present purposes, there is  no essential difference between UCC Article 2 and the common law of contracts.

As the foregoing cases suggest, receipt of a physical document containing contract terms or notice thereof is frequently deemed, in the world of paper transactions, a sufficient circumstance to place the offeree on inquiry notice  of those terms.  "Every person who has actual notice of circumstances sufficient  to put a prudent man upon inquiry as to a particular fact, has constructive  notice of the fact itself in all cases in which, by prosecuting such inquiry,  he might have learned such fact."

Cal. Civ.Code  19 .   These principles apply equally to the emergent world of online product delivery, pop-up screens, hyperlinked pages, clickwrap licensing, scrollable documents, and urgent admonitions to "Download Now!". What plaintiffs saw when they were being invited by defendants to download this fast, free plug-in called SmartDownload was a screen containing praise for the product and, at the very bottom of the screen, a "Download" button.   Defendants argue that under the principles set forth in the cases cited above, a "fair and prudent person using ordinary care" would have been on inquiry notice of SmartDownload's license terms.

We are not persuaded that a reasonably prudent offeree in these circumstances would have known of the existence of license terms.   Plaintiffs were  responding to an offer that did not carry an immediately visible notice of the existence of license terms or require unambiguous manifestation of assent to those terms.   Thus, plaintiffs' "apparent manifestation of ... consent" was to terms "contained in a document whose contractual nature [was] not obvious."  Windsor Mills,  25 Cal.App.3d at 992, 101 Cal.Rptr. at 351.    Moreover, the fact that, given the position of the scroll bar on their computer screens, plaintiffs may have been aware that an unexplored portion of the Netscape webpage remained below the download button does not mean that they reasonably should have concluded that this portion contained a notice of license terms.   In their deposition testimony, plaintiffs variously stated that they used the scroll bar "[o]nly if there is something that I feel I need to see that is on--that is off the page," or that the elevated position of the scroll bar suggested the presence of "mere[ ] formalities, standard lower banner links" or "that the page is bigger than what I can see."   Plaintiffs testified, and defendants did not refute, that plaintiffs were in fact unaware that defendants intended to attach license terms to the use of SmartDownload.

We conclude that in circumstances such as these, where consumers are urged  to download free software at the immediate click of a button, a reference to the existence of license terms on a submerged screen is not sufficient to place consumers on inquiry or constructive notice of those terms.   [FN15]   The SmartDownload webpage screen was "printed in such a manner that it tended to  conceal the fact that it was an express acceptance of [Netscape's] rules and regulations."   Larrus,  266 P.2d at 147.    Internet users may have, as defendants put it, "as much time as they need[ ]" to scroll through multiple screens on a webpage, but there is no reason to assume that viewers will scroll down to subsequent screens simply because screens are there.   When products are "free" and users are invited to download them in the absence of reasonably conspicuous notice that they are about to bind themselves to contract terms, the transactional circumstances cannot be fully analogized to those in the paper world of arm's-length bargaining.   In the next two sections, we discuss case law and other legal authorities that have addressed the circumstances of computer sales, software licensing, and online transacting.

These cases do not help defendants.   To the extent that they hold that the purchaser of a computer or tangible software is contractually bound after  failing to object to printed license terms provided with the product, Hill  and  Brower  do not differ markedly from the cases involving traditional paper contracting discussed in the previous section.   Insofar as the purchaser in  ProCD  was confronted with conspicuous, mandatory license terms every time he ran the software on his computer, that case actually undermines defendants' contention that downloading in the absence of conspicuous terms is an act that binds plaintiffs to those terms.   In  Mortenson,  the full text of license terms was printed on each sealed diskette envelope inside the software box, printed again on the inside cover of the user manual, and notice of the terms appeared on the computer screen every time the purchaser executed the program.   Mortenson,  970 P.2d at 806.    In sum, the foregoing cases are clearly distinguishable from the facts of the present action.

In addition, the model code, UCITA, discussed above, generally recognizes the importance of conspicuous notice and unambiguous manifestation of assent in online sales and licensing of computer information.   For example, 112, which addresses manifestation of assent, provides that a user's opportunity to review online contract terms exists if a "record" (or electronic writing) of the contract terms is "made available in a manner that ought to call it to the attention of a reasonable person and permit review."

Section 112 also provides, in pertinent part, that "[a] person manifests assent to a record or term if the person, acting with knowledge of, or after having an opportunity to review the  record or term or a copy of it ... intentionally engages in conduct or makes statements with reason to know that the other party or its electronic agent may infer from the conduct or statement that the person assents to the record or term."

In the case of a "mass-market license," a party adopts the terms of the license only by manifesting assent "before or during the party's initial performance or use of or access to the information."    Id .  209(a).

UCITA  211 sets forth a number of guidelines for "internet-type" transactions involving the supply of information or software.   For example, a licensor should make standard terms "available for review" prior to delivery or obligation to pay (1) by "displaying prominently and in close proximity to a description of the computer information, or to instructions or steps for acquiring it, the standard terms or a reference to an electronic location from which they can be readily obtained," or (2) by "disclosing the availability of the standard terms in a prominent place on the site from which the computer information is offered and promptly furnishing a copy of the standard terms on request before the transfer of the computer information."    Id .  211(1)(A-B).  The commentary to  211 adds:  "The intent of the close proximity standard is that the terms or the reference to them would be called to the attention of an ordinary reasonable person."    Id .  211 cmt. 3. The commentary also approves of  prominent hypertext links that draw attention to the existence of a standard agreement and allow users to view the terms of the license.

After reviewing the California common law and other relevant legal authority, we conclude that under the circumstances here, plaintiffs' downloading of SmartDownload did not constitute acceptance of defendants' license terms.

FN18.  Because we conclude that the Netscape webpage did not provide reasonable notice of the existence of SmartDownload's license terms, it is  irrelevant to our decision whether plaintiff Fagan obtained SmartDownload from that webpage, as defendants contend, or from a shareware website that provided less or no notice of that program's license terms, as Fagan  maintains.   In either case, Fagan could not be bound by the SmartDownload license agreement.   Further, because we find that the California common law disposes of the issue of notice and assent, we do not address plaintiffs' arguments based on California's Commercial Code  2207, the UCC Article 2 provision governing the "battle of the forms."   Moreover, having determined that the parties did not enter into the SmartDownload license agreement, we do not reach plaintiffs' alternative arguments concerning unconscionability.

Netscape's Communicator.   The parties disagree, however, over the scope of that license's arbitration clause.   Defendants contend that the scope is broad enough to encompass plaintiffs' claims regarding SmartDownload, even if plaintiffs did not separately assent to SmartDownload's license terms and even though Communicator's license terms did not expressly mention SmartDownload.

FN19.  A question not raised by the parties is whether this dispute involves "intellectual property rights."   Certainly, Netscape's intellectual property ("IP") rights would not seem to be implicated, even though Netscape may in some sense employ its IP--in the form of computer software--to plant cookies and, as plaintiffs allege, harvest users' personal information.

To begin with, we find that the underlying dispute in this case--whether defendants violated plaintiffs' rights under the Electronic Communications Privacy Act and the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act--involves matters that are clearly collateral to the Communicator license agreement.

Thus, on its face, the Communicator license agreement governed disputes concerning Netscape's browser programs only, not disputes concerning a plug-in program like SmartDownload.   Moreover, Communicator's license terms included a merger or integration clause stating that "[t]his Agreement  constitutes the entire agreement between the parties concerning the subject matter hereof."   SmartDownload's license terms contained the same clause. Such provisions are recognized by California courts as a means of excluding prior or contemporaneous parol evidence from the scope of a contract.    See Franklin v. USX Corp.,  87 Cal.App. 4th 615, 105 Cal.Rptr.2d 11, 15 (2001) .  Although the presence of merger clauses is not dispositive here, we note that defendants' express desire to limit the reach of the respective license agreements, combined with the absence of reference to SmartDownload in the Communicator license agreement, suggests that a dispute regarding defendants' allegedly unlawful use of SmartDownload is clearly collateral to the Communicator license agreement.

This conclusion is reinforced by the other terms of the Communicator license  agreement, which include a provision describing the non-exclusive nature of the grant and permission to reproduce the software for personal and internal  business purposes;  restrictions on modification, decompilation, redistribution  or other sale or transfer, and removal or alteration of trademarks or other  intellectual property;  provisions for the licensor's right to terminate and its proprietary rights;  a complete disclaimer of warranties ("as is") and an entire-risk clause;  a limitation of liability clause for consequential  and other damages, together with a liquidated damages term; clauses regarding  encryption and export;  a disclaimer of warranties for high risk activities;   and a miscellaneous paragraph that contains merger, choice-of-law, arbitration, and severability clauses, non-waiver and non-assignment provisions, a  force majeure  term, and a clause providing for reimbursement of the prevailing party in any dispute.   Apart from the potential generic applicability of the warranty and liability disclaimers, a dispute concerning alleged electronic eavesdropping via transmissions from a separate plug-in program would not appear to fall within Communicator's license terms.   We conclude, therefore, that this dispute concerns matters that, on their face, are clearly collateral to the Communicator license agreement.

Having determined this much, we next must test the presumption of arbitrability by asking whether plaintiffs' allegations implicate or touch on issues of contract construction or the parties' rights and obligations under the contract.

Genesco,  815 F.2d at 846.    That is, even though the parties' dispute concerns matters clearly collateral to the Communicator license terms, we must determine whether plaintiffs by their particular allegations have brought the dispute within the license terms.   Defendants argue that plaintiffs' complaints "literally bristled with allegations that Communicator and SmartDownload operated in conjunction with one another to eavesdrop on Plaintiffs' Internet communications."

We disagree.   Plaintiffs' allegations nowhere collapse or blur the distinction between Communicator and SmartDownload, but instead  consistently separate the two software programs and assert that SmartDownload alone is responsible for unlawful eavesdropping.   Plaintiffs begin by alleging that "SmartDownload facilitates the transfer of large files over the Internet by permitting a transfer to be resumed if it is interrupted."

Plaintiffs then explain that "[o]nce SmartDownload is downloaded and running on a Web user's computer, it automatically connects to Netscape's file servers and downloads the installation program for Communicator."   Plaintiffs add that defendants also encourage visitors to Netscape's website "to download and install SmartDownload even if they are not installing or upgrading Communicator."

In the course of their description of the installation and downloading process, plaintiffs keep SmartDownload separate from Communicator and clearly indicate that it is SmartDownload that performed the allegedly unlawful eavesdropping  and made use of the otherwise innocuous Communicator cookie as well as its  own "Key" and "UserID" to transmit plaintiffs' information to Netscape.   The complaints refer to "SmartDownload's spying" and explain that "Defendants  are using SmartDownload to eavesdrop."   Plaintiffs' allegations consistently  distinguish and isolate the functions of SmartDownload in such a way as to  make it clear that it is through SmartDownload, not Communicator, that defendants  committed the abuses that are the subject of the complaints.

After careful review of these allegations, we conclude that plaintiffs' claims "present no question involving construction of the [Communicator license  agreement], and no questions in respect of the parties' rights and obligations  under it."   Collins & Aikman,  58 F.3d at 23.    It follows that the claims of the five user plaintiffs are beyond the scope of the arbitration clause contained in the Communicator license agreement.   Because those claims are not  arbitrable under that agreement or under the SmartDownload license agreement, to which plaintiffs never assented, we affirm the district court's holding that the five user plaintiffs may not be compelled to arbitrate their claims.

Plaintiff Specht operated a website that he claims defendants electronically spied on every time users employing SmartDownload to enhance their browser software downloaded, from his site, software files that he provided for setting up an account with a separate service called WhyWeb.

Defendants counter that Specht received a "direct benefit" under the "Netscape license agreement," which they say authorized consumers to use SmartDownload and Communicator to obtain Specht's files.   Defendants contend that if a user who obtained a file from Specht's site subsequently subscribed to WhyWeb's service, Specht would receive a commission from WhyWeb.   Thus, according to defendants, if users employing SmartDownload accessed his site and obtained WhyWeb files, Specht would receive a direct benefit "because the software assisted in obtaining a WhyWeb file and increased the likelihood of success in the download process." Specht, however, claims that he received no commissions from providing WhyWeb software.

We note at the outset that defendants do not argue, as indeed they could not, that Specht benefited from SmartDownload license agreements entered into by the  named user plaintiffs or the putative class that they represent.   A contract theory of third-party benefits requires a predicate contract, and we have already determined that the user plaintiffs did not assent to the SmartDownload license agreement.

Even accepting  arguendo  this strained and roundabout hypothesis, we must reject defendants' legal conclusion.   Typically, whether a contract benefits or accords rights to a third party (most often, the right to enforce the contract) depends significantly on the intention of the original contracting parties.   See  Sessions Payroll Mgmt., Inc. v. Noble Constr. Co, Inc.,  84 Cal.App.4th 671, 680, 101 Cal.Rptr.2d 127, 133 (2000)  (explaining that a third- party beneficiary may enforce a contract made expressly for its benefit and has the burden of proving that the contracting parties actually promised the performance).   Clearly, Netscape and these unknown visitors to Specht's website did not expressly confer or intend to confer any contractual benefits on Specht or website operators generally (other than defendants).   Defendants therefore take a different tack, arguing that they need only show that Specht received some direct benefit, knowingly or not, under a Netscape license agreement.

FN21.  Plaintiffs argue in the alternative that their claims are inarbitrable because the Electronic Communications Privacy Act and the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act reflect a congressional intent to preclude arbitration of claims arising under those statutes.   In view of our disposition of this case, we need not address that argument.

Both parties have made reference to declarations filed in connection with the forthcoming motion for preliminary injunction. Such matters may not be properly considered on an  FRCP 12(b)(6)  motion to dismiss the complaint, which limits consideration to matters in the complaint and items of which the court may take judicial notice (none here). However, where an amended complaint has been filed, items pleaded or attached as exhibits to the original complaint may be considered to the extent they contradict assertions in the amended complaint.

CitySearch, Inc. (hereafter collectively in the singular Ticketmaster) operates to allow customers to purchase tickets to various events (concerts, ball games, etc.) through an internet connection with its customers. On the Ticketmaster home page, there are instructions and a directory to subsequent pages (one per event). The event pages provide basic information (short description of the event, date, time, place, and price) and a description of how to order tickets by either internet response, telephone, mail, or in person. Each of these subsequent pages is identifiable with an electronic address. The home page further contains (if a customer scrolls to the bottom) "terms and conditions" which proscribe, among other things, copying for commercial use. However, the customer need not view the terms and conditions to proceed straight to the  event page which interests him. Ticketmaster has exclusive agreements with the events it carries on its web pages so that tickets are not generally available to those events except through Ticketmaster (or reserved for sale by the event itself, or available from premium ticket brokers who generally charge higher than face value).

Tickets also operates a web site (Tickets.Com) which performs a somewhat different ticketing service. While Tickets does sell some tickets to certain events on its own, it also provides information as to where and how tickets which it does not sell may be purchased. A short factual description as to event, time, date, place and price is listed. Where Tickets does not itself sell the tickets, a place is given the customers to click for a reference to another ticket broker, or to another on-line ticket seller. Here is where the unique feature of this case-hyperlinks or deep linking-comes in. Where the exclusive ticket broker is Ticketmaster, and the customer clicks on "Buy this ticket from another on-line ticketing company", the customer is instantly transferred to the interior web page of Ticketmaster (bypassing the home page) for the the particular event in question, where the customer may buy the tickets (from Ticketmaster, not Tickets) on-line. An explanation is generally given by Tickets as follows: "These tickets are sold by another ticketing company. Although we can't sell them to you, the link above will take you directly to the other company's web site where you can purchase them." The interior web page contains the Ticketmaster logo and the customer must know he is dealing with Ticketmaster, not Tickets.

The motion to dismiss the first claim (copyright infringement) is denied because the complaint alleges actual copying. Plaintiff claims that the copying includes printing the factual information derived from the Ticketmaster interior web pages. The court does not accept this argument. A copyright may not be claimed to protect factual data ( Feist Publications  '91 499 U.S. 340, 113 L.Ed.2d 358).  While the expression, organization, placement, etc., of the factual data may be protected, Tickets is not alleged to have copied the method of presentation, but rather to have extracted the factual data and presented it in its own format. Where Tickets is alleged to have copied ( 35 of FAC) is in the making of thousands of copies taken from Ticketmaster's interior web pages for the purpose of extracting the factual data carried thereon and using it to  publish its own version containing the factual data. Thus, copying is alleged (albeit not republication of protected material).

Thus, the court rejects Ticketmaster's basic contention that it is copyright infringement to take basic facts from its publicly available web pages and use those facts (if the expression and method of presentation is not copied).

Copying is alleged by transferring the event pages to Ticket's own computer to facilitate extraction of the facts. This is a very different case from merely copying for its customers the Ticketmaster event pages. This falls in the same category of taking historical facts from a work of reference and printing them in different expression. By a similar analogy, the hyperlink to the interior web page (whatever it may do for the unfair competition or interference claims) does not allege copying.

Act (whatever it may do for other claims) since no copying is involved. The customer is automatically transferred to the particular genuine web page of the original author. There is no deception in what is happening. This is analogous to using a library's card index to get reference to particular items, albeit faster and more efficiently.

States Copyright Office...." Exhibit F to the FAC shows that the title of the work copyrighted is "Ticketmaster.com Web Site II" and (later) "Ticketmaster.com Web site III" and that the nature of the authorship is "underlying source code." The event pages change from day to day as old events are dropped out and new ones are added. There is a possible ambiguity as to whether the copyright as registered covers not only the home page but also each of the event pages Since the alleged copying is only of the event pages, there is still the question for further proceedings as to the court's jurisdiction over the claim of copyright infringement of the event pages.

The motion to dismiss the second claim (breach of contract) is founded on the "terms and conditions" set forth on the home page of the Ticketmaster site. This provides that anyone going beyond the home page agrees to the terms and conditions set forth, which include that the information is for personal use only, may not be used for commercial purposes, and no deep linking to the site is permitted. In defending this claim, Ticketmaster makes reference to the "shrinkwrap license" cases, where the packing on the outside of the CD  stated that opening the package constitutes adherence to the license agreement (restricting republication) contained therein. This has been held to be enforceable. That is not the same as this case because the "shrink-wrap license agreement" is open and obvious and in fact hard to miss. Many web sites make you click on "agree" to the terms and conditions before going on, but Ticketmaster does not. Further, the terms and conditions are set forth so that the customer needs to scroll down the home page to find and read them. Many customers instead are likely to proceed to the event page of interest rather than reading the "small print."

It cannot be said that merely putting the terms and conditions in this fashion necessarily creates a contract with any one using the web site. The motion is granted with leave to amend in case there are facts showing Tickets' knowledge of them plus facts showing implied agreement to them.

The motion is denied as to the 3d, 4th, and 5th claims (passing off, reverse passing off, and false advertising). These claims state federal (Lanham Act) claims. As defendants point out, the exhibits attached to the original complaint and the FAC do not appear to support the claims, but they are not necessarily intended to. The body of the FAC alleges that Tickets falsely suggested or implied an association with Ticketmaster, the giving of misleading information about phone numbers, and the unauthorized control over event pages of Ticketmaster.

The complaint also alleges deep linking as an example of  unfair competition, but the court concludes that deep linking by itself (i.e., without confusion of source) does not necessarily involve unfair competition. The false advertising claim is supported by allegations that Tickets has falsified information about the availability of tickets through Ticketmaster and that tickets are available only through premium ticket brokers. Tickets acknowledge that there may have been some accidental errors, which were corrected, but this issue is for later proceedings. Commercial advertising (i.e., publication by a business competitor) is sufficiently alleged to state a claim.

There are virtually no cases on deep linking, particularly none on linking to particular interior pages of a website. The allegations of deliberately disrupting business by hyper-linking do allege the "extra element" necessary to escape preemption. Accordingly, the court is not ready to definitively rule on this in the context of an interference claim and the motion to dismiss is denied as to this claim.

We are here called upon to determine the validity and enforceability of a forum selection clause contained in an on-line subscriber agreement of the Microsoft Network (MSN), an on-line computer service.   The trial court granted defendants' motion to dismiss the complaint on the ground that the forum selection clause in the parties' contracts called for plaintiffs' claims to be litigated in the State of Washington.   Plaintiffs appeal.   We affirm.

MSN membership into more expensive plans.   Among the claims was an accusation that Microsoft had engaged in "unilateral negative option billing," a practice condemned by the attorneys general of twenty-one states, including New Jersey's, with regard to a Microsoft competitor, America Online, Inc. Under the practice as alleged, Microsoft, without notice to or permission from MSN members, unilaterally charged them increased membership fees attributable to a change in service plans.

Before becoming an MSN member, a prospective subscriber is prompted by MSN software to view multiple computer screens of information, including a membership agreement which contains the above clause.   MSN's membership agreement appears on the computer screen in a scrollable window next to blocks providing the choices "I Agree" and "I Don't Agree."   Prospective members assent to the terms of the agreement by clicking on "I Agree" using a computer mouse.   Prospective members have the option to click "I Agree" or "I Don't Agree" at any point while scrolling through the agreement.   Registration may proceed only after the potential subscriber has had the opportunity to view and  has assented to the membership agreement, including MSN's forum selection clause.   No charges are incurred until after the membership agreement review is completed and a subscriber has clicked on "I Agree."

The on-line computer service industry is not one without competition, and therefore consumers are left with choices as to which service they select for Internet access, e-mail and other information services.   Plaintiffs were not forced into a situation where MSN was the only available server.   Additionally, plaintiffs and the class which they purport to represent were given ample opportunity to affirmatively assent to the forum selection clause.   Like Carnival,  plaintiffs here "retained the option of rejecting the contract with impunity."   499  U.S.

Finally, Judge Fitzpatrick held that enforcement of the forum selection clause would not inconvenience a trial.   Given the fact that the named plaintiffs reside in several jurisdictions and that, if the class were to be certified, many different domestic and international domiciles would also be involved, "the inconvenience to all parties is no greater in Washington than anywhere else in the country."

After reviewing the record in the light of the arguments advanced by the parties, we are in substantial agreement with the reasons for decision articulated by Judge Fitzpatrick.   We reject as meritless plaintiffs' arguments on appeal that the terms of the forum selection clause do not prevent plaintiffs from suing Microsoft outside of Washington or, alternatively, that the forum selection clause lacks adequate clarity.   The meaning of the clause is plain and its effect as a limiting provision is clear.   Furthermore, New Jersey's interest in assuring consumer fraud protection will not be frustrated by requiring plaintiffs to proceed with a  lawsuit in Washington as prescribed by the plain language of the forum selection clause.

As a general matter, none of the inherent characteristics of forum selection clauses implicate consumer fraud concepts in any special way.   If a forum selection clause is clear in its purport and has been presented to the party to be bound in a fair and forthright fashion, no consumer fraud policies or principles have been violated.    Cf.  id.  at 63- 64, 606  A .2d 407.

Moreover, as a matter of policy interest and apart from considerations bearing upon the choice-of-law provision in the forum selection clause,  plaintiffs have given us no reason to apprehend that the nature and scope of consumer fraud protections afforded by the State of Washington are materially different or less broad in scope than those available in this State.

The plaintiffs in  Carnival  could have perused all the fine-print provisions of their travel contract if they wished before accepting the terms by purchasing their cruise ticket.   The plaintiffs in this case were free to scroll through the various computer screens that presented the terms of their contracts before clicking their agreement.

Also, it seems clear that there was nothing extraordinary about the size or placement of the forum selection clause text.   By every indication we have,    [FN3]  the clause was presented in exactly the same format as most other provisions of the contract.   It was the first item in the last paragraph of the electronic document.   We note that a few paragraphs in the contract were presented in upper case typeface, presumably for emphasis, but most provisions, including the forum selection clause, were presented in lower case typeface. We discern nothing about the style or mode of presentation, or the placement of the provision, that can be taken as a basis for concluding that the forum selection clause was proffered unfairly, or with a design to conceal or de-emphasize its provisions.   To conclude that plaintiffs are not bound by that clause would be equivalent to holding that they were bound by no other clause either, since all provisions were identically presented.   Plaintiffs must be taken to have known that they were entering into a contract;  and no good purpose, consonant with the dictates of reasonable reliability in commerce, would be served by permitting them to disavow particular provisions or the contracts as a whole.    See  Rudbart v. North Jersey Dist.

PayPal is an online payment service that allows a business or private individual to send and receive payments via the Internet.  A PayPal account holder sends money by informing Paypal of the intended recipient's e-mail address and the amount to be sent and by designating a funding source such as a credit card, bank account or separate PayPal account.

PayPal accesses the funds and immediately makes them available to the intended recipient.  If an intended recipient does not have a PayPal account, the recipient must open an account to access the payment by following a link that is included in the payment notification e-mail.  PayPal generates revenues from transaction fees and the interest it derives from holding funds until they are sent.

As of January 1, 2001, approximately 10,000 account holders had registered with PayPal.  PayPal thereafter experienced a sudden and dramatic increase in its popularity, attracting one million customers over the next five months and 10.6 million accounts (of which 8.5 million were held by private individuals) by September 30, 2001.  Currently, PayPal provides services to twelve million accounts, and approximately 18,000 new accounts are opened each day. Plaintiffs allege that while PayPal has experienced a seven-fold increase in revenues and a thirteen-fold increase in users, it only has doubled the number of service representatives available to address customer concerns.

Plaintiffs contend that because PayPal's customer base has exceeded its operational capacity, PayPal has been and continues to be unable to maintain and manage accounts in the manner required by applicable state and federal legislation.  Plaintiffs allege in particular that when PayPal investigates a  customer's complaint of fraud, it freezes the customer's access to his or her account until the investigation is completed, but at the same time keeps the account open for deposits, a practice which  *1167  allows PayPal to derive economic benefit from the deposits while preventing customers from accessing even undisputed funds while the investigation is pending.  Plaintiffs further allege that PayPal does not provide a toll-free customer service telephone number, does not effectively publish the customer service telephone number it does provide, requires customers to report erroneous transactions by e-mail while not providing a specific e-mail address for that purpose, requires customers to provide numerous and burdensome personal documents before it undertakes an investigation, responds to e-mail inquiries with form letters, refuses to provide details or explanations with respect to its investigations, and provides no procedure by which a customer can appeal the results of an investigation.  Plaintiffs also allege that when customers  are  able to contact PayPal representatives, the representatives are combative and rude, refuse to answer specific questions, hang up in the middle of phone calls, provide "canned" responses to individualized problems, require customers to fax information while providing inoperative fax numbers, and refuse to allow customers to speak to managers.

Newspaper articles have reported that disgruntled customers who have been unable to contact anyone at PayPal to resolve their disputes have created their own website providing consumers with difficult-to-find customer service numbers and reporting their own frustrations with PayPal's service.  According to these accounts, PayPal has a backlog of over 100,000 unanswered customer complaints, a fact that has led the Better Business Bureau to revoke its seal of approval.  Plaintiffs allege that PayPal profits from its alleged acts and omissions because customers either abandon their efforts to recover their money or, in cases in which funds actually are returned, because it retains the interest collected on the funds it has held during the investigation process.

FN2.  PayPal objects to portions of the declarations and supporting exhibits submitted by Plaintiffs Toher and Resnick as vague and ambiguous, irrelevant, improper opinion or conclusion, lacking foundation, and violating the Best Evidence Rule. These objections are overruled.

PayPal's transfers, however, caused Comb's bank account to have insufficient funds, and the bank charged Comb $208.50 for failing to maintain his required balance.  Comb contacted PayPal and requested reimbursement for the insufficient fund penalty and any interest his funds accrued while in PayPal's possession.

Plaintiff Roberta Toher ("Toher") alleges the following:  Toher opened a PayPal account sometime in 2000.  PayPal failed to provide her with the name, address, and telephone number of a person she should notify in the event of an unauthorized electronic transfer.  On February 24, 2002, Toher discovered that PayPal had transferred funds from her checking account to four individuals without her knowledge, consent or authorization.

Once she found a telephone number, which was not toll-free, she was placed on hold for a lengthy period of time, and no one answered her call.  Toher then located PayPal's e-mail address and reported the error by e-mail.

Toher sent her complaint to one e- mail address, from which it was returned undeliverable, and then to the other address.  She also attempted again to contact PayPal by telephone.  After Toher again was placed on hold for a lengthy period of time, a PayPal representative instructed her to change her password and report the error by telephone to a different department.

Toher called that department's telephone number and spoke with a service representative who informed her that he had verified that the transaction had not been initiated by Toher and that PayPal would send Toher a letter explaining how to report the transaction in writing.  During this time, the recipients who erroneously had received the funds e-mailed Toher and inquired as to the reason for the payment.

On or about February 27, 2002, before her complaint had been investigated or resolved, PayPal informed Toher that it intended to take money from her checking account because her bank had declined a different, unrelated transaction.

Toher called PayPal and explained that she had filed a claim with respect to the erroneous withdrawal and instructed PayPal to stop removing funds from the checking account.  PayPal explained that there was nothing it could do to stop the latter transaction, and Toher was forced to pay a $27.00 fee to her bank to decline all subsequent electronic transactions related to PayPal.

Toher contacted PayPal to request for a second time the letter  explaining how to report her original claim.  PayPal subsequently informed Toher that it would begin processing her claim once she completed and returned a notarized affidavit by mail.

FN3.  Although she does not so allege in her complaint, Toher claims in her responding papers that PayPal still holds $136.48 of her money and refuses to return it on the basis that she failed to cooperate with PayPal's investigation.  PayPal disputes Toher's allegations and provides the results of its investigation, asserting that Toher's only legitimate claim could be for the return of the $27.00 she elected to pay to her bank to prevent further electronic transfers.

PayPal customers open an account by completing an online application for a personal, premier, or business account.  A prospective customer clicks a box at the bottom of the application page that reads, "[you] have read and agree to the User Agreement and [PayPal's] privacy policy."  A link to the text of the User Agreement is located at the bottom of the application.

PayPal Privacy Policy, and any documents incorporated by reference.  You further agree that this User Agreement forms a legally binding contract between you and PayPal, and that this Agreement constitutes "a writing signed by You" under any applicable law or regulation.

Arbitration.  Any controversy or claim arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the provision of Services shall be settled by binding  arbitration in accordance with the commercial arbitration rules of the American Arbitration Association.  Any such controversy or claim shall be arbitrated on an individual basis, and shall not be consolidated in any arbitration with any claim or controversy of any other party.  The arbitration shall be conducted in Santa Clara County, California, and judgment on the arbitration award may be entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof.

Either you or PayPal may seek any interim or preliminary relief from a court of competent jurisdiction in Santa Clara County, California necessary to protect the rights or property of you or PayPal, Inc. (or its agents, suppliers, and subcontractors) pending the completion of arbitration.

It is undisputed that Comb's claims are not subject to arbitration.  With respect to Toher and Resnick, PayPal failed to submit with its original moving papers copies of the agreements into which Toher and Resnick allegedly entered, arguing that circumstantial evidence sufficiently demonstrates assent by these Plaintiffs to the User Agreement PayPal currently offers its new customers.

At oral argument, PayPal reiterated its claim that Resnick entered into an agreement containing the exact arbitration clause found in Section II(19) of the current User Agreement, but it conceded that the version of the User Agreement entered into by Toher did not contain the subject arbitration clause.

PayPal nonetheless argued that Toher is bound to the  current  User Agreement, including the arbitration clause, because the version of the User Agreement Toher did accept binds her to any subsequent revisions to the User Agreement.  After the hearing, PayPal submitted supplemental declarations and exhibits ("the Supplemental Material") from PayPal's Senior Manager for Online Communications and Marketing Damon Billian.

Court's consideration of the Supplemental Material.  They argue that PayPal filed these documents in violation of this Court's Local Rules, and that the documents demonstrate that PayPal's original claim that Toher agreed to arbitration was false. The Court agrees that the filing did not comply with the Local Rules, and one reasonably may infer from the circumstances that PayPal's counsel at the very least were negligent in their original representations to the Court.  The Court does not take such irregularities lightly and will not hesitate to impose sanctions should this situation arise again. Nonetheless, because it concludes that the interests of justice are best served by reaching Plaintiffs' unconscionability arguments, the Court has given counsel the benefit of the doubt and has considered the Supplemental Material.

Toher provides that "this Agreement is subject to change at any time without notice," she assented to the arbitration clause that PayPal inserted into a subsequent version of the User Agreement.  In light of the disposition of the motion, the Court need not decide whether such a provision ever could result in a binding agreement to arbitrate.  As discussed below, however, PayPal's unilateral and apparently unfettered right to revise the User Agreement does bear on the question of whether the User Agreement is substantively unconscionable.

Id.  The two elements operate on a sliding scale such that the more significant one is, the less significant the other need be.   Id.  at 743, 113 Cal.Rptr.2d 422.   A claim of unconscionability cannot be determined merely by examining the face of the contract;  there must be an inquiry into the circumstances under which the contract was executed, its purpose, and effect.   Id.

FN10.  The record also demonstrates that individuals who are not account holders must register with the service as a precondition to accessing funds that an account holder sends to them.  Although none of the named Plaintiffs opened an account by such means, the Court notes that such individuals would not have any meaningful alternatives available to them.

PayPal, at its sole discretion, reserves the right to close an account at any time for any reason, including but not limited to a violation of this Agreement, upon notice to the User and payment to the User of any unrestricted funds held in custody.  PayPal, at its sole discretion, also reserves the right to periodically retrieve and review a business and / or consumer credit report for any account, and reserves the right to close an account based on information obtained during this credit review process.

PayPal, at its sole discretion, also reserves the right to restrict withdrawals from an account for any one of the events listed below.  If the dispute covers only a specific transaction, we will only restrict funds related to that particular transaction.  If your account is restricted, you will be notified by e-mail and requested to provide information relevant to your account.

PayPal will investigate the matter promptly.  If the investigation is in your favor, we will unrestrict your account.  If the investigation is not in your favor, PayPal may return funds to the sender and unrestrict the remainder of your account, continue the restriction for up to 180 days as to funds necessary to protect PayPal against the risk of  reversals, or may close your account by giving you notice and mailing a check for any funds in your account (minus funds that are in dispute) to the address that you have provided.  If you are later determined to be entitled to the funds in dispute, PayPal will make an additional payment of those funds to you.

A contract may provide a "margin of safety" that provides the party with superior bargaining strength protection for which it has a legitimate commercial need.  "However, unless the 'business realities' that create the special need for such an advantage are explained in the contract itself, ... it must be factually established."   Stirlen v.

Cal.Rptr.2d 138 (1997) .  When a contract is alleged to be unconscionable, "the parties shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to its commercial setting, purpose, and effect to aid the court in making the determination."   Cal.

Stirlen,  51 Cal.App.4th at 1540, 60 Cal.Rptr.2d 138  (finding that a mandatory arbitration requirement realistically applies "primarily if not exclusively" to claims filed by the employer in light of employer's failure to identify any provision of the contract or statute likely to give rise to a claim to which it would be compelled to submit to arbitration).

Cal.Rptr.2d 862.   As is this case here, the arbitration agreement at issue in  Szetela  categorically prohibited individual customers from joining or consolidating claims in arbitration.  The court determined that a large credit card company could not enforce the prohibition with respect to consumer claims against it because in practice most claims likely would involve consumers seeking the return of small amounts of money, and any remedy obtained by the few consumers who would not be dissuaded from pursuing their rights would pertain only to those consumers without collateral estoppel effect.   Id.  at 1101, 118 Cal.Rptr.2d 862.   The court concluded that such circumstances raise "[t]he potential for millions of customers to be overcharged small amounts without an effective method of redress...."  Id.

"[i]n all situations where arbitration provisions are placed on the same footing as other contracts, state law applies."  Ticknor,  265 F.3d at 941  (citation and internal quotation omitted).  Thus, while California's consumer protection statutes cannot prevent enforcement under the FAA of a prohibition on collective actions as such, a federal court properly may consider whether such a prohibition in combination with other provisions and circumstances renders an agreement substantively unconscionable as a matter of state law.

FN14.  PayPal objects to the declaration of Ann Saponora as exceeding the page limitations applicable to Plaintiffs' opposing papers and object to various portions of the declaration as vague and ambiguous, irrelevant, lacking foundation, hearsay, improper opinion, conclusion, speculation, violating the Best Evidence Rule, and improper use of case law and argument in a declaration.

It states in pertinent part that "[a]ny controversy or claim arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the provision of Services shall be settled by binding arbitration in accordance with the  commercial  arbitration rules of the American Arbitration Association." (emphasis added).   [FN15]   Further, because the clause is silent as to who bears the cost of arbitration, under California law each party is required to pay a  pro rata  share of the "expenses and fees of the neutral arbitrator, together with other expenses of the arbitration incurred or approved by the neutral arbitrator, not including counsel fees or witness fees or other expenses incurred by a party for his own benefit."

S.Ct. 513, 148 L.Ed.2d 373 (2000)  who claimed that the unknown and unidentified risk of excessive fees should be sufficient to defeat a valid arbitration clause, the named Plaintiffs here, none of whose individual claims exceeds $310.00, have shown that the costs each of them is likely to incur in commercial arbitration likely would exceed those involved in bringing a collective action.  By allowing for prohibitive arbitration fees and precluding joinder of claims (which would make each individual customer's participation in arbitration more economical), PayPal appears to be attempting to insulate itself contractually from any meaningful challenge to its alleged practices. Under these circumstances, the Court concludes that this aspect of the arbitration clause is so harsh as to be substantively unconscionable.

County, California.  PayPal argues that this venue provision is not unconscionable because forum selection clauses in general are  prima   facie  valid, courts have found similar forum selection clauses in arbitration clauses reasonable, and the named Plaintiffs themselves elected to litigate in this Court, thereby undercutting any claim that the contractual forum is burdensome or inconvenient for them.

Although it is true that forum selection clauses generally are presumed prima facie  valid, a forum selection clause may be unconscionable if the "place or manner" in which arbitration is to occur is unreasonable taking into account "the respective circumstances of the parties."   Bolter v. Superior Court,  87 Cal.App.4th 900, 909, 104 Cal.Rptr.2d 888 (2001) .  The record in this case shows that PayPal serves millions of customers across the United States and that the amount of the average transaction through PayPal is $55.00.  Although PayPal cites to unpublished or out-of-state authority holding that such facts do not warrant a finding of unconscionability, PayPal cites no California authority holding that it is reasonable for individual consumers from throughout the country to travel to one locale to arbitrate claims involving such minimal sums.

FN16.  As it does with respect to the costs of arbitration, PayPal contends that the AAA consumer rules mitigate any unfairness by permitting telephonic participation in arbitration hearings.  As already discussed, however, the User Agreement on its face provides that the AAA commercial rules apply.

FN17.  Plaintiffs also contend that the subject arbitration clause is unconscionable because it requires them to waive statutory rights.  The Court does not find this contention persuasive, and in any event it need not reach it.

Having considered the terms of the User Agreement generally and the arbitration clause in particular, as well as the totality of the circumstances, the Court concludes that the User Agreement and arbitration clause are substantively unconscionable under California law and that arbitration cannot be compelled herein.  Good cause therefor appearing, IT IS HEREBY ORDERED that the motions to compel individual arbitration are DENIED.

This motion by defendant Tickets.com, Inc. (hereafter TX) for summary judgment on plaintiffs Ticketmaster Corporation and Ticket Online-CitySearch, Inc. (hereafter collectively TM), intellectual property issues is denied as to  the contract claim of TM and granted as to the copyright and trespass to chattels claims, which are dismissed by this minute order.

At this point in the case, both parties have narrowed their claims. TM, the original plaintiff, has narrowed its intellectual property claims to a contract theory, a copyright theory, and a trespass to chattels theory.

Many of the factual items are not contested, although the legal result of applying the law to the uncontested facts is heavily contested. Among the uncontested facts are the following: Both TM and TX are in the business of selling tickets to all kinds of "events" (sports, concerts, plays, etc.) to the public. They are in heavy competition with one another, but operate in distinctive ways. TM is the largest company in the industry. It sells tickets by the four methods of ticket selling-venue box office, retail outlets, by telephone, and over the internet. Telephone and internet sales require the customer to establish credit with the ticket seller (usually by credit card). Internet sales have been the fastest growing segment of the industry.

TX at the time of the events considered in this motion was primarily (but not exclusively) an internet seller. Both TM and TX maintain a web page reachable by anyone with an internet connection. Each of their web pages has many  subsidiary (or interior) web pages which describe one event each and provide such basic information as to location, date, time, description of the event, and ticket prices. The TM interior web pages each have a separate electronic address or Uniform Resource Locator ("URL") which, if possessed by the internet user, allows the user to reach the web page for any particular event by by- passing the "home" web page and proceeding past the index to reach the interior web page for the event in question. The TM interior web pages provide telephone numbers for customers or allow the customer to order tickets to the event by interactive computer use. A charge is made for the TM service.

TM principally does business by exclusive contracts with the event providers or their producers, and its web pages only list the events for which TM is the exclusive ticket seller. TX also sells tickets to a number of events for which it is the ticket seller. At one point, its web pages attempted to list all events for which tickets were available whether or not TX sold the tickets. Its interior web pages also listed the event, the date, time, ticket prices, and provided for internet purchase if TX could sell the tickets.

When TX could not sell the tickets, it listed ticket brokers who sold at premium prices. In early 2000, TX discontinued this practice of listing events with tickets sold by other ticket brokers. Until early 2000, in situations where TM was the only source of tickets, TX provided a "deep link" by which the customer would be transferred to the interior web page of TM's web site, where the customer could  purchase the ticket from TM. This process of "deep linking" is the subject of TM's complaint in this action, of which there is now left the contract, copyright, and trespass theories.

"crawled" through the internal web pages to TM and electronically extracted the electronic information from which the web page is shown on the user's computer. The spider temporarily loaded this electronic information into the Random Access Memory ("RAM") of TX's computers for a period of from 10-15 seconds. TX then extracted the factual information (event, date, time, tickets prices, and URL) and discarded the rest (which consisted of TM identification, logos, ads, and other information which TX did not intend to use; much of this discarded material was protected by copyright). The factual information was then organized in the TX format to be displayed on the TX internal web page. The TX internal web page carried no TM identification and had only the factual information about the event on it which was taken from TM's interior web page but rearranged in TX format plus any information or advertisement added by TX. From March 1998, to early 2000, the TX user was provided the deep linking option described above to go directly from the TX web site to the relevant TM interior web page. This option stopped (or was stopped by TM) in early 2000.  For an unknown period afterward, the TX customer was given the option of linking to the TM home page, from which the customer could work his way to the interior web page in which he was interested. (The record does not reveal whether this practice still exists or whether TM objects to it.) Thus, the intellectual property issues in this case appear to be limited to events which occurred between November 1998, when spidering started, and July 2001, when it stopped. The "deep linking" aspect of the case is relevant only from March 1998, to early 2000, when it stopped.

The contract aspect of the case derives from a notice placed on the home page of the TM web site which states that anyone going beyond that point into the interior web pages of the web site accepts certain conditions, which include, relevant to this case, that all information obtained from the website is for the personal use of the user and may not be used for commercial purposes.

Earlier in this case (and at the time of the motion for preliminary injunction) the notice was placed at the bottom of the home page of the TM web site, so that a user without an especially large screen would have to scroll down the page to read the conditions of use. Since then, TM has placed in a prominent place on the home page the warning that proceeding further binds the user to the conditions of use. As one TX executive put it, it could not be missed.

At the time of the preliminary injunction motion, the court commented that there was no evidence that the conditions of use were known to TX. Since then, there  has been developed evidence that TX was fully familiar with the conditions TM claimed to impose on users, including a letter from TM to TX which quoted the conditions (and a reply by TX stating that it did not accept the conditions). Thus, there is sufficient evidence to defeat summary judgment on the contract theory if knowledge of the asserted conditions of use was had by TX, who nevertheless continued to send its spider into the TM interior web pages, and if it is legally concluded that doing so can lead to a binding contract. For reasons dealing with the desirability of clear unmistakable evidence of assent to the conditions on trial of such issues, the court would prefer a rule that required an unmistakable assent to the conditions easily provided by requiring clicking on an icon which says "I agree" or the equivalent. Such a rule would provide certainty in trial and make it clear that the user had called to his attention the conditions he or she accepted when using the web site. (The court notes that Professor Lemley also approves this approach, but this is treated as a legal opinion, not a fact). However, the law has not developed this way. Use of a cruise ship ticket with a venue provision printed on the back commits one to the venue provided. ( Carnival Cruise Lines  '91 499 U.S. 585, 113 L.Ed.2d 622 .) The Carriage of Goods by Sea Act, the Carmack Act, and the Warsaw Convention provide that limitations of liability on the bill of lading, air waybill, or airplane ticket are enforceable if the services are used by the customer.

Specht  involved a different set of circumstances, that of consumers invited to download free software from an internet site that did not contain a plainly visible notice of license terms.  See id.  at 32.

TM complains that the information obtained by the use of the spider was valuable (and even that it was sold by TX), and that it spent time and money attempting to frustrate the spider, but neither of these items shows damage to the computers or their operation. One must keep in mind that we are talking about the common law tort of trespass, not damage from breach of contract or  copyright infringement. The tort claim may not succeed without proof of tort- type damage. Plaintiff TM has the burden to show such damage. None is shown here. The motion for summary judgment is granted to eliminate the claim for trespass to chattels. This minute order is the order eliminating that claim. This approach to the tort of trespass to chattels should hurt no one's policy feelings; after all, what is being attempted is to apply a medieval common law concept in an entirely new situation which should be disposed of by modern law designed to protect intellectual property interests.

The copyright issues are more difficult. They divide into three issues. The first is whether the momentary resting in the TX computers of all of the electronic signals which are used to form the video representation to the viewer of the interior web pages of the TX computer constitutes actionable copyright infringement. The second is whether the URLs, which were copied and used by TX, contain copyrightable material. The third is whether TX's deep- linking caused the unauthorized public display of TM event pages. In examining these questions, we must keep in mind a prime theorem of copyright law-facts, as such, are not subject to copyright protection. What is subject to copyright protection is the manner or mode of expression of those facts.

Similarly, in this case, the existence of the event, its date and time, and its ticket prices, are not subject to copyright. Anyone is free to print (or show on the internet) such information. Thus, if TX had sat down a secretary at the computer screen with instructions manually to go through TM's web sites and pick out and write down purely factual information about the events, and then feed it into the TX web pages (using the TX distinctive format only), no one could complain. The objection is that the same thing was done with an electronic program. However, the difference is that the spider picks up all of the electronic symbols which, if it had been put on a monitor with the right software, would duplicate the TM web page. However, this is not the way it was done. The spider picks up the electronic symbols and loads them momentarily (for 10 to 15 seconds) into the RAM of the TX computers, where a program picks up the factual data (not protected), places same into the TX format for its web pages, and immediately discards the balance, which may consist of TM logos, TM advertisements, TM format for presentation of the material, and other material which is copyrightable. Thus, the actual copying (if it can be called that) is momentary while the non-protected material, all open to the public, is extracted. Is this momentary resting of the electronic symbols from which a TM web page could be (but is not) constructed fair use where the purpose is to obtain non-protected facts? The court thinks the answer is "yes". There is not much law in point. However, there are two Ninth Circuit cases which shed light  on the problem. They are  Sony Computer Entertainment  9Cir'00 203 F3d 596  and  Sega  9Cir'92 977 F.2d 1510 . In each of these cases, the alleged infringer attempted to get at non-protected source code by reverse engineering of the plaintiff's copyrighted software. In doing so, the necessary method was to copy the software and work backwards to derive the unprotected source code. The copied software was then destroyed. In each case, this was held to be fair use since it was necessary to temporarily copy the software to obtain the non- protected material.

It asserts in its points and authorities that taking the temporary copy in this case was not the only way to obtain the unprotected information, and that TX was able to, and in actuality did purchase such information from certain third-parties. Both  Sony  and  Sega stated that the fair use was justified because reverse engineering (including taking a temporary copy) was the only way the unprotected information could be obtained. Although this court recognizes that the holdings of  Sony  and Sega  were limited to the specific context of "disassembling" copyrighted object code in order to access unprotected elements contained in the source code, this court believes that the "fair use" doctrine can be applied to the current facts.

Taking the temporary copy of the electronic information for the limited purpose of extracting unprotected public facts leads to the conclusion that the temporary use of the electronic signals was "fair use" and not actionable.

In  determining whether a challenged use of copyrighted material is fair, a court must keep in mind the public policy underlying the Copyright Act: to secure a fair return for an author's creative labor and to stimulate artistic creativity for the general good. This court sees no public policy that would be served by restricting TX from using spiders to temporarily download TM's event pages in order to acquire the unprotected, publicly available factual event information. The rest of the event page information (which consisted of TM identification, logos, ads, and other information) was discarded and not used by TX and is not exposed to the public by TX. In temporarily downloading TM's event pages to its RAM through the use of spiders, TX was not exploiting TM's creative labors in any way: its spiders gathered copyrightable and non-copyrightable information alike but then immediately discarded the copyrighted material. It is unlikely that the spiders could have been programmed to take only the factual information from the TM web pages without initially downloading the entire page.

The smaller window was described as containing a page from the TM web site which was "framed" by the larger window. At the time of the preliminary injunction motion, TX stated that whether "framing" occurs or not depends on the settings on the user's computer, over which TX has no control. Thus, framing occurred on some occasions but not on others. However, TX says that it "did not try to disguise a sale by use of frames occurring on the Tickets.com website."

TX web page, this case is distinguishable from  Kelly.  In  Kelly, the defendant's site would display a variety of "thumbnail" images as a result of the user's search. By clicking on the desired thumbnail image, a user could view the "Images Attributes" page, which displayed the original full-size image, a description of its dimensions, a link to the originating web site, and defendant's banner and advertising. The full-size image was not technically located on defendant's web site, but was taken directly from the originating web site. However, only the image itself, and not any other part of the originating web site, was displayed on the "Images Attributes" page. The Ninth Circuit determined that by importing plaintiff's images into its own web page, and by showing them in the context of its own site, defendant infringed upon  plaintiff's exclusive public display right.

A familiar, recurrent theme throughout the course has been the need for consumer education.  Although some have adopted more of a "buyer beware" stance, several times throughout our discussions students have expressed concern that Internet users need to be better educated about what harms their Internet use may subject them (or their computers) to.

For example, in regard to employee privacy, many believe employers should notify employees if they monitor their e-mails or web surfing.  This is a form of education, as if employers tell their employees they are going to monitor them, how they are going to do so, and how they may use the information, the employer has educated the user (employee).  Armed with this knowledge, the employee is better able to protect himself or herself from disciplinary action due to their workplace Internet use.

Further, phishing is an on-line phenomenon I had little or no knowledge of before this class, and it is evident that consumer education could curtail the harms caused by it.  If consumers know that the web site or e-mail they receive from AOL or eBay may be an imposter's way of getting the user to divulge personal information, such disclosure is significantly less likely.  Although there have been efforts to educate users about phishing, ISPs and government could work together more to better educate the on-line public about this.

Additionally, Internet users could benefit from knowing more about spyware, adware, or cookies.  Unfortunately, few users get the level of understanding about these topics that we have had the opportunity to develop through these forums and discussions.  A startling number of users have adware on their computers without even realizing it.  Educating the public about how accepting End User Licensing Agreements can result in unknowing consent to adding spyware to personal computers is an important undertaking, for example.

For example, several attempts to pass federal legislation requiring employers to provide notice to their employees of monitoring of on-line workplace activity have failed (such as the Notice for Electronic Monitoring Act).  Some support state regulations to the same effect, but a pure notice bill has failed in California four times across gubernatorial administrations of both major parties.  In this case, both federal and state legislation failed because of politicians' deference to the business lobby.

Practically speaking, because Internet use crosses state lines by design, federal legislation would be more suited to addressing on-line legal issues.  However, states have taken the initiative to go beyond the protections federal laws provide.  Maryland, for example, has a more comprehensive law against phishing (the Maryland Spam Deterrence Act).  Also, Montana has a more comprehensive law regulating public records on the Internet (the Governmental Internet Information Privacy Act).

A problem with federal legislation is that it has the potential to preempt more protective state laws, sometimes before the state regulations have the opportunity to demonstrate their usefulness.  For example, Va. Code Ann. s. 18.2-152.3:1 would have provided for more general regulation and harsher penalties if CAN-SPAM had not preempted it.

One of the pervasive themes this semester is the fact that parents have to assume responsibility for the actions of their children on the Internet. At least four forums this semester have focused on different danger areas for children on the World Wide Web.

The first area of internet use affecting children arose in the second week when we discussed the topic of online prostitution. A lot of the discussion centered around the easy availability of pornographic materials on the Internet. The next area that posed a question with minor accessibility was online tobacco sales. Selling tobacco product online make it easier for minors to acquire the goods. The third area of child usage is Internet gambling.

All of the areas are ones where there is a merchant and a buyer. Each of these sites require the use of a credit card in order to make a purchase.  For a minor to make a purchase, they merely have to use their parent's card. Or, if they are near majority age, they may even have a card in their own name.

The class discussed many of the options that parents may have in this type of situation. Many have advocated suing the credit card companies that allow these questionable sites to sell to minors in transactions that they approve. Others said that the credit card companies should stop approving charges for these sites in general because they are illegal in several jurisdictions (online gambling).

Finally, the last area where children have a major contribution is the illegal downloading of copyrighted songs using P2P software. Parents are being held liable for the actions of themselves and their children who are illegally downloading material from the Internet. Although this is not an area where there is a credit card charge, there is financial harm to the parent if they are either forced to settle a lawsuit or lose in court.

The recurring theme in these four forums is the importance of the fact that parents need to know what their children are doing while they are online. The computer is not a babysitter, and parents need to monitor their children's usage. If a parent is looking over the kid's shoulder, they are not likely to be surfing internet porn, buying tobacco or gambling.

Privacy, or its absence, on the Internet, is a recurring theme. It's a concern in ecommerce, law enforcement, in connection with Internet usage in the workplace, and in many other online contexts. Scott McNealy, Sun Microsystems' CEO, famously said, "You have zero privacy anyway. Get over it." As our forums are starting to reflect, it seems he may have been right.

Privacy has no doubt been a recurring theme this semester. If you look at the discussion forum, you will notice that four of the weekly discussions centered directly on privacy issues. In the first week, the topic was the Fourth Amendment and how it related to the Internet. In this discussion, we discussed the privacy rights of prisoners and students at schools. In the third week, the discussion was on the Patriot Act, which obviously invokes privacy issues. A few weeks later, the topic was IM/Email privacy in the workplace. The final discussion of this class will also be on privacy on the Internet. I would be interested to see how much of our discussions would have centered on privacy if the Patriot Act wasn't in the picture. I wonder if it may be the catalyst for our paranoia about privacy on the Internet.

The Patriot Act is a convenient short-hand for privacy concerns but one that misses the mark more often than not.  However, Privacy on the Internet has been a concern since before 1997, when the Clinton Administration was in full swing.  A 1997 survey of 1000+ computer users conducted by Privacy and American Business, called "Commerce, Communication, and Privacy Online," found that 54% of all computer users "not currently using the Internet" would likely do so in the next year.  Of the remaining 46% who would not, 52% said they would be more likely to do so if "the privacy of personal information and communications would be protected."

Groups like the Online Privacy Alliance and the US Internet Industry Association continue to focus enormous resources on privacy issues on the Internet.  For the vast majority of these groups, their efforts remain on resolving consumer trust issues in e-commerce to create a vibrant marketplace on the Internet.

Throughout many of our forums there seems to have been a split regarding how involved the government should be in regulating many of the activities that go on.  Many people are concerned about the moral issues associated with activities like gambling, pornography, prostitution, and tobacco sales and what the government can do to prevent them.  Others have taken a less hands on approach feeling more like some of the issues are not being regulated because many people really do not care that they go on and there has not been a real push by the people to get the legislature to get anything done.  Potential harm to children has been been big with many who feel like the government should make the internet fully safe for childrens use, while others feel that parents should be responsible for minimizing risks to their own children.

One of the key themes that arose throughout the forums was how to address the issue of penalties when dealing with "cyber-crimes."  One of the many sources of debate on this issue was how much of a penalty should courts or legislatures impose on these unique types of offenders.

The forum on the CAN-SPAM Act provided an excellent example of the debate that occurs regarding the size of penalties in this context.  In this forum, one person noted that the first case under the Act settled for $25,000.  Several forum participants debated the question of whether this amount was reasonable.  One person noted that the statute permitted a fine of up to $2 million - therefore the $25,000 settlement was very minor.  However, other people noted that the point of the statue is not to repair the damage done by spamming, but to deter the practice; thus the penalties should be more reasonable.

This discussion illustrates a connection that occurred several times throughout the forums: the penalty's severity is typically related to the law's purpose.   If the purpose of a law banning certain behavior on the Internet is to prevent a specific kind of behavior then the penalty should be high enough to reach this goal without constituting overdeterrence.  If the penalty is too high, as one person noted in his posting, the individual cannot pay the fee and will not alter their behavior - this is overdeterrence and is more harmful than helpful.  However, if the goal of the law is to make the injured party whole the penalty should attempt to satisfy this end, which often leads to more sizeable damages.  Thus, as courts and legislatures attempt to determine how much is enough this question traditionally seems to come back to the purpose of the law.

One of the themes I have found in the discussions has been how the law treats owners allowing third parties to operate their equipment and how it treats users using third party equipment.  As the name suggests, the "cyberworld" is not grounded in any physical location, though the law continues to view conduct with a perspective towards a physical location.

When you use another's computer (whether you are an employee at work, a student at at school, a prisoner in prison, or a teenager at granma's house) your rights may be different from times when you use your own equipment, particularly by lowering your expectation of privacy.

The law also allows the owner of a computer (employer, school, prison) more leeway to snoop on your activity, while at the same time it potentially holds you responsible for the behavior of another (like when your teenage daughter downloads files on your computer).

If you are a member of the class, selecting the "Post|Edit" link at the top of the page, and entering your username and password, will provide you with additional links, "Post Item" and "Admin Options Off".  You will also see some additional information at the top of each posted item, a link to "Edit" the item (unless it's been deemed no longer editable), code to use to link to the item, and the item's "Order" on the page.

Finally, when your item is ready to post, check the box to that effect.  If you want to save it for editing later, don't check that box.  Your item will not appear on the regular page, but it will appear when you select the "Post|Edit" link.

Wiseman's Summer, 1995 Law and the Internet class.  Thank you to Chas Underwood for this introduction into the photography world and Jamey Rousey for technical  support and cocktails.  Comments, corrections and correspondence is welcome, please contact the author at dixie@mindspring.com.

Daddy", "Lust for Children", "How to Deflower Your Daughter",  and "School Girls" are primers in child sexual abuse.{4}  Child pornography may also be used to lure children into sexual activity and instruct them, since young children who view such material may be led to believe that this is acceptable behavior.  In addition to decreasing inhibitions, this material may cause sexual arousal in some children.

Child Pornography is harmful.  It is harmful for the subjects of child pornography and it is harmful for all other children who could become victims by those who are fuled by online child pornography.

Until recently, anonymity had been used only by a relatively small group of Internet users.  Much of the remailing software, like strong encryption software, was highly technical and designed to be used strictly in UNIX or DOS formats.  However, recent programs have made remailers much more accessible for the average computer user.  Joel McNamara's Private Idaho software is a widely used Windows interface which makes using both anonymous and pseudonymous remailers  a simple point and click operation.  Chaining and encryption operations are automated negating the need for technical knowledge. [42]  There are World Wide Web-based pseudonymous remailers such as Replay which remove the necessity of software for the user. [43]  Again, with ease of use in advanced remailers may come the ease of abuse foreshadowed by anon.penet.fi.

There are evident social benefits to Internet anonymity.  However, the potential for uncontainable abuse is present and is in the minds of legislators.   Current technology hides a sender's identity from not merely the recipient of his message, but from the most sophisticated methods of tracing.

Scientology v. anon.penet.fi.  Because the remailer kept a log translating pseudonyms to user IDs, the Finnish police were able to obtain the former Church member's name with a warrant to obtain the entire log.

Some feel that new federal legislation is necessary or at least that current federal statutes should be expanded to include spam, and others feel the problem is best handled by individual state governments. There are several federal statutes regarding spam currently pending, and there are at least 16 states with spam bills pending or enacted.

The most immediate action taken against the problems associated with unsolicited email on the Internet has come from the private sector. As soon as the noisome practice of unsolicited mass emails began, Internet Service Providers and individuals created methods to put an end to it.

Perhaps the earliest private means of curbing spam involved the reliance on Netiquette[7], the informal guidelines governing behavior on the Net. However, such guidelines lack the power of law. Consequently, spammers can ignore them with impunity. It is precisely because there is no enforcement mechanism for Netiquette that it has proven to be largely useless in the crusade against spam.

As mentioned, blocking software can only filter out certain types of incoming email. To be specific, blocking occurs on email that is sent from either a known spammer or a fictitious address. Therefore, if an advertiser is sophisticated -- and duplicitous -- enough to forge a legitimate address, the spam will likely reach most, if not all, of its addressees.

The costs here have been foisted onto ISPs who are forced to utilize resources on the mass of spam sent to their legitimate account-holders. Additionally, the person who is unfortunate enough to have their address forged as the sender of spam is essentially without recourse to the hordes of email that clog his or her account -- and ultimately close it.

ISP resources, such policies have been drafted to authorize ISPs to terminate misbehaving accounts. Again, professional spammers have ways around this, but AUPs have been very effective in curbing some of the annoyance and misuse of resources associated with spam. If you are shopping for an Internet Provider, or even if you already have one, it is advisable to check into the policies regarding spam. For instance, Mindspring has a fairly stringent AUP[10] regarding everything from spamming to impersonation on the Internet.

Mindspring echoes many ISPs when it sets out to protect both its customers and its resources from things such as spam. Responsible ISPs recognize that their job is to provide access to everything on the Internet with minimal or no interference. However, this job comes with the responsibility to see that this access does not inhibit the use of other subscribers or unjustifiably drain resources that are necessary to sustain the service that they seek to provide. Internet Providers that thoroughly understand this recognize the age-old balancing test between freedom of speech and the right to yell "Fire!" in a crowded theater. In a very real sense, ISPs that provide access to the Internet cannot do so at the expense of the rights of others.

Due to the dearth and limited effectiveness of legal remedies available to those affected by the rising tide of spam, various legislatures have proposed different means to deal with the problem. Of course, ISPs can continue to engage spammers on a contractual basis when they violate their AUPs, but again the effectiveness of this remedy is minimal.

Although nothing passes rapidly in the hallowed halls of Capitol Hill, there are several bills before Congress that specifically address unsolicited email transmissions. Although these federal proposals deal specifically with commercial email, they can be reasonably applied to unsolicited, non-commercial email transmissions as well. Of the bills that have been proposed, there are three that deal specifically with spam: the Netizens Protection Act of 1997, the Unsolicited Commercial Electronic Mail Choice Act of 1997, and the Electronic Mailbox Protection Act of 1997. Each is discussed below in terms of what relief, if any, is given to the victims of Internet spam.

This act would amend the Communications Act of 1934 to prohibit the transmission of all unsolicited advertisements via electronic mail. Further, it would require that information regarding the identity of the sender be included with all electronic mail messages.

The bill purports to promote online commerce and communications, to protect consumers and Internet Service Providers from the misuse of computer facilities by others sending bulk unsolicited electronic mail. It was introduced by Senator Torricelli on June 11, 1997.

State legislatures have also attempted to grant their constituents similar relief. The bills proposed in state congressional chambers follow the same premises as the federal bill. Below, we will discuss those measures that have been enacted and the remedies each provides.

Some of these bills have been recently enacted, while others are on the verge of passage. Despite their varied approached, each promises relief to those affected by the intrusive practice of spam on the Internet.

The bill specifically seeks to protect against the illegitimate use of a third party's Internet domain name. The statute addresses such use as that which is either without the permission of the third party or that which contains false or misleading information. It provides for damages to the recipient of an email message that is violative of this Act in the amount of $500 or actual damages, whichever is greater, and damages of $1,000 or actual damage, whichever greater, with regard to any third party that is improperly identified. The law's ambitious scope includes not only messages that originate in Washington, but also email that is addressed to a party that the sender knows or has reason to know is owned by a Washington resident. Of course, this raises a multitude of jurisdictional issues, but the legal evolution promises to be interesting once the Act takes effect in late June of 1998.

Rather than categorize the cases by federal or state, civil or criminal, etc., we have decided to group the cases by the type of plaintiff bringing the suit. The overwhelming majority of spam cases have been brought by Internet Service Providers (ISPs), but there are many other types of plaintiffs as well. We have divided the cases, by plaintiffs, into the following groups: ISPs, Domain Name Holders, Individuals, the FTC, State Attorneys General, and miscellaneous spam cases.

If the domain name has been spoofed, the actual holder of the domain name that was used will receive all of the undeliverable messages at the default return address for that domain, and that domain name's mail server will likely be overwhelmed. This is a big problem for ISPs because their postmasters will receive all of the bad, out of date, or otherwise undeliverable messages. This is also a problem for ISPs when they are fraudulently listed as the return address domain because of undeliverable messages being bounced back, but many times the spoofed address does not belong to an ISP. This section addresses cases that have been brought by non-ISP domain name holders whose addresses have been spoofed.

Many purport to be "completely legal." Although it is true that there is no statute or case specifically addressing pyramid scheme or chain letter spam, federal law seems to be pretty clear on the point that pyramid schemes and chain letters are illegal.

Despite advancements in the legislative arena, the significant drain on resources, time, and patience continues. The court system simply moves too slowly to be an effective control over problems arising on the Internet. When all is said and done, it is the private market that is best equipped to deal with spam in a truly effective manner.

This site's owner says "the site has been brought to you for you to spend less time doing mindless homework and more time doing or thinking up useful and productive tasks that actually let your mind expand!"

The author calls this site "Education's check and balance" because it forces "mediocre professors, who have been giving the same assignments since the Truman administration, to rethink their assignments -- and maybe even add a bit of creativity to them." The main page warns students not to turn these papers in; then it provides links to three versions of the site: School Sucks English, School Sucks Russia, and School Sucks Israel.

"Lowest prices on the Internet for pre-written term papers, research papers, and book/novel/story reviews!! Why start from scratch when you can use a fully cited, 'A' paper as a "study guide" or "research aid?"

If we can, we'll tell you how long it'll take and how much it's going to cost. COST!!!! That's right, cost. Don't worry, We are not some bunch of lazy bastards who make their living off of this, so we're not charging colosal prices, exploiting the youth of today. Then we can work out the details and shazaam... you have yourself a term paper."

The site claims it is "the easiest and most reliable term paper site on the web." and that they've "been in this business for years and know the needs of the average student in high school, college, and beyond." You can have unlimited access to the database for $9.95 per year.

The site also includes pre-written essays and term papers. The writers are available 24 hours a day, seven days a week, and they "always guarantee on-time delivery of your paper, so you can relax while [they] help you do the work!"

The Panopticon has great potential as a regulative dystopia. As a symbol of manipulation, it crystallizes the sinister side of modern dataveillance, that vague aspect of the Information Age that makes us uneasy without knowing exactly why. As a paradigm of manipulation, it focuses technological and legal efforts to protect personal data privacy. Our technology and law must now weigh the benefits of the Information Age against both Big Brother and the Panopticon.

The "Panopticon" is the English jurist and philosopher Jeremy Bentham's model penitentiary, which he described in his 1791 book Panopticon [3] For Bentham, however, his idea was more than an efficient use of space. His idea was, for him, the perfect architectural expression of the utilitarian goal of harmonizing the desires of the self with the desires of society (of the conscience).

This is classic psychological attribution: one acts, then adjusts one's background set of beliefs to conform to one's actions. Otherwise too much cognitive dissonance is generated between behavior and belief. The Panopticon was Bentham's most passionate project, upon which he lavished his time and money, and although it was never built in England, it exerted a powerful influence upon modern penal theory.

But it is the Panopticon mediated through Michel Foucault's "panopticism" which is truly interesting here. Foucault also saw in the Panopticon more than an efficient use of space. For Foucault, the Panopticon was a potent metaphor for what he most despised about modern society. Foucault saw Bentham's Panopticon as a watershed marking the transition from brutal "sovereign" power, which featured dramatic and violent punishments, to "disciplinary" power, which features humane and rational punishments, meted out automatically and invisibly. It is Foucault who translated Bentham's vision into "panopticism," a general paradigm for the functioning of modern power.

The essential aspects of panoptic power are these: It is embedded, or pervasively present in even the smallest of microrelations; every action a prisoner takes in his glass cell is visible and potentially observed.

It is assymmetric; while the prisoner is completely visible, the inspector is completely invisible in the tower. It is a power of inspection, depending on the constant visibility of the prisoner. It isolates and atomizes the inspected; the prisoner is alone in his cell - even given his own private bathroom to reinforce his solitude. It is automatic and ubiquitous; the inspector need do nothing for the prisoner to act in perfect conformity with even the smallest behavioral adjustment. It is self-policing; the prisoner is the bearer of his own subjection. It is impersonal, depending on abstract classifications of individuals: prisoner, student, worker.

It is capital, not labor, intensive. Finally, and perhaps most importantly, it is uncertain; the prisoner does not know whether he is being watched from one moment to the next. Hence he must constantly comply - if he does not for an instant, that may be the only instant upon which he is judged.

But is the Panopticon and "panopticism" really an accurate model for modern forms electronic of surveillance and control? David Lyon [7] identifies two ways in which panoptic power may differ from modern dataveillance.

At work, one's employer may impose a panoptic form of surveillance on the individual, monitoring and recording and perhaps reviewing, what software the individual uses, what email has been sent and received, what web sites have been visited. [8] But this panoptic eye is shut when the individual returns home, although of course a new set of eyes may then be trained on the individual, in his or her electronic purchases, for example. However, the line between work and home may be blurring. Unlike more brutal past forms of control, panoptic control, based on electronic information gathering, does not depend on where the individual is physically situated. 2) Lyons suggests that the modern social order is better explained in terms of two classes: consumers and an "underclass." While the underclass may experience panoptic power as a confining, carceral form of power, the consumer class may actually experience the modern panoptic state as pleasure. This is because such electronic information gathering assists consumers in satisfying their desires for corporate consumer goods. The unskilled, "flawed consumer" underclass, denied credit and checks, denied even employment on the basis of information, is constantly encircled by panoptic eyes, ready to deny them access to the consumer goods of modern society at every turn. Hence, for the vast majority of people in modern society, the social order is upheld through a form of consumerism rather than panopticism. However, even for this group, there is a way to see panoptic power at work. "Consumerism" itself may be panoptic if we understand marketing to mean not only research regarding individuals' needs and desires, but the the conscious manipulation of those desires. Hence, organizations with the best information on each individual are able to create a desire for a product, then fulfill that desire. For example, making traditional baked bread was too expensive for modern bread manufacturing processes; therefore, baker corporations created a desire for a new, better kind of bread, "white" bread. And individuals rushed to get it.

Hence electronic panoptic power does seem to function behind and within our institutions. And as the boundaries between spheres of life in the modern liberal state continue to blur, electronic panoptic power will continue to grow.

Bentham is famously recognized for the utilitarian maxim "the greatest happiness of the greatest number" and the detailed calculus he invented to implement it. He considered liberal attacks on his Panopticon as misguided: he was convinced that his new prison was a revolutionarily humane form of incarceration.

What they are concerned about is, of course, the degradation of human freedom through modern forms of social manipulation. This is also a strong theme in Anthony Burgess' A Clockwork Orange. The only "happiness" possible is that of Nietzsche's last men (the anti-overmen), who are no longer even capable of formulating alternative desires. Only the banal goals of the clockwork matter or are even visible to them.

Cryptography battles panoptic power in two specific ways: 1) it guarantees that some communications are completely confidential, and 2) it makes digital cash possible. Encryption of communications allows the prisoner a few shadows in his cell in which to hide; moreover it allows prisoners to communicate with each other. Digital cash, however, is the true threat to panoptic power in the commercial sphere, because it allows purchases to be made relatively anonymously, just as physical cash function now as anonymous medium of economic exchange.

Finally, tax return information is specifically protected from disclosure except for purposes incidental to tax administration [39], and banks' data are protected from federal agencies by a number of procedural safeguards set up in a statute passed to overturn United States v. Miller, supra. 2) Medical records receive surprisingly little federal protection. Statutes restrict the release of information pertaining to an individual's prior treatment in an alcohol treatment [40] or drug rehabilitation [41] program, and the Department of Health and Human Services is required to protect social security records. Otherwise, medical information remains largely unprotected. 3) Interactive media is protected in a potpourri of statutes. The Wiretap Law prohibits electronic or mechanical eavesdropping on phone calls [42] and has been extended to protect electronic communications and data transmission, e.g. by modem, [43] thus overturning the specific holding of Smith v. Maryland, supra.

The Panopticon can provide focus to this legislative activity. Data privacy protections can be targeted against three different kinds of activities: collection, organization, dissemination. With regard to collection, panoptic power is exerted when gathering is automatic and uncertain. Recall that it is the uncertainty of whether the inspector is watching that gives the Panopticon much of its unique power. Hence, data privacy laws should require government and private organizations to inform the consumer precisely when information is being collected and for exactly what purposes. No information gathering should be allowed unless such warnings are given to the consumer.

With regard to organization, panoptic power depends on atomizing the individual, turning on certain flags about an individual as a member of this or that group in a completely impersonal way. Data privacy laws should therefore restrict certain kinds of generalizations that organizations are allowed to make across groups, regardless of how much rational economic sense such generalizations may make. For example, an insurance company may want to make generalizations based on race, sex, or sexual orientation.

Finally, with regard to dissemination and disclosure, panoptic power is exerted in an automatic and pervasive way. Information sharing between organizations should be restricted; information gathered for one purpose should not be turned to another within another organization. Moreover, even where legitimate sharing occurs, the individual should be notified.

The Panopticon functions as a useful regulatory dystopia, a future to be avoided as carefully and systematically as Orwell's apocalyptic totalitarian vision in 1984. Escape from the Panopticon is possible, but only if we target our technology and law directly at panoptic forms of power.

It is now possible to find literally hundreds of websites devoted to software piracy by simply typing "warez," the slang term for pirated software, into any search engine. The newsgroup "alt.binaries.warez.ibm-pc" is one of the busiest news groups on the Internet with thousands of posts every week. It is now almost as easy to copy a pirated program to your computer's hard drive as it is to make a cassette copy of a song off of your favorite radio station. Because of the growth of the Internet, the effects of computer software piracy are global, resulting in increasing social and economic losses. Moral and legal considerations plague the software industry in their effort to minimize losses due to piracy, while the demand for software programs continues to expand within the international scope of the Internet.

On one side of the software battle are the hackers, crackers, couriers, downloaders, and users of pirated software; on the other are the software companies and users of legitimate copies of the same software. Curiously, both sides seem driven by the same motivations - - greed and power - - while at the same time both sides also feel that they are on the side of justice. Greed motivates the software companies which seek the maximum profit possible from their software creations, and greed motivates the pirates who desire expensive software but do not want to (or are unable to) pay for it.

A constant power struggle is waged between the two parties. The software companies try to stop the hackers, and the pirates try to overcome the authority of the software companies. The software companies see the pirates as criminals; the pirates often see themselves as freedom fighters against corporate greed. As the software companies spend larger amounts of time and money creating more elaborate software protection schemes, pirate groups spend just as much time and energy promptly cracking them.

While U.S. copyright statutes provide a certain measure of protection, international treaties and trade laws provide additional options for monitoring infringers. Software manufacturer trade associations promote a zealous, hard-nosed approach to regulating and penalizing anyone who participates in piracy, from the unsuspecting home user, businesses, bulletin board service providers and hackers who set up warez sites. Those who oppose the regulation of anything related to the Internet cite First Amendment concerns or simply proclaim that the Web is beyond governmental regulation and should be free. While most acknowledge that a problem exists, the debate rages over current regulation and protection, imposition of penalties and whether new technology or more narrow legislation will solve the problem.

F. Supp. 1077 (D. Md. 1995), co-defendants purchased and copied Microsoft software without the accompanying personal computers and sold the software to others. Here, the defendants asserted their alleged lack of knowledge as a defense. The Court found that the defendants had in fact received notice of the counterfeit products and were computer software professionals. Therefore, they were held liable for copyright infringement.

Supp. 1361, (N.D. Cal. 1995), the Court refused to hold the defendant liable for direct copyright infringement merely because he created the bulletin board space. The court analogized the service to a copy machine, wherein the owner is not liable for contributory copyright infringement where others may use the machine to reproduce copyrighted materials.

Remailers are a distinct sect of bulletin board service operators who are able to provide anonymity to their subscribers. Their users are able to commit copyright infringement by distributing unauthorized copies of software without concern that they will be traced.(10) Remailers can provide an access to e-mail services wherein no e-mail address is transmitted. A return e-mail can be forwarded to the original sender through the remailer with a number assigned to the recipient. While there are legitimate reasons for e-mail anonymity, this service surely provides an opportunity to engage in copyright infringement via piracy.

Remailers can be subject to contributory copyright infringement. While case law is scant at present, remailers will likely assert the familiar defenses of knowledge, contribution and substantial non-infringing uses.(11)  If the direct infringer can be traced, plaintiffs will be able to seek relief against them. However, unless remailers are liable for contributory infringement, plaintiffs in actions against remailers will find it difficult to obtain relief, especially if the direct infringer cannot be traced. Courts will have to balance the interests of legitimate anonymous consumers with anonymous users.

The effects of software piracy are global. There has been an exponential growth in software piracy due to the ability to copy and disseminate programs worldwide with only a few keystrokes. The role of Intellectual property is also changing in the global market place. The legal system does not seem to be ready to give any definitive solution to cyber-piracy. Content providers are increasingly edgy about protecting their ideas in the online medium; an area of particular concern for publishers is ensuring that copyrights to their work are understood and enforced on the Internet.

Since an entire operation can take less than 24 hours, it is virtually impossible for law enforcement officials to shut them down, and when they are able to shut such an operation down, it is virtually impossible to know where the next site will emerge.(17) Most software pirates are aware that piracy is a dangerous business that can get participants into a great deal of trouble. In fact, an atmosphere of electronic piracy seems to have in turn created a freer attitude than ever toward good old-fashioned plagiarism. The prevalent attitude behind piracy seems to be that if modern technology makes it easy to take or use whatever form of intellectual property comes along, then it is okay to take it no matter what the cost to the creator of the material. Because of this attitude, industry anti-piracy experts say that the problem is growing as more people become sophisticated in the techniques of uploading and downloading.

Software Publishers Association (SPA), piracy or the illegal distribution of copyrighted software cost the industry $11.4 billion dollars in 1997.(18)  The illegal copying and distribution of computer software has become common and widely accepted by computer users due to several factors, including the ease of transmitting software through networks or between modems, high price of commercial software, difficulty of discovering software piracy, and lack of economic incentive to sue individual (judgment proof) pirates for copyright infringement.

TRIPS, which went into effect on January 1, 1995, as part of the agreement that established the WTO,(28) was designed to remedy the perceived weaknesses in the Berne Convention and other multilateral intellectual property treaties. TRIPS requires that WTO member states comply with the substantive provisions of the Berne Convention, except for those concerning moral rights.(29) However, following what TRIPS negotiators commonly referred to as a "Berne plus" approach, the Agreement also: (1) adds rights beyond those that it incorporates from Berne; (2) appears to narrow the scope of permissible limitations to copyright holder rights; and (3) requires countries to make available effective remedies for copyright enforcement.(30) By bringing copyright within the ambit of the WTO, TRIPS also provides a mechanism for international enforcement through the imposition of trade sanctions against non-complying countries.(31)  Finally, by requiring stringent, quasi-proprietary copyright protection as a quid pro quo for WTO membership, TRIP creates a strong inducement for non-signatory countries to join an international copyright regime based on the Western model.

Since TRIPS came into effect, the WIPO has sought to regain its leading role in the international copyright administration and harmonization. In December 1996 the WIPO sponsored a diplomatic conference, attended by representatives of some 140 countries, with a principal objective of bringing world intellectual property law into the digital age.

The WIPO Copyright Treaty,(32) adopted at the diplomatic conference after considerable and often rancorous debate, would require states to provide digital content providers with greater protection against Internet piracy.(33) At the same time, the Copyright Treaty represents a defeat for content providers who, hoping to capitalize on the momentum for upward harmonization spurred by TRIPS, sought to institute a worldwide regime of extensive proprietary control over digital and non-digital content.(34) The Copyright Treaty gives explicit recognition to "the need to maintain a balance between the rights of authors and the larger public interest,"(35) and the Agreed Statements accompanying the Treaty provide that both existing and new limitations on copyright owner rights may be appropriate in the digital environment.(36) While keeping in mind the various treaties governing United States Copyright law, an examination of the history and evolution of copyright regulation yields a perspective on present day application of the law to software theft. Currently copyright statutes are distinguished between civil and criminal.

In addition, a recent amendment to the Copyright Act adds a sixth provision that grants the owner of a copyrighted sound recording the exclusive right to perform the work "publicly by means of a digital audio transmission."(45) Together, these six exclusive privileges constitute a copyright owner's bundle of protected rights.

In sum, while both misdemeanor and felony sanctions require a showing of infringement accompanied by the requisite mens rea, felony status only attaches in cases meeting the statutorily designated threshold requirements.

In 1994, the federal government attempted to prosecute LaMacchia under the wire fraud statute.(101) The Court declined to find a cause of action, instead citing the decision in Dowling(102) as controlling. Dowling was convicted of, among other things, copyright infringement.(103)  The Court there held that the infringer does not assume physical control over the copyright, nor does he deprive the owner of its use.

There are a number of problems with criminal prosecution for the software piracy categories. For example, copying software for personal use, or softlifting, could never meet the criminal statute's commercial advantage element. With corporate piracy, corporations and similar entities should not be subject to federal prosecution for the conduct of their employees for which they had no knowledge. The for profit element is lacking in both of these scenarios. However, eliminating the for financial gain provision of the criminal copyright statute would crush many Internet services and participants. The effect of such criminalization could be far reaching on the Internet because it would affect chat rooms which utilize copyrighted material as the basis for distribution, discussions and information daily. The effect could also chill First Amendment speech in a non commercial context, simply because it was infringing. Also, the government would still have to prove willfulness.

The result is that a corporation can be convicted of a criminal offense even if not a single one of its employees possessed the knowledge to be individually guilty. The imputed knowledge doctrine could result in an unduly harsh application of the criminal copyright statutes. Willfulness would need to be a primary consideration in the analysis of an infringement claim of this nature.

The Software Publishers Association is the largest organization combating software piracy. Formed in 1984, the SPA has been active in every aspect of software copyright protection--from litigation, to legislation, to education. Today the SPA has over 1,100 members, ranging from huge business software publishers to small computer game companies.

Copyright law should provide for strong civil remedies including permanent injunctions against infringement, seizure of all illegal software and any articles used to defeat copyright protection, compensation, and fines.(136)  Copyright law will deter piracy only if the final remedies for infringement are substantial. The copyright law should include minimum criminal penalties when piracy is committed knowingly and is carried out for a commercial purpose or to satisfy internal demands of any business or other entity.(137)  Although self regulation is conceptually appealing, so far it has failed to provide any semblance of copyright protection. Modern technology has upset the delicate balance upon which traditional copyright protection is premised, and copyright pirates are eagerly taking advantage of this imbalance.

Software makers have had to employ copy protection, scalable licensing, corporate activism, and civil litigation as anti-piracy measures because the threat of criminal liability has not and cannot decrease illegal copying.(141)  Although the government currently attempts to regulate software theft, the industry continues to lose billions of dollars. Nevertheless, self-help's imperfect protections are far superior to any current or prospective statutory device at the government's disposal. Furthermore, software makers must realize that the existing battery of private remedies can be substantially improved, particularly with regard to technological safeguards. As long as programs are easy to copy, software piracy will continue to plague the industry.

In addition to the ambiguity disclosed by the Courts in LaMacchia , the current copyright system's failure to provide an adequate deterrent to infringement serves as a strong motivating force behind the recent move to expand criminal prosecution of copyright infringement. Although the Copyright Act's penalty system attempts to dissuade future copyright violations, rampant piracy now plagues American copyright industries.

With billions of dollars being lost each year to piracy, it is apparent that the present statutory remedies are not producing their intended deterrent effects. Copyright piracy has emerged as a "big business" due to a combination of the low cost and negligible risk of detection associated with modern infringement methods and the relatively high benefits to pirates. On the one hand, the costs, or risks, of modern infringement are very low. In many cases, for example, modern technology reduces copyright infringement to a task as simple as the push of a button. Moreover, Information Age devices such as computers, modems, fax machines, and photocopiers are a common part of everyday life, thus rendering the tools of infringement readily accessible to pirates. As a result, modern copyright piracy often requires little time, effort, or expense.

While today's infringement costs decline, the attendant benefits of infringement climb to all-time highs. First, the very devices that make infringement easier and faster also make it more profitable. Modern technology has raised infringers' potential for financial gain by greatly increasing the ease with which numerous illicit copies can be made.

Second, digital technology has increased the quality of pirated goods, thereby enhancing their resale attractiveness. Finally, the items typically infringed by a modern pirate hold considerable value and retain high demand as commodities in today's information-based society. The combined low costs and high rewards of pirating copyrighted commodities create barriers to effective deterrence of criminal copyright laws.

While the current system of copyright laws has proven to be an ineffective deterrent to profit-seeking pirates, it also promotes types of information piracy. Currently prevalent in cyberspace, this new type of piracy concerns itself not with profit, but with simply making copyrighted items readily available to others without cost. In particular, these cyberspace pirates display their indifference for the copyright system by repeatedly uploading and downloading works on the information superhighway. As the LaMacchia case exemplifies, current criminal infringement laws are ill-suited to address this type of piracy and provide little, if any, deterrence on the cyberspace frontier.

The domain of Cyberspace is in rapid transition. It is quickly becoming a place unto itself--a world with no borders. The old legal system, developed during a time when borders were important, is probably inadequate to deal with these changes. Software companies have the option to litigate under the current system, but they may lose more than they gain. Given the lack of coherent global solutions, software companies need to find their own remedies rather than rely on government intervention. Technology seems to be the logical answer. The law may ultimately assist technology, but only in a supplemental capacity. Technology combined with law is the best prescription for fighting Internet piracy in Cyberspace.

"pre-digital" copyright include new rights to authorize online transmissions, to protect the integrity of electronic rights management information, and to prevent the facilitation of copyright infringement through the circumvention of technological anti-copying devices. See WIPO Copyright Treaty, art. 8 (providing new rights to authorize online transmissions); art. 11 (requiring nations adopting the treaty to provide "adequate legal protection and effective legal remedies" against the circumvention of anti-copying protection); art. 12 (requiring nations adopting the treaty to provide legal remedies against persons who remove or alter any "electronic rights management information" without authority).

Statements) (stating that nations may "carry forward and appropriately extend" existing copyright limitations into the digital environment, as well as "devise new exceptions and limitations that are appropriate in the digital environment").

Just to show you how easy it is to steal the look and feel of a website. With the assistance of my brother, I took portions of the Coke.com website and modified it for my own diabolical purposes. What can Coke do about it? You decide.

As physicians opened practices in towns throughout the nation, citizens living in rural areas traveled to the nearest town to receive healthcare services. The practice of infirm rural citizens traveling to larger towns to consult a doctor continued for the duration of the Twentieth Century.

By redefining medical practice in this manner, telemedical consults are explicitly included within the scope of services that cannot be performed without becoming a licensed practitioner within the state, unless the manner in which the services are provided falls within the scope of an exception to the licensing requirement.

This holding may have implications for telemedicine because it indicates that under appropriate circumstances, courts are willing to hold consultant physicians responsible to patients even where face-to-face contact has not occurred.

This is likely to contribute to further nationalization of the standard of care. Moreover, the promise telemedicine holds for making medical specialty services available to remote areas may potentially create a duty for physicians in rural areas to request specialty consults earlier than might be expected if patients could not obtain specialty care unless they traveled several hundred miles to receive face-to- face treatment under the traditional health care delivery system.

Compliance with registration provisions outlined above entitles physician to provide telemedical consults upon the request of a practitioner maintaining full, unrestricted license in this state, provided that the requesting practitioner maintains full decision-making authority regarding the care of the patient who is the subject of the consult.

Therefore, states may presume a physician who can present evidence of unrestricted privileges to practice at an accredited hospital is competent and ethical, since serious negligence or misconduct reported to the data bank would most likely result in refusal or revocation of physician privileges by hospitals.

The ability to provide more complete information, often augmented by live, two-way audio-video transmission of the patient with his local doctor at his side, should make telemedical consults safer and more effective than their telephone predecessors. Therefore, states who formerly felt comfortable allowing non-telemedical consults to occur across state lines need to explain why the current telemedical consults require more restrictive regulation.

This view might be the most accurate, since the telemedical evaluation is in lieu of a face-to-face visit. Viewed in this manner, the state might be misusing its regulatory power by attempting to legislate across state lines to prevent out-of-state doctors from providing consults to patients who reach out to them by way of virtual transmission of personal medical data to the doctor in the state where he is licensed.

Because of the desirability of having telemedical providers as close as possible to their patients to facilitate continuity of care in case on-site treatment is needed, it is vital that patients be able to receive telemedical services from the nearest provider, even if they are located outside the state where the patient lives.

The nation recognized early that regulation aimed at stifling competition threatens the well being of citizens because the availability of goods and services becomes more limited and also more expensive than it would be in a market with minimal restrictions.

If the percentage of state citizens who use telemedicine is small, enactment of restrictive legislation on the grounds that it is necessary to protect the health and welfare of citizens of the state may be unreasonably burdensome.

But when a patient suffering from a rare condition is referred for a telemedicine consult to a specialist possessing rare expertise, that patient is arguably more likely to be helped than harmed by the contact with an out-of-state physician.

In the first section of this essay, I articulate further the distinction between the internal and the external points of view of a practice. I conclude that only an account of legal practice which takes seriously the internal point of view has any prospect of understanding the practice. In the second section, I consider the view, represented by Pierre Schlag, that the distinction between the internal and external perspectives is unhelpful and potentially misleading. Although I reject Schlag's position, I note that he has alerted us to the need to be cautious in how we use the distinction. The third section of the essay explores in more detail what taking seriously the internal point of view of legal practice amounts to. I suggest first that any analysis which takes seriously the internal point of view must presume that practitioners practice in good faith. I examine some objections to this presumption. Second, I suggest that, from the internal point of view of the good-faith practitioner, law is (minimally) rational, and law is (in an important sense) autonomous. In the fourth section of the essay, I consider two objections to taking the internal point of view so seriously. First, I argue that, contrary to what one might suppose on first glance, taking the internal point of view seriously enlivens internal debate, rather than stifling some contributions to it. Second, I argue, again perhaps contrary to first appearances, that internal criticism of legal practice, far from being weak, is the only criticism which has any worthwhile impact. Finally, I draw some conclusions about ethical jurisprudence.

Hart then distinguishes between two kinds of observer. The first type of observer, whom we may more accurately call a "virtual participant,"(10)8 speaks of the rules of the practice as (actual) participants in the practice understand those rules, and so recognizes that practitioners treat the rules of the practice as reasons for acting, as grounds for praise and blame, etc.(11)9 This type of observer, in other words, while perhaps not participating in the practice, takes seriously the point of view of those who do.

The difference between my example of littering and Hart's of stopping at a red light illustrates exactly why an external observer's account must fail. There will be many rules, such as a rule against littering, which do not yield observable results when breached. From the internal point of view, this has little bearing on whether there really is a rule against littering.(16)14 From the observer's external point of view, however, there may be insufficient regularity from which the observer can draw any conclusions. The rule Hart chooses, on the other hand, is an example of a rule which is, far more often than not, obeyed.

It might be objected that an external observer could give an account of rules which were only partially enforced. But the account would only notice infrequent regularity -- sometimes A (littering) precedes B (admonition), and sometimes not. Clearly, this does not capture the participant's perspective on rules. Appearances perhaps to the contrary, it does not even capture the litterer's perspective. If the litterer is aware of the rule against littering, then the litterer is also aware that admonition is a possible, and appropriate, response, but is willing to take that risk.

In other words, however accurate a description of rule-governed behavior may be, such description can never capture the prescriptive nature of rules, absent appeal to the internal point of view of the rule follower.

However complete its descriptive account of a social practice, the external point of view cannot capture the prescriptive nature of rules. Imagine an observer of chess(18)16 who knows nothing of the rules but seeks to learn them by observation. Such an observer might learn that the horse-shaped piece hops two squares in one direction and one square over, and that the miter-headed piece moves diagonally on squares of one color. The observer might further note that when a piece's destination is occupied by a piece of the other color, the second piece is removed from the board. Each player moves only pieces of one color, except when removing a piece of the other color. After moving a piece, each player hits a button on top of what appears to be a timing device. After one player has made forty moves, the other writes something on a piece of paper which is sealed in an envelope, and the players depart until the following morning.

Which of these actions occurs will vary, depending on the nature or level of the game. Perhaps an observer could, in principle, observe enough games to be able to extract from those observations all and only those practices which are universal.(19)17 The observer may observe both tournament-level and casual games of chess, and isolate those practices universal to any occasion the game is played.

But these observers have not given an account of the practice of law which would be intelligible to the practitioner, who makes legal arguments, not economic or political ones. In other words, while these observers may have noticed an important regularity in the behavior of some practitioners of law, they have not identified any rule (or custom, standard, practice, or principle) to which those practitioners would appeal in explaining their own behavior. The observer, in short, has ignored the internal point of view.

The intelligibility of an external account of a practice rests on the internal point of view. On the other hand, the logic of observation/participation is such that the internal point of view derives no meaning or intelligibility from an external account.(28)26 The external account, that is to say, is not essential to the participant (although to the extent that it is descriptively accurate it may well prove useful), whereas the internal point of view is essential to the observer, if genuine understanding is sought.(29)27 Indeed, reference to the internal point of view is essential for the observer even before the observation begins, since the observer, absent the participants' guidance, has no basis for deciding what conduct falls within the "practice" being observed. That is, the boundaries of the practice can only be observed from inside. Is drumming one's fingers on the table while one's opponent considers how next to move part of the practice of chess or not? And how would an observer know to call the person on the other side of the table an "opponent," unless the observer already understood something about the nature of competitive games, unlessthe observer had already assumed the significance, albeit momentarily, of the internal point of view?

The essential difference between the internal and the external points of view of a practice is that the internal point of view is essentially purposive, concerned with reasons for action within the practice, whereas the external point of view is essentially descriptive, concerned with the causes of the participants' conduct. Only from the internal point of view does a practice have a point, and only from the internal point of view do the rules, standards, and customs of the practice operate as reasons for action.

Schlag's attempted demolition of Dworkin's view on this account leaves the distinction between internal and external perspectives unscathed. While Schlag may dispute Dworkin's account of where the world's baggage is located, he has not thereby shown that there is no difference between the perspective of a participant in a practice and the perspective of an external observer.

While judges give legal reasons for their decisions, the claim goes, their real reasons are political or ideological. Obviously, if the participants in a practice are acting in bad faith,(42)40 then their internal point of view does not deserve to be taken seriously.

The following sections sketch some characteristics of the internal point of view of the practice of law. The practice of law being more art than science, there is bound to be some disagreement about the characteristics of the internal point of view. I attempt here to sketch those characteristics in as broad a way as possible.

From the internal point of view, law is rational. Law's claim to rationality has been a favorite target of postmodern legal critics. Rationality has, no doubt, sometimes been an instrument of oppression. False claims of rationality, and related claims of absoluteness, objectivity, universality, and neutrality, have been used, and continue to be used, to perpetuate imbalances of power, to represent privilege as the natural order of things, to ossify status arrangements.(56)54 Thus, insistence on even minimal rationality may be met with trepidation in some quarters.

Nonetheless, if we are to be able to converse, we must accept minimal conditions of rationality. Unless a practice is, from the internal point of view, deliberately irrational,(57)55 the practice must presume at least minimal rationality. And law is a paradigmatic internally rational practice.(58)56 Law is, as Ronald Dworkin has observed, an essentially argumentative enterprise,(59)57 and argument without reason is mere assertion and counter-assertion.

This, of course, is no violation of the principle of noncontradiction, properly understood. Even Aristotle, the essentialist's essentialist, recognized that "the same proposition will be true and false in different contexts."

If the pragmatic lawyer Singer describes here cares little for deductive logic, why take the trouble to identify "major premises," or to carve exceptions out of principles, or to distinguish cases? The lawyer troubles to do all this precisely because, Singer and Llewellyn notwithstanding, even the pragmatic lawyer(73)71 cares a great deal about deductive validity, and acknowledges, albeit implicitly, the need to avoid self-contradiction.

From the internal point of view, law is separate and distinct from other enterprises. This does not mean that those other enterprises have no importance to the practitioner, but it does mean that, to have legal significance, these other enterprises must be cast in legally intelligible terms.

There is a version of formalism that is true. This version of formalism does not claim that law is unrelated to other areas of knowledge. It admits that legal argument makes use of moral, political, and sociological information.

Whether this is a version of formalism or not, it is not "true," at least not as a description of the internal point of view. From the internal point of view, the "extra-legal," in order to be taken into account, must be expressed in intra-legal terms, must be made a part of the law. Moral, political, sociological, and, I would add, economic, information is relevant to legal argument, but only to the extent that it can be expressed in appropriately legal terms, be incorporated into the internal point of view. A judge should not be persuaded by an argument, without more, that a property owner in an inverse condemnation case should be awarded $1,000,000 in compensation because that result best approximates the result which would occur in a free market -- although that might be a desirable economic result, so stated it has no legal force; but a judge might be persuaded by an argument that "just compensation," properly understood, means fair market value, that the fair market value in this case is $1,000,000, and so the property owner should be awarded $1,000,000.

It may be objected that giving primacy to the internal point of view potentially excludes "deviant," i.e. non-mainstream, participant views. Ethical jurisprudence, however, makes no substantive claims about what opinions are available to the participant. Ethical jurisprudence only insists that the participant's perspective be taken seriously, that those opinions be expressed in ways intelligible to the participant. From the perspective of the participant, the rules, standards, and customs of the practice, understood in light of the point of the practice, function as reasons for action within the practice. This does not preclude disagreement over the point of the practice (although it does preclude the position that the practice is pointless), disagreement over the fitness of particular rules, standards, and customs to that point, or interpretive disagreements about the meaning of the rules, standards, and customs.

In another sense, however, "perspective" might refer to what several contemporary legal theorists call "voice."(88)86 Thus it is argued that women, members of particular racial groups, and oppressed people generally speak in a distinctive voice, a voice which has its source in the uniqueness of their experience. Of course, pressed too far, perspectivism of this sort is self-defeating, and makes conversation impossible. Everyone's experience is different from everyone else's, but it would be meaningless to argue that each of us speaks in a "different voice." If that were so, we could not communicate. Too radical a perspectivism isolates everyone.

It is not "impoverished pluralism" to insist that all claims, including those of the oppressed, be subject to equal scrutiny. The notion that we should give greater weight to some perspectives than to others, simply because of "where they're coming from," is pernicious,(96)94 as is the related claim that one person cannot understand another because he(97)95 lacks the other's experience.

Critique of a practice from the observer's perspective, i.e., from a perspective which ignores and considers irrelevant the internal point of view, is unhelpful to the practitioner, and so is precluded by the ethical jurisprudential insistence that the internal point of view be taken seriously. But internal criticism is welcome.

While it is arguably legitimate for the external critic to debunk, trash, or otherwise to denounce the practice,(109)107 an internal critic who takes such a position has, effectively, abandoned the practice, shifted ground to the outside. Certain moves are available to the external critic which are unavailable to the (legitimate, ethical) internal critic.

In other words, criticism which presents itself as internal to its subject practice, but which is criticism for its own sake, is, despite its claim of internality, essentially external to its subject practice, literally pointless.

In sum, ethical jurisprudence is constructively critical of law and legal practice; it presumes that law is worth practicing, and that law and legal practice are capable of improvement; it rejects as inadequate any account of law which fails to take seriously the internal point of view; it dismisses as perverse any account which makes nonsense of the internal point of view.

College of Law. This is also the obligatory footnote about use of personal pronouns. It is possible to write perfectly intelligible English prose without resort to gender-specific personal pronouns. Accordingly, I only use "he" or "she" when the antecedent is known to be male or female, respectively.

It is not necessary to my analysis to make any specific claims about what good-faith practice looks like. All that is necessary is the presumption that good-faith practice, however it may be articulated, is possible. Practitioners will disagree about the details of good-faith practice; but only if they share the view that good-faith practice is possible is their debate meaningful.

As long as moral philosophy concerns itself with clarifying the everyday intuitions into which we are socialized, it must be able to adopt, at least virtually, the attitude of someone who participates in the communicative practice of everyday life.

The observer may also notice regularities which are not, from the point of view of the participant, rule-governed at all, but it is not clear how the observer could distinguish between rule-following behavior and merely regular behavior.

"really is" a rule against littering? Isn't the fact that the rule is rarely obeyed and rarely enforced evidence that there "really is not" a rule against littering? Only if one takes an external view of rules. That there is a rule is not reducible to empirical facts about the rate of obedience to it or the rate of its enforcement. Indeed, research to determine those empirical facts presumes the existence of the rule.

In the former case, rules are not reasons for action; rather, they function as limits on action. For example, moving a pawn one square backwards is simply impermissible under the rules; such a move is not a move in the game of chess at all. The rules of social practices (including the practice of law) do not have the same import. Rather, rules of a social practice function as reasons for action, and as reasons for praise, blame, etc. A blunder in chess, unlike a social blunder, breaks no rule. Still, if the observer cannot hope to understand a practice which is constituted by its rules, how much more futile is the hope to understand a practice in which rules sometimes function as reasons for action. The distinction between constitutive and regulative rules is, in any event, not a hard and fast one. See Schauer, Playing by the Rules, supra, note 7, 7, citing Raz, Practical Reason and Norms 108-113 (Princeton, 1990).

Any meaningful expression--be it an utterance, verbal or nonverbal, or an artefact of any kind, such as a tool, an institution, or a written document--can be identified from a double perspective, both as an observable event and as an understandable objectification of meaning. We can describe, explain, or predict a noise equivalent to the sounds of a spoken sentence without having the slightest idea what this utterance means. To grasp (and state) its meaning, one has to participate in some (actual or imagined) communicative action in the course of which the sentence in question is used in such a way that it is intelligible to speakers, hearers, and bystanders belonging to the same community.

Even if they were true, empiricist ethical theories could have no enlightening impact because they remain fundamentally cut off from the intuitions of everyday life . . . . As long as moral philosophy concerns itself with clarifying the everyday intuitions into which we are socialized, it must be able to adopt, at least virtually, the attitude of someone who participates in the communicative practice of everyday life.

It is important to keep in mind that the standpoint of the observer of cultural practices is the viewpoint not of God but of, say, the historian of ideas or the anthropologist, and that, as we now realize, is not a view from nowhere. Interpreters inevitably bring with themselves the perspectives and concerns of their own cultures; they cannot avoid relying upon the taken-for-granted assumptions built into the languages and practices that comprise their own forms of life. In the case at hand, this means that we can distance ourselves from certain of our cultural practices only by taking others for granted. We can never be observers without at the same time being participants.

The whole point of the CLS critique of American law has been that judges do suffer from false consciousness, and the law does reflect the ideological biases of judges. This is perfectly consistent with Dworkin's explanation of how judges decide cases. Indeed, it explains why judges feel constrained by the materials of the law when, at the same time, outside observers are able to predict their positions with a high degree of accuracy by reference to politics alone. For example, we may assume that both Justice Brennan and Chief Justice Rehnquist feel constrained by the materials of the law. We may assume that both of them experience the subjective feelings of order that Dworkin describes. Yet it is clear that they disagree vehemently about many issues of constitutional interpretation, and, what is more important, the substance of their disagreements is relatively predictable.

The formalist asserts the possibility of a non-instrumentalist understanding of juridical relations. This assertion, however, contains the following insidious implication: The mere possibility of a non-instrumental understanding renders instrumental understandings of the same legal material superfluous, but not vice versa. This follows from the paradigmatic quality of immanent intelligibility.

In similar fashion, the mere possibility of an intelligible account of legal practice from the internal point of view renders superfluous to that understanding an account from any external point of view.

Dworkin takes the practice of judges as exemplary of legal practice. Dworkin's account of legal practice is unabashedly idealized; Schlag's is so unidealized as to be no account of legal practice at all, but merely a rich description.

But the fact that a distinction is rooted in metaphor does not invalidate the distinction. Just as there is a difference between water being inside a glass and water being outside a glass, the container here being non-metaphorical, so there is a difference between understanding a practice from the point of view of its practitioners and observing a practice without reference to that point of view, whether the "container"

Empire, supra, note 4, offering a theory of interpretation under which one chooses between competing interpretations which "fit" their subject, that interpretation which makes of the subject "the best it can be." Dworkin's challenge to the critical theorist is to explain why one should choose an interpretation of legal practice according to which legal practice is cynical hypocrisy when there are available interpretations which show legal practice in a better light. The obvious (if easy) response, of course, is that those interpretations do not fit as well as the critical interpretation, and so are not real options.

Law is identical to the ideas of which it is comprised, and the intelligibility of law lies in grasping the order and connection of these ideas. Because law is, at least in the formalist understanding, essentially conceptual, it does not present itself as alien to the enquirer's efforts to comprehend it. Thus the formalist assumption is that law is, however inchoately, an exhibition of intelligence. For this reason our understanding can, without sacrifice or diminution, assume the perspective that animates the juridical enterprise from within. Accordingly, in the formalist view there is in law an integration of the activity of understanding with the matter to be understood. Since law is assumed to be intelligible from within, the content of law is regarded as being homogeneous with, and therefore accessible to, thought.

Logical consistency does not cease to be a good because it is not the supreme good. Holmes has told us in a sentence which is now classic that "the life of the law has not been logic; it has been experience."

But Holmes did not tell us that logic is to be ignored when experience is silent. I am not to mar the symmetry of the legal structure by the introduction of inconsistencies and irrelevancies and artificial exceptions unless for some sufficient reason, which will commonly be some consideration of history or custom or policy or justice. Lacking such a reason, I must be logical, just as I must be impartial, and upon like grounds.

Rev. 95 (1990). "Voice" has become a major critical category in recent years, perhaps starting with Carol Gilligan's In a Different Voice (Harvard U. Press, 1982), which argued that, in general, women's experience is different from men's and that, as a consequence, women speak in a voice different from that of men. The notion of "voice" has been taken up and expanded upon in feminist legal theory and in critical race theory.

If I were asked, then, to discern one central indisputable principle of what may be called substantive natural law--Natural Law with capital letters--I would find it in the injunction: Open up, maintain, and preserve the integrity of the channels of communication by which men convey to one another what they perceive, feel, and desire. In this matter the morality of aspiration offers more than good counsel and the challenge of excellence.

It here speaks with the imperious voice we are accustomed to hear from the morality of duty. And if men will listen, that voice, unlike that of the morality of duty, can be heard across the boundaries and through the barriers that now separate men from one another.

Needs and wants are interpreted in the light of cultural values. Since cultural values are always components of intersubjectively shared traditions, the revision of the values used to interpret needs and wants cannot be a matter for individuals to handle monologically.

I would weight the pragmatic method to identify and give special credence to the perspective of the subordinated; second, I would add a first principle of anti-subordination; and third, I would claim that the use of pragmatic method with a normative first principle is not inconsistent.

Her assumption, apparently, is that such scholars, because of their sexual orientation and oppressed status, have something to say which is different from anything anyone else might say. This does not seem to me obvious, although I have no interest in silencing their voices whether it is so or not.

Thus arises a standpoint for criticism that is decisive precisely because it is internal. Whereas criticism from the outside can be shrugged off with the argument that the critic's favored position is simply irrelevant to the law's immanent rationality, criticism from the inside engages law ineluctably on its own ground.

Cornell L. Rev. 256 (1989). Insisting that law is best understood as a form of politics, Michelman redefines politics and argues that law fits this redefinition. Michelman's position is importantly different from that of an observer -- his is a practitioner's perspective, and he is recommending that practitioners rethink the point of the practice. Michelman, in other words, is conversing about law from the internal point of view, and so doing (I'm sure he'd be indifferent to hear!) ethical jurisprudence.

There are critical moments in the lives of some persons--moments when the situation at hand elicits or provokes a revision of self so thoroughgoing as to constitute a conversion of some sort. Such moments sometimes involve disintegration of personality as well as, hopefully, reintegration. Similarly, there are critical moments in the lives of some traditions. Such a moment has arrived when the dissensus that is a feature of every large community reaches the point of fragmentation, and the revision of the tradition by a faction within the community is so fundamental as to constitute a break with tradition and the beginning of a new tradition . . . which then proceeds to develop over time, just as the tradition from which it broke continues to develop. . . . Even such dramatic 'breaks', however, develop gradually, over time, and illustrate the fact that the criterion for the revision of tradition is tradition itself.

See also Fish, supra, note 84, at 80: "All I have to recommend is the game, which, since it doesn't need my recommendations, will proceed on its way undeterred and unimproved by anything I have to say." Fish's honest assessment of his critical contributions is refreshing.

Of course, in finding this problematic, perhaps I have fallen into a "structure of thought" from which I am unable to comprehend cls. Perhaps -- but, speaking from the internal point of view of a legal practitioner, it seems to me that the cls critic is unable to comprehend practice.

Bear in mind, the Reno case dealt with words and images, items that evoke traditional images of speech or expression. What happens when a person is using a computer program as a means of expression? Computer code, when all is said and done, is simply a string of 1s and 0s, or other characters, which is not recognizable as "speech" for the majority of the population. How does something that has no recognizable syntax, at least not to the vast majority of Americans, qualify for protection under the First Amendment? If deserving of protection, to what extent should that protection be granted? These are some of the issues in the case being reviewed here.

This was viewed by the plaintiffs as the functional equivalent of providing the program for download on the 2600 web site. The amended complaint included a request to enjoin 2600 from mirroring to those web sites that continued to provide the DeCSS program for download.

"As Justice Brandeis wrote, freedom of speech is important both as a means to achieve a democratic society and as an end in itself. Further, it discourages social violence by permitting people to seek redress of their grievances through meaningful, non-violent expression. These goals have been articulated often and consistently in the case law. The computer code at issue in this case does little to serve these goals.

Since the statute in this case served a substantial government interest, did it overly restrict First Amendment freedoms by including those who traffic in the circumventing technology? Judge Kaplan decided it did not based on the digital world we live in today. Previously, one could stop copyright infringement by finding the infringing source and shutting it down. With the advent of the internet, a program like DeCSS can be created and spread around the globe, much like a viral outbreak.94 It is important to the copyright holder to have the ability to stop not only the source of the infringement, but anyone who attempts to pass along a means of circumventing copyright protection technology as well.

Thus, the provisions of the DMCA which restrict the posting of DeCSS and making it available passed Constitutional muster in all aspects for Judge Kaplan. After determining the statute prohibited the conduct present and was Constitutional, how far could the injunction go?

The 2600 defendants claimed that the studios were unable to show any actual harm caused by their posting of the DeCSS program. The plaintiffs did not prove that any decrypted movie was illegally copied and available for download; if there were, the plaintiffs did not prove that DeCSS was the method used to decrypt those movies.99 This was to no avail as Judge Kaplan interpreted the statute not to require actual harm in order to obtain relief. The plaintiffs only had to show a threat of harm as the court could grant an injunction under 17 U.S.C.

Frontier Foundation, 2600 stated an intention to appeal the decision in the case.111  Furthermore, in an act of apparent electronic civil disobedience, 2600 continues to list sites which purport to host the DeCSS program. However, they have met the letter of Judge Kaplan's order and do not actively link to those sites. They also tell how to use search engines to find DeCSS on the web, particularly pointing out one that is owned by one of the plaintiff studios.

However, as more people become accustomed to using computers and developing code, more people every day could be subject to the effects of this case and similar cases to follow. The Supreme Court has stated that technological issues are best left to Congress. Do you think this falls entirely into that category? With the explosion of technology in today's world can Congress, much less the court system keep pace?

The second reason I see is the David vs. Goliath factor. People love it when the little guy ends up beating the big guy who was picking on him. The online supporters of 2600 see these billion dollar companies attacking one of their own, and they see it as an attack on themselves. This gives them the even more motivation to join the fight. On the flip side, unless you see yourself having a stake in the outcome of the case, you don't want to be on the side attacking the individual. Just as people love the underdog, they hate the bully, and anyone siding with the studios might be seen as falling into that category. But that's just my $0.02.

Another interesting Private Market response to unsolicited email has been to invoice or bill the offending spammer. That is, given the substantial costs associated with junk email on the Internet, some ISPs have attempted to recoup these losses by charging those guilty of abusing their resources.[11] Although this has not been highly effective, it does raise certain legal issues associated with misrepresentation and trespass.

In the realm of government intervention, it is only fitting to commence with reactions from the federal government of the United States. Although nothing passes rapidly in the hallowed halls of Capitol Hill, there are several bills before Congress that specifically address unsolicited email transmissions. Although these federal proposals deal specifically with commercial email, they can be reasonably applied to unsolicited, non-commercial email transmissions as well. Of the bills that have been proposed, there are three that deal specifically with spam: the Netizens Protection Act of 1997, the Unsolicited Commercial Electronic Mail Choice Act of 1997, and the Electronic Mailbox Protection Act of 1997. Each is discussed below in terms of what relief, if any, is given to the victims of Internet spam.

The second component of The Netizens Protection Act of 1997 is equally as substantial. Section 3(C) of the bill forbids the use of "a computer or other electronic device to send an unsolicited advertisement . . . unless such person clearly provides, at the beginning of such unsolicited advertisement, the date and time the message is sent, the identity of the business, other entity, or individual sending the message, and the return electronic mail address of such business, other entity, or individual."[18] Again, we see precise language that is very broad in its scope yet specific in its intent to stamp out unsolicited, commercial email.

Another bill introduced by Congress regarding the scourge of spam comes from the Senate. Its short title is the Electronic Mailbox Protection Act of 1997.[19] The bill purports to promote online commerce and communications, to protect consumers and Internet Service Providers from the misuse of computer facilities by others sending bulk unsolicited electronic mail. It was introduced by Senator Torricelli on June 11, 1997.

The bill primarily addresses the practice of "telephone slamming" -- the practice of telephone companies switching residential and business long-distance service without authorization of the customer. However, sections of the bill do specifically address the problems of spamming. Unfortunately, this bill operates at best as a watered down version of the bills discussed above. Its primary deficiency is that it only provides relief for those who receive forged material. The bill in no way attacks the problem of spamming itself, and it would not provide the average recipient of unsolicited email any genuine relief. In fact, it might very well open the floodgates for advertisers who have seemingly been given a green light to transmit volumes of email.

The only caveat for advertisers being that they must provide some non-forged information and that they designate the transmission as an advertisement in some fashion.[25] Taken as a whole, this bill will likely do more harm than good. Such is the nature of a compromise within the beltway.

July 8, 1997. It allows for the recovery of damages and attorney's fees from spammers unless the recipient of an unsolicited advertisement has a preexisting business or personal relationship with the sender, the recipient has expressly consented to receive such email or the advertisement is readily identifiable as promotional.[35] If the sender of such email violates these provisions, the recipient may recover actual damages or damages of $10 per item of electronic mail received, whichever is greater, and Attorney's fees and litigation costs.[36] Injunctive relief is also an option under the provisions of this bill.[37] This act becomes effective on July 1, 1998.

As the reader can plainly see, the problem of spam is genuine. State and federal legislators are responding to complaints from the myriad of people that are adversely affected by spam on the Internet. Although these legislative remedies do provide some redress for the typical Internet user, the law in the area is still quite new, and it might be some time before true relief from spam is achieved. Until strong, enforceable policies are adopted the development of legal issues surrounding spam are likely to continue to evolve in the courtroom. This next section provides a summary of some of the more prominent case law dealing with spam.

It further alleges that "in truth and in fact...few, if any, purchasers achieve the specific level of earnings claimed by the defendants; and...in numerous instances, when the defendants do not achieve the guaranteed 25% occupancy rate, and purchasers seek a refund, the defendants do not provide a full refund of the purchasers investment," and that "therefore, the defendants representations...are false and misleading and constitute deceptive acts or practices in violation of Section 5(a) of the FTC Act, 15 U.S.C.

Spam is an odious practice to a great many people, but it still represents a form of speech. We cannot lose sight of the fact that the freedom to speak without fear of political or criminal retribution is precious to the American Constitution. We must be careful in all of our attempts to deal with the problems attendant with spam in a fair and objective manner, despite how personally distasteful it seems to most.

Private market software may or may not be the answer, but outlawing an entire category of speech is certainly not the appropriate course. If the solution does lie in the legislative arena, then the best possible resolution is one that would accord the American tradition of refusing to unduly burden the freedom of speech as well as the recognition that the proper role of government is to protect its citizens from force or fraud. Indeed, the ideal legislative remedy would be one that accomplishes two related goals. First, such legislation should incorporate a recognition that the scope of legislative endeavors is confined by the four corners of our Constitution. Second, that this noble document simultaneously mandates that we pursue and prosecute those individuals that flout the principles embodied therein.

The "dot coms" are omnipresent. Often a business may exist solely as a website, selling goods or services through the Internet. A famous example is amazon.com, which originally focused on selling books, and has now expanded to other goods [2].

Online businesses often attempt to protect the individual components of a website such as icons and logos through various intellectual property (IP) regimes such as patent, copyright and trademark law. Legislation and case law is currently focused on protecting website domain names- the gateway for entry into the contents of a website. For example, a small feminist bookstore named Amazon, which has existed in the real world since 1970, sued amazon.com alleging trademark infringement. This "battle of the Amazons" settled when Amazon agreed to assign its rights to the Amazon name to amazon.com [3].

Much of "Web surfing" depends upon the manner in which a computer interacts with its surfer and this usually dictates the commercial success of the website. A website is a form of electronic communication which is generated with the assistance of a computer software programs. Such software programs interact with the operating systems of computers to generate the end visual output a surfer sees when he visits a website. The graphical user interface (GUI) for software has been described as the outward behavior of software [7] and is the concept behind a computer program's ability to interact with a user in a way that is productive, intuitive and efficient. Although the functional aspects of a website alone will never be legally protected (other than by patent law in appropriate cases), the original selection, organization and presentation of features and functions as part of the overall expression and interaction of the GUI is a work of authorship. Thus, creating the look of a website often requires greater creative effort than the underlying algorithms, program code, and associated databases which comprise the hidden (albeit important) infrastructure of the website [8]. This paper examines protection of the overall "look and feel" of a website and the current status of case law on the issue.

First, the courts have taken an increasingly restrictive view of the scope of copyright protection for software. Conversely, the Federal Circuit Court of Appeals has expanded the scope of patent law software protection, holding that an efficient data structure, which is stored in the memory of a computer constitutes patentable subject matter. Second, software companies are developing patent portfolios to protect their investments in research and development of new technologies. Often these patents are the only tangible assets such companies have. In turn, these portfolios can be used to generate revenue through an aggressive licensing program. However, not all software based products or services can meet the novelty, non-obviousness, and utility requirements of patent law. This is especially true of the expressive aspects of a software product, such as the look and feel of a website, which cannot be patented because such non-functional elements of software do not meet the utility requirement [10].

Protection exists at the moment the originality and fixation requirements have been met and last for the life of the author plus 70 years. However, this is a fragile form of protection for IP as it is often difficult to prove copying and various defenses are available.

Under the 1976 Copyright Act, and its legislative history, copyright protection for computer software was confirmed; however, the Act itself did not set forth any particulars for the protection of computer software or GUIs. Instead, Congress designated the Commission on New Technological Uses of Copyrighted Works ("CONTU") to develop further legislation, which became the Software Copyright Act of 1980 [13]. However, neither of these Acts is explicit in describing whether protection for a computer program should extend beyond program source code to the originality and creativity contained in the audiovisual displays comprising the GUI or overall "look and feel" of the computer program.

Solutions, Inc. v. Intellectual Property Network, Ltd. [30] applied the three part Altai test to a compilation/GUI to determine whether the non-literal elements of two computer programs were "substantially similar" for copyright infringement purposes. The OPS court held that "it is clear that a user interface is entitled to protection" specifically when considering the overall look and feel of a program. Appropriately enough, OPS involved software programs which catered to law firms intellectual property practices and assisted such firms in managing the prosecution of trademark and patent applications.

U.S.C. 1125(a)) [32], when it is nonfunctional. Trade dress involves the total image of the product or service including size, shape, color, texture, or graphics. Trade dress must be either inherently distinctive (See Two Pesos, Inc. v. Taco Cabana, Inc. [33]), or acquire secondary meaning in the relevant market place so as to be identified with a particular producer or source of goods or services. Within this context, the court has developed a secondary meaning gradient. If a mark is either arbitrary or fanciful (i.e. inherently distinctive), second meaning is not required. If a mark is descriptive or suggestive, secondary meaning must be established by evidence of (1) long use (2) advertising (3) sales volume and (4) identity of service or origin in the minds of the purchasing public. (See Pizzeria Uno Corp. v. Temple [34]). Trademark protection is perpetual, ending only when a mark becomes generic.

The court affirmed the finding that the defendant intentionally copied the packaging and colors of the plaintiff's successful EXCEDRIN PM product for its competing TYLENOL PM. The court reversed the lower court holding of liability, however, because it found the trade name (i.e. trademark) on each product formed the most distinctive and obvious part of the trade dress so confusion would be unlikely. The Federal Circuit has extended this new, limited reading of trade dress to an almost per se rule in Conopco, Inc. v. May Dept. Stores Co. [36]. The court's reasoning clearly assumed that mass-market consumers read labels before buying. But, in OP Solutions, Inc. v. Intellectual Property Network, Ltd. [37], the court indicated that while product labeling reduces confusion, it is not dispositive especially when the brand names involved are not as prominent as those in Bristol Meyers and when such product labeling does not appear so prominently as to overwhelm the other features of the purported trade dress.

There are many proponents for extending trade dress protection to GUIs and websites [38]. One line of reasoning begins with Section 43(a) of the Lanham Act which provides that "anyone who uses any identifying features, or false or misleading designation of a product's origin in commerce that is likely to cause confusion as to the origin, sponsorship, or approval of goods, services, or commercial activities . . . shall be liable." This language protects the overall "look and feel" of a product's trade dress and thus should also apply to the image that is displayed to the public at a website. Since a GUI combines words, symbols, sizes, shapes, colors, designs and devices in distinctive pattern that consumers can use to identify source; it should be considered trade dress [39]. Thus, trade dress protection should arise when non-functional features of software and website GUIs are presented in an inherently distinctive way or in a way that has acquired secondary meaning [40]. GUIs are also indicators of source because they create a distinct impression on the Web surfer. One author even indicates that, as a whole, GUIs are non-functional [41]. This follows from the view that since GUIs are viewed by the user in their entirety, the functionality inquiry should also focus on the totality of the Website's look and not on individual features such as icons on the website.

Furthermore, trade dress allows GUIs to be viewed as a whole during the likelihood of confusion analysis [42]. Unlike the substantial similarity analysis in copyrights, this concept focuses on whether the average consumer would be confused as to source when viewing two marks. Since GUIs represent the look and feel of software, they must be viewed in their entirety as this is how a Web surfer encounters the software. This overcomes the "peeling" problem for GUIs under copyright substantial similarity analysis.

The problem is that, although trade dress protection for GUIs was first proposed back in 1988 [43], no court has ever held a user interface to be protectable as trade dress. In fact, only one court has even discussed trade dress protection for user interfaces. In Engineering Dynamics, Inc. v. Structural Software, Inc. [44], the Fifth Circuit squarely rejected such trade dress claims, holding that protectable trade dress does not reside in the input protocols, output reports, manuals, or look and feel of the plaintiff's software. The court found that imitating the on-screen GUI of a sophisticated engineering software program could not constitute trade dress infringement because the programming company's name was displayed and the purchasing public was limited and highly sophisticated [45].

Since there is little case law on the issue, much discussion has been generated about "how the courts should view" the issue of extending trade dress protection to GUIs. For example, some authors have argued that user interfaces are by their very nature functional because the interface represents the method through which the user communicates with both the program and the underlying central processing unit. Additionally, the interface is the means through which the user obtains utility from the program and thus "[w]hile specific visual elements of the interface arguably might be protectable, most elements of the user interface are intended to communicate or enable a specific feature or operation, and thus would seem to be as functional as the labels 'on' and 'off' on the computer's power switch"

Trade dress analysis generally focuses on mechanical functionality, denying protection because the elements are so utilitarian or superior to alternative elements that denying public access to these elements would inhibit competition.

Consumers value virtual trade dress for its own qualities, purely for the aesthetic experience that it provides. This, may be an especially thorny issue for Internet porn sites which arguably exist solely for aesthetic reasons. As such, GUIs become product configurations- a vital component of the good that is being sold or the service that is being offered.

Act protection is sought must be (i) unusual and memorable; (ii) conceptually separable from the product; and (iii) likely to serve primarily as a designator of origin of the product. In applying the Duraco test neither the product's success nor the defendant's intentional copying established secondary meaning; rather, both could have resulted merely from the intrinsic value of the trade dress in question.

In researching case law, the analogy to magazine and book covers may be especially relevant. Such covers share many general features found on a typical website. Magazine covers serve as the gateway to their contents.

The various functional and non-functional elements are arranged in a specific manner so as to increase interest in the contents. While certain elements of the covers may change, others, which contribute to the overall "look and feel" do not, so that source identity is maintained. Thus, two recent cases examining trade dress protection for magazine and book covers might assist other courts in determining whether websites representing product configuration merit protection.

Inc. [58], the court began by emphasizing that trade dress law does not "protect an idea, a concept or a generalized type of appearance" because trade dress law is intended to "protect an owner of a dress in informing the public of the source of its products, without permitting the owner to exclude competition from functionally similar products." The plaintiff's arguments failed because it relied on the uniqueness of the idea of a women's sports magazine and not the uniqueness of the trade dress of a specific embodiment of that idea. The court emphasized that the important connection must be between the trade dress and the product, not the idea behind the trade dress and the product. Based on the above, the court concluded that the overall trade dress of the magazine cover was quite generic and commonplace for the magazine publishing industry, and it was therefore incapable of serving as a source designator for Sports Traveler Magazine.

But, the articulation of specific, distinct elements is necessary because without such articulation, "courts will be unable to evaluate how unique and unexpected the design elements are in the relevant market." See Mana Products, Inc. v. Columbia Cosmetics Mfg., Inc. [62]. Therefore, although a court makes the source identifier determination based on the overall look of the trade dress, the court must still analyze each articulated element to arrive at its ultimate conclusion. This circular logic has made analysis of inherent distinctiveness quite impossible to comprehend.

Seventh Circuit commented that inherently distinctive trade dress must be either arbitrary or "sufficiently distinctive to allow consumers to identify the product from the trade dress." Additionally, the Seventh Circuit held that "uniqueness [with respect to other competitors in the relevant market] supports a finding that the trade dress is inherently distinctive."

Furthermore, because uniqueness and the ability to identify source of origin define the scope of inherently distinctive GUIs, trade dress protection accrues for the entire GUI rather than for individual elements of the interface.

The use of a mouse pointing device or of layered windows, for example, would fail to be either unique or identifying. Such interface devices have long since become standard fare and as such are not protected either individually or as part of a total interface. [64] However, specific configurations or combinations of GUIs might be considered both inherent distinctive and nonfunctional. Thus, although Apple in Apple lost its claim of general protection for all GUI configurations, a narrower claim of protection for a specific interface might have survived if a competing interface was likely to cause consumer confusion.

If a website author cannot assert inherent distinctiveness, he might still gain trade dress protection by establishing that the GUI possesses secondary meaning. As such, websites should be involved in substantial advertisement. Additionally, secondary meaning might be invaluable in instances where one publisher (for example Microsoft) produces a multitude of products that each employ similarly designed interfaces. Programs belonging to a family of applications thus, might be better placed to assert secondary meaning [68].

However, as indicated by Sports Traveler, it is still necessary for a plaintiff to establish that its trade dress is inherently distinctive or has acquired secondary meaning. See, e.g., Hormel Foods Corp. v. Jim Henson Prods. Inc. [72].

The status of protection for the "look and feel" of software or websites has already been described as a "gooey mess" [73]. Recently, with the passage of the Trademark Cyberpiracy Prevention Act [74], concrete protection has been given to established trade names. Thus, the next venue for litigation will probably be infringement claims based on the contents of websites. Perhaps additional legislation such as the Trade Dress Protection Act [75] is necessary. The case law in many areas is uncertain.

URL) and select the "How Our Laws Are Made" link. You will be expected to be familiar with that material by the end of the semester, and familiarity with it will make the cases far more interesting and accessible. If you do not have Internet access from home, access (and assistance) is available in the computer lab in the law library.

You should also make a point to visit the CSPAN and THOMAS sites several times during the course of the semester, to get a feel for the legislative process. You will be asked to report on the history, status, and progress of pending federal legislation of your choice. You should identify that legislation as early as possible in the semester, and check on its status at least weekly. Choose on the basis of what interests you, but also on the basis of whether any action appears to be imminent.

Ch. 1 of the casebook, which relates the history of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (which is fascinating and well worth knowing about). You may also find Chs. 4 and 6 valuable for the insights they provide into the legislative process.

Attendance is mandatory, and will be taken. A perfect attendance record will be rewarded with 2 points on your final grade. You are permitted one absence. If you miss two classes, you will not be permitted to take the final exam, unless I am persuaded that there was an extremely compelling reason for your absence. If you miss more than two classes, nothing could persuade me to permit you to take the final exam. Lack of preparedness when called upon may, in my judgment, be deemed an absence.

There are many ways to support AICR's cancer research and education programs. You may donate online, by phone or by mail. All online donations are encrypted and very secure. To make a donation now, select the method that works the best for you.

The American Institute for Cancer Research welcomes comments and questions from the public. In order to better serve you, we offer here contact information for specific departments within AICR. You may contact any of the departments shown below by email simply by clicking on the link shown.

The American Institute for Cancer Research has been a pioneer in supporting and encouraging research into the role of diet and nutrition in the prevention and treatment of cancer. AICRs efforts have funded hundreds of highly-respected research projects, stimulated exciting related research and attracted talented scientists to this promising field.

You can reduce your cancer risk, and were here to help. AICR offers a variety of information to help you eat and live more healthfully. Explore the material here and learn how easy it can be to lower your cancer risk.

Brochures - Brochures and pamphlets offering practical advice to help lower cancer risk. Online text versions, plus form to order printed copies.The New American Plate - A fresh new way of looking at what you eat every day for long term health and for weight management. Shop AICR - Purchase books and audio-visual presentations on cancer research, healthy eating and cancer survivorship.

The moment you receive a diagnosis of cancer, you become a cancer survivor. You join more than 10 million other cancer survivors in the United States. Although there are still gaps in what scientific research tells us about diet and exercise, and your return to a healthy, active life; AICR can supply you with the best available information to help you make better informed decisions and reduce your risk of secondary tumors and recurrence.

What is Planned Giving? - Discover how bequests, gift annuities and other planned gifts in support of cancer prevention can offer significant tax savings, and even provide income for life for the donor.

Current news releases, weekly food and health columns, access to interview sources, feature articles for newspapers, magazines and newsletters. Here you'll find a wide variety of material for use by the press and of interest to the public.

Since its founding in 1982, the American Institute for Cancer Research has grown into the nation's leading charity in the field of diet, nutrition and cancer. AICR supports research into the role of diet and nutrition in the prevention and treatment of cancer. It also offers a wide range of cancer prevention education programs. By adopting AICR's Diet and Health Guidelines for Cancer Prevention, people can reduce their risk of cancer by 30 to 40 percent.

The Nutrition Hotline is a free service provided by the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR). All material on AICR's website is provided for educational and informational purposes only and is not a substitute for individualized, professional medical advice. Please contact your health care professional with any questions you may have regarding your individual health or medical concerns.

The American Institute for Cancer Research has been a leader in encouraging and supporting innovative research in the area of diet, nutrition and cancer. The Institute does not directly carry out research, but rather provides funding for research at leading universities, hospitals and research centers throughout the U.S., as well as in other countries. All funded grants have gone through a peer-review process which meets the standards of the federal government's National Cancer Institute.

Cancer doesn't recognize national borders, nor is it a disease restricted to developed, industrialized countries. The need to study cancer and teach prevention worldwide becomes more apparent every year. AICR operates on a global level through its membership in the World Cancer Research Fund International (WCRF International).

The WCRF global network has found an increasingly important role to play for several reasons. One is the growing rate of cancer incidence around the world. Improving standards for public health and medical care have helped raise the life expectancy in most countries. Greater longevity means rising rates for cancer, a disease that most often strikes later in life.

In addition, a substantial body of scientific evidence has made clear that lifestyle choices play an overwhelming role in cancer incidence. Unfortunately, improved standards of living often translate into eating habits and practices that increase risk of cancer. Studies of the growing middle class in many developing nations find more obesity, lower levels of physical activity, more smoking and diets higher in fat and lower in foods from plant sources.

Through its international research and education programs, a primary goal of the WCRF global network is to help promote changes that will decrease rates of cancer incidence. Higher standards of living need not translate into higher incidence rates for cancer, heart disease and diabetes. WCRF International is working to help make a more prosperous and modernized world also a healthier and more cancer-free world.

The findings may seem like common sense: after all, tomatoes and broccoli (and their various components) have all displayed potent anti-cancer activity in over a hundred different studies, and they seem to act in different ways. Thus, diets high in both foods should contain a larger arsenal of cancer-fighters and afford more comprehensive protection.

Until now, however, the general thrust of diet-cancer laboratory science has been to identify and isolate the most potent cancer-fighting substances found in the diet. (Thats one reason lycopene, a strong antioxidant, became such a star.) Only very recently have researchers begun to construct experiments that attempt to address the complexity of the overall human diet, where the interactions of phytochemicals, vitamins and minerals may offer the key to protection.

So theres nothing magic about the combination of broccoli and tomatoes. Theres every reason to think, however, that the potent anti-cancer activity these two foods show together takes place whenever diets are high in a variety of plant foods. This study is simply among the first to document that fact.

Results of a large clinical study with breast cancer survivors appearing in the December 20 issue of the Journal of the National Cancer Institute suggest that lowering intake of dietary fact protects against breast cancer recurrence.

AICR helped to fund the landmark Womens Intervention Nutrition Study (WINS), which is a randomized study that included more than 2,400 postmenopausal women who had been treated for breast cancer. All had received standard therapies - surgery followed by radiation, chemotherapy, hormone therapy, or some combination of these treatments.

Half the women were asked to cut their dietary fat to 20 percent of total calories each day (33 grams of total fat). The other half followed a standard diet (51 grams of fat). Five years later, breast cancer had recurred in 9.8 percent of the women on the lowfat diet, compared with 12.4 percent of the women on the standard diet.

A separate, unexpected outcome from WINS is that women on the lowfat diet whose breast cancer was not sensitive to the hormone estrogen (i.e., estrogen receptor-negative breast cancer) achieved a 41 percent reduction in their risk of cancer recurrence.

Thats important, because women who do have breast cancer that is influenced by estrogen can take estrogen inhibitors to lower their risk. But the fact that there is an effect on ER-negative breast cancer gives hope to women with that type of cancer.

NOTE: The lead author of this article presented preliminary data on the longer-term (beyond 5 years) follow-up of this study at a conference on December 16, 2006. If confirmed, the new data suggest that lower dietary fat intake is even more protective against ER-negative breast cancer recurrence than was observed during the five years reported in the JNCI article. However, the follow-up data also suggest that dietary fat intake showed little protective effect against recurrence of ER-positive breast cancer.

All of the papers presented at the AICR conference, which is the worlds premier forum on the diet-cancer connection, appear in the issue, along with pertinent diagrams and notable abstracts from the poster sessions.

Scientists at the University of Washington in Seattle are using an AICR grant to study how and why cancer is often associated with loss of appetite and severe weight loss. In a study published in the September 2006 issue of the scientific journal Endocrinology, the researchers examined a specific molecule used by inflamed cells to turn on the bodys sickness response: fever, loss of appetite, etc.

Cancer patients who experience the loss of appetite called anorexia (not to be confused with anorexia nervosa, an eating disorder) and the weight loss that comes with it have a higher mortality rate. By studying the complex biochemical chain of events leading from low-level inflammation to anorexia and weight loss, the researchers hope to find new ways to prevent these conditions.

The molecule called MyD88 is used by cells to communicate with each other. Specifically, MyD88 triggers rapid inflammatory responses in cells and tissues, usually in response to bacterial infection. This inflammation is linked to the loss of appetite that, in cancer patients, is part of a condition called cancer anorexia/cachexia syndrome (CACS) which is marked by reduced food intake, muscle wasting and inexorable weight loss.

In the study, the researchers examined mice that lack MyD88. They found that without this molecule, the mice did not experience anorexia when exposed to an inflammatory stimulus. They also did not experience other aspects of the sickness response (fever, absence of thirst, reduced movement). Unfortunately, these mice still experienced weight loss, although it was significantly less extreme than in mice with MyD88.

This finding that MyD88 seems to play a central role in anorexia and feelings of sickness, but not weight loss, suggests that a separate factor or factors influence weight maintenance in cancer patients more directly.

Experts at the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) welcomed results from the Womens Intervention Nutrition Study (WINS) published in the December 20 issue of the Journal of the National Cancer Institute. The results suggest that breast cancer survivors who reduced the amount of fat in their diets were significantly less likely to experience a recurrence of breast cancer over the next five years.

When these results were first reported at an oral presentation last year, AICR interviewed the studys lead author, one study participant, and placed the study in context. Click here to read that article.

Last week, at a symposium in San Antonio, the studys lead author presented unpublished follow-up data (beyond the five years reported in the new JNCI article) that add a different perspective to the JNCI results.

According to this December 16, 2006 presentation, lowering fat intake was strongly associated with lower risk of recurrence, but only for the kind of breast cancer that is not sensitive to hormones (estrogen-negative breast cancer.) Among WINS participants with tumors that contain receptors for hormones (estrogen-positive breast cancer), however, reducing fat intake had little protective effect.

In light of the total available evidence on diet and breast cancer risk, AICR advises all breast cancer survivors, regardless of their receptor status, to adopt diets high in vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans and low in animal fat.

Instead of counting calories or fat grams, the cancer experts recommend that the whole plate undergo a simple makeover. The traditional American three-part formula of meat, potatoes and a single green vegetable will change. As the amount of meat gets smaller, the extra space may be taken up by two or more vegetables and a whole-grain.

Plant foods contain thousands of phytochemicals (phyto means plant). In laboratory studies, these naturally occurring substances have repeatedly shown an array of antioxidant and anti-inflammatory abilities that help cells defend against the start of the cancer process. Many have also shown the capacity to stop already cancerous cells from progressing into tumors.

Perhaps the simplest way to get started is to adapt simple dishes like casseroles, stews, stir-fries and summery, grain-based salads to meet the recommended two-thirds plant, one-third meat model. In one-pot cooking, its easy for vegetables, grains and beans to provide the healthful and satisfying heart of the meal while meat becomes a condiment, imparting flavor.

Its a return to the kind of casseroles and stews that were popular in the fifties and sixties, with a lighter, more contemporary twist. One-pot meals are an ideal way to transition to healthier proportions.

To help people adopt this healthy meal model, AICR is offering a completely revised version of The New American Plate: One-Pot Meals, a free brochure that shows how to make the shift to healthier eating without sacrificing convenience, flavor or satisfaction.

The 18 all-new recipes contained in the free One-Pot Meals brochure are just that combinations of healthful ingredients that require little preparation yet result in hearty, satisfying stews, stir-fries, casseroles and grain-based salads.

Heres a sample recipe from the brochure. This healthy update of a traditional French cassoulet trims the fat, but not the flavor. Its a colorful and hearty dish thats perfect for supper on gray, wintry days.

In same pot, saut? onion and carrots for 7 minutes until onion is soft. Add tomatoes with juice, beans and orange zest. Bring to boil, lower heat and add chicken. Cover and transfer to oven. Bake for 20-25 minutes.

The American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) is the cancer charity that fosters research on diet and cancer and educates the public about the results. It has contributed more than $78 million for innovative research conducted at universities, hospitals and research centers across the country. AICR also provides a wide range of educational programs to help millions of Americans learn to make dietary changes for lower cancer risk. Its award-winning New American Plate program is presented in brochures, seminars and on its website, www.aicr.org. AICR is a member of the World Cancer Research Fund International.

A: Smoking tobacco is strongly related to many cancers throughout the body. As smoke is inhaled, it passes through the mouth, where it increases cancer risk 27-fold, according to the World Health Organization. When the smoke moves through the throat, it increases cancer risk of the larynx (voice box) 12-fold. From the lungs, at least some of the more than 60 chemicals in tobacco that are known to cause cancer are absorbed into the blood, where they travel throughout the body. That explains why research suggests smoking increases risk of cancers of the pancreas, cervix, colon and perhaps even breast. The toxins need to be filtered by the kidney and seem to pose some cancer risk there. Before being excreted, these carcinogens in the urine are held in the bladder where they can be absorbed into the lining. Compared to nonsmokers, smokers have double or triple the risk of bladder cancer. Healthful eating and daily physical activity are part of an overall strategy to lower cancer risk, but so is tobacco avoidance.

Q: Does how much weight a woman gains in pregnancy really matter? A: Yes. Studies show that women who gain amounts below recommended levels are more likely to have babies who face health risks because they are born premature or underweight. Women who gain more than is recommended are at three times greater risk of having a baby who is large for its size (which poses concerns), and more likely to have hypoglycemia (low blood sugar) or jaundice in its early days. Some studies link excessive weight gain in pregnancy with greater risk for the mother to become overweight or develop diabetes or breast cancer in later years. The amount of weight a woman needs to gain during pregnancy is based on her weight before pregnancy, as defined by body mass index, which compares weight to height. The Institute of Medicine advises the following: underweight women should gain 28 to 40 pounds; normal weight women 25 to 35 pounds; and overweight women should gain 15 to 25 pounds. Those who are more overweight are classified as obese, but should still gain at least 15 pounds. Women shorter than 5 foot, 2 inches may do best with gains limited to the lower end of each range. Women carrying more than one baby should discuss with their doctors how these recommendations may be adjusted for their needs.

A: Lycopene is a natural antioxidant that can bind to unstable molecules and prevent them from possibly damaging our cells. Tomatoes may provide most of the lycopene we eat, but they certainly arent the only source. A red/pink color is the sign of lycopene, present in such vegetables as red bell peppers and fruits such as watermelon, guava and red grapefruit. Lycopene is also available in supplements, but studies suggest that it may be more powerful when combined with the many other substances and vitamins in food, so researchers emphasize food as the best source.

The American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) offers a Nutrition Hotline online at www.aicr.org or via phone 9 a.m. to 5 p.m. ET, Monday-Friday, at 1-800-843-8114. This free service allows you to ask questions about diet, nutrition and cancer. A registered dietitian will respond to your email or call, usually within 3 business days. AICR is the only major cancer charity focusing exclusively on how the risk of cancer is reduced by healthy food and nutrition, physical activity and weight management. The Institutes education programs help millions of Americans lower their cancer risk. AICR also supports innovative research in cancer prevention and treatment at universities, hospitals and research centers across the U.S. Over $77 million in funding has been provided. AICR is a member of the World Cancer Research Fund International.

A free information program from the American Institute for Cance r Research to help cancer patients and their families understand more about cancer, its treatment and the resources available to help them in overcoming this disease.

AICR has developed CancerResource to answer many of the basic questions which arise with a diagnosis of cancer. It provides information that can help a cancer patient be an active part of his or her treatment and of the many important decisions that come with fighting cancer. It also provides information about other resources available for additional information and support.

The New American Plate isn't a diet, or a complex system for calculating calories, fat grams, or carbs. It's a fresh way of looking at what you eat every day. Create meals that lower your risk for cancer and other chronic diseases and manage your weight, at the same time.

Do you eat the exact same things every day? Of course not. Most peoples diets are complex, and they change over weeks, months and years. To pinpoint associations between diet and cancer, researchers must dig through this massive menu to isolate the specific effects of individual foods.

Each scientific study provides another clue to the evolving mystery of how diet affects cancer. But as with any good mystery, some clues hold more weight than others. Since cancer isnt going to confess to what caused it, no single piece of evidence gives us all the answers. The body of evidence formed by many studies must be considered as a whole as we investigate the mystery of the diet-cancer connection.

This World Wide Web site with its home page in the domain "aicr.org" (the "Website") is a complimentary information service offered by the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) at no charge to users of the World Wide Web. Your continued use of the Website indicates your ongoing agreement to be bound by the terms and conditions set forth in this Terms of Service and Disclaimer. AICR reserves the right to change these terms and conditions any time, so please check back often to review the most recent version of the Terms of Service and Disclaimer. Do not use the Website if you do not acknowledge all of the following terms and conditions.

This Website is a free service provided by the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR). AICR does not provide medical advice. While AICR takes great care to provide the most accurate and up-to-date research and health information available, any information contained on this website is for educational and informational use only. The contents of this website are not intended to be a substitute for individualized, professional medical advice, diagnosis, or treatment. AICR therefore disclaims all liability for any loss, damage, or injury based on information directly or indirectly obtained through this website. Should you have individual medical or health concerns or questions, please contact your healthcare professional. The information provided on this Website is provided on an as is basis. AICR makes no warranties of any kind regarding this Website, including but not limited to any warranty of accuracy, completeness, currency, reliability, merchantability or fitness for a particular purpose, or any warranty that these pages, or the server that makes them available, are free of viruses or other harmful elements, and such warranties are expressly disclaimed.

You acknowledge that you will hold harmless AICR and its shareholders, officers, directors, and employees from all claims arising out of or related to your access or use of, or your inability to access or use, this Website or the information contained in this Website or other websites to which it is linked, including but not limited to claims that you have found something you have heard, viewed or downloaded from this Website or another website to which it is linked to be obscene, offensive, defamatory, or infringing upon your intellectual property rights. In no event will AICR or the contributors of information to this Website be liable to you or anyone else for any decision made or action taken by you in reliance on such information or for any consequential, special or similar damages, even if advised of the possibility of such damages.

AICR may provide links on the Website to other websites which are not under the control of AICR. In general, any website which has an address (or URL) which does not contain "aicr.org" is such a website. These links are provided for convenience of reference only and are not intended as an endorsement by AICR of the organization or individual operating the website or a warranty of any type regarding the website or the information on the website.

You may provide a hypertext link to this Website on another website, provided: (a) that the link must be a text-only link clearly marked "American Institute for Cancer Research," (b) the link must "point" to the URL "http://www.aicr.org" and not to other pages within the Website, (c) the appearance, position and other aspects of the link may not be such as to damage or dilute the goodwill associated with AICR's name and trademarks, (d) the appearance, position and other aspects of the link may not create the false appearance that an entity other than AICR is associated with or sponsored by AICR, (e) the link, when activated by a user, must display this Website full-screen and not with a "frame" on the linked website, and (f) AICR reserves the right to revoke its consent to the link at any time in its sole discretion by amending this Terms of Service and Disclaimer. You acknowledge that all other hypertext links to this Website must be approved in writing by AICR.

This Website (excluding linked sites) is controlled by AICR which is headquartered in the District of Columbia, United States of America. It can be accessed from all 50 states, as well as from other countries around the world. As each of these places has laws that may differ from those of the District of Columbia, by accessing this Website both you and AICR acknowledge that the statutes and laws of the District of Columbia, without regard to conflicts of laws principles thereof, will apply to all matters arising from or relating to use of this Website. AICR makes no representation that materials on the Website are appropriate or available for use in other locations, and accessing them from territories where their contents are illegal is prohibited. Those who choose to access this Website from other locations do so on their own initiative and are responsible for compliance with local laws.

At aicr.org, we are committed to protecting your privacy. We use the information you provide to process orders, information requests, and to help you enjoy a more personalized Web experience. Please read on for more detail about our privacy policy.

Our forms require users to give us contact information that may include name, email address, format preference (HTML vs. Text), address, interests, and similar information. We do not store sensitive information from our visitors, such as credit card or social security numbers.

"Cookies" are small pieces of information that are stored by your browser on your computer's hard drive. Our cookies do not contain any personally identifying information, but they do enable us to provide additional features on this site. Most Web browsers automatically accept cookies, but you can usually change your browser to prevent that, if required. Even without a cookie, you can still use most of the features in our Web site.

Will aicr.org disclose the information it collects to outside parties? aicr.org does not currently sell, trade or rent e-mail addresses to others. We may choose to do so in the future with trustworthy third parties, but you can tell us if you would prefer us not to by sending an e-mail message to aicrweb@aicr.org. (If you use more than one e-mail address to visit this Web site, send this message from each e-mail account you use.) Also, aicr.org may provide aggregate statistics about our visitors, orders received, traffic patterns and related site information to reputable third-party vendors, but these statistics will not include any e-mail addresses.

If a user elects to use our referral service for informing a friend about our Site or e-newsletters, we ask them for the friend's name and email address. The American Institute for Cancer Research will automatically send the friend a one-time email inviting them to visit the Site. The American Institute for Cancer Research stores this information for the sole purpose of sending this one-time email.

Our Site contains links to other Web sites. Please note that when you click on one of these links, you are entering another Web site for which the American Institute for Cancer Research has no responsibility. We encourage you to read the privacy statement on all such sites as their policies may be different than ours.

By using our Web site, you consent to the collection and use of this information by aicr.org. If we decide to change our privacy policy, we will post those changes on this page so that you are always aware of what information we collect, how we use it and under what circumstances we disclose it.AICR maintains its own mailing list. Occasionally, it rents or exchanges the mailing list with other organizations in order to maintain an active donor file to support AICR services. If you do not want to participate in the program, please let us know by writing to the above address, by emailing us at aicrweb@aicr.org, or by calling the above toll-free number.

The works of authorship contained in thisWebsite, including but not limited to all design, text and images, are owned or licensed by the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR), and may not be copied, reproduced, transmitted, displayed, performed, distributed, rented, sublicensed, altered, stored for subsequent use or otherwise used in whole or in part in any manner without AICR's prior written consent, except that the user may make such temporary copies in a single computer's RAM and hard drive cache as are necessary to browse the Website, and the user may make one permanent printout of each page of the Website to be used by the user for personal and non-commercial uses which do not harm the reputation of AICR.

The logo [AICR logo] and the American Institute for Cancer Research and World Cancer Research Fund names, slogans and other logos are trademarks, service marks or registered trademarks of their respective owners and may not be used by any other party without the express written permission of their respective owners.

Who makes possible the cancer research and education programs of the American Institute for Cancer Research? The answer can be as close as your next-door neighbor, the clerk at the supermarket, or the person sitting in the car next to you at a traffic light.

The support AICR has received from individuals may be modest or large, whatever fits the budget of the giver. But even the smallest gift, when multiplied by the millions of AICR supporters, helps add up to have a significant impact on the fight against cancer. To date, such gifts have provided funding for more than $78 million in cutting edge research in diet, nutrition and the prevention and treatment of cancer.

Those gifts have also provided the support to make possible AICR's wide range of educational programs and publications efforts that have helped millions of Americans learn about the potential of cancer prevention, and take steps to lower cancer risk.

Making A Measurable DifferenceIs it making a difference? The answer is clearly yes. Recent cancer incidence estimates, based on the Federal government's statistics, indicate that for the first time cancer incidence rates are declining. The experts say it's not due to medical breakthroughs or new drugs, but because people are making changes for cancer prevention: eating healthier, exercising more, watching their weight and smoking less.

The fight against cancer still has far to go, but exciting progress has been made. If you are a supporter of AICR, we thank you for all that your gifts have helped accomplish. If you are thinking about making your first gift, we invite you to visit more of the AICR site and learn about what your gift will help make possible, and about the types of giving opportunities possible.

AICR supporters have found a number of unique and fun ways to raise much-needed funds for vital cancer research and education programs. We've got all the tools you need to plan your own special event to support AICR. Contact us with your questions or for more information.

Planned Giving is a means of making a charitable gift part of a donor's overall financial, estate, tax and philanthropic planning, maximizing the benefits to both the donor and the charity, and often achieving significant tax savings.

The minimum amount required to establish a new endowment with the Institute is $10,000 with the understanding that future gifts will be added to the fund over ones lifetime and/or through his or her estate to ensure the growth of the fund to exceed $100,000. An endowed fund may be restricted to a particular type of cancer research, such as colorectal, breast or prostate cancer.

A contribution can also be made to the AICR Cancer Research Fund. This donor-restricted research fund was established in 1999. There is no minimum gift requirement if you wish to contribute to the Cancer Research Fund. Giving to the Cancer Research Fund is a wonderful way to earmark money for research purposes only.

The American Institute for Cancer Research appreciates the role that attorneys and financial planning professionals play in the consideration of charitable gifts by AICR supporters. The Institute has developed programs to assist attorneys and financial planners in providing their clients with accurate and current information related to charitable gifts.

Estate Planning Professional PublicationsAICR's free publications for attorneys and financial professionals provide updates on a variety of tax and gift planning issues related to charitable gifts. Browse titles and order online.

Learn more about the caner research and education programs at the American Institute for Cancer Research. Request a free copy of our annual report or samples of our other educational brochures. Browse titles and order online.

Interpreting relevant scientific data is the most critical step in the development of healthy living guidelines for the general public. Two affiliates of the World Cancer Research Fund global network, WCRF UK and AICR, did just that by facilitating an exhaustive review and analysis of the available scientific evidence on food, nutrition and cancer. The result was the Expert Report, Food, Nutrition and the Prevention of Cancer: a global perspective, published in 1997.

The Report reviewed thousands of published research studies from around the world, leading to specific recommendations for policy makers and the general public to reduce the risk of cancer and other chronic diseases. It remains the most authoritative report in its field and has become the standard basis for policy, research and teaching worldwide. Over 30,000 copies have been produced and distributed.

Until the latter half of the 1980's, the proposition that diet and lifestyle could affect cancer risk received significantly less scientific attention than other approaches to cancer prevention. For many, finding the financial support necessary to perform diet/cancer research was as daunting a task as performing the research itself. This is where the American Institute for Cancer Research has made a difference.

Since its founding, AICR has worked to bring research about diet, nutrition and cancer into the center of the scientific spotlight by funding innovative research projects. Read about and search research grants funded by AICR in Funded Research.

The primary focus of the Institute's Research Grant Programs remains the support of projects exploring the effects of dietary and nutritional factors on the etiology, pathogenesis, prevention and treatment of cancer. To this end, the Institute also encourages the rigorous, scientific evaluation of complementary and alternative dietary strategies, and places particular emphasis on the need to study synergistic effects of dietary components in cancer prevention and treatment.

AICR's continued support of such research has contributed to the substantial growing body of information about diet, nutrition and cancer, and has helped improve the status of such investigations in the eyes of the scientific community.

AICR ScienceNow is a 4-page quarterly newsletter from AICR written for the general public, as well as health professionals. The articles take readers behind the scenes to better understand the latest findings and directions in diet and cancer research. You'll find out the details of AICR-funded studies, read interviews with prominent scientists, read reviews of relevant books and journals and learn to discern between nutrition myths and scientific facts.

AICR Research Grant ProgramsThe AICR Research Program encourages innovative research on diet and physical activity in relation to preventing and treating cancer. AICR focuses on basic scientific approaches to understand the causes and mechanisms of cancer development and the development of innovative approaches for the treatment of cancer.

The program has been established in honor of Marilyn Gentry, President of AICR/WCRF. Since its founding in 1982, AICR has been an important factor in fostering research and educating the public on the link between diet and cancer. Since 1990, WCRF has carried this work across geographical boundaries to help alleviate the global burden of cancer. Part of a worldwide network, these organizations have raised awareness that risk of cancer can be reduced by nutrition and lifestyle modification. They have funded innovative scientific research on diet and cancer and stimulated new public initiatives for cancer prevention and control throughout the world.

The purpose of the Marilyn Gentry Fellowship Program in Nutrition and Cancer is to develop leaders in cutting-edge nutritional research as it relates to cancer prevention, treatment and survivorship. Due to the paucity of nutritional research in the area of cancer survivorship, we especially want to encourage applicants with strong interest in that area.

The two-year fellowships are designed to attract and support individuals at the transition stage between a postdoctoral position and the assistant professorship level. Fellows will be appointed at the rank of Research Assistant Professor of Nutrition and will receive two years of organized mentoring on the specific skills needed to succeed as academic scientists. Fellows will also develop a body of data that will allow them to compete successfully for grant funding and help establish them as independent investigators.

Selections for the Marilyn Gentry Fellowship Program in Nutrition and Cancer will be made on a rolling basis throughout the year. An initial review subcommittee, comprised of the chair of the UNC School of Public Health, Department of Nutrition, two distinguished committee members from UNC and Ritva Butrum, Ph.D. from AICR/WCRF, or their designees, will review the first round of applications and determine if they are potentially acceptable. The most highly qualified candidates will be referred to the full selection committee. Two to three fellows will be selected each year, depending on available funding.

One-third of fellowships will be awarded to individuals who are not citizens or permanent residents of the United States. Preference will be afforded to citizens of countries where AICR/WCRF has active programs.

The first mentoring component of the Marilyn Gentry Fellowship Program in Nutrition and Cancer will match each fellow with a research mentor who will help the fellow identify a subset of the mentors research, which will be set aside for the fellow. Thus, the fellow will be able to develop his or her own area of focus, with a body of data and presumably grant funding, that he or she is free to use as the platform for a future faculty appointment. The research mentor will also develop and sharpen the fellows grant writing skills. It is expected that each fellow will successfully generate a grant using the research and data generated during the fellowship.

The second mentoring component is a Core Professional Development Program. The purpose of this program is to ensure that fellows are formally trained in the skills that encourage success as leaders and scientific professionals. In collaboration with AICR/WCRF staff, faculty members from UNC will deliver an advanced, high-level seminar series covering topics on grant writing, leadership, public speaking, ethics, teaching skills, career advancement and laboratory and research management.

Experiences will include the completion of a grant proposal, participation in grant reviews during AICR grant panel meetings, presentation to the AICR Board at least once each year, attendance at AICRs Annual Research Conference and two national or international scientific meetings each year, and participation in other selected experiences as needed to enhance the fellows fundamental base of knowledge.

At five-year intervals, AICR/WCRF will identify three external advisors and charge them with visiting The University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, reviewing the fellowship program, and submitting a report on the progress of the Marilyn Gentry Fellowship Program in Nutrition and Cancer using the same criteria listed above.

Cancer is not a single disease, but the generic name for more than 100 diseases, all having in common the uncontrolled reproduction of abnormal cells. Although scientists are only now beginning to understand the causes and growth of cancer, there exists a large and growing body of evidence showing that the foods we choose each day play a major part in cancer prevention.

Scientists have long estimated that a large percentage of our cancer risk is related to our lifestyle choices. The international report on cancer prevention from the American Institute for Cancer Research, Food, Nutrition and the Prevention of Cancer: a global perspective, found that 30% to 40% of all cancers are directly linked to the foods we eat, the exercise we get and how well we watch our weight. And the report estimates that 30% of cancers can be prevented by not using tobacco. What this means is that we have the potential through our daily food and lifestyle choices to make a major impact on the cancer risk we each face in our lives.

The cancer prevention opportunities offered by research and education programs in diet, nutrition and cancer are enormous. It has only been in the last 15 to 20 years that research in diet and cancer has been given more attention and has begun to attract the levels of funding that can bring strong results. Today an increasing understanding of the role of vitamins, minerals, fats, fiber and phytochemicals offers each of us the opportunity to make simple changes for lower cancer risk.

With more than 1.2 million new cancer cases in the U.S. each year, and more than 500,000 cancer deaths annually, programs that can produce even a small reduction in cancer rates offer enormous savings in lives, suffering and medical expense. AICR has been at the forefront of providing education programs and materials to help people learn how to make changes for lower cancer risk. Click here to pop-up a window with the AICR Diet and Health Guidelines for Cancer Prevention. See how many of the recommendations you're currently following for better health and lower cancer risk.

Currently, there are no guarantees against cancer. But with overwhelming scientific evidence showing that the vast majority of cancers are directly related to our lifestyle choices (with diet and smoking as the two major influencers of cancer risk), there is a great deal that we each can do to reduce our cancer risk.

THINKING about cancer is something most of us would rather avoid, but today we know that paying more attention to our cancer risk is something that can yield real dividends. Researchers tell us that the majority of cancers we face are preventable not through new drugs or medical breakthroughs but through simple lifestyle choices.

The landmark 1997 report, Food, Nutrition and the Prevention of Cancer: a global perspective, published by AICR and WCRF UK, documented the real potential of cancer prevention. The scientists who produced this report estimated that 30% to 40% of cancers are directly linked to our diets and related factors, such as maintaining a healthy weight and staying physically active. They also found that 30% of cancers could be prevented by not smoking. Just a few simple changes can help reduce cancer risk for you and your family.

The foods you choose each day are one of the most important factors in protecting you against cancer. Most Americans eat a diet that is far too high in fat and calories. Even more important is what the average U.S. diet lacks: a variety of vegetables, fruits, beans and other plant-based foods.

Eating a healthier diet, one that not only can help protect against cancer, but also against heart disease, stroke and a variety of other health problems, is easier to do than you may think. A good starting point is the AICR Diet and Health Guidelines for Cancer Prevention.

Your overall health and cancer risk are very much affected by the things you do in your life. Free AICR educational publications related to healthier living and lower cancer risk are available through this site. Choosing healthy foods, particularly a diet rich in vegetables and fruits, gives your body not only the nutrients it needs for good health, but a whole arsenal of compounds within food that help protect against the naturally-occuring cancer risks you face every day.

Similarly, maintaining a healthy weight and staying physically active have also been shown to be important in helping your body protect itself against cancer. There's nothing magic or difficult about these types of lifestyle choices. Eat right, stay active and watch your weight put them all together and they add up to a formula that can cut cancer risk by 30 to 40%.

Smoking is the most publicized of cancer risks. There is no question that smoking, or using tobacco in any form, is one of the worst choices you can make from a health perspective. Not only does the use of tobacco greatly increase risk for lung cancer, but it also appears to influence some other forms of cancer, and significantly increases your risk for cardiovascular disease and stroke.

No single food or food substances can protect you against cancer, but the right combination of foods a predominantly plant-based diet can. Evidence is mounting that the minerals, vitamins and phytochemicals in many plant foods interact to provide extra cancer protection. This concept is called synergy.

The American Institute for Cancer Research offers resources and educational materials for health professionals. AICR's programs can help educate patients and clients about cancer prevention, using sound and reliable information. All materials are reviewed by experts in the field and are based on evidence from AICRs landmark, international science report, Food, Nutrition and the Prevention of Cancer: a global perspective.

National Cancer Institutecancer.govThe latest information from the U.S. government's National Institutes of Health. Access in-depth fact sheets on specific types of cancer, search for clinical trials and subscribe to a weekly e-newsletter "NCI Cancer Bulletin".

Oncology Nursing Societywww.ons.org/patientEd/National organization supporting oncology nurses provides in-depth information on prevention, diagnosis, treatment, specific types of cancer and survivorship.

Susan G. Komen Breast Cancer Foundationwww.komen.orgResources on prevention, detection, diagnosis, treatment and support for breast cancer patients and survivors. Features message boards and other interactive tools.

The Prostate Nethttp://www.prostate-online.org/Information on prostate cancer risk, detection and treatment. Heading a national initiative to promote disease risk education and prostate cancer screening through barbershops.

American Dietetic Associationwww.eatright.orgNational association of nutrition professionals offers a "Food & Nutrition Information" section full of useful information. Search for a nutrition professional in your area.

Nutrition.govwww.nutrition.govPractical information on healthy eating, dietary supplements, fitness and how to keep food safe. Compiled and maintained by the combined efforts of U.S. federal government agencies.

Cancer Nutrition Information, LLC www.cancernutritioninfo.comFree information on nutrition-related side effects of cancer treatment, recipes and clinical trials. Additional information available by subscription.

AICR's quarterly Newsletter explains current cancer research, provides recipes and menu ideas for healthy eating, and offers practical advice to lower cancer risk. Currently more than 1.6 million American homes receive the Newsletter.

AICRs educational brochures help you reduce your cancer risk, prepare healthy recipes, manage your weight and more. Selected brochures are featured below. Click the brochure title and read it online, view or print the pdf, or order a free sample.

AICR Nutrition Info for Kids:Encourage Healthy Habits Early AICR's free bimonthly children's newsletter, the good-news-letter provides kids with an entertaining reminder of how much fun eating healthfully can be.Filled with puzzles, stories, games, and interesting food facts, the "good-news-letter" can be an important tool to help your kids make the right diet and exercise choices for good health.To Subscribe If you have a child between 7 and 10 in your home who would like to receive the good-news-letter every other month, call the toll-free number below. Please ask for the publications operator. If you wish to make a donation when requesting your free subscription, simply tell the operator, who will be glad to take your credit card information.While there is no charge for the good-news-letter, your donation of $5 or more not only helps bring this newsletter to thousands of children across the country, but also helps support vital programs in cancer research and education.

Order now! Select available materials from our Publications Catalog, including Spanish materials. Use the Publications Order Form to mail or fax your order in, or call toll-free to place your order. All major credit cards are accepted.

Because cancer creates lasting physical, emotional and psychosocial changes, survivors often feel vulnerable after treatment. Many feel a need for guidance. Many want to know: What can I do to help myself? How can I protect myself against recurring or secondary tumors? How can I return to an active, healthy life?

Unfortunately, the painstaking process that yields science-based recommendations on diet and exercise for cancer survivors has not yet reached its conclusion. Until recently, nutrition research has focused on reducing the risk of primary cancers. AICR is actively promoting deeper and more comprehensive investigation relating to survivor issues.

The following recommendations list the most powerful steps you can take to prevent cancer. Putting them into practice should help you protect yourself against a secondary tumor, or a recurrence of your cancer. The recommendations are divided into seven groups that reflect daily choices about food and activity. The categories are plant-based foods, animal-based foods, fat, salt, alcohol, food preparation and energy balance.

Choose predominantly plant-based diets rich in a variety of vegetables and fruits.If eaten at all, limit intake of red meat to less than three ounces daily.Limit consumption of fatty foods, particularly those of animal origin. Choose modest amounts of appropriate vegetable oils.Limit consumption of salted foods and use of cooking and table salt. Use herbs and spices to season foods.Limit alcoholic drinks to less than two drinks a day for men and one for women.Do not eat charred food. Consume the following only occasionally: meat and fish grilled in direct flame, cured and smoked meats.Avoid being overweight and limit weight gain during adulthood. Take an hour's brisk walk or similar exercise daily.

Nutrition and the Cancer Survivor offers suggestions and information for those of you who have finished undergoing cancer treatment. The focus of the brochure is preventing a return of cancer or a secondary tumor.

Nutrition of the Cancer Patient addresses the needs of survivors still undergoing or recently released from treatment. The brochure suggests specific ways to cope with the effects of treatment, while trying to eat well.

For cancer survivors, studies suggest that exercise improves long-term prospects and the quality of life. Among the quality-of-life benefits are improved fitness, enhanced self-esteem and reduced fatigue. You might think physical activity would heighten fatigue, which is one of the most common complaints of cancer survivors. But studies show that relaxation actually increases fatigue, while a moderate exercise program reduces it. Exercise can also relieve depression and anxiety.

There are several ways in which exercise enhances the long-term prospects of cancer survivors. Physical activity improves the function of the immune system and reduces stress. Also, by helping to control weight gain and reduce the percentage of body fat, exercise can influence the risk of cancer recurrence and survival.

Knowledge is your best defense against a secondary tumor or recurrence of cancer. Below are some of the most common questions about diet and exercise that cancer survivors ask after treatment. The answers are based on current research.

Nutrition Hotline Online. Before using the question, it may be edited by AICR staff. All personal information will be removed. Only the city and state will be used. Questions and their answers will be posted for a limited time.

A Cancer Survivor's AlmanacNational Coalition for Cancer Survivorshiphttp://www.canceradvocacy.org/This book addresses in detail the medical, personal, family and social issues following a diagnosis of cancer. The book even covers insurance, employment, legal and financial concerns. The resource section lists useful, cancer-related organizations and agencies. See the website above for order information.

This free newsletter is available three times a year from Cancer Care as either a printed or electronic publication. The newsletter has information and other resources for people during or after cancer treatment. Visit their website to sign up.

Published six times a year, this magazine is for anyone whose life has been touched by cancer. It provides information, hope and inspiration. Call 615-791-3859 for subscription information or visit their website.

MAMM magazine is devoted to meeting the needs of women diagnosed with breast or reproductive cancer. Its 10 issues a year provide information on research, treatments and quality of life concerns. For subscription information and ordering, visit their website.

People Living With Cancer of the American Society for Clinical Oncologyhttp://www.plwc.org/Access oncologist-approved information on more than 50 types of cancer and their treatments, clinical trials, coping, and side effects. Participate in live chats or message boards, or search the "Find an Oncologist" and drug databases.

Cancer Survivors Network of the American Cancer Societywww.acscsn.orgAn online community for survivors. Build a personalized web page, join chats on a variety of topics, and search their extensive resource library.

The Wellness Communitywww.thewellnesscommunity.orgProvides free emotional support, education and hope for people with cancer and their loved ones. Locate a local facility. Join online support groups or listen to webcasts.

National Coalition for Cancer Survivorshipwww.canceradvocacy.orgThe Coalition is a network of organizations and individuals concerned with the support of cancer survivors and their families. Their "Resource" section includes the Cancer Survivor Toolbox? and Resource Guides on specific types of cancer.

As the only major cancer organization in the U.S. focusing exclusively on diet, nutrition and cancer, the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) has taken the lead in providing science-based information to the public on cancer prevention. Part of AICR's research and education efforts are aimed at cancer survivors.

AICR has hosted Nutrition after Cancer since 2001 to bring science-based information on diet, nutrition and physical activity directly to cancer survivors. Due to the success of these conferences and public interest in this topic, AICR is committed to offering more in the future. Read more about the Nutrition after Cancer Conference.

AICR has also published a book based upon these conferences. It is full of insights and practical advice from leading scientists on diet, nutrition and exercise for the cancer survivor. Order a copy of the book Nutrition after Cancer.

Established in 1999 by dietitian and cancer survivor Diana Dyer, M.S., R.D., and managed by AICR, the Diana Dyer Cancer Survivors' Nutrition Research Endowment Fund helps fund research projects on cancer patients' nutritional needs during treatment and recovery. One focus of the Fund is to define whether dietary supplements, antioxidants in particular, are beneficial or harmful for cancer patients under cancer treatment.

At the sessions devoted to survivorship issues, presenters and attendees discuss the major questions facing scientists: Can certain diets improve survival? Can dietary strategies reduce the side effects of cancer treatment? Specific factors, such as omega-3 fatty acids and exercise, have been examined.

On May 8, 2001, in New York, NY, AICR held the first conference on diet and nutrition for cancer survivors. Researchers, health professionals and cancer survivors gathered to address one question: Can changes in diet or activity level reduce the risk of cancer recurrence, secondary tumors and late effects of treatment?

To provide cancer survivors with the best advice on nutrition and physical activity available at this time.To establish a dialogue with cancer survivors about their questions and concerns so as to determine where new information is needed.To identify key areas of research and encourage scientists to enter the field.

The full text of the conference presentations has been published by AICR in book form. In easily understood language, leading experts offer advice on diet, nutrition and exercise for the cancer survivor. Read excerpts or order a copy.

The IRS Form 990 is an annual federal income tax return that all charities exempt from income tax are required to file. The figures in these statements are presented in accordance with IRS regulations.

AICR press releases provide the media with practical information related to diet, nutrition and cancer. Releases address updates on research related to diet and cancer and special features focusing on making changes for lower cancer risk.

All press materials may be used in any publication without additional permission. Please credit the American Institute for Cancer Research as the source. Members of the Press: Sign up receive AICR news by e-mail.

Ever Green, Ever Healthy provides newspapers, newsletters and corporate and organizational publications with brief feature stories about better health, good nutrition and cancer prevention. New articles are available quarterly.All AICR press materials, including these articles, are free for use and may be used without additional permission. Please credit the American Institute for Cancer Research as the source.Members of the Press: Sign up to receive Ever Green, Ever Healthy by e-mail.

AICR's programs in research and education can help provide access to a wide range of experts. Many of these scientists, physicians and dietitians are available to answer questions from the media concerning the relationship between cancer prevention and diet, weight, exercise and tobacco use.

Karen Collins, MS, RD, CDN, holds a BS degree in nutrition from Purdue University and an MS degree in nutrition from Cornell University, where she also was an instructor. She has been involved with the American Institute for Cancer Research for more than 15 years as a writer, nutrition education consultant and public speaker. Ms. Collins has authored brochures, newsletter articles and cookbooks. For the past eight years, she has written two weekly newspaper columns syndicated to more than 700 newspapers nationwide and carried weekly on the MSNBC website. In addition, Ms. Collins conducts a private practice in nutrition counseling, working with individuals and groups to develop realistic strategies for achieving health goals.

The answer is an overwhelming YES. By eating a predominantly plant-based diet and consuming more vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans, you can strengthen your bodys natural defenses against tumors.

The NAS report stimulated considerable new research on the diet-cancer link. Through grants for seminal projects, the Institute fostered such activity. By 1993, the body of new research had grown to huge proportions, and the time had clearly come for a new review of the research in order to find a consensus. Working with its international affiliate, the World Cancer Research Fund (WCRF-UK), the Institute assembled a panel of 16 renowned scientists from eight countries. During a three-year period, this panel reviewed and evaluated more than 4,500 different studies on diet and cancer.

The 670-page report, Food, Nutrition and the Prevention of Cancer: a global perspective, contains the results of this effort. It indicates that 30 to 40 percent of cancers are directly linked to choices we make about food and drink, exercise, and body weight. The report also includes 14 recommendations for reducing risk of cancer based on these results.

With the diet-cancer link clearly established, AICR has continued to carry out its dual mission: It sponsors research that will generate further knowledge and produces educational programs and materials concerning its diet and lifestyle guidelines. To date, the Institute has committed more than $78 million for research related to diet and cancer. In addition, AICR has established a wide range of education programs to bring its message of cancer prevention to millions of Americans.

Science has just begun to explore the relationships among what we eat, how we live and the risk of cancer. Expanding such knowledge is part of the American Institute for Cancer Researchs dual mission of cancer research and education.

Additional information on AICR Research Grant Programs, including listings of past grant awards and the full research grant application package, is available from the Institute. It can be found in the research section of this AICR web site.

Choose a diet rich in a variety of plant-based foods. Eat plenty of vegetables and fruits.Maintain a healthy weight and be physically active. Drink alcohol only in moderation, if at all. Select foods low in fat and salt.Prepare and store foods safely.

AICRs guidelines are based on a growing body of scientific research related to the role of diet and nutrition in the cancer process. Much of this research is described and evaluated in the major international report, Food, Nutrition and the Prevention of Cancer: a global perspective.

The Institutes award-winning publication, The AICR Newsletter, is sent to 1.6 million households four times each year. It is the most widely distributed health newsletter in the U.S. It brings its readers lucid explanations of scientific findings, health tips and ideas for everyday living.

The Institute produces a variety of educational booklets, brochures, and leaflets covering such topics as the latest information on antioxidants and phytochemicals to suggestions for the quick preparation of healthy meals. Many of these publications are available online in the Publications Section of this site. You will also find information there about ordering free copies of AICR educational materials.

The Institute also offers a variety of other educational services for consumers. The publication of a variety of healthful recipes, offered through The AICR Newsletter, booklets, newspaper columns and other ways, are widely appreciated. You can find them at our Recipe Corner.

Throughout the year, AICR also conducts public seminars in selected cities across the country. During these two-hour sessions, a registered dietitian explains the diet-cancer link and strategies for reducing risk of the disease. Check the Upcoming Events section on this site for dates of upcoming seminars and other educational events.

AICR's award-winning educational programs are constantly expanding. Throughout this site you will find examples of the Institute's efforts in cancer prevention education. If you have specific questions about AICR educational programs, please Contact AICR.

Take a look at this list of recent questions and their answers. You may find the information you're looking for. Or, submit your own questions by e-mail, or call the Hotline. The list of questions and answers will be updated on a regular basis, so make sure you check back soon.

Q: There are so many new diets out there these days. Which do you recommend? A: Actually, we do not recommend any specific diet, as this word implies short-term limitations on what you eat. The key to weight management is to make eating healthfully a part of your daily lifestyle, not just to restrict food intake for a couple of weeks. Check out AICRs New American Plate program, which addresses proportion and portion size. It focuses on the transition to a plate filled with more plant-based foods and less animal protein, along with cutting down on portion sizes. There is no deprivation involved, no elimination of specific food groups or emphasis on any one food, as with many fad diets. And incorporating physical activity into your life is essential to a healthy lifestyle.

Source: U.S. Department of AgricultureReturn to table of contents The Traditional American Breakfast A good morning meal should provide energy that burns steadily all morning long. It should also provide a share perhaps even a third of the nutrients and phytochemicals your body requires each day. Too often traditional American breakfasts fail on both counts.One standard American breakfast is no breakfast at all. People skip the morning meal because of the rush to get up and out or because of the desire to reduce caloric intake. Eating a healthy breakfast fuels the muscles for physical activity and improves productivity. It actually increases the rate at which you burn calories. Skipping this meal is likely to leave you sluggish and hungry.Furthermore, skipping the morning meal to lose weight is counterproductive. Study after study shows that people who skip breakfast take in more calories later in the day than people who eat three evenly spaced meals. Other studies show that breakfast skippers tend to have higher blood cholesterol levels as well.Another traditional American breakfast is a doughnut and coffee. We grab a doughnut, Danish or cinnamon bun because it's quick and easy. Such pastries, however, are highly processed plant foods. That is, they contain excessive amounts of refined flour and refined sugar. They are a quick fix. They raise your blood sugar level rapidly and then let it plummet. The result is fatigue and hunger before the morning is half over, and you find yourself looking around for a snack to keep you going.A third traditional American breakfast is eggs, bacon or sausage, served with the inevitable hash browns. This hearty classic is high in saturated fat, and countless studies show saturated fat raises cholesterol levels and contributes to the clogging of arteries. Furthermore, it provides too much animal protein and fat and not enough of the protective nutrients and phytochemicals found in a plant-based breakfast. This kind of morning meal can lead to overweight and chronic diseases including cancer.The proportions are off in all of these traditional breakfasts. They are lacking the right balance of plant foods and lean animal protein. Pastry and coffee usually fail to provide a steady flow of energy. Eggs and fried meat won't supply the protective vitamins, minerals and phytochemicals long-term health requires. And not eating breakfast misses the grade altogether.

There are many ways to make a smoothie. Try different fruit and yogurt combinations to create your own nutritious and satisfying breakfast drink.If you prefer flavored yogurt to plain yogurt, the light varieties of yogurt will have fewer calories and less sugar.

Eat each separately for a grab-and-go breakfast. Or mix yogurt, raisins and cereal together whichever way works best for you.Use plain or light yogurt instead of sugar-sweetened flavored yogurt to cut down on added sugar. Combine with raisins to add natural sweetness.Look for whole grains in the ingredient list of the cereal. If a whole grain, like 100 percent whole wheat or whole oats, is listed as the first ingredient, it means the food is rich in whole grains.

Did you know that health experts recommend that we eat at least 3 servings of whole-grain foods daily? Most Americans average less than 1 serving a day. Breakfast is an opportunity to get more servings of whole grains into your diet.Including some plant-based protein at breakfast, like peanut butter, may help delay mid-morning hunger.

Cut down on added sugar by using all-fruit preserves. Or try apple butter, a spread made from apples and apple cider with no added sugar.Save time making fruit salad. Buy canned fruit or pre-cut fresh fruit at the supermarket deli counter or salad bar.

Look for whole-grain cereals that contain little or no added sugar. For example, Shredded Wheat contains no added sugar. Cheerios, Wheat Chex and Wheaties are low in sugar compared to many processed cereals.Vary your fruit choices depending on what's in season.Nuts are filling; a small handful adds protein and healthy fats to breakfast.

For an easy way to eat 2 servings of whole grains, choose a whole wheat English muffin.To cut down on fat, use soy sausage instead of pork sausage and reduced fat cheese instead of its full-fat counterpart.To cut down on fat, order a veggie pizza from the pizzeria. Save a slice for breakfast.Our recipe for vegetable pita pizzas (see recipe) calls for whole wheat pita and squash a delicious way to eat some servings of whole grains and vegetables.

You'll get plenty of fiber (from the bran and berries) and disease-fighting phytochemicals (from the berries, wheat germ, bran and cranberry juice) in this meal. Use plain lowfat yogurt instead of sweetened flavored yogurt to avoid extra calories, and sweeten with fresh fruit.

Spread apple butter or sugar-free preserves on your toast to eliminate added sugar. Enjoy the succulent flavor of seasonal fresh fruit. If peaches are not in season, choose another fresh fruit. Or use canned peaches packed in water or their own juice and drained.

Brown rice is a whole grain. It retains its outer coating, which gives it more nutrients and fiber than white rice. Try this recipe on the weekend or when you have time to cook. It's worth the time. Then save and refrigerate the rest to enjoy later in the week.

Here's a delicious way to fit vegetables into your morning meal.The combination of whole wheat tortillas, vegetables and eggs keeps this recipe within the 2/3 plant food to 1/3 animal food proportion.

If cooking is your pleasure, this recipe's for you. It requires some advance planning since the ingredient mixtures need to be refrigerated overnight and baked the following day.This strata is made with whole wheat bread. Make sure the first ingredient on the packaged bread is whole grain or whole wheat. It makes a difference.

Beans for breakfast? You bet. And veggies, too. This unique breakfast is anything but boring.The oil and avocado used in this recipe are rich in heart healthy monounsaturated fat. The soy cheese has less fat than regular cheese. As with all fats, moderation is key.Return to table of contents Weight Control and Portion SizePeople who are overweight and inactive are at greater risk for cancer and other chronic diseases. Researchers believe that overweight and inactivity cause the body to secrete high levels of insulin and other hormones known as growth factors. Cells constantly exposed to these substances begin to divide quickly and often, which makes cancer more likely. The good news is that regular physical activity and weight loss can help restore insulin levels to normal. That may help reduce your risk of disease.If you're looking to lose weight, don't cut out whole categories of foods or skip a meal to reduce your daily calories. Chances are, these strategies won't work. Feeling deprived of your favorite foods or not eating a meal altogether could lead to overeating later on.Instead, throughout the day fuel your body mostly with vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans. Meals centered around these foods tend to be lower in calories and fat than meals dominated by animal foods. For eating satisfaction and added health benefits, remember the New American Plate's rule of thumb: two-thirds plant food to one-third animal food.If you've switched to a healthier diet but are still having difficulty reaching a healthy weight, one factor to consider is portion size. Start by looking at your plate and analyzing how much you eat. Try this experiment: Measure out a regular portion of a favorite breakfast food. For instance, pour your usual portion of dry cereal into a bowl. Next, check the standard serving size chart, and measure out the standard serving size of your cereal. Compare the two bowls.Ask yourself this question: How many standard servings go into the portion I regularly eat? If you are concerned about your weight, consider decreasing the number of servings in your portion. Cut back gradually so you'll be less likely to notice the change. Even small reductions add up to substantial health benefits. Remember, maintaining the right proportion of plant foods to animal foods is important to your long-term health. So reduce the portion sizes on your plate, but maintain the "2/3 to 1/3" proportion. Also, exercise more. If you still do not see your weight gradually moving in a healthy direction, contact your doctor or a registered dietitian for a more individualized plan.

Whole wheat toast with a dab of peanut butter and banana slices. Instant oatmeal or whole-grain cereal sweetened with fresh fruit and lowfat milk or soy milk. Lowfat yogurt mixed with fresh fruit in a blender for a vitamin-rich smoothie. Fish, such as leftover salmon on a whole-grain bagel and reduced or non-fat cream cheese.A breakfast parfait of layered lowfat yogurt, fresh fruit and cereal and chopped nuts.Return to table of contents RecipesThe recipes that follow take varying times to prepare. Some, like the smoothies, are ready in a matter of minutes. Others, like the muffins, granola or vegetable pita pizza, can be prepared on a weekend and frozen. Then individual portions can be defrosted in the microwave for an instant breakfast. Still others, like the brown rice pudding or Italian breakfast strata, may best be saved for special occasions.

Dr. Brunet is identifying the signaling pathways affected by caloric restriction and influence tumor suppression and longevity, based on the hypothesis that caloric restriction activates AMP-activated protein kinase which in turn phosphorylates and increases the activity of the FOXO family of Forkhead transcription factors, which in turn inhibit cell growth and/or apoptosis.

Dr. Chan is determining whether EGCG, a major component of green tea, sensitizes ovarian cancer cells to cisplatin treatment by inhibiting detoxification of cisplatin through inactivation of AP-1 and NF-B pathways that could lead to the depletion of glutathione.

Dr. Bhattacharya is investigating the role of selenium on tumor blood vessel maturation, based on the hypothesis that pre-treatment with organoselenium compounds leads to tumor vessel maturation, that this maturation can be assessed non-invasively by functional magnetic resonance, and that it could result in improved drug delivery and therapeutic response.

Dr. Feldman is exploring whether soy enhances the anticancer activity of vitamin D and calcitriol against prostate cancer through inhibition of 24-hydroxylase (CYP24) and prostaglandins by suppressing expression of COX-2 in a mouse xenograft model.

In her study Dr. Demark-Wahnefried will investigate blood biomarkers in the participants of the Fresh Start Diet and exercise intervention program that is ongoing among cancer patients, and determine the extent to which the program leads to alteration in lipid profiles, insulin, IGF levels, and cytokine profiles.

It's important to remember that you need to request permission from AICR before you use the AICR name in promoting or holding your special fund raising event.It's also important to remember that it takes time to review, grant permission and provide support for special fund raising events. Please contact AICR early in the planning process. You'll find we can provide tips, ideas and even educational materials that can help make your event more successful.

Recognition in the event program is an easy way to raise money. If a printed program is being provided, local companies may want to buy space in the program. Individuals might also buy space for an Honorarium to a family member, friend, or coworker.

Local stores might also have access to vendors who may want to contribute to the event. A convenience store or supermarket might be able to help contact vendors to donate bottled water or snack items for the course, for example.

Download these samples below to help you plan your tournament. All of the files are in PDF format. You must have the free Adobe Acrobat Reader installed on your computer. You can download it FREE at the link provided below.

Contact local radio stations. Many radio stations are affiliated with other stations. Encourage them to pass the information along for additional publicity, and include in the announcement whom to contact in support of the event. You may receive interest from individuals wanting to golf, corporate or local sponsors, and/or individual donations.

Publicize before, during and after your event. Even if the media isnt able to cover the actual event, follow up after the event with stories and pictures that they might be willing to use. If youre planning an annual event, all of this publicity can help make the community more aware when next years event rolls around. You may also find that publicity during and right after an event can bring in additional donations in support of AICR, as well as offers from individuals, organizations or companies who want to be involved the next time the event is held.

Post on community boards. Posting your event on community bulletin boards in parks, community centers, shopping malls, offices, or places of worship is an easy way to publicize. You never know where youll attract potential participants or sponsors. Include contact numbers for those wanting additional information.

Program - If you provide programs for the event, the sponsors should be listed alphabetically, and by sponsorship levels. It is not recommended to list the dollar amounts that each sponsor contributed.

Course Management - Acknowledge the management at the course and any staff that helped to make the day possible, in the program and at the closing ceremony. If there is food provided, be sure to thank the chef and catering crew.

Again and Again- Volunteers should be acknowledged and thanked as well, both during the event in the program, at the closing ceremony, and after the event. If you have goodie bags for golfers, make sure to have extras for your volunteers.

In the study, scheduled for publication in the December 2004 issue of the Journal of Nutrition, rats fed a combination of tomatoes and broccoli had markedly less prostate tumor growth than rats who ate diets containing either food alone  and also less tumor growth than rats who ate diets containing specific cancer-fighting substances isolated from tomatoes and broccoli.

The fact that the study attempted to examine the effect of whole foods in combination  and not solely the isolated substances that have attracted attention as potential magic bullets  sets it apart. At a press conference, John W. Erdman, Ph.D., Professor of Food Science and Human Nutrition at the University of Illinois at Urbana, outlined the reasoning behind this new approach to nutrition science.

Lycopene is one natural substance that has been isolated from tomatoes that has attracted a great deal of attention in the last decade as a prostate cancer fighter. But in a study Erdman and his colleagues published last fall in the Journal of the National Cancer Institute, rats fed isolated lycopene were not afforded significant protection from prostate cancer. The same study showed that rats fed diets containing freeze-dried tomato powder had much greater prostate cancer survival.

Freeze-dried tomato powder is used in animal diets as a substitute for whole tomatoes, because it contains the full range of vitamins, minerals and phytochemicals that occur in tomatoes and is easier to feed.

Broccoli is another food recognized for its anti-cancer potential. It is known to contain substances called glucosinolates that break down into compounds that help enzymes flush carcinogens from the body before they can do any harm. But again, past research has shown that these substances work better when they act in concert with all of the other natural substances found in broccoli.

In Erdmans latest study, researchers examined how well lycopene alone suppressed the growth of prostate tumors in rats. They compared these results to the tumor-suppressing activity of tomato powder. In the same animal model, researchers fed diets containing broccoli powder, and, in still another group, a diet containing a combination of broccoli and tomato powder.

When the results were analyzed, the scientists were surprised to see that each type of diet they studied was better able to suppress prostate tumor growth than the drug. In the group that ate the combination tomato-broccoli diets, the average tumor weight was significantly lower than the control group and also lower than the broccoli, tomato and lycopene groups.

Pomegranates Culinary Jewels Made Easy children and vegetables cholesterol and eating on the run potassium DASH diet and snacks olive oil frozen waffles and stevia frozen dinners pedometers and fibrocystic breast disease lowcarb diets wraps and red grapefruit Picking Your Way Through the Buffet The Important Nutrient Potassium How Much Do We Know About Antioxidants?

According to a report issued by the International Agency for Research on Cancer, an agency of the World Health Organization, being overweight and inactive accounts for one-quarter to one-third of worldwide cases of breast cancer, colon cancer, endometrial cancer, kidney cancer and esophageal cancer.

Why is this an issue? If the body's cells are exposed to very high levels of these substances over an extended period of time, they tend to reproduce more quickly. This increases the chances that cancer can find a foothold.

As research continues, scientist will likely identify additional biological reasons that excess weight and inactivity increase risk. It is already clear, however, that diet, physical activity and weight management play key roles in cancer prevention.

Most of us know when we gain weight. Clothes no longer fit. The mirror becomes an irritating reminder, and the scale is permanently hidden under the bed. But its too easy to overlook these warning signs and remain in the dark about your health risks from overweight and obesity.

Fortunately, science offers two methods for assessing your body weight. While theyre not perfectly accurate, they both tell you whether, and how urgently, you need to take steps to control your weight and reduce your cancer risk.

Place a tape measure around your waist immediately above the tip of your hipbone.Measure your waist after exhaling.Determine your health risk. For women, a waist measurement of 35 inches or more indicates high risk. for men, a waist measurement of 40 inches or more indicates high risk.

We live in fattening times. Everything in our environment conspires to make us gain weight: inexpensive processed foods, modern conveniences that make physical exertion unnecessary and TV and computers that keep us inactive for long periods of time. If you consume just 100 calories more than you burn each day, youll put on a pound in a little more than a month, and almost 30 pounds in three years.

Remember the advice that many scientists give: Limit your weight gain during adulthood to 11 pounds. Several studies suggest that gaining more than 11 pounds (5 kg.) increases your risk for cancer and other chronic diseases.

The best strategy to manage your weight is to set a reasonable limit on weight gain by mentally adding 11 pounds to your current weight. Thats your limit. Youve drawn a line in the sand. Now promise yourself never to cross it. And keep that promise for life.

The Iowa Womens Health Study tracks 41,836 postmenopausal women who were between 55 and 69 when the study began back in 1986. They filled out a long questionnaire about their physical activity and researchers have kept track of their medical history.

The study is particularly interesting in that it examined the breast cancers among its participants according to receptor status (i.e., whether the tumors are sensitive to the presence of estrogen and/or progesterone, which can influence cancer growth).

The observed protective association was stronger among participants with BMIs of less than 25 (i.e. those who were not classified as overweight or obese). This makes sense, as excess weight is known to be a separate risk factor for colon cancer.

The idea that regular physical activity benefits overall health is nothing new. An indirect association between physical activity and cancer risk has also been hypothesized for some time, because regular physical activity has an important role in preventing obesity. Obesity has been shown to be a risk factor for several kinds of cancer.

But AICR urged food marketers not to see the recent spate of findings as license to promote exercise alone, without regard to portion size, value marketing and other issues that contribute to U.S. obesity.

Just two decades ago, the association between activity level and cancer risk was purely theoretical. Since then, the number of studies on the activity-cancer link published in peer-reviewed journals has roughly doubled every five years and that pace is now quickening, according to an AICR review of the literature.

Well over 100 studies tracking cancer rates and physical activity levels in human populations were published between 2001 and 2005. Over half of these appeared in the last two years. Visit www.aicr.org/activity to read an in-depth summary of the research.

Of the 56 studies conducted to date on physical activity and colorectal cancer, 48 demonstrated a reduction in cancer risk among the most physically active subjects. Of 51 studies on breast cancer and physical activity, 34 observed a reduction in risk among the most physically active subjects.

There have been 18 studies of the link between activity and endometrial cancer, and 14 of those found decreased risk to be associated with increased levels of physical activity. For prostate cancer, 18 out of 36 studies found reductions in risk among subjects who were most physically active. Physical activity as a risk factor has been examined in 15 studies of lung cancer, 10 of which found a risk reduction.

When the risk reductions observed in these studies are averaged together, the results are significant. Physical activity was associated with an overall 10 to 30 percent risk reduction for prostate cancer, a 30 to 40 percent risk reduction for breast, endometrial and lung cancer, and 40 to 50 percent risk reduction for colon cancer.

In addition to these epidemiological studies, a surge in basic laboratory research continues to reveal how physical activity alters hormone levels in the cellular environment in ways that discourage the cancer process.

Physical activity appears to lower levels of biologically available sex hormones, which could lead to decreased risk of hormone-related cancers, including cancers of the breast, endometrium, ovaries, prostate and testes. Physical activity may also increase the amount of substances that bind to these available sex hormones and keep them from adversely influencing the tissues at potential cancer sites.

Regular exercise also significantly lowers insulin levels, which may be associated with lower cancer risk. Exercise may also decrease cancer risk by interfering with the substances called insulin-like growth factors (IGFs), which target sensitive tissues and may promote the kind of uncontrolled growth that can spark the cancer process. How Much, How Often, and For How Long?

Moderate physical activity is defined as a level of effort at which a person experiences some increase in breathing or heart rate and burns 3.5 to 7 calories per minute. A healthy individual engages in moderate physical activity while walking briskly, moving the lawn, dancing, bicycling on level terrain, swimming, etc.

For some cancer sites, such as colon cancer, the level of activity that has been associated with significant reductions in risk is vigorous the individual experiences a large increase in breathing or heart rate (conversation is difficult or broken) and burns more than 7 calories per minute. Examples include jogging, bicycling uphill, swimming continuous laps, taking an aerobics class, etc.

Shapers of public health policy are reacting to the rapidly changing scientific landscape. The latest set of USDA Dietary Guidelines for Americans emphasize physical activity more strongly than in the past, and even the familiar Food Pyramid itself has been altered to show a figure climbing stairs.

Physical activity will also loom larger than ever an upcoming AICR Expert Panel Report examining risk factors for the disease, according to researchers involved in its preparation. In fact, the increased focus on activity level as cancer risk factor has precipitated the addition of the term Physical Activity to the reports title.

The document, now entitled Food, Nutrition,Physical Activity and the Prevention of Cancer: A Global Perspective will issue recommendations for individuals and policy makers based on a review of thousands of studies. It is scheduled for publication in 2007.

The food industry has also seized upon research on physical activity and disease risk. In the past six months, Kraft Foods Inc., the Kellogg Company and other leading food marketers have played up the role of exercise in advertising campaigns.

But the AICR researchers cautioned that physical activity is only part of a set of behaviors that protect against cancer and other diseases. According to Collins, recently stepped up efforts by food marketers to promote physical activity are welcome, but should be examined critically.

Dr. Chlebowski's study will determine whether a low-fat diet combined with an exercise program can reduce weight and increase insulin sensitivity in postmenopausal breast cancer patients, thus reducing the likelihood of cancer recurrence.

All AICR press materials, including these columns, are free for use in newspapers, magazines and other publications, and may be used without additional permission. Please credit the American Institute for Cancer Research as the source.

There are more than eight million cancer survivors in the United States.Cancer treatments have improved over the last twenty years. Many people go into remission; many become long-term survivors.Each cancer case is unique, but survival statistics are significant and helpful in planning treatment and looking at prognosis. Many localized cancers carry a prognosis for five-year survival of 90 percent or greater. For many cancers, five-year survivors are considered cured and have the same expected life span as others of their age and condition who never had cancer.

IntroductionThere has never been a time of greater hope in regard to cancer. Today, we know more about identifying and treating this disease than ever before. A diagnosis of cancer is no longer a reason to despair. Cancer patients now have a much better chance to overcome this disease and return to a full and active life. Treating cancer is not a job for the medical professional alone. If you or a loved one have been told you have cancer, regard the diagnosis as a reason to learn more, to take action and to be an active participant in defeating this disease. The American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) has developed the CancerResource program to help cancer patients, their families and friends gain an understanding of the disease, the treatment options and the various resources available. The materials in the CancerResource packet provide information to help you be an involved, active participant in fighting cancer. In addition to this CancerResource guide, AICR offers a brochure called Cancer InformationWhere to Find Help, a resource for locating and contacting organizations that provide cancer information, support or direct services. To order this publication, call AICR toll free at 1-800-843-8114.

Through a wide range of cancer education and research projects, AICR has helped millions of Americans learn more about cancer prevention. It has also received numerous requests for information about cancer and its treatment. Although AICRs primary focus is on prevention, it recognizes its responsibility to provide understandable, reliable information that can help individuals through the difficult period following a diagnosis of cancer.

When you or someone you care about is diagnosed with cancer, the first response may be one of confusion, anxiety and fear. Yet, at that moment, there are many important decisions concerning treatment and care that must be made, and often they must be made soon.

CancerResource can help those affected by cancer regain a sense of control at this crucial time. Decisions about treatment and care can become more manageable when individuals understand the disease and treatment options and know where to turn for additional information and assistance.

AICR developed CancerResource with the guidance of professionals, who have a variety of medical, research and educational expertise. CancerResource is not meant to be a comprehensive resource. What is presented here should not replace your physicians advice or information received from cancer treatment specialists. Rather, use CancerResource as a starting point to becoming better informed about cancer, what treatment options are available, and when and where to ask questions to get the information you need. You may choose to read CancerResource straight through or only turn to those areas of information of most interest to you.

CancerResource is an information resource, not a substitute for medical care. The American Institute for Cancer Research does not recommend any specific treatment. Treatment must be worked out for each individual patient by the health care team. The information that is given here is general and may not apply to your individual situation.

The American Institute for Cancer Research is the only national, major cancer organization focusing exclusively on diet, nutrition and cancer. Scientists have estimated that as many as 30 to 40 percent of all cancers are linked to dietary choices, and the National Cancer Institute currently estimates that as many as 35 percent of cancer deaths are diet related.

AICR has led the way in research and educational programs to help increase knowledge and understanding of the role diet plays in the cancer process, in the prevention of cancer and in its treatment. It has been a pioneer in encouraging research to help understand how dietary changes may be used to reduce cancer risk and to develop new nutritional means of treating cancer.

AICR was founded in 1982 with the dual mission of both supporting cancer research and providing educational programs for cancer prevention. It has been one of the largest funding sources for research in diet, nutrition and cancer. In addition, it has also been a national leader in public health education programs, which have helped millions of Americans make changes to lower cancer risk. AICR's educational efforts include a national newsletter, Nutrition Hotline, television and radio public service broadcasts, children's programs, cookbooks, syndicated newspaper columns, and numerous educational booklets and brochures.

All these emotions are natural reactions to a diagnosis of cancer. Most are temporary. Cancer experts recommend confronting these feelings directly, although methods and timetables will differ from person to person.

At first, denial can help soften the impact of the diagnosis and give you time to process the information. Denial can be a problem, however, if it keeps you from getting treatment. Most cancer patients are able to work through these feelings before they begin treatment.

Once you accept the diagnosis, anger may set in. You might ask yourself, "Why me?" Being angry at the disease or at healthy people you know could be a way of expressing other feelings, like fear or helplessness. Letting your feelings known can help you accept the diagnosis.

A cancer diagnosis frightens many people. It may be the fear of pain or dying, the physical effects and costs of treatment, or the burden it could place on your family. Not knowing what to expect can cause more fear than the facts. Learning as much as you can about your diagnosis and treatment may make you feel less afraid and more in control of the situation. Read through CancerResource for helpful information.

The stress that comes from learning of your diagnosis can cause a variety of physical symptoms, including a faster heart rate, headaches, trembling, loss of appetite and sleeping problems. Stress may also affect your immune system and how well your body fights disease. To help reduce stress and anxiety, try to exercise, listen to relaxing music, talk about your feelings, and keep involved in activities you enjoy. Counseling or joining a support group may also help.

Cancer patients may feel isolated when they dont feel like socializing or if friends stay away because of the diagnosis. If you are lonely or feel like no one you know understands what youre going through, try to get in touch with other cancer patients or a support group of people who are facing issues similar to yours. Ask your health care team for referrals or look through the AICR brochure "Cancer InformationWhere to Find Help" for information on finding an appropriate support group.

You may feel depressed about a cancer diagnosis. If symptoms become more serious, like strong feelings of sadness and despair, helplessness, and loss of interest or ability to do activities that were a normal part of your life, then let your doctor know, so you can get appropriate help or treatment.

Once the shock of a cancer diagnosis passes, most people are able to look forward with a feeling of hope. Since each cancer case is unique, it is not possible to exactly predict the outcome of your cancer. However, improved treatment methods and knowing that so many cancer survivors are leading full, productive lives may help you and your family feel more optimistic about the future.

Handling Family Issues"I'm so concerned about how my family will handle this cancer diagnosis."A diagnosis of cancer can present new challenges and stresses for many families. Adjusting to new roles and responsibilities can cause upheavals in the way family members interact. Children may need special attention and guidance at times of disruption in their routine. They need to know that nothing they said or thought caused you to get cancer and that their help and support means so much to you and the family. Sharing your feelings and needs with your spouse or partner is also very important.

If family members are unable to help each other or are having difficulty adjusting to the diagnosis, check with your physician, hospital social services department or library for referrals to local support and service organizations that can help you cope with the emotional stresses of the disease.Finding Emotional Support"My friends and family were just so helpful." People with cancer and their families often find a great deal of help and support by making contact with others who are in similar circumstances. Cancer support groups can be a wonderful source of strength, hope and practical ideas for everyday life. Attending a support group can give needed structure and focus to your week, as well as emotional support from individuals who can empathize with you.

Some patients find that the support of the medical social worker in a local hospital, local mental health or health care facility is invaluable. For others, it might be a member of the doctor's staff, a relative who has experienced cancer therapy or a neighbor who can run a few errands if you're feeling tired. Resource Note: For additional resources read our brochure Cancer Information: Where To Find Help. This provides a listing various sources of cancer information and assistance. Including a number of national organizations who may be able to offer additional assistance on finding local support and service organizations, either through their own local branches or other groups in your local area.

Working with Your Physician and Health Care Team"The kindness and patience of my doctor was invaluable to me... My questions were answered, sometimes two or three times when I was too anxious to actually hear what he was saying." One of the most important considerations in the treatment of your cancer is deciding on a doctor. You can find a board-certified oncologist, or cancer specialist, by asking your primary care physician, managed-care representative, or contacting the oncology department at the hospital. Besides experience, there are other qualities that your doctor should have, which may require a little more research on your part.

You must feel that your oncologist is competent and up-to-date, and that he sees you as a partner in your cancer treatment. Your doctor should be willing to listen to your concerns, offer support, and explain treatment options and side effects in language that you understand.

It is important to include your primary care physician in decisions about your treatment and medical care. Think of your primary care physician as your gatekeeper, the doctor who has good knowledge about your overall health and who can refer you to other health professionals, when needed. Other members of the health care team, such as the nurse, dietitian, physical therapist, radiation therapist, and social worker are also excellent sources of information and explanations for various aspects of your treatment. So be sure to ask questions.

It is very common to feel anxious when initially visiting an oncologist. One way to remove some of the anxiety of a first visit is to bring a list of questions with you. Paper and pencil or a tape recorder may also help, so you can remember the answers given.

You might want to bring a family member or close friend with you for support, especially if you are feeling overwhelmed or upset. Some individuals, however, feel more comfortable speaking privately with the doctor. A good compromise may be for the friend to accompany you, but remain in the waiting room while you are with the doctor.

Good communication is critical to a doctor-patient relationship. Your initial meeting will help you gauge how comfortable you feel with this particular doctor. If your interaction is not satisfactory, you may want to seek another referral from your primary care physician, or you can call the oncology department of your local hospital for a list of names of local oncologists who treat your type of cancer.

A second opinion can give you confidence in the information and recommendations you have already obtained, or it may offer a different approach to treatment. If the second physician disagrees with the initial consultation, you may even want to seek a third opinion. The important thing is that you receive the best state-of-the-art diagnostic tests and treatment, and that you have confidence in the care you are receiving.

You may ask your primary care physician for a referral for a second opinion, or you can ask the oncologist that you have already seen. You should not be uncomfortable asking for this referral. Many physicians welcome the additional input and reassurance provided by a second opinion. It is your right as a patient to obtain this information. If this request is met with resistance, give some extra thought to whether you wish to continue with this doctor.

For many cancer patients, the first few days and weeks following a diagnosis of cancer are filled with a blur of appointments, tests and new information, often in a language that isn't quite clear. No one can be expected to remember everything the first time around. Your nurses and physicians know this and should encourage you to continue asking questions even the same questions two or three times.

Theres no need to feel embarrassed if you dont understand the medical terminology being used. Ask to have the information explained in simpler language, and paraphrase the answers to make sure theyre clear to you. This information will affect important treatment and care decisions youll have to make. Being an involved, active participant in your treatment means asking questions to get the answers you need for those decisions.

Modern medicine has developed several methods of treating cancer. The most common are surgery, radiation therapy, and chemotherapy. Other cancer treatments include hormone and investigational therapies. Complementary/alternative medicine (sometimes referred to as "integrative medicine") is becoming more integrated into mainstream medicine.

There is no "best" method of treating cancer. In deciding on a specific type of treatment, the physician must consider a number of factors, including the type, stage, and location of the cancer, as well as the health and age of the patient.

It is very clear, based on the scientific literature, what should be done to treat your cancer. In many cases, clinical practice guidelines will direct your doctor to use these established practices.It is not clear what to do, but there are several promising alternatives (e.g,. radiation vs. surgery). Your doctor will have a balanced discussion with you about the various options. You will be asked your preferences based on your cancer and your lifestyle.It may be unclear what treatment to use. In this case you may wish to participate in a clinical trial of a promising new treatment.

A combination of treatments is commonly used to treat a specific cancer. Regardless of the type of treatment, the goal is the same to stop the uncontrolled growth of the cancer cells. Surgery does this by attempting to remove all the cancer cells. Radiation and chemotherapy work by destroying the cancer cells.

Your physician should be willing to discuss each of the treatment options or combination of treatment options under consideration, including the advantages and disadvantages, and complications or side effects of each type of treatment.

Cancer cells can spread by traveling through the bloodstream or the lymphatic system, which carries lymph fluid through the body. Surgeons often remove lymph nodes that are near the tumor to see if they contain cancer cells. This information contributes to treatment decisions. The location and extent of surgery determine the long- and short-term side effects.

Radiation therapy may be used before surgery to shrink the tumor or after surgery to destroy any cancer cells that may remain in the area. Most often, the radiation is delivered as a series of treatments using a machine that directs high-energy rays at the cancer. In some cases, however, radioactive material may be implanted at the tumor site to give continuous treatment over a period of time.

Even though radiation therapy is directed only to the area where treatment is needed, it can cause side effects. Most of the side effects are not permanent. The most common side effects of radiation therapy are fatigue, skin rashes or redness in the area being treated, reduced appetite and gastrointestinal upset. In some cases, radiation therapy may cause a decrease in the type of blood cells that help protect the body against infection, bleeding and anemia.

Chemotherapy, or treatment with anti-cancer drugs, is used to destroy cancer cells by disrupting their ability to grow and multiply. The type and stage of cancer determines which drugs are used, and often more than one drug is used during a single course of treatment.

Chemotherapy drugs poison the cancer cells. That action, as well as the toxic effect they may have on some normal, healthy cells can produce a wide range of temporary side effects. The most common side effects of chemotherapy include nausea and vomiting, hair loss, loss of appetite and fatigue. Other side effects include an increased chance of infection, bleeding and anemia.

Some types of cancer depend on hormones for their growth, while other types of cancer may be suppressed by high doses of hormones. For these reasons, doctors may recommend therapy that either prevents cancer cells from getting the hormones they need to grow, or supplies amounts of hormones that limit the growth of cancer cells.

Hormone therapy is most commonly used to treat cancers of the breast, prostate and other hormone-responsive tissues. Drugs may be used to block the body's production of hormones, or surgery is performed to remove hormone-producing organs.

Hormone therapy can cause a number of side effects, depending on the specific drug or surgical procedure. In some cases, the treatment interferes with the body's normal production or use of hormones. For example, women taking tamoxifen may experience some symptoms of menopause, such as hot flashes. Patients may have nausea and vomiting, swelling and weight gain. Since some hormones cause an increase in appetite, they are occasionally prescribed for this purpose.

Investigational therapies are new treatment approaches that are being tested in clinical trials. There is not yet sufficient data to make the therapy a standard method of treatment. Biological therapy and gene therapy are considered investigational therapies.

Biological therapy (sometimes called immunotherapy or biological response modifier therapy) uses the bodys immune system to fight cancer or to lessen some of the side effects of cancer treatment. This therapy may suppress or alter cancer cell growth, boost the killing power of immune system cells, or enhance the bodys ability to repair or replace normal cells damaged by other cancer treatments. Examples of biological therapy include interferon, interleukin-2, monoclonal antibodies, colony-stimulating factors, and vaccines.

Cancer vaccines are a form of biological therapy with potential to encourage the immune system to recognize cancer cells. They may help the body reject tumors and prevent them from recurring. Unlike other types of vaccines, cancer vaccines are injected after the disease is diagnosed. They are being studied for their possible use with other biological therapies and as a treatment for melanoma and many other types of cancers.

The side effects and severity of biological therapy depend on the type of treatment. It may cause flu-like symptoms, including fever, chills, nausea, vomiting and fatigue. Muscle aches and rashes at the site of injection may occur. Interleukin-2, in high doses, can have more severe side effects and is usually administered in the hospital where the patient is closely monitored.

Initiated in the 1990's, gene therapy replaces an active cancer-causing gene, or oncogene, with a normal gene. It might also involve removing bone marrow from a cancer patient, inserting a "designer" gene, and then returning bone marrow to the patient.

Researchers use clinical trials to find out whether investigational therapies are safe and effective. These carefully controlled studies often compare the new therapy with standard treatment methods. In a clinical trial, some participants are given the best known treatment along with the investigational therapy, and some are given the best known treatment alone. This is at minimal or no cost to patients. The participants are randomized by chance to determine who will receive the investigational therapy and who will not. Sometimes the investigational therapy is not helpful, but other times it can lead to significant improvements in treatment and quality of life.

Complementary/alternative medicine (CAM) can be described as diagnosis, treatment and/or prevention that complements mainstream medicine by contributing to a common whole, by satisfying a demand not met by orthodoxy or by diversifying the conceptual frameworks of medicine. CAM is now also referred to as "integrative medicine."

While certain complementary/alternative therapies for cancer may appear to help some people, scientific evidence proving their effectiveness is often lacking. If you are already using or want to try complementary therapies, it is important to tell your doctor what you are doing. Some of these therapies may be harmful or may interfere with conventional treatments. There is often little information available about how herbal therapies and supplements interact with prescription drugs. In addition, many botanicals and herbals are poorly standardized, so it is not known exactly what is in them and in what amounts.

Most methods of treating cancer are associated with side effects. Treatments that destroy or limit the growth of cancer cells may also damage healthy cells and tissues, producing unpleasant side effects.

The range of side effects depends on the type of treatment and how the person reacts to it. Ask your doctor about the side effects you might expect from a specific treatment method. Realize, though, that it is not possible to predict exactly what the type and extent of the side effects might be for you. Indeed, there may be no side effects at all, or only very limited ones.

Not everyone is affected the same way. The side effects you experience may be very mild. This does not mean that the treatment is not working.There are often ways to control and limit the severity of side effects. Speak with your physician about reactions and problems related to your treatment.Side effects are usually only temporary--as the treatment ends, so will the side effects.Enduring side effects for a short time is worth the potential benefit of effective treatment.

Hair loss, a side effect of chemotherapy, is a concern for many patients. Some drugs may cause the hair to thin out, while others may cause the loss of all body hair. Deciding how to handle the situation before starting treatment may help. You may want to check the phone book for shops that sell wigs, hair pieces, or turbans, or for hair replacement centers that have experience in servicing people with cancer. Fortunately, the hair loss is only temporary. It usually returns after an interval when treatment has been stopped or completed.

Fatigue occurs in many people with cancer, especially in those actively receiving treatment. Cancer itself may cause fatigue by interfering with normal body processes. Cancer treatment may cause fatigue because extra energy is needed to repair tissues damaged by radiation or chemotherapy. Fatigue during treatment does not mean a person's cancer is getting worse.

Dehydration is a frequent cause of fatigue, so be sure to drink plenty of fluids, especially water. In many instances, the fatigue has no clear cause, but in some cases it may be a symptom of depression.

Eat well. Choose a variety of healthful foods every day. To help keep your energy level up, try to eat several smaller meals and healthful snacks instead of three larger meals throughout the day.Get adequate sleep and rest. Short naps may help restore energy during the day, while long naps may make it difficult to sleep at night.Conserve your energy. Set priorities, take rest breaks, and arrange your home so items used the most are close by. Sit whenever possible, use proper body positions when lifting or carrying objects, and let other people help you.Work wisely. Talk with family, friends, coworkers and your supervisor about your fatigue. Schedule tasks that require the most attention for times of the day when you have the most energy. Trade more fatiguing duties and use energy-saving appliances and services.Keep active. Plan some light activity into each day, possibly with other people. A simple exercise program that includes both strength training and cardiovascular exercise can help you feel more energetic during the day and sleep better at night. Speak to your doctor before beginning an exercise program.Reduce stress. For example, listen to relaxation tapes or soothing music. Get a massage, meditate, get involved in a hobby, take warm baths. Laugh with family and friends.Think positively. Focus on healing and recovery. Set realistic goals for yourself and be patient in reaching them. Participate in social activities. Reward your progress, and keep looking ahead.

Eating well can help you feel better and stronger. It helps you better cope with side effects and recuperate faster after treatment. People who are well nourished may even be able to handle higher doses of certain treatments.

Generally, a diet for cancer patients should provide enough calories and protein, as well as vitamins and minerals. This helps to maintain your strength, prevent body tissues from breaking down, and rebuild tissues that cancer and its treatment may harm.

When you are unable to eat enough food or the right kind of food, your body uses stored nutrients as a source of energy. This may weaken your bodys natural defenses and its ability to fight infection or other bodily stresses.

Its important to drink plenty of fluids, especially if you dont feel like eating much. Keep a glass of water, fruit juice or vegetable juice within easy reach throughout the day. You can drink carbonated beverages, if you prefer, but remember that they may give you symptoms of gas, make you feel full and reduce your desire for food. Try to limit caffeine-containing beverages, since they may keep you from getting your needed rest.

To help meet calorie and nutrient needs, eating several small meals throughout the day may work better than eating three large meals. A commercial nutritional supplement, like a drink or shake, might be recommended by your doctor or dietitian if poor appetite or side effects of treatment make eating difficult. Supplements are available in cans, as a powder, or as pudding. They are tasty chilled and come in a variety of flavors. Liquid nutritional supplements are found in most pharmacies and supermarkets, or can be special-ordered by your pharmacist. Discuss supplement choices with your physician and registered dietitian.

When the gastrointestinal tract is not working effectively, total parenteral nutrition (TPN) may be used. This process involves feeding nutrients directly into a vein. TPN is costly and may have side effects. Therefore, before resorting to TPN, your doctor will want to explore all the available options of enteral activities, including feeding by mouth or with a tube.

Cancer treatment may affect your ability to digest, absorb and use food. If a form of cancer treatment is causing dietary side effects, discuss it with your doctor and health care team. There may be ways to ease the problem, such as changing treatment levels or drugs. A registered dietitian may also have some eating suggestions to help minimize the side effects.

Cancer treatment can cause tooth decay and other problems for your teeth and gums. Changes in eating habits may add to the problem. If you eat often or eat a lot of sweets, you may need to brush your teeth more often.

See your dentist before starting treatment, especially if you have a history of tooth or gum problems. This may help prevent infection or other problems later on.Use a soft toothbrush. If your gums are very sensitive, clean your teeth with cotton swabs or mouth swabs made especially for teeth cleaning.Rinse your mouth with warm water when your mouth and gums are sore. Also rinse your mouth if you have been vomiting to get rid of any acid remaining on your teeth.If you are not having trouble with poor appetite or weight loss, limit the amount of sugar in your diet. Also, cut down on foods that stick to the teeth such as caramels, dried fruits, seeds and chewy candy bars. Try to brush or rinse your mouth after each meal or snack. See your dentist regularly. Patients who are receiving treatment that affects the mouth (e.g., radiation to the head and neck) may need to see the dentist more often than usual.

Nausea, with or without vomiting, may occur as a side effect of cancer surgery, chemotherapy, radiation therapy, biological therapy, and of some medications used for pain. The cancer itself, or other conditions unrelated to your cancer or treatment, may also cause nausea. Nausea can keep you from getting enough food and needed nutrients. Here are some helpful suggestions.

Eat small amounts often and slowly.Avoid eating in a room that's stuffy or too warm, or has cooking odors or smells that might disagree with you.Drink fewer liquids with meals; drinking liquids can cause you to feel full and bloated.Sip liquids throughout the day, except at mealtimes. Using a straw may help.Drink beverages cool or chilled. Try freezing favorite beverages in ice cube trays.Eat foods at room temperature or cooler; hot foods may add to nausea.Dont force yourself to eat favorite foods when you are nauseated; it may cause you to develop a permanent dislike of those foods.Always sit upright when eating.Rest after meals since activity may slow digestion. Rest sitting up, for about an hour after meals.If you feel nauseated in the morning, try dry toast or crackers before getting up.Wear comfortable, loose-fitting clothes.Avoid eating for one or two hours before radiation therapy or chemotherapy, if nausea occurs during treatment.Try to keep track of when your nausea occurs and what is causing it (specific foods, events, surroundings). A small notebook can serve as a food diary to record the circumstances associated with the nausea. If possible, make appropriate changes in your diet or schedule. Share this information with your doctor, nurse or registered dietitian.Many people undergoing cancer treatment feel best in the mornings. There is nothing wrong with having your major meal at that time.Ask your doctor about anti-nausea medications.

Do not drink or eat until you have the vomiting under control.Sit upright for a period of time after vomiting.Once you have controlled the vomiting, try small amounts of clear liquids, such as cranberry juice, flat ginger ale or cool broth. Begin with one teaspoon every 10 minutes, gradually increase to one tablespoon every 20 minutes, then try 2 tablespoons every 30 minutes.When you are able to keep down clear liquids, try a "full-liquid" diet that may include cream of wheat, pudding, ice cream or frozen yogurt, broth, gelatin and milk. Continue to take small amounts as often as you can keep them down. If you feel okay on a full-liquid diet, gradually work your way up to your regular diet. Carbonated beverages are fine for some people, but others find the beverages make them feel full or bloated, or cause burping, which can stimulate vomiting.

Diarrhea may be caused by chemotherapy, radiation therapy to the abdomen, infection, food sensitivity and emotional upset. Long-term or severe diarrhea may cause dehydration and other health problems, since needed water and nutrients are lost. Contact your doctor if the diarrhea is persistent.

Avoid dairy products if they increase indigestion and diarrhea. (Many liquid nutritional supplements are milk free and are available in a variety of flavors.)Eat small amounts of food and liquids throughout the day.Drink plenty of liquids, such as water, diluted cranberry juice, broth, decaffeinated coffee or tea. Drinking fluids is important because your body may not get enough water when you have diarrhea.Drink liquids that are at room temperature. Avoid very hot or very cold foods.Eat plenty of foods and liquids that contain sodium and potassium. These minerals are often lost during diarrhea. Foods high in potassium that don't cause diarrhea include bananas, peach and apricot nectar and boiled or mashed potatoes. Good liquid choices include bouillon or fat-free broth.Try a clear liquid diet during the first 12 to 24 hours of onset.

Drink plenty of liquids (at least eight glasses per day) to help keep your stools soft. A daily four-ounce serving of prune juice may also be helpful.Take a hot drink about one half hour before your usual time for a bowel movement.Try high-fiber foods, including whole grains, fresh vegetables and fruits. For example, choose whole wheat bread, cauliflower, carrots, potatoes with skin, bananas, prunes, oranges and berries.Add unprocessed wheat bran to foods such as casseroles and hot cereals.Get some exercise, such as walking, every day. Speak with to your doctor or physical therapist about the amount and type of exercise that is right for you.If none of these suggestions works, ask your doctor about fiber supplements, like Metamucil, or medicine to ease constipation. Drink plenty of fluids, as indicated in the directions for use. Be sure to check with your doctor before adding fiber or taking any laxatives or stool softeners.

Chemotherapy and radiation therapy in the head or neck area - which can reduce the flow of saliva - often cause dry mouth. When this happens, it is hard to chew and swallow. Dry mouth can also change the way foods taste. To reduce problems caused by dry mouth, try the suggestions below, as well as the ideas given for a sore mouth or throat.

Avoid salty foods.Try tart foods and beverages, such as lemonade. These foods may help your mouth produce more saliva. Melon may also help.Suck on hard candy such as lemon drops, eat popsicles, or chew sugar-free gum.Keep your lips moist with lip salves.Use sauces, gravies and salad dressings to make food moist and easier to swallow.Try thick drinks, such as fruit nectars, at room temperature or cold.Have a sip of water every few minutes, to help you swallow and talk more easily.Maintain good oral hygiene.If your dry mouth problem is severe, ask your doctor or dentist about products that coat and protect your mouth. Synthetic saliva products, such as Glandosane, Optimoist, Moistin or Mouthkote, may help.

Take deep breaths before attempting to swallow, and exhale or cough after swallowing.Thick liquids may be easier to swallow than thin liquids. Gelatin may be easier to swallow than thick or thin liquids.Mashed foods should not be too thick.Drink your fluids between, rather than during, meals since they may reduce your appetite. Liquids at room temperature may be easier to swallow.

Chemotherapy, radiation therapy, or the cancer itself may cause your sense of taste to change. Some patients complain of a bitter, metallic taste, especially when eating foods high in protein. Each person's sense of taste may be affected differently. You will need to learn which foods, if any, taste differently to you.

Depending on how your taste has been affected, some of the following ideas for improving flavor may work better than others. In addition, visit your dentist to check for dental problems that may affect your food's taste.

Choose and prepare foods that look and smell good to you.If red meat tastes different, use chicken, turkey, eggs, dairy products, tofu or fish that doesn't have a strong smell.Make meat, chicken or fish more flavorful by marinating it in sweet fruit juices, sweet wine or Italian dressing.Try using small amounts of flavorful seasonings such as basil, rosemary or oregano.Try tart foods that may have more taste, such as oranges or lemonade. A tart lemon custard might be tasty and will also provide needed protein and calories.Serve foods at room temperature.Try using onion, garlic and other seasonings to add flavor to vegetables.Maintain good oral hygiene.Drink liquids throughout the day.

Weight loss can occur during cancer treatment. It is often caused by the effects of cancer on the body and its interference with eating, digestion, or absorption of food. Weight loss can also be caused by loss of appetite from cancer therapy or feelings of depression or anxiety.

Involve yourself in as many normal activities as possible.Stay calm, especially at mealtimes. Don't hurry your meals.Try changing the time, place and surroundings of meals. A candlelight dinner can make mealtime more appealing. Eat with others, or listen to your favorite music.Eat whenever you are hungry. You do not need to eat three meals a day; try several smaller meals throughout the day.If you are losing weight, eat food often during the day, even at bedtime. Have nutritious snacks available, but store them out of sight.Add variety to your menu by using new recipes, spices and food products. Eat out in restaurants occasionally.Ask your dietitian to help you with meal planning for adequate nutrient intake.

Weight gain may be an unexpected occurrence during cancer treatment. Sometimes this is due to hormonal changes. Excessive portion sizes or eating too many foods high in calories and fat can also increase weight. Sometimes patients feel less nauseated or anxious when they have food in their mouths. Discuss your weight gain with your physician or registered dietitian to determine the best way to achieve a healthy weight. This is important because excess weight gain may worsen prognosis for certain cancers, such as breast cancer.

Sometimes patients gain excess weight during treatment without eating extra calories. For example, certain drugs (such as prednisone) can cause the body to retain fluid. The extra weight is from water and does not mean you are eating too much.

DO NOT go on a diet if you notice weight gain. Instead, tell your doctor so you can find out what may be causing this change. If anticancer drugs are causing the weight gain, your doctor may recommend limiting the salt you eat, since salt causes your body to hold onto water. Drugs called diuretics also may be prescribed to get rid of the extra fluid.

If you were able to digest milk and milk products easily before you began your radiation or chemotherapy treatment, but now develop cramps and diarrhea after you drink milk or eat certain dairy foods, then you may be suffering from lactose intolerance. The cancer therapy may have temporarily inactivated the enzymes in your intestinal tract that digest the milk sugar called lactose.

Avoid milk or dairy products that give you problems. Yogurt and small amounts of aged cheeses may be easier to tolerate.If you are concerned about not getting enough calcium in your diet, try calcium-fortified orange or apple juice, and calcium-fortified cereals and breads. Ask your doctor or dietitian about taking calcium supplements.Try one of the enzyme products, such as LactAid or Lactinex, which helps break down the lactose. Some products can be taken in pill form, others are added directly to milk. Or try reduced- lactose milk, such as LactAid milk.

"Will my insurance cover cancer treatment?"People who had health and life insurance before treatment generally are able to keep it, although costs and benefits may change. Review your insurance policies to find out exactly what your coverage includes. Talk to your insurance provider to make sure you understand the extent of your coverage and its limitations. Also check your disability insurance or benefits to see if you are eligible to maintain your income during times when you may not be able to work.

It is very important that you keep careful records of all your covered expenses and claims. If a claim is turned down, you do not have to simply accept it. Ask your doctor to explain to the company why the services meet the requirements for coverage under your policy. If you are turned down again, find out if the company has an appeals process.

Cost and extended payment options may be negotiated with health care providers.Medicare offers coverage to people 65 or older and to those who are permanently disabled, after two years of collecting disability payments.Medicaid covers people who are in low-income brackets.The U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs (VA) may be able to help with health care costs if a cancer patient or spouse is, or has been, a member of the Armed Forces. Any VA health care facility can provide information about these programs.The Federal Government's Civilian Health and Medical Programs of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) helps pay for civilian medical care for spouses and children of active duty Uniformed Services personnel, retired Uniformed Services personnel and their spouses and children, and spouses and children of active duty or retired active duty personnel who have died. For further information, contact the Information Office of CHAMPUS, Aurora, CO 80045.If you want to apply for a new policy, health maintenance organizations often have open enrollment periods when you may be accepted regardless of your history.You may be eligible for group insurance through a professional, fraternal or political organization to which you belong.

Cancer and cancer treatment require careful financial planning, whether or not there is health insurance to cover some of the costs. The financial burdens of cancer are much more difficult for someone with no health insurance, but a lack of insurance should not mean a lack of competent medical care and treatment.

If you do not have health insurance, you will usually be expected to use as much of your own assets as possible to pay for your care and treatment. There may be other sources of financial assistance available, as your own assets become limited. Discuss this with your social worker.

The federally backed Medicaid program provides health coverage for the elderly and for people with no insurance and limited means. Your local or state office of social services (or welfare office) can supply information on eligibility and coverage. Requirements vary from state to state, so be sure to check the current regulations for your state of residence. In most cases, Medicaid covers direct medical costs, as well as home health care, when needed.

Some hospitals are required to provide treatment for needy patients under special federal aid construction programs. Speak with your physician, your local social services or welfare office, and your hospital's social worker to see what help may be available.

At different stages of your cancer treatment, you may want to use the services of a home health care agency. Home health care agencies provide home visits by registered nurses to check on wound healing after surgery, to administer intravenous (IV) antibiotics or chemotherapy, or to monitor your condition between visits to your doctor. Some also can provide physical therapists to help with your recovery, or trained aides who can help with your personal care.

Health insurance coverage varies for these services, so it is important to find out exactly what your health insurance will pay for. Also, be sure to ask the agency a few key questions: the qualifications of its staff and whether they are bonded and insured; whether there is a minimum number of visits; whether they offer discounts for multiple visits; and the amount of notice required to have someone at the home.

If your health insurance is limited or does not cover this type of assistance, check with your local or state social services office to find out if you are eligible for state programs providing such assistance. In addition to medical assistance, there may be special programs in your area, such as Meals on Wheels, to help with the challenges of everyday living during the times when you may need it. Your local social services or welfare office, or your hospital social worker, should be able to provide information about these services and how to apply for them.

As you or your loved one begins treatment, you may find yourself on an emotional roller coaster. Hope for a cure, joy at each success, and a determination to get life back to normal, alternate with fear that treatment will fail, frustration at physical limitations, and sadness when treatment brings changes in physical appearance. Powerful anticancer drugs, radiation therapy, surgery, biological therapy and hormone therapy sometimes cause unpleasant side effects that may lead to irritability and depression.

As cancer treatment ends, your appetite and interest in food should start to come back. At first, you may wish to eat five small meals per day, rather than three larger ones. For example, whole grain cereal, lowfat milk and a sliced banana may be all you can manage first thing in the morning. A snack of toast, peanut butter and chilled orange juice may be appealing midmorning.

Add favorite foods that you enjoyed prior to treatment to your meals and snacks. For instance, enjoy a slice of apple pie as an evening snack. Buy ruby red strawberries and slice them over a bowl of cereal or yogurt. Enjoy fresh salmon? Look for sales and bake the salmon with a bit of olive oil or poach with chopped fresh herbs.

If you are concerned that you will eat TOO much and gain undesired weight, then monitor your weight weekly. If you are taking an ongoing medication that can lead to weight gain, be careful to select nutritious, low-calorie foods. Discuss any weight gain or weight loss concerns with your physician and registered dietitian, both during and after treatment.

What about vitamin and mineral supplements? First, try to eat a variety of foods to get the nutrients your body needs. There is no scientific evidence that dietary supplements or herbal products can cure cancer or prevent it from coming back. Speak with your doctor before taking any supplements on your own. In general, if you add a supplement, choose one that contains no more than 100 percent of the Daily Value of vitamins and minerals in a daily dose.

Sometimes a diagnosis of cancer leads to a reexamination of lifestyle habits, including diet and exercise, in order to improve the quality of life. Healthier lifestyle practices, along with the assistance of family, friends and outside support groups, can make the coping process easier. It can also increase your feeling of well-being.

During cancer treatment, it is important to make your body stronger. Inadequate nutrition, excessive drinking, smoking, and not getting enough rest make it more difficult for your body's immune system to fight the disease. This makes it harder for your body to handle cancer treatment and to recover after treatment.

Once your treatment is over, it would seem prudent to try the following action steps developed by the American Institute for Cancer Research. AICR recommends these six guidelines to decrease the risk of cancer. They will also help decrease risk of recurrence.

"How will I be treated by my coworkers?" Having cancer can affect your job situation in various ways. You may need to take some time off or change jobs, or limit your work hours during treatment. Most employers want to retain good workers and will rearrange your work schedule to fit your needs. If you feel well enough to work during treatment, then you should go ahead and work.

If youve been away from your job for awhile, going back to work can be an important, but stressful, milestone. Coworkers may be uncomfortable about how they should act around you; some may be overly solicitous, while others may avoid you. Some may even think, mistakenly, that cancer is contagious.

Plan to deal openly about your cancer in a way that feels most comfortable to you. If your coworkers' attitudes are making it hard for you to work, try to resolve the situation informally with the people involved. If that doesnt work, your manager or employee relations department may be able to help.

If you feel that your employer has unfairly discharged you or changed your work assignments, hours, salary, or benefits, or has limited your opportunities or responsibilities because of the cancer, you may be protected by law. Laws in many states, as well as the Federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 and the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, can be invoked to prevent discrimination.

You may experience various emotions as you return to life after treatment. For example, you may feel upset or anxious when treatment is over, especially if you have been treated regularly for a lengthy period of time. Fear of recurrence is common, and the anniversary of the diagnosis can be emotional. You may wish to have family or friends close by at that time.

Keep in mind that millions of Americans have been successfully treated for cancer and have gone on to enjoy full and rewarding lives. Yet, for many, there is not just the physical recovery from cancer treatment to contend with, but the emotional recovery that having cancer can place on a person. Today, there are numerous support groups available that work not only with cancer patients, but with cancer survivors, to help them return to a normal, fulfilling life.

Understanding the terminology of medical treatment is often confusing and frustrating to patients. Yet, specialized medical terminology allows doctors and health professionals to be precise in communicating important information about the health and care of their patients. It is also a language they feel comfortable communicating in, and which they sometimes forget is not completely understood by others.

The following glossary defines some of the basic terms associated with cancer and cancer care. Remember, your health care providers are there to help you. If you don't understand what is being said, ask them to explain it in simpler terms. Adenocarcinoma - A cancer that develops in gland-forming tissue. Most breast cancers are adenocarcinomas. (See Carcinoma). Adjuvant therapy - Anticancer drugs or hormones given after surgery and/or radiation to help prevent the cancer from recurring.Alternative Medicine - Diagnosis, treatment and/or prevention which complements mainstream medicine by contributing to a common whole, by satisfying a demand not met by orthodoxy or by diversifying the conceptual framework of medicine.Anemia - Having too few red blood cells. Symptoms of anemia include feeling tired, weak, and short of breath. Benign - A term used to describe a tumor that is not cancerous. Biological therapy - Treatment to stimulate or restore the ability of the immune system to fight infection and disease. Also used to lessen the side effects of some cancer treatments. Includes the use of interferon, interleukins, monoclonal antibodies, colony-stimulating factors, and vaccines. Also called immunotherapy or biological response modifier therapy. Biopsy - The removal of a sample of tissue or cells for examination under a microscope for purposes of diagnosis. Bone marrow - The inner, spongy tissue of bones where blood cells are made. Botanicals - Foods and supplements derived from any plant part, including the seeds, flowers, fruits, roots, leaves and stems. Used to treat diseases or improve health. Cancer - A general name for more than 100 diseases in which abnormal cells grow out of control; a malignant tumor.Carcinogen - Any substance that causes cancer in animals or humans. Carcinoma - Cancer that begins in epithelial tissues, which line or cover the surfaces of organs, glands and other body structures. Most cancers in humans are carcinomas. (See Adenocarcinoma). Carcinoma in situ - Cancer that is confined to the cells where it began, and has not spread into surrounding tissues. Chemotherapy - The use of drugs to treat cancer. Clinical trials - Medical research studies conducted with volunteers. Each study is designed to answer specific scientific questions and to find better ways to prevent or treat cancer. Complementary Medicine - Diagnosis, treatment and/or prevention which complements mainstream medicine by contributing to a common whole, by satisfying a demand not met by orthodoxy or by diversifying the conceptual frameworks of medicine. Diet - Food and drink regularly consumed for nourishment.Dietary Supplement - A product (other than tobacco) intended to supplement the diet that bears or contains one of more of the following dietary ingredients: a vitamin, mineral, amino acid, herb or other botanical; intended for ingestion in the form of a capsule, powder, softgel or gelcap, and not represented as a conventional food or as a sole item of a meal or the diet. Enteral feeding - Nutrients provided by mouth or through the gastrointestinal tract. Health care team - A group of trained professionals who work together to provide patient care. For example, a physician, nurse, registered dietitian, physical therapist, radiation therapist, social worker. Hormone therapy - The use of drugs or surgery to remove, block, or add hormones in order to treat cancer. It is used to treat cancers of the breast, prostate and other hormone-responsive tissues.Immune system - Complex network of cells and organs that protect the body from attacks by foreign "invaders." It is one of the bodys main defenses against disease. Immunotherapy - See biological therapy .Integrative medicine A term used to refer to the integration of complementary/alternative medicine into conventional treatment. Lymphatic system - The organs and tissues that produce, store and carry white blood cells that fight infection and other diseases. Includes the bone marrow, spleen, thymus, lymph nodes, and a network of thin tubes that carry lymph and white blood cells into tissues of the body.Lymph nodes - Small bean-shaped structures scattered throughout the body along the channels of the lymphatic system. Lymph nodes contain white blood cells and act as filters keeping bacteria and cancer cells from entering the bloodstream. Malignant - A term used to describe a tumor that is cancerous. It can invade surrounding tissues and spread to other parts of the body. Metastasis - When cancer cells break away from their original site and spread to other parts of the body. Mutation - Change in the genes or hereditary material in cells. Nutrients - Essential chemical compounds found in food (protein, carbohydrate, fat, vitamins, minerals, water) that are needed for normal body function. Oncologist - A physician who specializes in treating cancer. A board-certified oncologist has specialty training and has passed examinations in that specialty area of expertise. Parenteral feeding - Nutrients provided through a vein, bypassing the gastrointestinal tract. Phytochemicals - Substances found in plants that may reduce the risk of cancer. Platelets - Special blood cells that help form clots and stop bleeding. Primary care - Doctor that oversees your general medical care. Can refer you to appropriate specialists, when needed. Prognosis - The likely outcome of a disease; the chance of recovery. Radiation therapy - Cancer treatment with high-energy rays, used to kill cancer cells and shrink tumors.Red blood cells - Cells that supply oxygen to tissues throughout the body. Registered dietitian - An expert on the role of food and nutrition in health and disease. An RD must have at least a four-year college degree in this area and must pass an extensive examination on their knowledge to become registered. RDs may also be called nutritionists, but not all nutritionists are RDs. Remission - The partial or complete disappearance of signs and symptoms of disease. Sarcoma - A cancer of supportive or connective tissue, such as cartilage, bone or muscle. Stage - The extent of cancer in the body, and whether it has spread from the original location to other parts of the body. Staging refers to testing to determine whether the cancer has spread. Tumor - An abnormal growth of cells or tissues. Tumors may be benign (non-cancerous) or malignant (cancerous).White blood cells - The cells of the immune system that fight infection.

The CancerResource Advisory Council provides overall direction and guidance for the CancerResource program. The Council's advice has helped ensure that the CancerResource program effectively provides state-of-the-art information to make facing cancer and its treatment more understandable and successful.

Aim for meals made up of 2/3 (or more) vegetables, fruits whole grains or beans and 1/3 (or less) animal protein. Brochures and other materials guide you through a transition from a traditional plate to new and exciting patterns for eating.

Portion sizes in America have gradually grown too large. USDA's standard serving sizes help you assess the portions you eat. The online Serving Size Finder can help you identify standard servings. Then ask yourself how many standard servings go into the portion you regularly eat?

AICR's expert report Food, Nutrition and the Prevention of Cancer: a global perspective established the relationship between a predominantly plant-based diet and reduced cancer risk. The report suggests that eating more vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans coupled with increased physical activity can reduce cancer risk by 30 to 40 percent. Foods That Fight Cancer summarizes current research on some specific foods.

Popular high-protein and low-carb diets have confused some people about weight-loss strategies. But research shows that vegetables and fruits are a powerful tool in weight management, too. The fiber and water in plant foods make you feel satisfied without filling you up with calories.

At the center of the New American Plate are delicious, nutritious recipes. They're full of fruits, vegetables, whole grains and beans, and easy to prepare. Serve them in healthful proportions, and enjoy the portion size appropriate for you.

Delicious food. Healthy food. They're one and the sameespecially when the recipes are developed by AICR's cookbook team. AICR is proud to announce the publication of its treasure-trove of 200 recipes, which ravish the palate while helping you manage your weight and reduce the risk of disease.

Hundreds of studies suggest that a predominantly plant-based diet is linked to long-term health. The phytochemicals, minerals and vitamins in plant foods seem to bolster the bodys defenses against cancer, heart disease and stroke.

In addition, two extensive reviews of research published last year reconfirm that a plant-based diet also helps people manage their weight. The reason seems to be relatively simple: Vegetables and fruit are low energy-density foods.

That is, vegetables and fruits contain a high percentage of water and fiber per ounce that tend to fill you up. They also have fewer calories per ounce than other foods. Therefore, they tend to satisfy your appetite before youve consumed many calories.

The revised edition of AICRs New American Plate brochure recommends gradually making the transition to a plate that contains 2/3 (or more) vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans to 1/3 (or less) meat or dairy products. Achieving this healthy proportion of plant foods to protein and fat coupled with increased physical activity is the first step toward managing your weight. The second step, the brochure suggests, is gradually reducing portion size.

The New American Plate brochure offers strategies for achieving healthy proportions of food on the plate and for assessing portion size. Diagrams and charts guide the reader through the transition from a Traditional American Plate loaded with fats to the New American Plate.

The revised version of the brochure contains 14 brand new recipes that help in planning such healthy meals. More recipes can be found in the recipe corner and in The New American Plate Cookbook, which will be available in bookstores in March 2005.

In addition, the revised brochure stresses the parallel between strategies that prevent disease and strategies that prevent overweight and obesity. A predominantly plant-based diet, increased physical activity and weight management are key to reducing cancer risk. A predominantly plant-based diet, physical activity and reduced portion sizes are key to reducing weight.

According to these two timely studies, energy density is the key concept to understanding the efficacy of plant foods in regard to weight loss. Most plant foods are high in water and fiber, but comparatively low in energyor calories. Thus they create a feeling of fullness without delivering the hefty load of calories delivered by foods higher in fat.

AICR is issuing this statement now because a series of surveys and articles indicate that the low-carb diet fad peaked last winter and has been losing its following during this past summer. According to a study published by NPD Group, Inc., the number of Americans following low-carb diets hit a high of 9 percent in February 2004 and then fell to 6 percent by June.

Another survey conducted by InsightExpress Inc. indicates that half of the Americans who have tried low-carb diets have given them up. The same study shows that the number of people trying them for the first time is shrinking.

Even the Grocery Manufacturers of America, which represents many of the food processors who tried to cash in on the fad with new low-carb products, sees interest in these items fizzling out. Both anecdote and statistics indicate that low-carb items arent drawing the way they used to, spokesman Michael E. Diegel says.

Most Americans simply rejected low-carb diets. Others found that they didn't work for them. Still others lost weight on them, but gave them up because they were too restrictive or caused side effects such as irritability, sleeplessness, or digestive disorders.

Since the mid-eighties, research results have accumulated suggesting that consumption of vegetables and fruits is a useful tool for weight management. These studies have fallen into three categories: short term trials that provide meals to subjects, long term trials that provide meals and trials that simply offer dietary advice to subjects.

In the first category, researchers measure what happens when scientists provide meals for a group of subjects, but secretly change the percentage of fat and complex or unrefined carbohydrates in those meals.

In such studies, some subjects eat meals high in fat and low in complex carbohydratesthat is energy dense meals that are packed with fat and calories and low in fiber and water. Others eat meals that are low in fat and high in complex carbohydratesthat is, filled with fiber and water that dilute their energy density.

Researchers observed that it was simply the amount of food eaten by subjects that determined how full they felt and how long they stayed full. More significantly, even though they felt the same degree of fullness, subjects who ate a given amount of energy-dense, high-fat meals ended up consuming more calories than subjects who ate the same amount of low-energy dense, high-carbohydrate meals.

Once it was demonstrated that simple adjustments to the fat-to-carbohydrate ratio of meals could have such a clear impact on total caloric intake, researchers began wondering if making such adjustments over a longer period of time could have measurable effect on weight loss.

This possibility was investigated in two long-term clinical studies that provided meals to small groups of overweight subjects over the course of three weeks. Subjects ate meals that were much higher in vegetables and fruits and lower in fat than their habitual diet. At the end of both trials, they showed significant weight lossin one trial an average of 17.2 pounds.

Results are not as pronounced in studies in which subjects are merely advised to make healthy adjustments to the energy density of their meals. These trials tend to last for years instead of weeks and involve larger numbers of subjects. Yet average weight loss for such trials is 8 or 9 pounds.

This relatively weak result may be due to complicating factors that are difficult for scientists to control, such as the many emotional and psychological aspects of eating. There are also many methodological differences among these studies. Some trials advise subjects to increase vegetable and fruit consumption without telling them to make other changes in their diet. Some instruct subjects only to lower consumption of fat, and still others combine these and other recommendations.

In addition, not all of the published clinical trials that have asked subjects to make such healthy adjustment to their diets specifically studied weight loss. Many were devised to track cholesterol levels or blood pressure. In these trials, weight loss tended to be lower.

In regard to the role of complex carbohydrates in weight management, a large body of research studies with different designs and varying results has accumulated. In such cases, scientists resort to a review procedure that weighs and assesses the evidence to draw conclusions. Two such reviews were published in 2004.

Dr. B.A. Swinburn and his colleagues reviewed more than 200 studies relating to causes of obesity and strategies to reduce it. Seventy of these studies related to the role of foods high in fiber and foods high in fat. Careful evaluation of these studies led to the conclusion that high intake of foods with fiber is protective against obesity.

On the basis of these reviews and statements, AICR will reaffirm in all its educational materials and programs the efficacy of substituting complex carbohydrates for more energy dense foods in order to reduce weight. The strategy is viewed as one of several effective tools to fight overweight and obesity.Making Complex Carbohydrates Work for YouBesides confirming the role of vegetables and fruits in weight management, the research also suggests that outside of a controlled scientific situation it may be difficult for people to consistently increase consumption of plant foods. Traditional eating patterns, restaurant and fast food offerings and mainstream food marketing tend to favor diets high in meat, dairy and fat-ladenpastry over vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans.

A strategy recommended by AICR involves focusing on the proportion of foods on the plate meal by meal. A good rule of thumb is to fill your plate 2/3 (or more) with vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans and 1/3 (or less) animal protein.

According to Polk that might mean serving yourself two vegetables and a whole grain like brown rice or kasha and reducing the size of your energy-dense meat dish to make room for the plant foods. Or it could mean preparing a one-pot mealstew, stir fry, casserole, or dinner saladthat is 2/3 vegetables and grains and 1/3 meat, poultry, or fish.

The American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) is the nations third largest cancer charity, focusing exclusively on the link between diet and cancer. The Institute provides a wide range of education programs that help millions of Americans learn to make dietary changes for lower cancer risk. AICR also supports innovative research in cancer prevention and treatment at universities, hospitals and research centers across the U.S. The Institute has provided over $68 million in funding for research in diet, nutrition and cancer. AICRs Web address is www.aicr.org. AICR is a member of the World Cancer Research Fund International.

For example, an epidemiological study might investigate how diet affects the risk of breast cancer in African-American women who live in rural areas. These studies are observational: scientists watch whats going on, but they dont try to change it. Strong evidence can and does arise from epidemiological studies, but remember: detectives cant build an ironclad case out of circumstantial evidence alone.

Quick: list the kinds of foods you ate most often ten years ago. Like eyewitness testimony in a courtroom, case-control studies depend on our unreliable memories. In case-control studies, cases and controls may remember their past diets differently. Some new scientific developments, such as biomarkers of dietary intake act like fingerprints of the foods we eat regularly, can help to avoid this problem.

Just as forensic scientists use advanced crime labs to sift through the many confusing clues found at crime scenes, cancer researchers also examine complex dietary evidence in controlled laboratory environments. Laboratory studies involve more than observing and gathering data. Scientists make small, defined changes in one or more sets of test subjects - animals, cells or tissues. Then they compare the various outcomes.

An epidemiological study can suggest that eating green beans protects against cancer. But thats only an association. With in vitro studies, scientists can look at the chain of events that happens when nutrients and cancer cells meet. Put those two types of studies together, and youre closer to solving the mystery than with either type of study alone.

Strengths of In Vitro StudiesIn vitro studies are tightly focused, which means that scientists can control for many confounding variables. Once an in vitro study finds a suspect - a biological mechanism that might protect against or add to your risk of cancer they can then easily test their suspicions in an animal model.

In vitro studies cant tell us if an anti-cancer effect that happens at the cell level also occurs in the real world of the complex human body. They also cant tell us how much we might have to eat to reap anti-cancer benefits, and they can only involve food components, not whole foods. You cant feed a cell an apple.

In vivo studies put diets to the test in complex living organisms. If cell or tissue studies (in vitro) provide evidence that nutrient X protects against cancer, an in vivo study can give researchers the next clue.

Testing diets in animal models allows scientists much stricter control than with humans. Unless they lock you in the lab, youre probably going to eat those Oreos, but a mouse eats what hes fed - so researchers know exactly whats going in and whats going out.

Humans arent mice. While a surprising number of our biological processes may be similar - especially the cancer process - many things that happen in mice dont happen the same way in humans, and vice versa.

In controlled trials, scientists dont just observe what happens to study subjects as they eat what they would usually eat. They make specific changes to the participants diets to see how those changes affect them. One group of study participants, the intervention group, consumes foods or nutrients scientists think may protect against cancer. Other participants, the control group, get a different food prescription - often just a placebo.

Most controlled trials are randomized and double-blind. Randomized means that study subjects in the two groups dont differ in any major way other than in what theyve been asked to eat, so the results arent affected by unrelated things. Double-blind means that neither the scientists nor the people in the study know whos in which group.

Controlled trials are often called the scientific gold standard. This can be true in many situations, but for unraveling the mystery of linkages between diet and cancer prevention, this investigation method may not be perfect.

Meta-analysis is all about putting the different pieces of the case together in a scientific way. It combines the findings of many different studies using statistical methods. They offer a real, quantifiable sense of how the evidence is building.

Cumulative evidence is another way of looking at the big picture. Rather than using a complex mathematical model, though, cumulative evidence simply means stacking up all the related studies and figuring out what they say overall. Think of our fictional detective looking at fingerprints, eyewitness testimony, DNA evidence, and circumstantial evidence, and putting them all together to see what kind of case they form.

In a food processor, combine the whole wheat flour, all-purpose flour, sugar, and salt. Pulse for a few seconds to combine. (The dough can also be made by hand. In a medium bowl, mix the dry ingredients with a spoon, then use a fork or pastry blender to mix in the remaining ingredients.) Add the butter and canola oil. Pulse again until the ingredients are well combined and the mixture resembles crumbs. With the food processor running, add the ice water, beginning with 1 tablespoon and adding more, one teaspoon at a time, until the dough starts to come together. Gather the dough into a ball and let it rest for a few minutes.

Lightly flour a sheet of waxed paper large enough to roll out the dough. Press the dough into a flattened disk. Cover the dough with another sheet of floured waxed paper. Using a rolling pin, roll the dough out into a 12-inch circle. Remove the top sheet of waxed paper. Lift the bottom sheet and turn it over a 9-inch pie plate so that the dough falls into the pan. Peel away the waxed paper and gently press the dough into the pan, starting with the bottom, then the sides, pressing out any visible air bubbles.

On 2 plates, divide orange slices. In small bowl, combine orange juice, ginger, honey and cinnamon. Drizzle mixture over orange slices, sprinkle even amounts of almonds over each serving and garnish with 2 ginger snaps per plate.

In small bowl, whisk together lime juice, oil and mustard. In salad bowl, place arugula and pears. Toss with just enough dressing to coat. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Sprinkle with feta, pecans (if using) and pomegranate seeds, and serve. Or line salad plates with lettuce leaves and mound the salad in center of each.

This Nutrition Facts label is for a particular brand of macaroni and cheese. It would normally appear on the back of the package. The numbers and percentages on it are signicant. They tell you whether this brand of macaroni and cheese is a good food choice for you as part of your overall diet on any given day.

The Guide shows you how to compare numbers on a single label and then how to compare corresponding numbers between labels. These comparisons enable you to make informed food choices for better health. In Conclusion...

During her lifetime, Ada Magnusson carefully invested her money so that, over the years, it grew substantially. She felt so strongly about supporting the fight against cancer that she named AICR in her will. Ada had a real interest in supporting cancer research, so she called us for information about how to restrict her bequest to cancer research. We provided her with the necessary language, which she used in her will.

Sadly, Ada Magnusson recently died of pancreatic cancer. As she had specified in her will, her bequest to AICR, which totaled over one million dollars, has been put into a special fund the AICR Cancer Research Fund that will be used only for cancer research. We are grateful to Ada for her thoughtful, generous and lasting gift.

The loss of a loved one to cancer is a devastating blow, but AICR supporter Clyde Johnston found a positive way to work through his grief. In the hopes that others would not have to go through what his wife Regina endured, and after several heartfelt conversations with AICR staff and with his family, Clyde decided to establish a special endowment to fund cancer research in memory and honor of his wife.

Like most donors to AICR, Herbert and Virginia Baumgartner make gifts to continue funding lifesaving cancer research. We give because we want to make cancer a disease that doesnt happen to other people, says Virginia.

Over the years, Herbert and Virginia have been successful with their investments, especially with a particular mutual fund. Because of the taxes that would be due on this profitable fund, they were looking for a charitable plan which could avoid capital gains taxes on the funds growth.

Thats when they discovered the Cancer Fighters Annuity Program. It took them by surprise when they realized all the advantages this program offers. Gifts of appreciated assets in exchange for a Cancer Fighters Annuity avoid capital gains and provide a guaranteed and stable income for life a portion of which is free of income taxes. Quarterly payments are wired directly to the Baumgartners credit union account and when they receive their statement, Its like a nice present! says Virginia.

When Rosalyn Belliveau was a young girl, she was deeply affected by the loss of her grandmother, and then her mother, to cancer. Her feeling is that cancer is one of the widest killers and research has to find more ways to help more people. She believes charitable giving is a personal choice for everyone and since cancer affects so many people and their families, her choice is to give to AICRs Monthly Donor Program.

In 1999 Debbie Olivier passed away from breast cancer. To celebrate her life and carry on her legacy of philanthropy, each year friends and family help to organize the Debbie Olivier Memorial Golf Classic.

Debbie Olivier was deeply connected with her community. She continued to give back even during her battle with breast cancer. With her charitable spirit in mind, proceeds from this event are donated to worthy charities. AICR is proud to be a recipient of the monies raised from this event.

The 2006 tournament was another great success. The tournament took place at the San Luis Rey Downs, just north of San Diego. The days events included full rounds of golf, as well as putting, long-drive, and closest-to-the-pin contests. An auction, prizes, awards and a dinner rounded out the day.

Team AICR is a diverse group made up of students, military personnel, professionals, and parents. They are seasoned marathoners and first timers. They come from Alaska, Texas, Connecticut, and all points in between. Many of their lives have been affected by cancer, and all of them are making a real difference in the fight against cancer. We at AICR appreciate and admire their dedication.

You can help provide for future cancer research and education through a simple bequest in your will. We recommend you consult with your attorney when drafting a new will, or when changing an existing will, if you wish to include a bequest for fighting cancer in your will.

Your bequest to the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) to help in the war against cancer can be a cash amount, a gift of the remainder of your estate, or a portion of the remainder, after obligations to your family and loved ones are met.

"I give, devise and bequeath to the American Institute for Cancer Research for its general purposes [state fraction or percentage of the rest, residue and remainder] in my estate, both real or personal."

"I hereby give, devise and bequeath to the American Institute for Cancer Research [whatever amount or percentage you so desire]. The use of this bequest is restricted to funding cancer research grants approved by the American Institute for Cancer Research."

This charitable gift annuity program allows you to transfer cash or marketable securities (stocks or mutual funds) to the American Institute for Cancer Research. In return for that gift, you, or whomever else you may designate, are guaranteed fixed payments for as long as you or they live.

A gift annuity can offer substantial tax advantages. Because your gift eventually will be used to fund important cancer education and research programs, you can immediately deduct a portion of your gift as a charitable contribution on your income tax return.

With a gift annuity, you will receive a payment each year for the rest of your life. And in most cases the annuity income will be favorably taxed and will be much higher than you could receive from a certificate of deposit, money market account or similar investment.

You cannot outlive a gift annuity, nor can your payment be canceled or lowered or suspended. Your payment amount is set at the time you make your gift and is based on various factors, including the size of your gift and your age. You can also designate someone else to receive the annual payments, or can even choose to receive the payments yourself during your lifetime, then have them continue to another person only after your death.

You can transfer cash, stocks, mutual funds or other assets to the program. If you transfer appreciated property, such as securities, you will be able to gain additional tax and financial benefits from the program.You can name almost anyone (over the age of 60) to receive the annuity income.If you do not need the higher income at this time, AICR will commit to pay a substantially larger annuity income to you (or other beneficiaries) at a future specified time.

A trust is simply a legal agreement that indicates how assets placed with a trust will be managed. When a trust names a charity, such as the American Institute for Cancer Research as its beneficiary, it can offer a number of advantages.

Most important, for many people who establish charitable remainder trusts, is the satisfaction of knowing that they have made a significant contribution to the fight against cancer, while still satisfying their financial needs and security during their own lifetime.

Charitable donations can take many forms, from the loose change you drop into a collection basket to carefully planned donations of significant size with important tax and financial implications. Many people, unfortunately, fail to recognize the financial benefits that can come through a contribution of appreciated property, such as stocks, bonds or mutual funds.

When you write a check to make a donation to a charity such as the American Institute for Cancer Research, your donation gives you an income tax deduction. But if you made the same donation with appreciated assets, you receive a double tax benefit. You will get the immediate income tax deduction and avoid the capital gains tax that would be owed if that asset was sold by you.

When you donate stocks, bonds or mutual funds, you receive a tax deduction for the full, current fair market value of the property donated (assuming you have held the property for more than one year). It does not matter that you may have only paid $6,000 several years ago for a stock that is now worth $18,000. That $18,000 figure will be your charitable donation. As importantly, the $12,000 in taxable capital gains that you would face if you sold that stock does not apply when you transfer the stock as a contribution to a charity. And because, in most cases, the stocks or bonds or mutual fund shares can be easily transferred to AICR, you can also avoid the commission expense that would normally be due for the sale of the property.

Over the last 15 years, a number of expert reports have reviewed the literature on diet and cancer and made recommendations designed to reduce the risk of cancer. The report, of which this is a summary, builds on that earlier work and the panel acknowledges its debt to the many scientists responsible and, even more crucially, to the thousands of researchers whose findings, reviewed and assessed in the report, form the basis of its recommendations.

The report summarised here has some special features. As its title indicates, it is concerned explicitly with the primary prevention of cancer, and has a global perspective. Aspects of food and nutrition likely to reduce cancer risk have been emphasised, while due weight has been given to those that may increase risk.

The panel agreed on a consistent method to assess the various types of scientific evidence, so that the basis for its judgements can itself be evaluated by the reader. The dietary recommendations designed to prevent cancer, summarised on pages 14 and 15, are generally food-based, and either quantified or set out in clear language, so as to be useful to both policy-makers and the general public. The recommendations have been framed bearing in mind existing guidelines designed to prevent deficiency and infectious diseases, and to prevent non-infectious diseases other than cancer, especially cardiovascular diseases. The panel accepted a relatively broad brief which included consideration of factors related to diet, and concluded that relative body mass and degree of physical activity are both important in modifying the risk of cancer.

To review the scientific and other expert literature linking foods, nutrition, food processing, dietary patterns and related factors, with the risk of human cancers worldwide.To devise a series of dietary and other recommendations suitable for all societies and designed to reduce the risk of human cancers.To evaluate the degree of consistency between such recommendations and those proposed for the prevention of coronary heart disease and other diseases.To consider both the feasibility and the policy implications of the global implementation of these recommendations.

The burden of preventable suffering and death from cancer throughout the world is huge. Some of the cancers now most common in Europe, North America and Australasia are known to be largely preventable. Changes in society worldwide are accelerating and are liable, if unchecked, to increase the burden of cancer, most of all in Africa, Latin America and Asia.

As the report shows, evidence of causal links between food and nutrition and cancer is often sufficiently strong to be a basis for recommendations to policy-makers and to the general public. It is now apparent that, although genetic predisposition varies, the key factors determining whether or not people develop cancer are environmental. The two most important ways to reduce cancer risk are the avoidance of cancer-causing agents, of which tobacco is by far the most lethal, but which also include biological agents, viruses and bacteria, and the habitual consumption of diets high in those foods and drinks that protect against cancer. A principal purpose of the report has been to identify such diets.

The panel estimates that recommended diets, together with maintenance of physical activity and appropriate body mass, can in time reduce cancer incidence by 30 - 40%. At current rates, on a global basis, this represents 3 - 4 million cases of cancer per year that could be prevented by dietary and associated means.

Action to prevent cancer is, therefore, rational, timely and important, and should be a major priority and responsibility for international agencies, governments, industry, non-governmental organisations, medical and health authorities, and for all working in the public interest at international, national and community level.

In 2007, WCRF/AICR will publish the second expert report containing a rigorous review and evaluation of an estimated 10,000 pieces of research on diet, physical activity and weight management and their effect on cancer risk. This will be a landmark document in which an expert panel assesses decades of research results, draws conclusions and makes recommendations.

As a growing number of studies adds to the evidence that high doses and/or levels of vitamin D may reduce risk of cancer, researchers are investigating how this occurs. Recent studies by AICR-supported researchers provide clues to the mechanisms by which vitamin D plays a role in prostate and skin cancers.Over the past three decades, numerous epidemiologic and laboratory studies have shown an association between increased vitamin D - measured via blood levels and/or dietary intake - and reduced cancer risk. Recent studies offer new clues to the mechanisms by which vitamin D may influence cancer risk. These findings may point the way to uses for vitamin D to help prevent and treat cancer.

People can obtain vitamin D from foods, supplements and sun exposure. Ultraviolet rays from the sun trigger the production of vitamin D in keratinocytes, which are the major type of cell in the upper layer of skin. This inactive vitamin D is then converted in the liver and then kidney into its active hormone form, known as calcitriol. Scientists have discovered that keratinocytes also have the unique ability to form active vitamin D (calcitriol) for use within the cells.

Laboratory studies in the 1980s showed that vitamin D inhibited the growth of malignant melanoma cells, leukemic cells and squamous carcinoma cells (malignant keratinocytes). Since that time, researchers have found that vitamin D - once considered important only for its role in boosting calcium absorption - regulates numerous genes that influence cellular processes crucial to cancer development, including proliferation, blood-vessel formation (angiogenesis), and apoptosis. This suggests that vitamin D may play a role in the therapy of many types of cancer, says David Feldman, M.D., Professor of Medicine at Stanford University School of Medicine.

Mechanisms in Prostate Cancer Dr. Feldman and his colleagues have recently demonstrated that calcitriol targets genes that inhibit the synthesis and activity of prostaglandins, hormone-like substances that stimulate cancer growth and progression in cell cultures. In studies aimed at developing treatments, the researchers found that calcitriol acts to inhibit prostaglandins in prostate cancer cells by three separate mechanisms, including decreasing the expression of the COX-2 gene, which synthesizes prostaglandinsDr. Feldman's research, partially funded by AICR, focuses on the role of vitamin D in prostate cancer. Other studies from his lab suggest that vitamin D elevates levels of insulin-like growth factor binding protein 3 (IGFBP-3) in prostate cancer cells. Higher levels of IGFBP-3 have been shown to reduce the risk of prostate cancer development and metastasis. Another research group, at the University of Rochester, has recently shown that vitamin D inhibits the invasive ability of human prostate cancer cell lines and blocks two critical steps in tumor angiogenesis.

"Although we are focused on the skin, I could easily believe the mechanisms would be comparable in other tissues," says Dr. Bikle, who is beginning to test his vitamin D findings in mouse studies. Along with prostate, other cancers that will likely benefit from mechanistic findings of vitamin D are cancers of the breast and colon - both associated with vitamin D deficiency.

AICR is saddened by the passing of an important, internationally recognized scholar whose work helped put the study of diet's link to chronic disease on the map. Dr. David Kritchevsky was a brilliant scientist whose research on dietary fat and calorie restriction revolutionized our understanding of nutrition's role in the cancer process. He was a dear friend to AICR. His quick wit will be greatly missed, but his contributions to the field of nutrition science will endure.This AICR profile of Dr. Kritchevsky from 2001 offers a glimpse of his work, his relationship with AICR, and his sense of humor.

"Research is demanding because you're always waiting for something to live, die, crystallize, or melt. So you have to have patience. And if you think you're right, you have stick with it. And if you find you're wrong, you have to have the guts to get out."

For more than half a century, that credo has helped Dr. David Kritchevsky unlock the secrets of biochemistry and nutrition. Only recently, though, has it led him into the field of cancer research. Indeed, he spent the bulk of his career exploring the links between dietary fats and atherosclerosiswriting the first-ever book on cholesterol and, in the 1960s and 1970s, becoming an internationally known expert on the links between dietary fiber and heart disease. It wasn't until the 1980s, though, that he began puzzling out the relationship between diet and cancer. Inevitably, that brought him into contact with the American Institute for Cancer Research, where he served on the first study section. He was also, he remembers, one of the fledgling group's staunchest defenders.

"The only question the Institute ever asked was, 'Is it good science? And if it is, let's fund it.' And in many cases, their investments paid off, and the Institute has kept a lot of young investigators afloat that way."

At 81, Kritchevsky has done his part to encourage a new generation of investigatorshis own son, Stephen, is an epidemiologist and an expert in antioxidantseven while pursuing a busy research agenda of his own. In recent years, he has turned his attentions to conjugated linoleic acid (CLA), a substance that inhibits both cancer and heart disease in laboratory rats. He is quick to point out that CLA is found only in the much-maligned category of animal fatsspecifically the fats of ruminant animals like cows. "Which proves," he says, "that God has a sense of humor."

Findings like these, running as they do against the grain of popular belief, have made Kritchevsky skeptical of reductive thinking. "Let's take fiber. The early studies suggesting fiber had a beneficial effect were based on populations with a high-fiber diet. But there were other things in that diet. We were looking at this one component instead of worrying about the interaction of all the components. And that's when you can make the wrong guess."

Until then, what's a confused consumer to do? For Kritchevsky, it all boils down to "moderation and variety. Eat a little of everything and not too much of anything. I don't think there's anything intrinsically bad unless you eat too much of it. The only people who died after eating one meal were the ones who ate with the Borgias."

Colon cancer is second only to lung cancer as the leading cause of cancer death in the U.S. It is estimated, however, that about 75 percent of colon cancers are preventable by adopting moderate changes in diet and lifestyle.One moderate dietary change that may work is eating more omega-3 fatty acids, found in fish and fish oil, along with more pectin. Pectin is concentrated in apples and citrus fruits, but the cell walls of every type of fruit are coated with it. Researchers in the Department of Nutrition and Food Science at Texas A&M University (TAMU) have discovered that the combination of fish oil and pectin might create a greater protective effect against colon cancer than the individual compounds do separately. This combination has been shown in laboratory studies to be remarkably successful at inducing apoptosis (programmed death) of cancer cells. Radiation Another Risk FactorWith a postdoctoral grant from AICR, Jairam Vanamala, Ph.D., a Postdoctoral Research Associate at TAMU, is trying to elucidate the mechanism(s) through which fish oil and pectin achieve their synergistic effect. "The heart of my project," says Dr. Vanamala, "is determining how these two substances eliminate damaged cells, which have the potential to become cancer cells, through apoptosis."For this study, his research group will use carcinogens and radiation to induce colon cancer in animals. After cancer induction, the animals will be divided into two groups. One group will be fed fish oil and pectin, a fermentable fiber. When pectin reaches the colon, bacteria ferment it to form butyric acid. "Butyric acid can induce apoptosis on its own by enhancing the death receptors on cancer cells," says Dr. Vanamala. By suppressing the prostaglandin pathway, the omega-3 fatty acids can also promote apoptosis. Together, these two seem to create an even better environment for enhancing the death of damaged cells that could be premalignant.The other group will be fed corn oil and cellulose, a non-fermentable fiber, as a control diet. Through molecular and cellular analyses, Dr. Vanamala's team will attempt to develop a deeper understanding of the signaling pathways that regulate apoptosis caused by the combination of fish oil and pectin. Although the blood levels of omega-3 fatty acids used in the study are uncommon in people, Dr. Vanamala points out, "They are similar to the levels among Eskimos, who have extremely low levels of cancer and heart disease."Need to Know WhyDr. Vanamala's experimental model mimics human exposure to carcinogens and radiation, which may also be a factor in cancer development. Studies suggest that because of their increased exposure to radiation, pilots, astronauts and radiologists have an increased cancer risk.However, although fish oil and pectin have been documented as protective against colon cancer, a diet that contains large increases of these substances beyond what is found in a mostly plant-based diet still cannot be recommended for human use. "It is essential," says Dr. Vanamala, "to understand why these foods are beneficial before we tell consumers to eat more foods that contain them."ReferenceSanders, LM et al. An increase in reactive oxygen species by dietary fish oil coupled with the attenuation of antioxidant defenses by dietary pectin enhances rat colonocyte apoptosis. J Nutr. 2004;134:3233-8.

In a few years, obesity will replace smoking as the number one preventable cause of many common cancers, according to Professor Jeffrey M. P. Holly, Ph.D. With a grant from AICR, Professor Holly is examining how fatty acids affect the actions of insulin-like growth factors (IGFs), which may promote cancer. He is also looking at two phytochemicals that may interfere with the actions of IGFs and form part of a diet to prevent cancer.

She did take the job at Duke, however, and began research on the effect of flaxseed, another high-fiber food, on prostate cancer. "Fortunately, that's one cancer I can't develop," she jokes. She now is a professor in both the Departments of Surgery and the School of Nursing.One of Dr. Demark-Wahnefried's current projects, partially funded by AICR, is a 10-month exercise and diet intervention study involving breast and prostate cancer survivors. She will analyze the participants' blood lipid and hormonal levels to see how these markers change from the beginning to the end of the program.She has also been active with AICR in education. In 2005, she spoke about the role of lifestyle, particularly diet and exercise, on cancer recurrence at AICR's Miami Conference on Nutrition after Cancer. She has also chaired a session at AICR's annual research conference.Dr. Demark-Wahnefried speaks highly of AICR. "It is truly one of the most active organizations on diet, nutrition, and cancer," she comments. "It not only funds seminal cancer research, but also has a service arm to get this information out to patients. Another plus is AICR's annual conference, where scientists can meet and network and learn new things."Dr. Demark-Wahnefried did not plan on a career in research when she completed her undergraduate work in nutritional science and chemistry at the University of Michigan. "I was the first woman in my family to go to college, and it was important to have a tangible career when I got out, so I studied to be a dietitian."But after three years in that field, during which time she completed a master's degree at Texas Woman's University, she went into research. She earned a Ph.D. in nutritional science at Syracuse University in 1988. Her research in cardiovascular disease began there.Her transition from studying high-fiber foods and cardiovascular disease to fiber-rich foods and cancer was easy. "Fiber plays a role in cholesterol regulation," she says. "Cholesterol, in turn, influences hormone-related cancers, because the body converts cholesterol into androgens and estrogens. These are sex hormones that play a role primarily in breast and prostate cancers but other cancers as well."

Her more recent lifestyle intervention trials for cancer survivors were a natural outgrowth of her cancer research. "Weight gain is a prevalent problem in breast cancer therapy, and we found that we could stop the cycle of obesity and adverse body composition changes through exercise." She is trying to find what kinds of education and information work best to motivate cancer survivors to exercise and eat healthful diets.Although she works 50-80 hours a week, Dr. Demark-Wahnefried and her husband, who runs a computer hosting company, take ballroom dancing lessons for personal enjoyment and exercise. She tries to eat a healthy diet. "Fortunately, I love fruits and vegetables," she affirms. She also makes sure she gets on an elliptical trainer every other day. "I can't ask my cancer survivors to exercise if I don't do it. You've got to walk the walk."

Scientist in the Spotlight: Richard M. Niles, Ph.D."Sometimes in research you stumble upon discoveries that you never would have thought to look for," says Richard M. Niles, Ph.D., Chair of the Department of Biochemistry and Molecular Biology at Marshall University's medical school in Huntington, W.V. "You look at the data and say, 'This is really interesting. I never would have thought about that.'"Dr. Niles had one of these "Eureka!" moments when he looked at the findings of his latest research that used gene array analysis, a powerful technology, to study vitamin A and melanoma in animals. Vitamin A is effective in inhibiting the growth of many different types of cancer cells. "The data give us some real insight into the sequence of target genes for retinoic acid (a biologically active form of vitamin A). If we can translate this finding to human melanoma, it will provide a significant breakthrough in our understanding of why so many melanomas are resistant to treatment with vitamin A and retinoic acid."AICR has funded four of Dr. Niles's research projects, all of which are related to aspects of retinoic acid. Vitamin A (retinoic acid) is believed to be essential for the normal functioning of melanoytes, the pigment-producing cells in the skin. Much of his research has studied whether retinoic acid might be useful in prevent-ing early-stage melanoma from advancing.In 1999 AICR funded a two-year project dealing with a new technology that records gene expressions regulated by vitamin A. "The AICR grant enabled us to get results in the gene array field at a very early time. Those results then helped us receive National Institutes of Health (NIH) funding to continue the research," says Dr. Niles.AICR's commitment to funding early research is one of its strong points, according to Dr. Niles. "There's a real need for AICR's support of pilot studies, which are more risky projects than NIH would consider. But unless you have a lot of data gathered already, it's hard to get funding from NIH."Dr. Niles credits AICR for being the first major organization to fund studies relating nutrition to cancer, when it was not popular to do so. "AICR has been the leader in that area," he says.Dr. Niles's interest in science began at an early age, initially in astronomy. Later he turned to the biological sciences and considered entering medical school, but he found research interested him more. He began working with vitamin A after hearing a presentation at a cancer research meeting on retinoic acid. "The subject matter was totally new to me, and afterward I went to my coworkers in the laboratory and said, 'Let's try retinoic acid on the cells in our laboratory.' It had very similar effects to what I had heard. I've been studying it ever since."Although his career is focused on science, Dr. Niles likes to relax with non-science books. He alternates between fiction and nonfiction. He also stays fit. He runs two to three times a week and plays tennis with a group at the medical school twice a week.Dr. Niles's interest in science did not rub off on his two sons. One lives in Maine and works in accounting and finance, while the other works in public relations and grant writing for a West Virginia hospital. Dr. Niles's wife is active in volunteer work at the hospital affiliated with Marshall University's medical school and also at the local Ronald McDonald House.His family understands the importance of vitamin A to good health. "Everyone takes a multivitamin each morning," Dr. Niles reports. "We also eat lots of salads that include carrots and red peppers, which are rich sources of beta-carotene that is converted to vitamin A inside the body."

Stronger Than Iron, Curcumin May Prevent TumorsCurcumin is the phytochemical in the spice turmeric that gives curry its yellow color. In animal studies, it has prevented the growth of several types of cancers. It has even been tested in clinical trials as a way to prevent cancer in humans.Suzy V. Torti, Ph.D., Associate Professor of Biochemistry at Wake Forest University School of Medicine in Winston-Salem, N.C., has studied curcumin's protective effect against cancer. In collaboration with her research colleagues, Dr. Torti recently found a possible explanation for how curcumin inhibits tumor growth.Cancer Cells Deprived of Iron"We made the unexpected observation that curcumin binds and isolates iron in cells and tissues," says Dr. Torti. The process of binding and isolating a metal ion such as iron is known as chelation. Her group made this discovery after studying the effects of several natural products.How chelation of iron by curcumin may prevent cancer is unknown. It may involve the special need of tumor cells for iron. Although iron is essential for the body to function, cancer cells are avid for iron. It is required for their growth and DNA synthesis. In conditions of excess iron storage, the risk of liver cancer is greatly increased.Dr. Torti notes, however, that chelation is probably only a part of how curcumin affects tumors. "Studies have shown lots of partial answers to the question of why curcumin inhibits tumor growth. Its property of chelating iron is just another piece of the puzzle of how this simple molecule works."Pinpointing the RelationshipIn a current, two-year study, funded by AICR, Dr. Torti and her colleagues are attempting to better define the interaction between iron and curcumin and their effects on tumor growth. Her study will use mice that have a genetic defect that causes them to develop intestinal tumors. The mice will all be fed the same amount of curcumin.In this study, Dr. Torti will see how many intestinal or liver tumors the mice develop when they are given varying amounts of iron. "We will assess whether giving more or less iron when you are also giving curcumin will affect how the curcumin works in preventing tumors," Dr. Torti says.The study will also examine the molecular action of curcumin. This information could lay the groundwork for developing medicines or treatments that mimic the chemopreventive actions of curcumin. The other findings from this study could have important and practical implications for dietary interventions used to prevent cancer. "Our study with mice will be the first to provide some measurements of the effect of different levels of iron when curcumin is being used," Dr. Torti points out.If dietary iron reduces the activity of curcumin, this could have immediate implications for human trials, where iron supplementation might be avoided or reduced when curcumin is administered. She concludes, "If people are taking curcumin to prevent them from getting cancer, and they are also taking iron supplements, the curcumin may be inactivated by the iron, possibly defeating the whole purpose."ReferenceBuss JL et al. The role of iron chelation in cancer therapy. Current Medicinal Chemistry. 2003;10(12):1021-34.

Scientist in the Spotlight: Thomas Gasiewicz, Ph.D.At a press conference on July 14, 2005, AICR publicized the striking results of an AICR-funded study on green tea. The study discovered that epigallocatechin gallate (EGCG), a potent antioxidant in green tea, can bind to a common protein called HSP90 and inhibit cellular activity that may lead to cancer.The lead researcher for the study, Thomas Gasiewicz, Ph.D., Professor of Environmental Medicine at the University of Rochester Medical Center, says, "The active green tea substance EGCG may target HSP90 with a degree of precision that could be equivalent to the activity of our best cancer drugs. EGCG binds directly to it and keeps it from passing on signals that can start the cancer process."Dr. Gasiewicz made this discovery almost by accident. At the time, his laboratory was looking for a natural substance that would block the expression of the protein Ah receptor (AhR) through which dioxin produces toxicity in mammals. His laboratory looked at a lot of flavones, a class of phytochemicals, including EGCG."We saw that EGCG counteracted AhR expression, but we couldn't figure out how it was working. For months, we tried to make EGCG bind to that protein, but it did not," says Dr. Gasiewicz.By accident, the researchers observed that EGCG bound to HSP90, which then stabilized the activity of AhR. "The finding of this mechanism is my most surprising research result," Dr. Gasiewicz relates. "I never would have predicted it.""In science, sometimes you need the ability to recognize an unusual event and go with the results," he adds.Figuring out how things work is what drew Dr. Gasiewicz to research. He traces his interest back to his childhood, when his family lived near the woods and he spent a lot of time exploring nature.As a result, he was always drawn to the sciences in school. In 1972, he earned a B.S. degree in chemistry, but the theoretical side of that subject did not interest him.When he went to the University of Rochester for graduate school, he met the scientist who had discovered that AhR is the transcription factor for dioxin. "His work struck me as extremely important for public health," says Dr. Gasiewicz, who received a Ph.D. in toxicology in 1977.Since then, most of his research has been devoted to determining the normal function of AhR and how it affects the immune system. "If we can find out how AhR works when exposed to dioxin, we may obtain clues on how to treat and prevent cancer," he says. "We're using dioxin as a tool to understand this particular protein."Although dioxin is a powerful toxin now spread throughout the world by many activities of mankind, a person's lifestyle can outweigh the health risk from dioxins. "Our bodies have a certain ability to deal with these chemicals," points out Dr. Gasiewicz. "One molecule of dioxin will not cause you to develop cancer."In his spare time, Dr. Gasiewicz still explores the great outdoors. He enjoys weeklong backpacking trips in the Adirondacks. He also plays golf.Recently, he went on a rafting trip with his two children in the Grand Canyon. His son is a college junior interested in math, physics, international relations and languages, while his daughter is pursing a master's degree in public relations and marketing.His wife now works as a teacher's aide with learning disabled children, although she was a nurse when she met Dr. Gasiewicz.

Determination of biologically plausible mechanisms for the action of micronutrients, macronutrients, phytochemicals and dietary patterns on cancer risk.Determination of the influence of processing, distribution, storage, preparation and cooking on the anticarcinogenic or carcinogenic potential of foods.Identification and validation of biological or biochemical markers of cancer risk, including immunological and hormonal markers, which are influenced by dietary exposures.Examination of how interactions among factors such as dietary patterns, whole foods and food components, physical activity and genomics act to modify cancer risk.Mechanisms through which energy intake and expenditure, body composition, body weight and physical activity influence cancer risk.Mechanisms by which dietary agents modulate tumor stem cell survival and proliferation.Addition of a food, nutrition, or physical activity component to a funded epidemiologic, intervention, or clinical study that examines cancer risk or cancer prevention.

Investigation of the selective growth (nutritional) requirements of tumor cells as compared to normal cells.Identification of nutritional factors alone or in combination that can selectively suppress tumor cell growth.Investigation of the mechanisms through which micronutrients, macronutrients, energy balance and other nutritional factors may improve cancer treatment or reduce the toxicity of chemotherapy drugs, radiation, or immunotherapy, while sustaining or enhancing the efficacy of treatment.Identification of diets and dietary constituents that modify cancer development and how modulating these factors may arrest or reverse cancer or its precursor lesions.Mechanistic studies addressing energy intake and expenditure, body composition, body weight, physical activity and the treatment of cancer.Addition of a food, nutrition, or physical activity component to a funded epidemiologic, intervention, or clinical study that examines cancer treatment or the inhibition of cancer progression.

Investigate differential mechanisms of action of food and nutrients on future cancer risk in cancer survivors as compared to those without cancer.Investigate nutrition-based treatments that enhance quality of life in cancer survivors, including those that mitigate negative effects of treatment.Addition of a nutrition component to a funded epidemiologic, intervention or clinical study on cancer survivors that will examine links between nutrition and cancer.

Investigator Initiated Grants (IIG)AICRs Investigator Initiated Grant program remains the core of the Institutes research efforts. This program has contributed to a deeper and more precise understanding of how food, nutrition and physical activity impact the cancer process. It also encourages new research on dietary means of preventing and treating cancer, or improving the life of the cancer patient and the cancer survivor. Research supported by this program uncovers the mechanisms by which nutrients and other food constituents help prevent or promote the cancer process. This program is open to researchers at not-for-profit universities, hospitals, or research centers and provides renewable, two-year grants of up to $75,000 per year (plus 10% for indirect costs). IIG applications may be revised up to two (2) times. The Principal Investigator must have a Ph.D., or equivalent degree, or M.D. degree and be a research staff or faculty member at a non-profit academic or research institution at the level of an assistant professor (or its equivalent) or higher.

Post-Doctoral Grant Awards (PDA)AICRs Post-Doctoral Grant Awards are designed to encourage new researchers to enter the field of nutrition- cancer research and to explore innovative research ideas that are often difficult or impossible to fund from traditional sources. This program is open to post-doctoral trainees (not for academic appointment holders or independent investigators) at non-profit universities, hospitals or research centers and provides two-year grants of up to $38,000 (no indirect costs are allowed) per year, and cannot be renewed. A minimum of 75% of the proposed budget must go to salary with a minimum of 75% time effort. PDA applications may be revised once. The post-doctoral applicant must have a Ph.D., or equivalent degree, or M.D. degree that was awarded no more than four years prior to the date of application. The applicant must also be sponsored by a professor from the laboratory in which the applicant is to perform the research.

Matching Grants (MG)AICR is interested in working with for-profit corporations and/or not-for-profit organizations in funding cancer research consistent with AICRs areas of interest. Research must be conducted at an academic or other not-for-profit research institution. AICR usually provides about $75,000 as its part of the funding arrangement. Interested investigators should contact AICR to discuss application procedures. Applications will be evaluated by a peer review process and must meet the same high and rigorous standards as all other AICR funded grants.

As a general policy, WCRF International gives priority to epidemiological research proposals that relate well to the expert report Food, Nutrition and the Prevention of Cancer: a global perspective. Preference is given to applications that adhere to the following general and specific priorities considered to be likely to produce valuable results that mark a substantial advance on current knowledge.

Studies that focus on nutrition of the mother, fetus, neonate and young child and lifelong cancer risk.Studies investigating energy intake and expenditure, body composition (including growth and height), body weight and cancer risk.Studies investigating the role of physical activity and/ or inactivity and cancer risk.Projects focusing on the particular circumstances in the developing world and countries in transition from developing to developed economic status, in order to study the relationship between food, nutrition, physical activity and cancer.Studies investigating the effectiveness of interventions or programs aimed at changing eating habits, physical activity or nutrition status at individual, community or population level.

Beans (also known as legumes) include lentils, peas and many other bean varieties. (Soybeans also fall into this category, but their anti-cancer benefits are described in the Soy section.) The active ingredients in beans that seem to have a role in cancer prevention include saponins, protease inhibitors and phytic acid. These phytochemicals appear to protect cells from the type of genetic damage that can lead to cancer. Beans are also rich in fiber, and diets high in fiber have been repeatedly linked to lower risk of colorectal, pancreatic and breast cancers.

In laboratory studies, saponins have shown the ability to inhibit the reproduction of cancer cells and slow the growth of tumors in several different tissues. Protease inhibitors have slowed the division of cancer cells and helped to prevent tumors from releasing substances called proteases that destroy nearby cells. Phytic acid has shown the ability to significantly slow the progression of tumors.

One recent case-control study involving 3,237 men of different ethnic backgrounds found that those subjects who consumed the most beans had a 38 percent lower risk of prostate cancer than subjects who consumed the least.

AICR has funded research on the following topics relating to beans and the cancer-fighting components they contain. Click each topic to read a summary of the AICR-funded research studies performed to date.

Berries are known as good sources of vitamin C and fiber and diets high in both of these substances have been consistently linked to lower cancer risk. But all berries, particularly strawberries and raspberries, are especially rich in a substance called ellagic acid, which has shown the ability to prevent cancers of the skin, bladder, lung, esophagus and breast in laboratory studies. This phytochemical seems to utilize several different anti-cancer methods at once: it acts as an antioxidant, it helps the body deactivate specific carcinogens, and it helps slow the reproduction of cancer cells.

AICR has funded research on the following topics relating to berries and the cancer-fighting components they contain. Click each topic to read a summary of the AICR-funded research studies performed to date.

The cruciferous vegetables are broccoli, cauliflower, cabbage, Brussels sprouts, bok choy and kale. This family of vegetables contains many components that have been linked to lower cancer risk, including glucosinolates, crambene, indole-3-carbinol and, especially, isothiocyanates (which are derived from glucosinolates.)Several laboratory studies have suggested that cruciferous vegetables help regulate a complex system of bodily enzymes that defend against cancer. Components of these vegetables have shown the ability to stop the growth of cancer cells in various cell, tissue and animal models, including tumors of the breast, endometrium, lung, colon, liver, colon and cervix. Large human studies have associated diets high in cruciferous vegetables with lower risk for lung, stomach and colorectal cancers. The evidence from these studies, which compare the diets and disease rates of different populations, is less consistent for ovarian, endometrial and prostate cancers.

Clinical studies on the role of cruciferous vegetables in cancer development and recurrence are just beginning, but preliminary evidence suggests that diets high in these foods have beneficial effects on cellular metabolism that may translate into lower cancer risk.

AICR has funded research on the following topics relating to cruciferous vegetables and the cancer-fighting components they contain. Click each topic to search for relevant AICR-funded research studies performed to date.

Spinach, kale, romaine lettuce, leaf lettuce, mustard greens, collard greens, chicory and Swiss chard are excellent sources of fiber, folate and a wide range of carotenoids such as lutein and zeaxanthin, along with saponins and flavonoids.

Results from several studies suggest that dietary folate is associated with lower risk of both colorectal adenomas (polyps which often progress into cancers) and colorectal cancer. Two large studies have suggested an association between increased dietary folate intake and reduced breast cancer risk in women who consume alcoholic beverages. In men, results from two studies indicate that diets high in leafy green vegetables and other sources of folate may reduce the risk of lung cancer, especially in smokers.

In the Iowa Womens Health Study, women who ate the most green leafy vegetables were found to have less than half (44%) of the risk of ovarian cancer compared with subjects who at the least green leafy vegetables.

Flaxseed is available as flaxseed flour, flaxseed meal (which has the texture of cornmeal), flaxseed oil and whole flaxseeds. The whole seeds cannot be digested, so they provide no nutritional or health benefits unless they are ground.

Flaxseed is the best dietary source for substances called lignans. Lignans are classified as phytoestrogens (plant estrogens) because they seem to mimic the action of estrogen in the body. This behavior has been linked to reduced cancer risk. Flaxseed oil does not contain lignans (a group of phytochemicals studied for the anti-cancer abilities), but some manufacturers of flaxseed add them.

In several laboratory studies, flaxseed has inhibited the formation of colon, breast, skin and lung tumors. However, there is some indication that the anti-cancer effect of flaxseed varied widely depending upon the variety of flaxseed and its growing conditions.

A few laboratory studies involving rats have suggested that consumption of flaxseed during pregnancy and lactation produces hormonal changes in offspring that may impact their cancer development. These findings are preliminary and warrant further study.

In some short-term human studies, consumption of flaxseed has altered estrogen metabolism in ways that may indicate a protective effect against breast cancer. To date, the laboratory and clinical work on flaxseed and breast cancer has focused on estrogen-receptor negative breast cancers. The effect of flaxseed on estrogen-positive breast cancers has not been studied.

Currently, the evidence associating consumption of flaxseed with protection against prostate cancer is less consistent; some human studies indicate an increased risk, some a decreased risk, and still others find no association at all. In a recent clinical study, however, consumption of a low-fat diet combined with daily flaxseed for 5 weeks inhibited various aspects of prostate cancer biology in beneficial ways for a small group of prostate cancer patients.

Garlic belongs to the family of vegetables called Allium, which also includes onions, scallions, leeks and chives. These vegetables contain many substances now being studied for their anti-cancer effects, including: allicin, allixin, allyl sulfides, quercetin and a large group of organosulfur compounds.

Laboratory research has shown that one garlic component, called diallyl disulfide, exerts potent preventive effects against cancers of the skin, colon and lung. Recently, this compound proved able to kill leukemia cells in the laboratory. A compound derived from garlic called ajoene has displayed similar activity.

Two large studies in China and Italy have linked garlic consumption in humans to lower mortality from stomach cancer. The Iowa Womens Health Study found that women who ate garlic consistently had a lower risk for colon cancer. Another article found that garlic consumption was linked to lower risk of stomach cancer in Korea.

Both grapes and grape juice are rich sources of resveratrol, a specific type of natural plant chemical that belongs to a much larger group of plant chemicals called polyphenols. The skin of the grape contains the most resveratrol, and red and purple grapes contain significantly more resveratrol than green grapes. Grape jam and raisins contain much smaller amounts of this phytochemical. Wine also contains resveratrol, but alcohol has been consistently associated with increased risk for breast cancer and several other types of cancer, so wine is not a recommended source.

Several studies have found polyphenols in general and resveratrol in particular to possess potent antioxidant and anti-inflammatory properties. Resveratrol has been able to prevent the kind of damage known to trigger the cancer process in cell, tissue and animal models.

Resveratrol has been shown to slow the growth of cancer cells and inhibit the formation of tumors in lymph, liver, stomach and breast cells. Resveratrol has also triggered the death of leukemic and colon cancer tumors.

Since ancient times, tea has been used as both beverage and medicine. Both black and green teas contain numerous active ingredients, including polyphenols and flavonoids, which are potent antioxidants. One class of flavonoids called catechins have recently become the focus of widespread study for their anti-cancer potential.

In laboratory studies, green tea has been shown to slow or completely prevent cancer development in colon, liver, breast and prostate cells. Other studies involving green tea have shown similar protective effects in tissues of the lung, skin and digestive tract.

Studies that track the diets of human subjects over several years particularly studies conducted in Asia, where green tea consumption is common have associated regular usage of green tea with lower risk for bladder, colon, stomach, pancreatic and esophageal cancers.

Very recently, human clinical studies have begun to explore consumption of green tea among cancer survivors. Preliminary results suggest that regular consumption (3 or more cups/day) of green tea is associated with reduced recurrence of early (Stage I) breast cancer. Evidence for prevention of Stage II and III breast cancer recurrence is less consistent.

The soyfoods include tofu, soymilk, soybeans, soynuts, miso (soy paste), tempeh, soy burgers and soynut butter. Active ingredients in soy that appear to have anti-cancer effects are isoflavones (which have been the most studied), saponins, phenolic acids, phytic acid, phytosterols, and protein kinase inhibitors.

Laboratory studies involving soy have demonstrated a protective effect against cancer in the cells and tissues of the bladder, cervix, lung and stomach. Preliminary evidence suggests that diets high in soy may help make breast, cervical, ovarian, head and neck cancer cells more sensitive to the effects of chemotherapy and radiotherapy.

Soy appears to contain some components that resemble very weak forms of the bodys natural hormones. As a result, soy foods can mimic the actions of hormones under certain conditions and counteract these hormonal actions at other times. Because of such complexities, most of the studies that have investigated soys role in cancer development have dealt with hormone-related cancers such as those of the breast and prostate.

Soy has been shown to inhibit the growth of prostate cancer cells in a variety of laboratory conditions. In a large, human study, men who said they drank soymilk more than once per day for 20 years were found to have 70% lower prostate cancer risk than men who never drank soymilk. More recent human studies that have sought to determine the effect of soyfoods on hormones linked to prostate cancer have produced inconsistent evidence.

Soy has been associated with the inhibition of breast cancer cells in some, but not all, laboratory experiments. Diets rich soy have been shown to alter the metabolism of breast tissue in animal subjects in ways that may translate into added anti-cancer protection.

Several human and laboratory studies have suggested that consumption of soy early in life may help protect against breast cancer later in life. Results are less encouraging for a post-menopausal role. In fact, one recent analysis of available data concluded that soy consumption by adult women probably has little or no effect on either breast cancer risk or the survival of breast cancer patients.

The red or pink color of several fruits tomatoes, watermelon, papaya, pink guava and pink grapefruit comes chiefly from a carotenoid called lycopene. This potent antioxidant, together with a group of related compounds collectively called the red family, has displayed anti-cancer potential in a variety of studies. There is evidence that this potential is increased if tomatoes are consumed in a processed form that allows these natural compounds to be released and more easily absorbed, such as tomato sauce, tomato paste, and tomato juice.

Antioxidants can help protect against the kind of damage that gets cancer started, and the antioxidant nature of compounds within tomatoes has long been known. Recent evidence from laboratory studies suggest that tomatoes may help combat cancer in additional ways, at later stages of the process.In the laboratory, tomato components have stopped the proliferation of several cancer cells types, including breast, lung, and endometrium. Tomatoes have attracted particular attention from prostate cancer researchers because lycopene and its related compounds tend to concentrate in tissues of the prostate. In animal models, consumption of tomato compounds has been linked to large decreases in prostate cancer risk.

In fact, studies that compare the diets and disease rates of different populations have repeatedly associated diets high in tomatoes with lower prostate cancer risk, as well as lower risk of stomach and pancreatic cancers.

One study that tracked the diets of a large group of men for six years found that those who ate the most tomato products (cooked tomatoes, tomato sauce, pizza and tomato juice) had a 35% lower risk of early prostate cancer and a 53% lower risk of advanced prostate cancer than men who ate the least of these foods.

A few, small clinical studies have investigated how tomato components (or tomato-rich diets) influence the prostate health of patients who have been treated for prostate cancer. Results are encouraging, but preliminary.

Whole grains are rich in fiber, vitamins, minerals and hundreds of phytochemicals. They contain several substances that have each been linked to lower cancer risk, including fiber (both soluble and insoluble), antioxidants, phenols, lignans, phytoestrogens and saponins.

Because of the wide range of anti-cancer ingredients they contain, diets high in whole grains may decrease cancer risk in general, and specifically the growth rate of breast cancer, via several simultaneous and synergistic methods.

When data from 40 recent studies on whole grains and cancer risk were combined and analyzed, the risk for cancer was reduced by 34% on average in people who ate large amounts of whole grains compared to those who ate small amounts.

Winterize your body with nutritious, warming soup. If you have a busy schedule, soup is a great time-saver and fills you up without filling out your waistline. When you stoke soup with vegetables, whole grains and beans, youre adding foods replete with phytochemicals, the naturally occurring compounds in plant foods that work with vitamins and minerals to help boost immunity and fend off disease.

The soup most touted as a comfort food may be that soup of soups, chicken soup. Some scientific research shows that compounds in chicken soup actually seem to provide mild anti-inflammatory benefits that reduce mucus production, and lessen a stuffy nose or cough.

But in the pecking order of healthful soup ingredients, the chicken may be second to vegetables. Vegetables are loaded with natural compounds called phytochemicals that protect our cells from damage that can lead to cancer. A hearty soup is an easy way to slip in extra servings of vegetables, whole grains and beans that most of us dont eat often enough.

Whether its a broth or a bisque, starting a meal with soup can stifle the impulse to eat large portions later in the meal. Just make sure youre not ladling out generous helpings of broccoli-cheese soup or cream soups that are high in fat and calories. If you want a creamy texture, stir in some fat-free milk or evaporated skim milk.

Favorite vegetable soups like tomato, lentil and onion are teeming with valuable nutrients. Vitamin C-rich tomato soup provides a serving of vegetables in the liquid itself, and more can come from added vegetables. Lentils, from the legume family of dried beans, contain cancer-fighting fiber and folate. Beta-carotene, the phytochemical in carrots, sweet potatoes and squash, also can be a nutritious star in your bowl. These veggies can be steamed in the microwave for a few minutes, mashed, then mixed with broth and spiced up.

Although nothing surpasses soup homemade from scratch, it doesnt take much effort to create a soup without the salty, tinny taste of regular canned soups. Just start with a good quality store-bought broth that is fat-free and low in sodium. Add a handful of two or three frozen or canned vegetables to make a standard vegetable soup. Add canned beans and cooked pasta, and you have minestrone.

Homemade soups dont have to take long, either. Simply chop and steam carrots, sweet potatoes or winter squash in the microwave or on the stove for 5-6 minutes, puree and blend with that healthful canned broth until you have the desired consistency. Herbs, garlic and spices can punch up the taste and health protection of any soup as well. A dash of curry or chili powder complements squash or pea soup, and a dash of dill or thyme enlivens tomato soup. Flip through a cookbook for other seasoning ideas.

Of course, on a chilly weekend afternoon, a long-simmering pot of soup yields a superior stock. You can freeze extra portions for good eating in the days ahead. Even a simple vegetable broth will fill your home with an enticing aroma and your stomach with healthful phytochemicals.

Here is a vegetable soup recipe that taste-testers at AICR applauded for its rich taste and hearty supply of cancer-fighting nutrients and phytochemicals. With a hunk of fresh whole-grain bread on the side, youll have a gratifying meal.

In a large saucepan, heat broth to boiling. Stir in brown rice. Cover and cook, over low heat, for 5 minutes. Add vegetables and oregano. Simmer for about 5 minutes until the vegetables are tender. Add basil, cumin, salt and pepper. Ladle soup into bowls and sprinkle each with grated cheese.

The more physical activity you get, the better off you are. But you knew that already. To lower your risk for cancer and other chronic diseases, AICR recommends taking an hours brisk walk or similar exercise daily, and trying to exercise more vigorously for at least one hour every week.

Ready to start a real workout regimen? AICRs Getting Active, Staying Active shows you how.A Small Start is Still a StartFollow the instructions as you read along, and by the time you get to the end of this article, youll have completed a head-to-toe workout without leaving your desk.

These exercises emphasize flexibility and muscle tone. It may not be the kind of heart-pumping activity shown to improve cardiovascular health, burn calories and reduce cancer risk, but its a great way to take a mid-day break and keep up your energy.

Sit up and bring your shoulders back. Now lift them as high as you can. Slowly roll them forward and down again into the position you started. Now repeat the shoulder roll in the opposite direction. Repeat, alternating directions, four more times.

Once again, push your chair away from your desk. Reach down and place your hands under your left thigh. Pull your knee up toward your chest. Now extend your leg as far as you can and hold for two seconds. Repeat with your right leg. Repeat two more times with each leg.

Sit up straight and place your feet flat on the floor. Now press down with your toes and slowly lift your heels as high as they will go. Hold for five seconds, and lower them back down. Now lift your toes off the floor, pressing down with your heel, until you feel the stretch. Hold for five seconds, and lower your toes back down. Repeat, alternating heels and toes, four more times.

The Color Purple is in, from Broadway to the produce aisle. Asparagus, potatoes, broccoli, and tomatoes are just a few of the latest produce items with a deep violet hue showing up in grocery stores and nurseries. While purple produce may raise eyebrows, it also provides added compounds that research has associated with preventing heart disease and certain cancers.Spurring the developments of red-blue fruits and veggies are scientists from both the private and public sectors. With these eye-catching foods, researchers are looking to increase Americans' fruit and vegetable intake through novelty, distinct taste, or added health benefits.

Studies have found that anthocyanins (pronounced an-tho-SIGH-uh-nins) are powerful antioxidants. Antioxidants are compounds that can bind to and neutralize highly reactive free radicals that can lead to diseases such as cancer.

Photo courtesy of Institute for Culinary Arts, MCCresearchers first need to find foods with those genes. Conventional-colored fruits and vegetables in this country often have purple ancestors or distant cousins in other parts of the world.

Take the carrot. In the Roman era, purple and white carrots were a typical sight. By the 10th century, carrots were reportedly grown in Afghanistan and Pakistan, the purple soon joined by red, green, and black strains. It was only in the 15th or 16th century that the Dutch bred the orange carrot, in support of the House of Orange and its struggle for Dutch independence. (To read more carrot history and fun facts visit a virtual carrot museum, where you can also explore an actual museum dedicated to carrots.)The purple tomato reportedly traces its roots back to a wild species in South America that is poisonous.

Photo courtesy of Oregon State University Dept. of HorticultureCrossbreeding produced an edible strain and researchers say an anthocyanin-rich eggplant-colored tomato could come to market within the next few years. Purple asparagus was developed in Italy hundreds of years ago; purple potatoes are common in Peru.

Scientists are only beginning to study anthocyanin-rich fruits and vegetables. Early research has yielded positive findings. Studies have shown that the more reds and blues in a potato, the higher its antioxidant level. A study published last month in the British Journal of Nutrition found that laboratory rats fed anthocyanin-rich purple potato flakes showed significantly higher antioxidant activity than rats fed cornstarch.

Photo courtesy of Oregon State University Dept. of Horticulture the color of produce. There is, for example, a virtual rainbow of carrots available to the gardener - not only purple, but red, blue, yellow and white. Red carrots have increased levels of lycopene, a phytochemical found in tomatoes and associated with lower risks of prostate and breast cancers among other health benefits. Yellow carrots contain more xanthophylls, a substance found in plants leaves and related to eye health.Indeed, while purple fruits and vegetables can add visual zip and cancer-protective compounds to your menu, research has shown that people need a wide assortment of phytochemicals to provide good health. After all, the conventional carrot is packed with carotene, a compound that provides its orange color and is associated with lowering cancer risk. So, by all means, enjoy a little purple cauliflower or potatoes, but be sure to include a helping of those traditional greens, yellows, and oranges for a colorful health boost.This is the first in an occasional series of articles on Weird Foods.

Coping with Weight-Loss PlateausEven if you've stuck with a diet and exercise program for lower cancer risk, you may reach a point where your progress is stalled. It's called a "plateau," and it can be frustrating. Here are some tips on what to do.What makes people hit a plateau, even if they have been faithful to their diet or exercise routine? The reasons are complex, health experts say. In a number of different studies on weight loss in women, all dieters reported a plateau after about six months - regardless of the type of program they were following.Why Weight Loss May StallMetabolism is the rate at which energy units (called calories) are burned for functions needed to stay alive, such as digestion, growth, blood circulation and healing. When fewer calories are taken in, the body adjusts to the lower level and starts to burn energy more slowly while storing more fat to avoid starvation. This adaptation has evolved over thousands of years to enable humans to survive during times of famine. If calories are reduced too much, metabolism may slow down."Cutting 250-1,000 calories off what you have been consuming is okay, but eating fewer than 1,200-1,400 calories per day is too little for most people," says AICR Nutrition Advisor Karen Collins, a Registered Dietitian."Although a cut of 250-500 calories a day will be enough to bring weight to one level, you may reach a point where you are still consuming more calories than needed to lose even more weight," Collins says. "In that case, use vegetables and fruits as substitutes for higher calorie foods, so you can cut another 250-300 calories per day.""Dear Diary..."Another reason why weight-loss progress may be stalled is that the amount of food a dieter is eating has crept up over time without being noticed. To keep portions in perspective, it helps to keep a daily record listing foods and beverages with amounts, calories and times eaten. A daily record can give you a realistic picture of your eating patterns and where extra calories are coming from.Sometimes, weighing yourself too often can make it seem as though you are not losing weight. It's wise to get on the scale weekly, not daily, to check your weight, Collins advises. Hormonal changes, water retention and other variables in your daily physical condition can add or subtract pounds and give a misleading picture of how you're doing. Remember not to set an impossible weight-loss goal. Several studies and expert panels note that a "successful" weight loss is 10 percent of the starting weight. It's unrealistic to expect to become petite if your body type is tall or large-boned.If you feel discouraged in your weight-loss efforts, talk to someone who will encourage and identify with you. More and more studies show that positive thinking is definitely part of successful changes in health habits, including weight loss.Exercise to Boost Calorie BurningPlateaus may occur with fitness programs, too. To make progress with fitness, your muscles must be continually challenged by increased and different types of exercise.Strength training is an important part of a weight-loss program. More muscle mass burns more calories. If you are already lifting weights or using resistance bands, gradually add more weight and more repetitions - enough to tire your muscles out, but not more than is mildly difficult. Work different muscle groups on different days of the week, and don't do any group two days in a row.Changing your workout activities changes the set of muscles you are working. Less used muscles have to work harder and the amount of calories burned increases. This benefit applies not only to strengthening, but also to aerobic activity, which increases your heart rate and circulation. Try something new - such as brisk walking, jogging, dancing, or swimming. Alternate 5 or 10 minutes of slow movement with a period of faster movement, all in one workout, to create an "interval" effect.Before making changes in your exercise program, check with your physician. AICR recommends at least one hour of daily moderate exercise and at least one hour of vigorous exercise each week.

In small bowl, flake salmon using fork. Set aside. In medium bowl, beat eggs. Combine thoroughly with egg whites using wire whisk. Heat large nonstick skillet over medium heat. Coat with oil spray. Pour eggs into skillet and sprinkle with salt and pepper. Cover skillet and cook eggs for 3-4 minutes.When eggs are almost cooked, drop bits of salmon and cheese over top. Sprinkle with peppers and chives. Cover pan and continue to cook about 2-3 minutes until eggs are completely set. Serve immediately.Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 162 calories, 8 g total fat (3 g saturated fat), 4 g carbohydrates, 18 g protein, <1 g dietary fiber, 434 mg sodium.Oatmeal Peach MuffinsThese perfectly moist muffins are packed with nutritious, cancer-fighting ingredients. The peaches lend a sunny flavor, while the oats and whole-wheat flour contain phytochemicals and give you more fiber than most single slices of whole grain toast. Canola oil is a healthy fat and even the cinnamon contains health-promoting properties.

Preheat oven to 400 degrees. Coat 12-cup muffin tin with oil spray and set aside. In small bowl, combine all streusel mix ingredients and set aside.In large bowl, mix oats, flour, baking powder and salt. In separate bowl, whisk eggs with sugar. Whisk in milk, applesauce, oil and vanilla. Pour over dry ingredients. Mix just until combined. Gently fold in peaches. Spoon batter into prepared tins. Top each with streusel mix. Bake 20-25 minutes or until toothpick inserted comes out clean. Remove from oven and cool in pan for 5 minutes, then remove from pan and transfer to wire rack to continue cooling.Makes 12 muffins. Per muffin: 191 calories, 5 g total fat (<1 g saturated fat), 33 g carbohydrates, 4 g protein, 3 g dietary fiber, 184 mg sodium.Pomegranate-Apricot SparklerTangy pomegranate juice is popular because of its high concentration of phytochemicals that can protect cells from damage that may lead to cancer development. When it is combined with the sweet taste of apricot nectar, then lightened with sparkling water and a spritz of lime, you can turn it into a dazzling summer drink for guests.

In large bowl, toss spinach with cucumbers, carrots and radishes. Divide salad onto 4 individual serving dishes. In small bowl, combine remaining ingredients for dressing with fork. If creamier dressing is desired, mix in yogurt. Pour into dressing container and serve with salad.Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 52 calories, 4 g total fat (<1 g saturated fat), 5 g carbohydrates, <1 g protein, 2 g dietary fiber, 40 mg sodium.

Walking on a treadmill is an easy way to get an aerobic workout. It improves your circulation and balance while burning off calories and excess fat for lower cancer risk. But the secret to safe treading is to be hands-free.Using a treadmill is a wonderful way to get a regular aerobic workout that is personalized to your needs. You can regulate your speed, how much time you spend walking and even whether or not you want to tread uphill by setting the moving track at an incline.The advantages are many. Treadmills are used indoors, so the safety and weather hazards of walking outdoors are avoided. Their electronic screens tell you how many calories you are burning, how fast you are going and how much distance you are covering. Many offer preset programs to vary speeds and incline levels. Its always important to check with your doctor before starting to use a treadmill (or before starting any new exercise program). Another important fact to remember is: Try not to hold onto the handrails while you are treading, and pump your arms to keep them moving.Avoiding a Wrenching ExperienceWhen youre using a treadmill, its easy to feel as though you need to hold on to keep from falling. Yet holding on may cause some painful problems. Gripping handrails overstretches your back muscles and compresses your chest muscles. The result is a slumped posture. If you already have this condition, holding on while treading will make it worse. Holding on can also wrench the muscles and joints in your upper body when you grip the front bar and lean far forward, or hold on with only one hand. Your shoulder and hip joints tend to over-rotate, which can lead to repetitive stress injuries. Holding on can lower the amount of calories you burn on a treadmill because your weight is likely to be lighter on the track. Treading hands-off burns about 20 percent more calories, enabling better weight control and, therefore, lower risk of cancer and other diseases. Hands-free treading also avoids raising your blood pressure which may occur if youre gripping tightly, especially at a fast speed (3.5 miles per hour or more).Why Hands-Off Treading Makes SenseThe real world is full of uneven surfaces that you must walk on. Your brain constantly sends signals down your spinal cord to help you navigate. Sensors in your feet and legs relay nerve impulses to your brain, where they are interpreted as smooth asphalt, uneven pavement, lumpy grass, or a bed of pebbles, for example. Holding on to the treadmill interferes with these signals, deactivating your bodys balancing system and causing you to perform below your normal baseline of activity. When treading for improved health, you must perform above your baseline.Normally, you dont hold on to anything when you walk around. Your limbs and joints work in unison to support your full weight. Even if you only hold on lightly, you take valuable work away from many muscles. Essentially, holding on mimics using a walker.Tips for Treading WellIf youre afraid youll lose your balance or get dizzy, slow your speed to 2 mph, if necessary. Balancing is part of exercise and your body becomes more efficient only when challenged.If the machine tells you to hold on for heart rate because it uses sensors when you grip, let go after checking your heart rate. Also, if youre holding on because everybody else does it, remember that popularity doesnt make it right.Start out slowly and just let go. Concentrate on correct posture. As your body adjusts to treading hands-free, increase the speed or incline over time.

Adding more vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans to your diet can help bolster your overall health and reduce cancer risk. To help your body adjust to a mostly plant-based diet that is high in fiber, starting slowly is key.People who are eager to reap the health benefits of a high-fiber diet may try to do too much too soon. Similar to exercise, its wise to begin slowly when incorporating plenty of fruits, vegetables and whole grains into your diet for protection against cancer. In my gastroenterology practice, I often see patients consuming fiber to excess, says Antoinette Saddler, M.D., Assistant Professor of Internal Medicine at the University of Virginia Health Systems Digestive Health Center of Excellence in Charlottesville. They ingest a huge amount of fiber, eating multiple bran muffins for breakfast, lots of broccoli and so on. You have to increase your fiber intake gradually so that your body can adjust.Gradually adopting a mostly plant-based diet will allow you to enjoy the many health benefits while preventing possible side effects.Weeding Out ProblemsAlthough a plant-based diet can help prevent many health problems, it can cause some discomfort if not adopted gradually. Gas is one of the most common types of distress. When youre eating high-fiber foods, they pass into the colon where bacteria digest them. This process produces gas, says Dr. Saddler. People should introduce fiber slowly, chew their food well, minimize air swallowed and minimize how many carbonated beverages they consume.Enzyme supplements can help reduce intestinal gas that comes from fiber-rich foods. One very nutritious food that many people avoid for fear of developing intestinal gas is cooked dried beans. Unfortunately, they are missing out on a delicious, lowfat source of protein that also contains cancer-fighting folate and fiber, along with important minerals like potassium, magnesium and iron.According to Registered Dietitian Karen Collins, gas forms in some people because their digestive enzymes do not break down certain complex carbohydrates in these foods. Therefore, the foods ferment excessively in the large intestine and emit gas. She suggests that people who develop gas after eating cooked dried beans and peas should look for supplements that contain the enzyme alpha-galactosidase. You need to consume the supplements just before or at the same time you eat the food, says Collins. They cant be added to the food while it cooks. You also can lessen the gas produced by canned beans by rinsing them well. For dried beans, soak them several hours or overnight. Discard the water they soaked in before cooking them.Plant Foods and Digestive IllnessesSome people associate consumption of certain vegetables with heartburn as well as intestinal gas. But other factors are often more to blame.A high-fat meal, swallowing larger chunks especially of meats, and some common foods like orange juice can lead to heartburn in some people, says Dr. Elaine Feldman of the Medical College of Georgia. Caffeine, mints, garlic, alcohol and chocolate can cause heartburn and gastric distress too, as can lifestylefactors such as smoking, stress, rushing through meals, or lying down too soon after eating. Sometimes acidic vegetables and fruits, such as citrus fruits and tomatoes, may contribute to heartburn. Feldman suggests cooking tomatoes, onions and garlic to help offset any discomfort these healthful plant foods may cause.When you cook fruits and vegetables to ease digestion, use lowfat cooking methods (bake, broil, steam, stir-fry, or poach) and choose healthy fats (olive oil, canola oil, or another monounsaturated oil). Drink plenty of liquids including hot tea and fat-free, reduced-sodium broth. Last, but not least, exercise daily to help move waste through the system and prevent cancer.As for conditions such as diverticulitis and ulcers, Dr. Saddler says, People frequently confuse diverticulitis actual infection with diverticulosis, a condition of pockets in the bowel, she explains. Doctors may tell patients with diverticulosis to avoid small seeded items, but I have not seen definitive data that proves this prevents the condition. People with diverticulosis should eat a high-fiber diet to reduce developing pouches.She notes that a plant-based diet should have little or no impact on ulcers. People have heard through the years that spicy foods and acidic foods will cause ulcers, but this is a myth, Dr. Saddler explains. They should worry more about the aspirin and ibuprofen they take rather than the pizza they ate. (Most ulcers are caused by an infection of the bacterium Helicobacter pylori.) Fiber-rich foods also can relieve constipation. One of the great things about a plant-based diet is that it helps with bowel movements, Dr. Saddler says.There is a lot of constipation among older people because their colon motility slows down. They may have diseases or take drugs that cause constipation, she says. It is important to increase water when you increase fiber to help with constipation. Older people should drink fluids before they become thirsty, because the sense of thirst decreases with aging.

If your weight is satisfactory, you are probably eating the right number of servings to match your energy needs. If you are overweight, consider gradually reducing the number of standard servings in your regular portions.

Eat five or more servings a day of a variety of vegetables and fruits, all year round.Eat more than seven servings a day of a variety of grains, beans, roots and tubers. Prefer minimally processed foods.

Most researchers consider eating a mostly plant-based diet essential to reducing cancer risk. Vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans contain vitamins, minerals, fiber and natural substances called phytochemicals that can help prevent the development of tumors or slow down the cancer process.

Of all food items, vegetables and fruits are the most protective. There is convincing evidence that they protect people from cancers of the colon, stomach, rectum, esophagus, lung and pharynx. They probably also offer protection from cancers of the breast, bladder, pancreas and larynx. And they possibly also offer protection from cancers of the liver, ovary, uterus, cervix, prostate, thyroid and kidney.

It is difficult to interpret much of the existing data on red meat because there are several possible reasons for an increase in risk. Diets high in meat are frequently high in calories as well as high in fat. In addition, methods of preparation and preservation may play a role. Preservation, such as curing and smoking, may increase cancer risk. Diets high in cured meats possibly increase the risk of colorectal cancer.

Recently, attention has focused on the link between dairy products or, more specifically, milk and prostate cancer. A review of the current scientific literature suggests that the results of human studies so far are conflicting and contradictory. To date, the evidence is too inconsistent to warrant any recommendation concerning dairy products and cancer. But this is an area to be watched.

For many years, researchers believed that excessive dietary fat was a major factor affecting cancer risk. Recent research, however, has caused experts to regard other factors as more important. Nevertheless, AICR's landmark report concluded that diets high in total fat possibly increase the risk of cancers of the lung, colon, breast and prostate, and that diets high in animal fat and/or saturated fat possibly increase the risk of cancers of the lung, colon, breast, uterus and prostate.

The danger of a diet high in fat may come from the high number of calories, which can lead to overweight and obesity. There is convincing evidence that obesity increases the risk of colon cancer and post-menopausal breast cancer, as well as cancers of the pancreas, uterus, prostate, kidney, ovary and, indirectly, esophagus.

Stomach cancer rates are generally highest in those parts of the world where diets traditionally are very salty because meat, fish, vegetables and other foods are preserved by salting. This includes Japan and parts of China and Latin America. Populations that consume large amounts of salted fish also have an increased risk of cancer of the nasopharynx.

In general, excessive salt consumption is not as much of a concern in the U.S. However, it is prudent to be aware of the salt content of foods, especially processed foods. Sodium intake may be related to the risk of other health problems, including high blood pressure.

Grilling, broiling and barbecuing are considered high-heat methods of food preparation. These methods can lead to the formation of cancer-causing substances called polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs) and heterocyclic amines (HCAs). These substances can form when fat drips onto hot coals causing flare-ups or direct flame makes contact with animal protein fibers. Consequently, diets high in meat cooked at high temperatures possibly increase the risk of stomach and colorectal cancers.

Although the evidence is not strong at this time, it is reasonable to exercise care when preparing foods to decrease the formation of carcinogenic substances. Marinating meats before cooking, flipping frequently, removing all visible fat and microwaving for part of the cooking time can help to significantly cut down on cancer-causing substances. In addition, remove any char that forms on food before eating.

A convincing relationship has been shown between alcohol consumption and cancers of the mouth and pharynx, larynx, esophagus and liver. In addition, alcohol is probably linked to cancers of the colon, rectum and breast, and possibly related to lung cancer. The link is greatly increased if drinkers also smoke. In general, risk is related to the amount of alcohol that is consumed the larger the number of drinks the greater the cancer risk.

Although there is increasing evidence that modest alcohol consumption can decrease heart disease risk, alcohol is a known carcinogen. The risk of heart disease can be decreased in other ways, such as losing weight, cutting down on saturated and total fat in the diet, and increasing physical activity.

An energy imbalance (eating more calories than the body burns) can lead to overweight and obesity, increasing the risk of some cancers. There is strong evidence for an association of obesity with the risk of post-menopausal breast cancer and cancers of the colon, pancreas, uterus, prostate, kidney, ovary and, indirectly, esophagus. In addition, there is some consensus in the literature that overweight individuals experience an increased cancer risk, and that cancer risk generally increases as Body Mass Index (BMI) increases. A large prospective cohort study of non-smokers in the U.S. suggests that about 10 percent of all cancer deaths are caused by overweight.

It is believed that there may be a number of other factors behind the connections between overweight and obesity and cancer risk, besides calorie intake and physical activity alone. These other factors include rate of childhood growth, age at puberty, fat intake and circulating insulin levels.

Physical activity may help to decrease levels of insulin, and therefore may explain the decreased risk offered by regular exercise. More than 100 epidemiological studies have linked physical activity to reduced cancer risk, including cancers of the colon and breast.

Learning More About CancerMany people are uncomfortable thinking and talking about cancer. That attitude is understandable, but outdated. Today, being willing to talk about cancer and get the facts on prevention, early detection and treatment is one of the most important commitments you can make for better health.

The medical and research communities now know a great deal about cancer, and much of that knowledge can benefit you directly. You can learn how to reduce your risk of cancer and how to detect it early enough to improve your chances of a successful recovery. If you have cancer, you can learn more about your treatment options and how to live well as a cancer patient and survivor.

As with all health-related issues, an important resource in learning more about cancer is your personal physician. If you feel you need additional help, this booklet contains listings of organizations that provide authoritative, reliable information on preventing, treating and living with cancer.

Information from Cancer OrganizationsA large number of national and local organizations offer cancer-related information, support or direct services. Among these, three organizations stand out as comprehensive, reliable sources. Each one can provide a wealth of help, such as free educational materials, information and referrals to other resources.

Educational booklets and health aids, a Nutrition Hotline and information on cancer research programs are available at little or no cost. AICR also publishes CancerResource: A Resource Guide for Those Living with Cancer. This publication offers cancer patients information on treatment options, as well as additional listings of information and resources. Contact AICR for information, publications or help.

The NCI is part of the federal government's National Institutes of Health, an agency of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services. NCI coordinates the federal government's national research program on cancer and makes this information available to the public, physicians and health professionals.

The CIS is staffed by certified information specialists who provide accurate answers to questions about cancer prevention, detection, diagnosis and treatment. Resource materials used to respond to callers' questions are updated regularly by NCI.

A computerized database called Physician's Data Query (PDQ) provides information on state-of-the-art cancer treatments, clinical trials of current treatments, early detection and supportive care information. The CIS staff will also send you free educational pamphlets on cancer geared to your specific needs.

Dialing the CIS number automatically connects you with the regional office serving your area, allowing you to find information on resources available in your community. CIS operates from 9:00 a.m. to 4:30 p.m. ET, Monday through Friday. Spanish-speaking staff members are available.

Please note that sometimes the CIS number can be busy. Do not be discouraged if you can't get through to an information specialist right away the information you receive will be well worth the wait.In addition, callers have the option of hearing recorded information about cancer 24 hours a day, 7 days a week.

The cancer information available through CIS is also accessible on the NCI Web site. Here you will find a wide range of information about specific types of cancer taken from the PDQ, NCI cancer fact sheets and other publications. All information has been reviewed by oncology experts and is based on the results of current research.

ACS is a nationwide voluntary organization dedicated to eliminating cancer by sponsoring research, public education and patient care programs. Call the toll-free number 24 hours a day, seven days a week or visit their Web site for information and publications on cancer detection and research and for the location of your local chapter. More than 3,400 local ACS chapters assist cancer patients through a variety of patient and family education, service and rehabilitation programs.

Scientists now know that many factors contribute to an individual's risk of cancer. Many of these factors are within your control. Even though no one can predict exactly who will develop the disease, there are specific, simple steps you can take which may lower your risk. The organizations listed in this section can provide you with help in learning about cancer prevention and early detection.

AICR has developed a set of simple and practical guidelines to help people follow a diet for lower cancer risk. The guidelines are based on an analysis of more than 4,500 research studies published in the Institute's landmark report, Food, Nutrition and the Prevention of Cancer: a global perspective and represent the best advice science currently offers for reducing cancer risk. Call AICR to receive a free copy of the booklet, Simple Steps to Prevent Cancer. It explains the guidelines and how to make them a part of your everyday life.

AICR's free quarterly newsletter provides practical information for helping you follow a lifestyle to lower cancer risk. You will learn how to make wise food choices at home and in restaurants and receive current information on important cancer research.

AICR publishes more than 50 educational booklets and health aids to help you understand the link between diet and cancer, and to show you practical ways to follow a lifestyle for lower cancer risk. Single copies are available free of charge. Call for a publications catalogue or for information on ordering bulk quantities.

When you call AICR's toll-free number and ask for nutrition information, your call will be referred to a registered dietitian who will personally answer your questions on diet, nutrition and cancer. Dietitians cannot give medical advice.

Local ALA chapters offer information on smoking and health as well as smoking cessation classes, self-help support groups and video stop-smoking programs free on loan. Call or visit their web site for the location of the chapter nearest you.

Discuss early detection of cancer with your physician, who can teach you ways to examine yourself for breast and testicular cancer. In addition, he or she can perform simple tests and exams to help detect other forms of cancer.

AICR offers an information card on the correct way to perform a breast self-examination, along with a set of stickers that can be placed in the medicine cabinet, dresser drawer or on the calendar to serve as a monthly reminder. Call for a free copy or for information on ordering bulk quantities.

Several AICR booklets and pamphlets discuss prevention and early detection of common forms of cancer, such as breast cancer, colon cancer and prostate cancer. Call for free single copies or for information on ordering bulk quantities.

The CIS staff or the Web site can provide pamphlets on early detection of breast, prostate and other types of cancer. They can also help you find a mammography facility in your area that has been certified by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration.

The Institute studies the genetics of cancers that occur in families, gathers information and attempts to determine patterns that may help assess cancer risk within a family. People who might be interested in obtaining their questionnaire are those whose families have signs of familial cancer, such as cancer incidence at an early age, cancer in more than one close relative, more than one cancer in a close relative and/or more than one generation affected.

Write or call to obtain educational materials on hereditary cancers and a questionnaire to gather information. If appropriate, the Institute will follow up the questionnaire by talking to your physician.

AHRQ supports research designed to improve the quality of healthcare, reduce its cost and broaden access to essential services. The organization produces a range of publications and electronic information products about cancer. Requests for a copy of the latest publications catalog and publications on early detection may be made by calling the publications clearinghouse.

When people receive a diagnosis of cancer their first reaction is often shock, numbness and denial; that is perfectly normal. But as soon as the shock wears off the question most people ask is, "What can be done to help me?" Information is one of your most potent weapons against cancer.

Many people with cancer want to be very involved in making decisions about their treatment. They want to do all they can to find resources that will help them learn about the disease. If you are diagnosed with cancer, your first resource is your doctor, who can evaluate all the factors affecting your individual health status. Your individual circumstances will influence the decisions you make about treatment. The resources in this section and Section 6 can help you find out more about cancer in general and treatments for particular types of cancer.

Conventional treatment for cancer includes surgery, radiation therapy, chemotherapy and hormonal therapy. The following organizations can help you find out about the treatment for your type and stage of cancer. They can also point you to doctors, hospitals and other health care resources.

AICR has developed the CancerResource program to help cancer patients and their families gain an understanding of the disease, the treatment options and the various resources available. The materials in the CancerResource package provide information to help someone be an involved, active participant in fighting cancer. Packets are available for colon, prostate, breast and lung cancers.

The People Living with Cancer section of ASCO Online provides information on the diagnosis and treatment of cancer. It is written in easy-to-understand language and allows you to search for oncologists by name or geographical area.

Investigational treatment takes place as part of a research study. In an investigational treatment, all patients receive the standard therapy, for their type and stage of cancer. Some or all patients receive additional treatments that scientists are testing on people after they have successfully tested it in the laboratory.

Investigational treatments also called clinical trials are conducted according to strict scientific guidelines, called a protocol. Participants must be fully informed by the researchers about the investigational treatment before they agree to accept it. Much or all of the treatment is provided at no charge. In some cases, the investigational therapy is of no help; in others, it can lead to significant improvements. If the results are generally positive, the treatment may be approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration for use by the general public. More participants are needed for clinical trials at medical research institutions nationwide so that better cancer treatments can be developed.

Note that investigational treatments are different from unproven treatments. Unproven treatments are claimed as cancer therapies, but have no reputable scientific data to back up the claim. Laetrile is one example of an unproven treatment. All reputable investigational therapies must have approval from the U.S. Food and Drug Administration.

In addition to research programs at Comprehensive Cancer Centers, the National Cancer Institute sponsors clinical and laboratory cancer programs and clinical cooperative groups to investigate promising new methods of treating specific types of cancer. The CIS staff can give you information about programs that are investigating your type of cancer.

This center is the biomedical research hospital of the National Institutes of Health. It was specially designed to bring patient-care facilities close to research labs so that findings of basic clinical scientists could be moved quickly from labs to the treatment of patients. As a research facility, only patients with the precise kind or stage of cancer under investigation are admitted for treatment, and your doctor must refer you. Call the hospital or visit their web site for information on current clinical research studies.

Complementary and Alternative TreatmentsComplementary and alternative medicine (CAM) are healing practices that are usually not taught in Western countries medical schools or available in most hospitals. They also may include products that are not used by conventional physicians. Although scientific evidence exists for some CAM therapies, conventional medical research studies have not yet determined the safety or efficacy of most CAM treatments.

Surveys show that many people diagnosed with cancer use some type of CAM treatment during the course of their illness. CAM therapies may appeal to cancer patients who have not been satisfied with their treatment, who may have been told no options remain for them or that they have no chance of recovery. Others may try CAM therapies to avoid or find relief from pain or side effects of conventional treatments like chemotherapy and radiation.

Dietary regimens and vitamin and other supplements are among the CAM therapies cancer patients choose most often. However, researchers have found that many alternative treatments, especially nutritional supplements, interact negatively with chemotherapy and radiation. On the other hand, stress reduction therapies such as meditation, gentle yoga and support groups, are generally found to be safe and beneficial for cancer patients. It is extremely important to become informed by a variety of reliable sources before using any CAM therapies.

NCCAM is the federal government's lead agency for scientific research on CAM. NCCAM's mission is to explore CAM healing practices in the context of rigorous science, to train CAM researchers and to inform the public and health professionals about the results of CAM research studies. The NCCAM Clearinghouse provides information on types of treatments, current and completed research studies and guidelines for choosing a practitioner (although it does not provide medical advice or referrals to practitioners).

Biofeedback is a training technique by which patients learn to monitor their bodys responses to reduce stress and achieve relaxation. Some cancer patients have found biofeedback helpful as an addition to other pain control techniques or medications. The association provides educational materials for consumers on biofeedback, publishes a membership directory and provides referrals to trained practitioners.

Cancer Care, Inc. is a non-profit agency that helps patients with the emotional, psychological and financial consequences of cancer. Call the counseling line to get help with medical information, referrals to services in your area, free educational materials and information about teleconference educational programs and telephone support groups.

NCCS is a network of individuals and organizations concerned with cancer survivorship and the support of cancer patients and their families. Some of its affiliates run self-help groups in local communities. The national office can provide free publications on life after a cancer diagnosis, as well as a free quarterly newsletter. Legal advice on insurance or employment discrimination also is available.

Hospice provides support and assistance for patients in the final stages of cancer and for their families. Consumer brochures and other educational materials about end-of-life care are available. Contact the Helpline for information and for referrals to hospice services in your area.

A series of classes for patients and families that provides information about cancer diagnosis and treatment, as well as assistance in coping with the physical and emotional challenges of a cancer diagnosis.

A statement that describes the cancer patients right to be treated in a humane and non-discriminatory manner by health professionals, employers and others. Call the ACS national office to receive a copy.

The Wellness Community provides a full range of free support services to cancer patients and their families in a home-like setting at 20 facilities nationwide. Services include support groups, educational workshops, expert lectures and social gatherings.

For many people, one of the most stressful aspects of living with cancer is coping with the financial impact. Financial aid from organizations is usually very limited because of the great number of people needing help. When available, it may include equipment loans, home care at low or no cost or assistance with the cost of specific treatments or medications.

Aside from financial assistance, another important source of support is financial counseling helping you figure out how to pay your medical bills, and sometimes intervening on your behalf with doctors and hospitals to make financial arrangements you can afford.

Having cancer may also affect your ability to work. Sometimes people have to change jobs or limit their hours of work during cancer treatment. Most employers are eager to retain good workers and will work with you to find a suitable schedule. If you feel you are being treated unfairly on the job solely because you have cancer, you may be able to get help in dealing with your employer.

Social workers at your hospital can provide financial counseling and direct you to sources of financial and other assistance in your community. They may also help you arrange payment plans with the hospital and with your doctors.

Cancer Care, Inc. helps patients with the emotional, psychological and financial consequences of cancer. Call the counseling line to get help with medical information, referrals to services in your area, free educational materials and information about teleconference educational programs and telephone support groups.

Through this program administered by the Federal Government, many medical facilities and hospitals provide free or reduced-cost care to patients who are uninsured. Call for information about eligibility and a list of Hill-Burton hospitals in your area.

PAF helps cancer patients deal with insurance companies and managed-care treatment payments. It provides legal intervention, insurance negotiation and answers to frequently asked questions on managed care.

This program facilitates care and financial assistance for eligible veterans and their dependents at numerous VA medical centers and outpatient clinics throughout the country. The Web site lists VHA-designated comprehensive cancer centers, how to obtain access to clinical trials for cancer research and other information.

Even if you are receiving treatment at a hospital or treatment center near your home, transportation can be a major headache and expense. For help with local transportation, check with your hospital's social services department, your church or your local chapter of the American Cancer Society. To speak with your local ACS chapter, call 1-800-ACS-2345 or look in your telephone directory under "associations."

A national, nonprofit organization of more than 1,000 private pilots who fly ambulatory patients who cannot afford the cost of travel to medical facilities for diagnosis and treatment. Services are free of charge for patients who qualify.

Formerly the National Patient Air Transport Helpline, this service provides referrals and transportation assistance to patients with financial difficulties who need to travel to a distant medical facility for evaluation, diagnosis or treatment.

Cancer patients often have special nutritional needs, particularly during radiation or chemotherapy. With better nutrition, patients are more likely totolerate treatment. Good nutrition also can reduce the unpleasant side effects of some treatments.

Dietary Options for Cancer SurvivorsWith this easy-to-use guide (170 pages, $12), cancer survivors can check the scientific evidence before making dietary changes or taking supplements to maintain their health and reduce risk of secondary tumors and recurrence. Fully annotated, Dietary Options lists foods, food substances, herbals, supplements and dietary regimens and summarizes the research to date on their effectiveness.

Call AICR's toll-free number and ask for Nutrition Information. Your call will be referred to a registered dietitian, who will personally answer your questions on diet, nutrition and cancer. Dietitians cannot give medical advice.

The CIS staff can send you a booklet on nutrition during cancer treatment. Useful information on nutrition can also be found in two other booklets available from the Cancer Information Service: Chemotherapy and You and Radiation Therapy and You, guides to self-help during treatment.

With more than 400 chapters in the U.S. and abroad, ACPA provides help and support groups for those suffering from chronic pain that lasts longer than six months. Pain is managed through methods such as relaxation techniques, exercise, nutrition and family involvement.

The foundation provides peer support, information and advocacy. It provides information about pain care, pain drugs, patients pain bill of rights, finding support, end-of-life care and complementary andalternative medicine for pain.

BMT InfoNet provides publications and support to bone marrow, peripheral blood stem cell and cord blood transplant patients and survivors, including a resource directory and patient-to-survivor telephone service.

When you call AICR's toll-free number and ask for nutrition information, you will be referred to a registered dietitian who will personally answer your questions on diet, nutrition and cancer. Dietitians cannot give medical advice.

The Komen Foundation's hotline answers questions about breast cancer diagnosis and treatment, as well as other breast conditions. The hours are 8:30 a.m.- 4:30 p.m. CT, Monday through Friday. The hotline is staffed by trained volunteers who have personally experience with breast cancer. They make referrals to accredited mammography and treatment centers nationwide and will provide educational materials. Affiliates in major cities sponsor support groups and organize an annual "Race for the Cure." TDD is available.

This organization is an international network of support groups for parents of children with cancer. It provides newsletters, emotional support and information for parents. They also have newsletters and educational materials for young patients and their siblings. Chapters exist in many areas and several offer summer camps, transportation and emergency funds. Contact the national office for the one nearest you. Services are free.

This organization aims to improve the quality of life for children with cancer and to reduce the risk of cancer by promoting children's health through financial and in-kind assistance, advocacy, support services, education and prevention programs.

The Colon Cancer Alliance sponsors the Buddy Program for patients, their families and friends. The program provides information and support services, including personal stories, a buddies network and chat sessions.

Many local ACS chapters sponsor an Ostomy Support Program for people who have had ostomy surgery as a result of colon or rectal cancer. In some communities, this program may be offered cooperatively by ACS and the United Ostomy Association.

UOA is a national network that offers ostomy patients mutual aid, emotional support and information about the care of colostomies. Provides information to patients and the public, and sends volunteers to visit new ostomy patients.

The American Kidney Fund provides direct financial assistance based on need for patients with kidney disease, including kidney cancer. Covered expenses include medications, transportation costs, special dietaryneeds, home dialysis supplies, insurance and Medicare premiums and emergencyneeds.Call to receive an application and eligibility criteria. They also publish educationalpamphlets on dialysis and kidney disease in general; call for a publicationslist.

The Kidney Cancer Association is a membership organization made up of patients, family members, physicians, researchers and other health professionals. The association offers a broad range of services including distributing free educational publications about kidney cancer, holding patient meetings and hosting an informative website. The association also acts as a patient advocate with the federal government, insurance companies and employers.

The Leukemia and Lymphoma Society has 58 chapters that provide information, support and financial assistance for people with leukemia, lymphoma, multiple myeloma and Hodgkin's disease. In addition, patients can get referrals to local sources of help.

This organization provides funds for lymphoma research and educational information for lymphoma patients, as well as local support groups, patient services, educational programs, and small grants for basic treatment-related needs such as travel and child-care expenses.

The IMF offers a free information packet that includes a patient handbook, a summary of the disease and treatment options, patient-to-patient networking, a back issue of the newsletter a subscription order form, information on patient and family seminars, information on clinical conferences and myeloma specialist workshops. IMF publications include Living with Myeloma, and Goingfor The Cure. as well as on-lineinformation such as a patient handbook.

AICR CancerResource ProgramAICR has developed the CancerResource program to help cancer patients and their families and friends gain an understanding of the disease, the treatment options and the various resources available. The materials in the CancerResource package provide information to help someone be an involved, active participant in fighting cancer. Packets also are available for breast, colon and lung cancers.

When you call AICRs toll-free number and ask for nutrition information, you will be referred to a registered dietitian who will personally answer your questions on diet, nutrition and cancer. Dietitians cannot give medical advice.

The American Foundation for Urologic Disease provides educational information for the public, patients and healthcare professionals on prostate cancer. The foundation also offers a prostate cancer survivors network.

ECPCP provides educational materials and offers advice and counseling services from advisors who are prostate cancer patients and survivors. It helps callersobtain a thorough understanding of the disease and treatment options.

US TOO! is a network of support groups for men with prostate cancer and their families. Us Too groups offer fellowship, peer counseling, education about treatment options and discussion of medical alternatives.

SPOHNC is a patient-directed, self-help organization dedicated to meeting the needs of oral and head and neck cancer patients. It addresses their emotional, physical and humanistic needs through a telephone support hotline, a newsletter, a survivor network and other services. SPOHNC lists support groups nationwide on its Web site.

Your physician can help you find cancer treatment resources in your community. He or she may also be able to direct you to support groups and information about local agencies providing direct services to cancer patients.

Your local hospital is more than just a place to receive treatment, it is also the center of health care activities in your community. If your hospital has a cancer program approved by the American College of Surgeons, it usually offers extensive support programs for cancer patients as well as excellent care.

Many of the organizations listed in this booklet have local chapters around the country. Look in your telephone directory under "associations" or call the national office of the association for information about the chapter nearest you.

These agencies can provide information about treatment and home health services, particularly if you cannot pay for the care you need. They are listed in your telephone directory in the government listing sections for your state, county or city.

These agencies can provide information about community mental health services available to help you cope with the emotional aspects of cancer. They are listed in your telephone directory in the government listing sections for your state, county or city.

Referral services such as the Cancer Information Service and others listed in this pamphlet can help you locate local support groups as well as the nearest Comprehensive Cancer Center or other treatment resources.

In addition to providing emotional and spiritual support for cancer patients and their families, some churches may donate blood, provide some financial assistance or volunteer time to help cancer patients with meals, chores or local transportation to and from treatment.

Your own network of family and friends can be a tremendous source of emotional support both during and after cancer treatment. They can also provide assistance with daily living needs such as shopping, transportation to and from treatment, housekeeping and other personal needs.

Commercial on-line computer services are avenues of communication for cancer patients and caregivers. These electronic services provide basic explanations of disease and therapies, allow explorations of the medical literature and have e-mail and discussion groups for personal exchanges of questions and information regarding cancer. Using a computer, modem and telephone line, you can print out copies of brochures, communicate with online support groups, locate clinical trials and obtain up-to-date information on cancer. If you do not have a computer, contact your public or hospital library to find out if they offer computer access to patients or the public.

It is important to be cautious about cancer information on the Internet. The names of many cancer organizations are very similar, and what may sound like a familiar organization may not be. Most reputable cancer organizations will send you free information about what they do and about additional resources. The best way to get a realistic picture about cancer treatment options and approaches to recovery is to compare information from a variety of organizations before you make any decisions. Ask yourself if the information is presented in an unbiased manner, if it is sponsored by industry or a company, if the Web page title is misleading about the information, if the quality of writing and the references is good, and if it includes information about unheard-of therapies or information sources, which may be risky. Information from chat groups, news groups and similar forums may be from anonymous sources or those that cannot be evaluated for quality or validity. Always get input about your Internet search findings from health professionals and other cancer patients.

Healthfinder is a federal government consumer health and human services information Web site. It can lead you to selected online publications, clearinghouses, databases, Web sites and support and self-help groups, as well as government agencies and non-profit organizations that produce reliable information to help the public make better choices about health needs.

MEDLINEplus is a consumer-oriented gateway site maintained by the federal governments National Library of Medicine. It provides access to extensive information about specific diseases and conditions, drug information, dictionaries of medical terms and directories of health organizations, health professionals and health libraries. The site also provides free access to PubMed, the National Library of Medicines database of references of more than 11 million articles published in 4,300 biomedical journals.

The American Institute for Cancer Research for Cancer Research is a nonprofit, tax exempt organization whose purpose is to provide funding support for research into the relationship between diet, nutrition and cancer and to expand consumer knowledge about the results of such research as it relates to cancer prevention and treatment in the United States and worldwide. Contributions to AlCR are deductible for federal income tax purposes.

Other agencies in cancer research traditionally have been committed to chemotherapy, radiation and surgeryareas other than nutrition. And, recent budgetary restrictions have further squeezed nutrition to the fringe of their priorities. AICR, which was founded in 1982, is one of the main funding organizations that focus specifically on issues of diet, nutrition and cancer.

AICR provides a number of services that you can receive free at home or in your local area including the AICR newsletter, educational brochures, nutrition counseling, cancer information and referral, and from time to time educational seminars. If you would like more information on programs please call 1-800-843-8114 or visit our website at www.aicr.org.

WASHINGTON - Two new studies presented today at a large meeting of cancer researchers show strong links between specific dietary factors and cancer risk. The studies, though not yet published in peer-reviewed scientific journals, are attracting considerable attention.

Their findings will need to be published to allow the research community a chance to review them in detail, but the results reported in the media corroborate (and enlarge upon) research funded by AICR and other cancer research organizations.

AICR cautioned, however, that even if the new results are confirmed, they do not suggest that soy and fish are magic bullets against cancer. Loading up on any food, no matter how healthful, is not advisable.

Populations with high soy consumption have been associated with lower risk for breast cancer for decades, and many laboratory investigations involving breast cells and tissue have uncovered important connections to explain how soy may be protective.

The new study is important because it is the first to examine how childhood intake impacts breast cancer risk later on in life. It is a relatively large case-control study, involving 597 Asian-American breast cancer patients (cases) and 966 Asian-American women without the disease (controls).

In the study, women who reported eating the most soy foods such as tofu and miso between ages 5 and 11 had a 58 percent lower risk for breast cancer than women who ate the least. Among adolescents and young adults, smaller reductions in risk were observed.

A growing body of evidence suggests that certain cells are more sensitive to dietary influences at specific stages of life. Laboratory studies involving soy and breast cancer funded by AICR have demonstrated that, in animal models, such windows of opportunity occur during childhood and early adolescence, while breast tissues are developing.

The latest results from the Physicians Health Study, which involves 22,071 men, suggest that those who said they ate fish five or more times a week had 40 percent lower of risk of colorectal cancer than participants who said they ate it rarely or never.

The Physicians Health Study began as a double-blind, randomized, placebo-controlled study originally intended to study how aspirin and certain supplements influence cancer. To derive the new results, researchers reanalyzed data that the participants provided on a single food-frequency questionnaire shortly after the studys outset.

As such, one of the central assumptions of the resulting cohort study is that the men consistently maintained the diets they reported eating over the many years (nearly 20 years, on average) that the study progressed.

Nevertheless, the reported results are closely in line with published research. Omega-3 fatty acids (contained in fatty fish like salmon, tuna, sardines, bluefish, ocean trout, herring and mackerel) have been shown, in laboratory studies, to combat the kind of inflammation often associated with cancer development. These fatty acids have also stopped or slowed the growth of several different kinds of tumors, in animal models.

Additional explanations for the observed protective effect exist. People who consume more fish tend to eat less red meat (an established cancer risk factor) and also tend to be leaner, more physically active, and to eat more plant foods. This overall behavior pattern has been linked to lower risk for cancer and other chronic diseases. Additional research presented at Tuesdays meeting included a cohort study suggesting that high levels of dietary vitamin E helped protect smokers against the kind of damage that can lead to lung cancer, and a study linking low blood cholesterol levels in prostate cancer patients to improved outcomes.

NOTE: The studies were presented at the Frontiers in Cancer Prevention Research Meeting of the American Association for Cancer Research (AACR) in Boston. AACR is a large professional organization with a membership comprising thousands of cancer researchers. It is not affiliated with the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR), which is an independent cancer charity that fosters research on the diet-cancer link and educates the public about the results.

This new study offers further evidence that people concerned about cancer risk should consume a diet that is rich in a variety of fruits and vegetables and that is also low in red meat in general and in processed meats (hot dogs, cold cuts, sausage and bacon) in particular.

Adopting this overall eating pattern ensures a steady supply of vitamin C and other natural substances such as carotenoids, retinol and tocopherol, which have all been linked to lower stomach cancer risk in previous EPIC results.

The researchers examined the blood theyd sampled before the study began from 215 participants who have since been diagnosed with stomach cancer. They compared this blood to that collected from 416 controls. They then adjusted for the effects of several variables known to factor in cancer risk such as body mass index, smoking status, and H. pylori infection, in an effort to pinpoint the relationship between blood levels of vitamin C and stomach cancer risk.

But when the researchers examined the blood levels of vitamin C (which, for certain fruits and vegetables, can provide a more accurate indication of consumption than self-reporting) they found a strong protective effect. That is: they found that those subjects with the highest level of vitamin C in their blood had a 60 percent lower risk of stomach cancer than those subjects with the lowest levels.

Food manufacturers already add Vitamin C (in the form of ascorbic acid) to foods high in nitrite such as bacon and sausage to in an attempt to reduce the formation of N-nitroso compounds in the stomach. Getting plenty of vitamin C in the diet may add another layer of protection, this study suggests.

Its easier than you think to get enough vitamin C, even if youre not a fan of orange juice. True, citrus fruits and melons are loaded with it. But green, leafy vegetables like spinach, lettuce and kale offer plenty of vitamin C, and so do root vegetables like sweet potatoes, carrots, parsnips and yams. Youll also find vitamin C in artichokes, bell peppers, broccoli, Brussels sprouts, cabbage, cauliflower, and tomatoes.

Evidence linking red meat consumption to breast cancer is not new, but this study shows a strong association (nearly a doubling of risk) between the women who reported eating the least red meat and those who ate the most. Previous studies investigating this connection, which have produced inconsistent results, have tended to focus on older women.

The study confirms AICRs long-standing recommendation to limit consumption of red meat to less than three ounces a day. AICRs New American Plate campaign translates this advice to the plate: make meals in which vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans take up at least 2/3 of the plate, with meat and dairy taking up 1/3 or less.

Red meat includes beef, lamb, pork and veal. Although pork may look white when cooked, its nutritional composition places it in the red meat category. Venison, on the other hand, may seem to be similar to red meats, but because it comes from wild animals, it is not included in the traditional definition of red meat.

Some scientists believe that red meat increases risk for colon cancer because red meat contains higher levels of a particular form of iron, called heme. Heme iron seems to damage the lining of the colon and stimulate inappropriate cell growth. As we get more answers, experts should be able to determine which specific meats are riskier, and why.

Asking for seconds, cleaning ones plate, laying out extravagant meals for guests, wanting to fatten up a visiting loved one: all of these behaviors originally arose in times of food scarcity. The experts at AICR are asking an increasingly obese U.S. population to stop and think if these outmoded social niceties are worth the extra pounds.

Overweight and obesity have been associated with increased risk for chronic diseases such as heart disease and Type II diabetes for years. Researchers at AICR, along with others around the globe, are now uncovering evidence that extra weight means extra risk for many types of cancer as well.

Americans still greet guests with a hefty dose of calories (in the form of alcohol and appetizers) the moment they cross the threshold. At meals, we dole out the largest portions to guests and urge them to take second and third helpings.

Collins also noted that the preparation of hearty and satisfying (read: high calorie) meals is one way families express affection. For meal-makers, providing for ones family remains a source of pride. For meal-takers, refusing to indulge risks disappointing a loved one who has worked hard.

One classic social psychology experiment is designed to test how subjects intake of food is influenced by the presence of others, and by the eating behaviors those others exhibit. Scientists pair unknowing subjects with individuals who have been assigned to eat a great deal of food or very little.

A famous 1974 study showed that subjects who sat at tables where others ate very little decreased their own consumption by 29 percent, on average. Subjects who sat at tables where others ate a lot of food increased their own consumption an average of 25 percent.Subsequent studies showed that consumption increases when subjects eat with friends and decreases when subjects eat with strangers.

A collection of studies published in the British Journal of Nutrition in 1997 showed that, when subjects were asked to keep track of the meals they ate, they reported eating up to 44 percent more when dining with others than they did when eating alone.

Several possible reasons for this behavior have been offered. Groups of people eating together are more apt to include alcohol with meals, which increases a meals caloric content. Also, groups usually take longer (an average of 15 minutes longer) to eat a given meal than single diners, and a recent study in the journal Physiology and Nutrition showed that subjects who ate in groups did not eat more slowly than subjects who ate alone. Thus, during those extra minutes that the groups lingered over their meals, they simply continued to eat, which drove up their calorie consumption significantly.

Try putting these findings to work in your own home, Collins advised. Listen to your own body, not to what others are doing. Try being the one who makes it easier for others to eat healthfully. Take a little less at dinner tonight, and see what kind of influence your behavior has on those around you.

Emily Post Weighs InBut the social pressures that influence how much we eat arent always so mysterious and implicit. Emily Posts Etiquette, first published in 1922, explicitly discussed how reluctant guests should deal with hosts who press food on them.

It still is considered impolite to refuse dishes at the table, because your refusal implies that you do not like what is offered you. If this is true, you should be doubly careful to take at least a little on your plate and make a pretense of eating some of it, since to refuse course after course can not fail to distress your hostess.

Post goes on to say that such behavior makes you a seemingly reproachful table companion for those of good appetite sitting next to you.Post was by no means alone in this attitude; just a few years earlier, the U.S. Government itself was offering similar advice (for fundamentally different reasons).

Today, with high-calorie, low nutrient food cheap, convenient and ample, and an endless demand for convenience driving levels of physical activity lower than ever, there may be some old rules we cant afford to hold on to.If outmoded notions of common courtesy are making the problem worse, then its about time that common courtesy became a lot less common, said Collins.

Most Americans know someone with firmly held beliefs about why he or she cannot lose weight. AICR is targeting specific beliefs that have real potential for long-term harm: those that people seize upon to justify staying at an unhealthy weight.

And not every myth stays a myth. With a handful of findings (and a little PR know-how), enterprising individuals can turn a weight loss myth into a lucrative product. Many popular fad diets can be traced to the hype surrounding a specific surprising study or studies. The no-carb craze that seized the nation at the end of the 20th century is the most famous example, but bookstores are still crammed with quick-fix weight loss plans: no fat, no flour, no sugar, all juice, etc.

Behind the buzz, the hype and the myths, theres a single unassailable truth: if you want to lose weight, you have to place yourself into a state of energy deficit, by burning more calories than you consume. And that means eating less and exercising more.

Dr. Stevens is a nutrition epidemiologist with expertise in the role of diet and obesity in cancer risk. She heads a large research program focusing on the causes, consequence, and prevention of obesity in different populations. She has special interest in minority health, anthropometry and physical activity. She has been the Principal Investigator of the Coordinating Center for two large national trials that examined obesity and physical activity in children and adolescents.

Obesity and physical activity have only recently been recognized as important modifiable risk factors for cancer. Next to smoking, obesity and low physical activity may be related to as many cancer deaths as any other lifestyle factor. Programs to prevent obesity are fast becoming a focus of cancer prevention research alongside smoking prevention programs.

The AICR distinguished professorship is housed in the Department of Nutrition, a recognized leader in educating healthcare professionals in nutrition. The AICR distinguished professor provides senior leadership University-wide to mobilize intellectual resources and forge alliances to focus on research and education linking nutrition and cancer. The professorship was first awarded to Dr. Steven Zeisel, who was then Chair of the Nutrition Department. Dr. Zeisel is now the Schools Associate Dean of Research and a Kenan Professor.

Blood Samples Are KeyBut it isnt simply the sheer size and international scope of the EPIC project that excites AICR researchers. They praise EPICs comprehensive method of collecting dietary information and its rigorous study design, which includes internal methods of verification such as food diaries to help EPIC researchers standardize and validate their results.

These papers have examined associations between a host of factors in addition to specific aspects of diet, including hormone levels, body weight, genetic variation, air pollution and levels of physical activity.

Earlier this year, in a paper published in the March 1 issue of the Journal of the National Cancer Institute, EPIC researchers published data on meat intake and risk for stomach and esophageal cancers.

A study appearing in the August 1, 2006 issue of the International Journal of Cancer analyzed the blood of 1,141 EPIC participants with breast cancer and compared it to the blood of 2,204 matched subjects without breast cancer. Among women over 60 whose blood was given under non-fasting conditions, high levels of serum C-peptide a state of affairs that could reflect insulin resistance, long suspected of contributing to cancer risk was associated with a doubling of breast cancer risk.

Riboli admits that the associations between diet and cancer observed so far havent been uniformly strong, but points to the fact that the study only published its first results in 2001. As time goes on and occurrences of cancer increase in the study population, its likely that links will become easier to observe. He also stresses EPICs unique ability to analyze multi-factoral models overall dietary patterns in addition to links to specific foods in isolation such as fish, vegetables, meat, etc.

For their part, the AICR experts who follow EPIC so closely suspect that in science, as in most things, Americans tend to adopt a Made in America mindset. Research conducted in the US generates buzz and attention, while major international studies can sometimes get discounted, or dismissed outright.

Spurred by a new scientific review that reveals how the study of diet in cancer survivorship has been woefully overlooked and underfunded, AICR is issuing an urgent call to the nations cancer researchers and those who fund them.

WASHINGTON, D.C.  Although soups are sometimes ignored in summertime, they can be refreshingly effective in dealing with sizzling temperatures. And, as a starter or first course, they are useful in taking the edge off the appetite for dieters. Soups can also function as a light summer meal, served with a salad and bread and, from a health perspective, offer an interesting and easy way to increase daily servings of vegetables.

Both hot and very spicy dishes are often used in other culinary cultures to counter hot summer weather, on the theory that the accompanying sweating produces a cooling effect. But, according to Karen Collins, AICRs Nutrition Adviser, whether or not you use soups for this purpose they are an excellent way to start a meal.

Although most people think making a basic chicken soup from scratch is time-consuming, Collins asserts that it is possible to make one that is low in fat and sodium but still richly flavored, without a lot of time or work on the part of the cook.

In this recipe, the chicken is gently simmered, a technique that is especially useful with breasts, which can easily dry out in the cooking process. However, for maximum flavor, thighs or other parts of the chicken are recommended.

In some Asian households, a small amount of Mirin, a cooking rice wine, is used in making mild broths in order to impart a delicate flavor and umami, or mouth feel, to substitute for unhealthful fats. This custom has been adapted and also adopted for use with the Mediterranean and Caribbean versions, but in each case, the alcohol-based flavoring can be omitted.

Heat the pot, uncovered, over high heat until the water comes to a boil. Immediately reduce heat until the liquid is simmering gently. Continue simmering, occasionally skimming the froth that forms on the surface, for 35 to 40 minutes, or until the meat is thoroughly cooked. To prevent overcooking, a thermometer can be used; the chicken is done when it reaches 165 degrees.

Remove the chicken from the pot and set aside until cool enough to handle. Wrap tightly in plastic wrap and refrigerate until ready to use, 1-2 days. Using a large colander or sieve to strain out the other ingredients, transfer the broth to a large container. Discard strained ingredients. Chill broth in the refrigerator or freezer until the fat has hardened at the top of the broth. Remove the fat and discard. Use the broth to make soup or transfer into small containers suitable for personal use and freeze for future use.

Place mushrooms in a small bowl and add 1 cup hot water, or enough to cover. Soak until mushrooms are soft. Drain mushrooms, reserving water. Remove stems from mushrooms and cut any large mushrooms into bite-sized pieces.

The proportion of African-Americans diagnosed with more advanced-stage cancer is significantly higher than Whites, which leads to a shorter survival time, Jones said. In fact, African-Americans make up only 8 percent of todays cancer survivor population.

In addition to limiting access to screening and other aspects of healthcare, living below the poverty line also increases the prevalence of known modifiable cancer risk factors such as obesity, tobacco use, and poor diets, Jones said.

Colon Cancer: A Growing DivideColon cancer is the now the third leading cause of cancer deaths for both Black men and women, and the difference in mortality rates compared to Whites has widened substantially over the last 25 years, Jones said.

An estimated 17,000 African-Americans are diagnosed with colon cancer each year, making it the second most common cancer among Black women and the third most common cancer among Black men. Yet only 28 percent of the African-Americans reported having a colonoscopy within the last five years.

Just 35 percent of colorectal cancer in Blacks is detected at an early, localized and more easily treatable stage. Consequently, only 50 percent of African-Americans with colon cancer survive for five-years after diagnosis, compared to 64 percent of Whites.

Dr. Jones introduced AICR grantee Dr. Stephen OKeefe, whose research comparing the diets of native Africans and African-Americans is uncovering a new link between diets high in meat and colorectal cancer.

Sulfur-reducing bacteria, whose growth is stimulated by the high sulfur content of meat. These bacteria produce hydrogen sulfide that is toxic to colon cells.7-alpha-dehydroxylating bacteria, whose growth is stimulated by bile acids the body synthesizes in response to fat in the diet. These bacteria convert bile acids into secondary forms which are carcinogenic in experimental models.

Native Africans, who said they ate a staple diet high in corn meal (carbohydrate) and low in animal meat and fat, had more of the good methanogenic bacteria and Lactobacilli planatarum, a bacterium that has been shown to help protect the lining of the colon from the kind of damage that can spark cancer. Polyps were found in only one Native African subject.

His focus on the issue of colon cancer in African Americans began when he moved to the US from Cape Town, South Africa. In Africa, Dr. OKeefe clinical and research interests were nutrition and gastroenterological diseases in underdeveloped countries. Upon moving to Richmond, Virginia, he noted that colonoscopies of African Americans were turning up many more adenomas (colon polyps which can become malignant and lead to cancer) than he ever saw among Native Africans.

Other research presented at the two-day conference examined the roles of exercise, fiber, chronic inflammation, vitamin C, soy, and host of other dietary factors. Panels also focused on the issue of diet in cancer survivorship, and the technologies that are allowing researchers to investigate how diet influences patterns of gene activity in cancer cells.

He spoke at the end of a press conference in which Dr. Stephen OKeefe of the University of Pittsburgh described his research associating high incidence of colon cancer among African Americans with that groups meat intake, which is higher than the national average. Dr. OKeefes work focuses on gut bacteria that produce carcinogenic by-products when intake of meat is high. AICRs Prince cited OKeefes small but suggestive study as one of many exploring the relation of meat to colon cancer.

For years, research on colon cancer had linked high intake of fiber to lower risk of colon cancer. Scientists consistently observed that populations consuming diets high in fiber had lower risk for colon cancer.

Laboratory studies suggested a number of plausible mechanisms to explain the connection, including fibers tendency to bind to potentially harmful bile acids, and its capacity to increase the bulk of matter moving through the intestine. This increase in bulk helps the body eliminate waste faster, reducing the amount of time the sensitive tissues lining the colon spend in contact with dietary carcinogens.

Clinical Trials Find No LinkBut the notion that fiber helps prevent colon cancer was dealt a serious blow in 2000, when three separate clinical trials (two appearing in the New England Journal of Medicine, and one in The Lancet) found no significant association between fiber intake and risk for colon polyps, which are often precursors to colon cancer.

Nevertheless, those clinical trials and inconsistent results from cohort studies (which track the diets and disease rates of large groups of individuals over several years) have convinced many that fiber intake is not associated with colon cancer risk. With the fiber theory in eclipse, focus has shifted to other potential dietary connections such as fat, lack of folate, sedentary lifestyle, obesity and of the course the intake of red and processed meat.

Meanwhile, Evidence Linking Meat, Colon Cancer BuildsThe association between meat and colon cancer has been observed in several large cohort studies. In January 2005, for example, a study published in the Journal of the American Medical Association (JAMA) found that among 148,610 adults aged 50 to 74, those with the highest long-term consumption of processed meat (sausages, ham, bacon, and cold cuts) had a 50 percent higher risk of distal colon cancer (a section of the colon near the rectum) than those who ate the least. This relationship was present even after researchers adjusted for the impact of weight, exercise, fruit/vegetable/whole grain intake & vitamin supplement use on colon cancer risk.

In June 2005 the most comprehensive cohort study ever undertaken, the European Prospective Investigation into Cancer (EPIC), reported in Journal of the National Cancer Institute (JNCI) that among its nearly half-million participants, those subjects who ate the most red meat and processed meats (about 6 ounces a day, on average) had a 35 percent greater risk of developing colon cancer compared to those subjects who ate the least of these foods.

Laboratory research exploring the meat-colon cancer connection at the cellular and molecular level has come up with many plausible reasons for the observed increase in risk. Several components of meat have been shown to cause tumors in the laboratory, such as heme iron (a blood pigment found in red meat), the combination of nitrate, nitrosamines and salt (found in processed meats), as well as heterocyclic amines and polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (found in meats cooked over high heat.) Dr. OKeefes work suggesting that meat intake has a direct and potentially risk-increasing effect on gut bacteria represents an exciting new addition to these existing theories, Prince said.

Prince noted that several presentations and posters related to diets role in colon cancer are scheduled to be presented at the two-day AICR International Research Conference of Food, Nutrition and Cancer in Washington, DC. Among them are studies exploring the role of meat intake, as well as studies that continue to uncover evidence of a protective role played by fiber.

In fact, since those three clinical trials that failed to find a fiber-colon cancer link were published in 2000, evidence that fiber can indeed help prevent colon cancer has continued to appear steadily in the scientific literature.

AICR is also sending hundreds of New American Plate posters to the regions medical centers and schools, which illustrate the central concept behind the nutrition education program in a bold, colorful, easy-to-understand way.

Chief among these are diabetes, hypertension and other diet-related conditions, Kasofsky said. Nursing services at the regions behavioral health centers and satellites will disseminate AICR materials to evacuees. A federal block grant has also allowed local officials to hire nutritionists to help individuals make healthy, everyday changes in how they eat. Several nutritionists will go out into the community to reach those who cant make it into the regions clinics and health centers.

The job of educating individuals about healthy eating is made a bit easier by AICRs New American Plate materials, Kasofksy said. Were grateful to AICR for donating these brochures and posters. Most importantly, of course, the information they provide is accurate and up-to-date.

The New American Plate switches the proportions found in a typical American meal. It offers guidance to help shift the focus away from meat and onto vegetables, fruits, whole grains and other plant foods. The brochure gives practical advice and recipes for making meals where plant foods take up 2/3 or more of the plate, and animal protein takes up 1/3 or less.

In conjunction with its yearly International Research Conference on Food, Nutrition and Cancer, AICR will hold a news conference on July 13 to present new data suggesting that high colon cancer rates observed among African-Americans have a biological underpinning related to diet.

Jeffrey R. Prince, AICR Vice President for Education, will provide a state-of-the-research overview on diet and colon cancer, with a special focus on how recent controversies surrounding the roles of fiber and meat are affecting efforts to provide practical, evidence-based guidance to the public.

Heat the oil in a large heavy pot over medium-high heat. Add onion and garlic and gently saut? until onion is translucent and garlic is golden, about 5 minutes. Add tomatoes with juices, jalapeno chilies, chili powder, cumin, chives and bay leaf. Cook 10 minutes, stirring occasionally. Add beans, bell peppers, corn and chocolate (if using). Reduce heat to medium-low and simmer until chili is thick, stirring occasionally, about 35 minutes. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Stir in cilantro. Adjust seasonings if needed, adding more chili powder or hot sauce to taste. Remove bay leaf before serving. Serve with corn bread and low fat cheese.*Any type of canned diced tomatoes can be used. Canned northern or garbanzo beans (drained and rinsed) can be used in place of red kidney beans.

Preheat oven to 350 degrees. In blender, puree squash, milk, eggs, brown sugar, pumpkin pie spice and salt until completely mixed. Pour into graham cracker crust and bake for 45-55 minutes or until the pie is set in the center.

A Heaping Helping of Tomatoes by the American Institute for Cancer Research Lycopene, a phytochemical in tomatoes and tomato products, could possibly be used to prevent or treat skin cancer caused by UVB rays. Although lycopene has been shown to reduce lower risk of breast and prostate cancers, it has never been tested as a preventive agent against UVB-induced skin cancer. Epidemiological studies show, however, that those who consume more lycopene have less skin cancer.

Found primarily in tomatoes, lycopene is a phytochemical that acts as an antioxidant, like many other phytochemicals in vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans. Lycopene is more available for absorption after the tomato is processed. Some of the most common ways of consuming lycopene are in ketchup, tomato sauce, tomato soup and tomato juice.

Although every little bit helps, tomato-based foods we eat in larger portions can provide more lycopene. For example, one-half cup of tomato sauce provides about 19 mg. of lycopene, while one cup of tomato juice provides about 23 mg. One tablespoon of ketchup provides only 2.9 milligrams (mg.). You could eat seven tablespoons (almost half a cup) of ketchup to get the same amount of lycopene in the tomato sauce and juice examples above, but you would also consume half a days worth of sodium and about six teaspoons of sugar.

Melt butter in a small Dutch oven over medium-high heat. Saut? onion until translucent, 4 minutes. Add garlic and saut? until the onions are golden, 5 to 6 minutes. Add tomatoes with their juices, sugar, thyme, mace and cayenne. Bring to a boil, cover and simmer the soup until the tomatoes and onion are soft, about 15 minutes.

Tai chi is so gentle that its hard to believe it is actually a martial art. The names of some of the exercises are poetic: waving hand in the cloud or pushing the mountain. But like other Asian martial arts, such as judo and karate, tai chi cultivates calm focus of the mind required to breathe correctly while doing the exercises.

Many different schools and styles of tai chi exist. Most pattern their movements on agility observed in animals. Legend has it that a 15th century monk, Chang San-Feng, watched a fight between a bird and a snake. He observed how the yielding movements of the snake could overcome the stiff attack movements of the bird. The bird was allowed to use up its energy in attacking, which the snake dodged. When the bird was exhausted, the snake fought back and won.

We humans may not be as nimble as animals, but we can still practice tai chi exercises to offset arthritis, improve our circulation and muscle strength and, in turn, bolster our immune function, which can help offset cancer risk.

Here are examples of two simple tai chi exercises:Leg strengthener. Stand with your feet hip-width apart and knees slightly bent, with arms rounded in front of you as though you were hugging a tree. Keep your back straight and limbs soft while holding this position for as long as you can. At first, you may stand with your back lightly against a wall to keep your balance until you get the hang of the exercise. Your leg, arm and back muscles are strengthened by performing this exercise for a few minutes each day.

Spine warm-up. A second easy tai chi exercise involves standing with your feet approximately 24 inches apart and legs slightly bent. Turn from the waist and keep your hip bones facing forward and still. Swing your arms loosely from side to side, with your shoulders and head gently following. Do this for several minutes while breathing deeply and slowly.

Tai chi classes can now be found through county recreation departments, YMCAs, churches, community centers and even through some health maintenance organizations. For more information, consult the Web site of the American Tai Chi Association, http://www.americantaichi.net/, or look in your local library or bookstore for tai chi videotapes and books.

A: They dont need to be. Roasting is a terrific way to prepare many vegetables, because it intensifies flavors and brings out a natural sweetness. To roast vegetables, cut them into bite-sized chunks, place them in a thin layer on a large baking tray and drizzle them very lightly with olive oil, or lightly coat with a cooking oil spray. Bake them at 400 or 425 degrees for 30 to 40 minutes, until they are lightly browned and tender, but not mushy. Baking time will vary with the vegetables you use. Almost any vegetable roasts well, except tender greens or delicate snap peas. You can serve roasted vegetables straight from the oven as a side dish, or let them cool to room temperature before splashing them with balsamic vinegar to make a roasted vegetable salad. Zucchini, bell peppers, Portobello mushroom and onions make a great roasted combo. You can also turn them into a vegetarian main dish by adding some toasted nuts and a little Parmesan cheese and serving it with whole-grain bread. Roasted vegetables are also great as pizza toppings or pita fillings, or served sliced over whole wheat pasta or brown rice.

Q:Does the vegetable called jicama have any nutritional value? How is it prepared? A: Jicama (the j is pronounced like an h) is a root vegetable that looks like a cross between a turnip and a potato. You can peel it, slice it into strips and serve it raw in salads or with a lowfat dip. You can also cook it by steaming, stir-frying, or oven roasting. Jicamas have a mild flavor and crunchy texture. You should choose smaller ones because theyre less woody. They should be free of bruises. A whole cup of raw jicama contains only about 50 calories. They are an excellent source of vitamin C and a good source of dietary fiber.

Although the women were supposed to reduce their dietary fat to only 20 percent of their calories, most did not get very close to that goal. For many, the fat content of their diet began at 38.8 percent and ended at 29.8 percent. To see if cutting back on the amount of fat alone can influence weight, these women were instructed to eat more carbohydrates as they ate less fat to try to maintain their initial weight.

Women on this lowfat diet reportedly reduced their calorie intake by an average of about 360 calories a day. This decrease in calories should have led to a significant weight loss, but the women lost less than two pounds in seven years.

Can people lose weight by cutting back on fat without changing their exercise habits or trying to reduce calories? For the group of women over age 50 in this study, the answer was no. Like these women, if you cut your fat intake but substitute other foods to maintain the same calorie intake, you shouldnt expect to lose weight.

In todays world of large portions and constant food availability, simply eating healthy food like whole grains, vegetables and fruits without consciously cutting back on your portion sizes and unnecessary eating is unlikely to cause weight loss. Creating enough of a change in your balance of calories consumed and burned to produce weight loss almost always requires eating fewer calories and physical activity.

For people already at a healthy weight who want to avoid the usual adult weight gain that increases cancer risk, the modest fat and calorie reduction that women on a lowfat diet achieved in the WHI study may be enough. However, other studies show that many adults need 45 to 60 minutes of exercise a day to avoid overweight. The women in this study had a wide range of activity levels, but only walked for 30 minutes at a moderate pace, six days a week. For optimal health, the American Institute of Cancer Research recommends at least an hour a day of moderate activity, like a brisk walk.

Whether eating a lowfat diet may prevent breast cancer at all was not addressed by WINS. Until more research is done, AICR recommends eating a diet that is 2/3 (or more) plant foods and 1/3 (or less) lean meat and lowfat dairy products and to use healthy fats, such as olive oil instead of saturated fat like butter.

The phytochemical lycopene is a good example of how cancer prevention research is evolving. Research on this phytochemical, found in tomatoes and some other vegetables and red fruits, like watermelon, shows promise as protection against prostate cancer. Scientists also have found that lycopene from cooked tomato products  such as tomato paste  is more easily used by the body than lycopene from fresh tomatoes.

Now lycopenes anti-cancer effects are being researched in combination with broccoli. John W. Erdman, Ph.D., Professor of Food Science and Human Nutrition at the University of Illinois at Urbana, decided to see if cancer protection would increase if participants ate both foods.

Dr. Erdmans team fed one group of rats only broccoli powder and another group only tomato powder. Each contained all of the individual plants phytochemicals and nutrients. Still another group received a combination of tomato powder and broccoli powders. A final group of rats was fed a normal diet supplemented with finasteride (a drug prescribed for an enlarged prostate, a noncancerous condition).

Fruits are being studied as well for this synergistic effect. Rui Hai Liu, M.D., Ph.D., Associate Professor of Food Science at Cornell University, has examined antioxidant activity in various fruits. Although Dr. Liu found that cranberries had the strongest phytochemical activity of 11 fruits he studied, he says, The antioxidant activity of cranberry and apple together is much higher than the separate measurements for these fruits, he says.

Dr. Liu estimates that there are probably more than 8,000 phytochemicals in plant foods, and each one works with others to perform many protective functions. These include stimulating the immune system, warding off damage from free radicals and putting the brakes on cell growth.

Eagles and Rafter both had athletic backgrounds, Adrian as a competitive swimmer and Brad as the captain of his high school varsity soccer team. But both boys also realized that what they were undertaking required training and special knowledge. They prepared for their ride with a thorough training program, working up to the 100 mile per day distance that was the target for the planned 15-day ride. They also consulted with local riders, getting help in mapping out a safe route and advice on needed supplies for the trip.

The American Institute for Cancer Research is honored to be the recipient of the funds raised by these hard-working and generous young men. Their efforts, initially a surprise to former teacher Parnas, ended up being an important emotional support for her in her fight against cancer, and gave her hope that more people would become aware of the deadly side of melanoma, a skin cancer usually associated with overexposure to the sun.

From Montgomery, Alabama, Toni organizes the annual Swing-a-thon marathon to raise funds for cancer research through the American Institute for Cancer Research. Since 1995, Toni and her fellow marathon participant, cousin Brandi Smith, have raised more than $35,000 for cancer research. Each year the two girls spend 48 hours or more on the wooden swing in Toni's front yard to raise funds and draw attention to cancer prevention.

Both girls have worked to make the marathon a success by soliciting support from local businesses and media. Area stores set up a number of collection boxes in support of the girls' project, several newspaper articles helped promote their efforts and a local radio station provides ongoing coverage and support for the marathon.

For Toni, the swing-a-thon was a reaction to the effect of cancer on her own family. As a ten-year-old she lost her grandmother to cancer, and then, shortly after, two aunts also lost their battles with cancer. Toni became determined to make a difference in the fight against cancer. The next step was convincing her parents, Rita and Earl Fowler, to let Toni attempt it and then to get her long time friend Bonnie Jackson (who swung with Toni for the first three years of the marathon) to join her.

As a result of Toni's work on the swing-a-thon, Rosie O'Donnell invited her to appear on the nationally televised Rosie show and share the details of her swing-a-thon and fund raising efforts for cancer research.This year marks the eighth consecutive year of the marathon. Each year it has grown in visibility and popularity, drawing extensive media coverage, strong support from area businesses, and a large number of visitors to Toni's neighborhood to make donations and talk with the girls about their efforts. Toni also distributes AICR brochures to educate visitors about reducing their cancer risk.

Toni's efforts have brought her well-deserved recognition. She was named top youth volunteer in Alabama for the year 2000 in the Prudential Spirit of Community Awards program, an honor that earned her and her family a trip to Washington, D.C., an engraved silver medal and a $1,000 award for her efforts.

The swing-a-thon is very much in keeping with Toni's busy life. She was involved in a variety of activities in high school, including student counsel, cheerleading, the yearbook, the student newspaper and much more. She will no doubt continue this trend as she heads to college in Mobile, AL.

Holwitz believes Americans are ready for something more comprehensive and more comprehendible than the kind of low-cal, low-fat, or low-carb regimens that lead to bland, monotonous meals and yo-yo dieting.

The book lays out an entirely new model for making meals one that gently shifts the focus away from meat and onto vegetables, fruits, whole grains and other plant foods. The New American Plate approach employs international culinary techniques to add complex flavor, texture, color and aroma without adding fat and calories.

Jeff Prince, AICR Vice President for Education, is a lead member of the team of chefs, food writers, nutritionists and scientists who authored the cookbook. He believes that the time is right for the books refreshing new approach.

Certainly, other cookbooks have made similar claims over the years. Prince insists, however, that the team behind New American Plate Cookbook was careful to avoid the classic missteps of healthy cookbooks: Too often they cut back on fat, salt or sugar without regard for how such changes fundamentally alter a recipes overall appeal.

In fact, New American Plate Cookbook reshapes the plate so that a variety of vegetables, whole grains, beans and other plant foods take up at least 2/3 of the space, leaving only 1/3 or less for animal protein.

Not only does this layout switch the proportions found in a traditional American meal, it flatly contradicts the low-carb craze that has seized America over the past 5 years. And the authors couldnt be happier about that.

New American Plate Cookbook arrived in bookstores at precisely the right moment to distill these disparate elements into a single, easy-to-use meal model, Prince said. The timing couldnt have been better for a simple and delicious way to eat that doesnt involve counting calories, fat grams or servings of specific kinds of food.

The new Dietary Guidelines for Americans, released in January 2005, issue a major challenge regarding vegetables. The average adult needs to boost their consumption of dark green vegetables by 200 to 300 percent. We currently eat so little of these foods that our health is suffering.The latest dietary recommendations suggest that most adults should eat three cups of dark green vegetables a week. To reach this amount, you could have a half-cup serving almost every day, or larger servings several times a week. If that seems like a lot of vegetables, thats because Americans seldom eat them. One consequence of this poor eating habit is that American diets tend to be low in potassium and magnesium. Dark green vegetables provide these minerals that are linked with healthy levels of blood pressure and blood sugar.Not only do we seldom eat them, however, many of us walk into grocery stores and never notice, or even recognize, many of the dark green vegetables there. Next time youre in a grocery store, go on a green vegetable hunt, looking for these nutritious, delicious treasures.Romaine lettuce  and even darker green leafy vegetables like spinach, Swiss chard, kale, collard greens, mustard greens and turnip greens  contain beta-carotene as well as the carotenoid cousins called lutein and zeaxanthin. Beta-carotene, lutein and zeaxanthin are all powerful antioxidants that seem to play a role in blocking early stages in the development of cancer. Some studies even link them with a lower risk of breast, lung and skin cancers. In addition, lutein seems to help slow the development of age-related macular degeneration (AMD), a cause of age-related blindness. These same dark greens can also supply a significant amount of folate. Folate is a B vitamin that promotes heart health and helps prevent certain birth defects. Folate is also necessary for DNA duplication and repair. Without repair, damaged cells can develop into cancer.The importance of folate should not be underestimated. Even after considering the presence of other cancer-fighting nutrients, several large studies show that the risk of colon polyps, which are the source of most colon cancers, is 30 to 40 percent lower in people with a high folate intake compared to those with diets low in folate. Research also suggests that diets low in folate may increase the risk of cancers of the breast (particularly among women who drink alcohol), cervix and lung.Certain dark green vegetables offer another advantage. Watercress, arugula, bok choy, broccoli and kale are all members of the cruciferous family. These vegetables supply phytochemicals such as indoles that help stop cancer before it starts. These phytochemicals block enzymes that activate carcinogens and boost enzymes that detoxify them. Other antioxidant phytochemicals in these green cruciferous veggies help prevent and repair DNA damage that can lead to cancer. They also seem to interrupt the growth of cancer cells.If you havent eaten many of these dark green vegetables before, you may not know how to serve them. Perk up salads or sandwiches with small tender leaves. Add greens with larger, tougher leaves to soups. You can quickly stir-fry many of these greens in a dash of canola or olive oil with some garlic, onion, or ginger. Check your grocery store for pamphlets with more ideas for preparing this kind of produce, or look at cookbooks. Or get fresh ideas at your desk: Go to the website of the American Institute for Cancer Research (www.aicr.org) and click on Recipe Corner. Type in the name of a vegetable for some tasty recipes to try. The website www.5aday.com offers a similar service.

Recent research shows that chocolate can provide natural health-promoting substances called flavonoids. Since flavonoids seem to help prevent heart disease and cancer, the idea of eating chocolate sounds like a tempting and delicious way to better your health. The complete message is, however, that although chocolate might be preferable to other treats, it is no substitute for vegetables and fruits, which also contain flavonoids.The flavonoids in chocolate that laboratory studies demonstrate to have powerful antioxidant effects are called flavanols and procyanidins. These two compounds come from the flavonoid family that includes resveratrol, found in grape juice, and EGCG, found in green tea. When people consume these substances in chocolate and cocoa, the antioxidant status of their blood increases. This rise in antioxidant levels helps protect us from damage to the heart and blood vessels, while it also guards our DNA from damage that can lead to cancer. In addition, the flavanols and procyanidins in chocolate improve the function and flow of blood vessels and help control inflammation.The antioxidants in chocolate have generated a lot of interest because studies show that these compounds are more powerful antioxidants than EGCG in tea, which is a strong antioxidant. One study that compared the total antioxidant activity in single servings of cocoa, green tea, black tea and red wine scored cocoa markedly higher than the rest.Yet the flavonoid content of cocoa and chocolate is highly variable. The more cocoa in a chocolate product, the higher the antioxidant flavonoid content is. Because dark chocolate is more concentrated in cocoa content, it is higher in flavonoids than milk chocolate. For this reason, dark chocolate is used in research studies. White chocolate has no cocoa content. A cup of hot or cold cocoa may sound like a health drink loaded with antioxidants, but almost all cocoa drink mixes contain cocoa treated with alkali (also called Dutch cocoa) to produce a darker, richer taste. Unfortunately, this process drastically reduces flavonoid content. Unless you find a chocolate mix made with untreated cocoa, start with plain cocoa (not Dutch) and add your own sweetener and milk to make a flavonoid-rich cup.Surprisingly, the fat content of chocolate is not a reason to avoid it. Technically, chocolate contains saturated fat, but the particular type of saturated fat  stearic acid  is unique because it does not raise blood cholesterol. Studies show that neither dark or milk chocolate is a cholesterol concern in moderate amounts. But keep in mind that other ingredients added to some chocolate candies can change their nutrition impact.But one of the reasons you shouldnt rely on chocolate for antioxidants, in the place of vegetables and fruits, is the calorie load. A small piece of dark chocolate has only 50 calories, but most candy bars contain at least 200. In comparison, a serving of vegetables and fruits contains a generous amount of health-promoting phytochemicals and only 25 to 80 calories. An antioxidant-rich serving of green tea has no calories at all.Besides, vegetables and fruits have more than flavonoids. They provide vitamins, minerals like magnesium and potassium, and phytochemicals that protect our health in other ways. Some, for example, block the activation of carcinogens, while others interfere with the life cycle of cancer cells and promote their destruction.Recent research on the flavonoids in chocolate implies that we can enjoy limited amounts of this sweet treat without guilt. But this news shouldnt discourage us from eating a mostly plant-based diet loaded with vegetables and fruits.

Coat the bread slices lightly with cooking spray on one side. Place the slices, sprayed side down, on a cutting board. Lightly rub top of bread with the cut side of the garlic. Sprinkle oregano over one slice, then top with the cheese, followed by the roasted vegetables. Add the second slice of bread, sprayed side facing up.Heat a hinged electric grill or, if cooking stove-top, a griddle or a skillet, preferably cast iron, over medium-high heat. Place the sandwich on the cooking surface so that the cheese is closest to the heat. If using an electric grill, close it. If grilling on top of the stove, use a small heavy skillet or pan to weigh down on top of the sandwich.Grill the sandwich 1 to 1 1/2 minutes, or until the cheese has melted and the bread is well browned on the bottom. Carefully flip the sandwich and grill until brown on the second side, 30 seconds to 1 minute. Using a serrated knife, cut the sandwich in half diagonally. Serve immediately.Makes 1 sandwich. Per serving: 210 calories, 6 g. total fat (3 g. saturated fat), 30 g. carbohydrate, 13 g. protein, 5 g. dietary fiber, 326 mg. sodium.

Preheat the oven to 350 degrees. Lightly coat an 8-inch square baking pan with canola oil spray.In a large bowl, mix together the flour, baking powder, baking soda and salt. In a medium bowl, stir together the egg, honey, applesauce, canola oil and orange zest.Stir the wet ingredients into the dry ingredients until blended. Stir in the dates and walnuts. Spread the mixture into the prepared pan.Bake about 25 minutes, until a tester such as a toothpick inserted in the center comes out clean. Cool the cookie bars in the pan on a wire rack until completely cool. Cut into 16 2-inch bars. Store in a tightly covered container for 2 to 3 days.Makes 16 servings. Per serving: 91 calories, 4 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 14 g. carbohydrates, 2 g. protein, 1 g. dietary fiber, 58 mg. sodium.

In a small bowl, combine cornstarch, curry powder and sugar. Mix in soy sauce, then broth. Set aside.Heat a heavy skillet over high heat, add 1 tsp. oil and heat until hot. Add asparagus, pepper, peas, ginger and garlic. Stir-fry until vegetables are tender but still crisp. Transfer mixture with a slotted spoon to a plate.Heat remaining oil in pan. Add shrimp and stir-fry until pink, about 1 minute. Stir in vegetables. Stir sauce, then pour into skillet. Bring to a boil, reduce heat and simmer until shrimp are opaque in the center, about 2 to 3 minutes. Serve immediately. Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 167 calories, 5 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 10 g. carbohydrates, 20 g. protein, 2 g. dietary fiber, 277 mg. sodium.

In a small bowl, stir together yogurt, honey, dill and black pepper until blended. In a large serving bowl, toss together spinach, red pepper, celery and green onions. Drizzle dressing over top and lightly toss to coat. Sprinkle with feta and serve. Makes 6 servings.Per serving: 41 calories, 1 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 6 g. carbohydrates, 2 g. protein, 1 g. dietary fiber, 91 mg. sodium.

Mix together cumin, cinnamon, half the coriander and salt. Rub into the lamb. Let stand 30 to 60 minutes. Heat 1 Tbsp. oil in a skillet over medium heat. Add couscous and stir, cooking 1 to 2 minutes, until grains turn translucent and shiny. Remove from heat. Mix in remaining coriander, apricots and raisins. Pour in 2 cups of boiling water, stirring briskly. Cover and let stand 7 minutes. Meanwhile, toast nuts in a skillet over medium heat, stirring, until lightly toasted, about 4 minutes. Transfer nuts to a small bowl. Stir couscous with fork to fluff grains. Add remaining boiling water. Place peas on top of couscous. Cover and let stand 5 minutes more. Cut lamb into thin, bite-sized slices. Heat the skillet over medium-high heat until hot, add remaining oil and heat until hot. Add lamb and saut? until lightly browned. Fluff couscous with a fork. Add salt and pepper to taste. Mix in lamb and nuts. Transfer to a serving dish or individual plates. Sprinkle mint on top, if desired.Makes 8 servings.Per serving: 345 calories, 11 g. total fat (2 g. saturated fat), 46 g. carbohydrate, 17 g. protein, 5 g. dietary fiber, 373 mg. sodium.

We at AICR are particularly heartened that, for the first time in history, the USDA Dietary Guidelines recognize the role that healthy diets play in the prevention of cancer. This is an important step.

For years, the best available advice for lowering cancer risk has fallen closely in line with advice for lowering risk of cardiovascular disease, Type 2 diabetes, and other chronic illnesses. The landmark 1997 AICR/WCRF Report, Food, Nutrition and the Prevention of Cancer: a global perspective, examined over 4500 studies on nutrition and cancer risk and concluded that making healthy changes in diet and related factors could lower worldwide cancer rates by 30 to 40 percent.

By expanding in scope to include the convincing scientific evidence on diet and cancer prevention, the new Dietary Guidelines make the overall take home public health message much simpler and  we believe  much more comprehensive.

As a research organization, AICR is gratified that in drafting the 2005 Guidelines, the DHHS/USDA Dietary Guidelines Advisory Committee based its conclusions on peer-reviewed scientific evidence that was painstakingly compiled by a team of experts. This kind of rigorous, objective analysis is the standard that all who work in the public health arena should follow.

Perhaps most importantly, the new Guidelines distill the wealth of dietary data into a series of practical, actionable steps for individuals to adopt. The renewed focus on the need to increase consumption of fruits and vegetables is also welcome, because the scientific evidence linking these foods to a host of health benefits is now overwhelming.

AICR welcomed the new Guidelines, the first to recognize the role of healthy diet in reducing risk of some cancers. But AICR noted that many Americans have complained of feeling overwhelmed by the many specific goals laid out in the new Guidelines, which offer a series of highly specific, quantified recommendations as a way to transform the overall diet.

This simple, easy-to-remember approach, which has been the cornerstone of AICRs New American Plate campaign for years, encompasses the best available advice on lowering risk for cancer, heart disease, stroke and other diseases. At the same time, adopting the 2/3-to-1/3 proportions effectively reshapes meals so they are higher in fiber and lower in fat and calories than the traditional American meal. As a result, they can help individuals maintain a healthy weight, and offer a healthy strategy for those looking to lose weight safely, gradually and effectively.

The experts at AICR say they adopted the New American Plate approach because it conveys dietary advice visually, in practical, everyday terms. Abstract dietary concepts like number of servings per day, food groups and even the food pyramid itself are avoided, in favor of clear, real world examples.

The next step in the New American Plate approach is to start adjusting the proportion of plant to animal food on the plate. Its a shift in emphasis, not a sudden, radical change, said Collins. I suspect thats another reason for its appeal.

According to Collins, its easy to do the Dietary Guidelines if you have the right model for your meals. The traditional American plate, which contains a large piece of meat, a large helping of mashed potatoes and a small serving of peas, wont get you there.

The New American Plate will, because it contains two different vegetables and a whole grain like brown rice, kasha, bulgur or whole wheat pasta making up 2/3 of the volume and a small piece of meat, poultry or preferably fish making up the remaining 1/3.

To help people make the gradual transition to this healthier eating pattern, AICR offers the free New American Plate brochure, a wealth of online information, a recipe database and weekly recipe emails, all of which ensure that meals offer both flavor and health benefits.

Also available in bookstores is The New American Plate Cookbook, published by the University of California Press, with an introduction that explains the New American Plate model and 200 recipes that put it into action.

WASHINGTON, DC  Can a health organization produce a gourmet cookbook? Can an unapologetic passion for richly flavored, satisfying food be reconciled with a desire to make meals that are slimming and powerfully protective against a host of health problems?

The team that created The New American Plate Cookbook set out to prove they can. In recipes like Spiced Braised Lamb with Apricots and Carrots, Orange Pilaf with Dried Fruit, and Snow Peas with Cashews, they developed colorful and delicious dishes that make up the predominantly plant-based meals linked to better health.

At first, the team of cooks, nutritionists, foodies and scientists viewed the project from their own particular perspectives. Half were concerned first with complex flavor, color, aroma and mouthfeel. The other half looked for dishes containing quantity and variety of vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beansingredients that delivered phytochemicals, fiber and a low-caloric load.

According to Sheen, the team tried adding herbs and bits of onion to retain moisture, but nothing worked unless refined flour was added. Finally, at the point of despair, one team member developed a formula involving whole-wheat flour, oat bran and a small amount of olive oil. The resulting Heirloom Whole Wheat Bread delighted everyone.

The team then set out to produce the recipes that make it easy and exciting to realize this new model for a meal. At the heart of The New American PlateCookbook are 30 vegetable recipes with surprising combinations of ingredients and delightfully blended flavors and 40 one-pot meals that include the 2/3 to 1/3 proportion within themselves.

At the same time, these phytochemicals lend plant foods the distinctive sensuous characteristics that make people value them. The rich color of tomatoes, the pungent aroma of garlic, the tartness of berries and the nutty flavor of whole grains are all due to the presence of these protective substances.

The following three recipes reflect key strategies and techniques evident in recipes throughout the cookbook. Spiced Braised Lamb with Apricots and Carrots offers a complex and rich layering of color, flavor and health-protective phytochemicals that maximizes great taste and good healthwith less than 300 calories per serving.

In a food processor or blender, combine the ginger and garlic. Process until the mixture is the consistency of a paste, scraping down the sides with a rubber spatula as needed. Set aside. In a small bowl, stir together the spices.

With a slotted spoon, transfer the lamb to the pot. Add the tomatoes with juice, apricots, salt, and1/2 cup water. Bring the mixture to a boil and reduce the heat. Cover and simmer for 25 minutes, stirring occasionally. Add the carrots, cover, and simmer for 15 to 25 minutes, stirring occasionally, until the meat and carrots are tender. Add water as needed if the mixture seems too dry.

Preheat the oven to 450 degrees. Lightly coat an 8-inch square baking dish with canola oil spray. In a bowl, toss the nectarines and raspberries with1/2 cup of the sugar, using your hands to distribute the sugar evenly. Pour the fruit, scraping the bowl with a rubber spatula, into the prepared baking dish.

Lightly dust a work surface with flour. Gently pat the dough into a1/4-inch-thick rectangle using the heel of your hand. Sprinkle the dough lightly with flour, if it becomes too sticky. Dip the rim of a 2-inch biscuit cutter or drinking glass in flour and cut 9 rounds from the dough. Arrange the rounds in 3 rows on top of the fruit in the baking dish. The rounds should almost touch and should leave a border of fruit along the outer edges of the dish.

Surveys show that many cancer patients turn to herbal supplements hoping to decrease the side effects of treatment or boost the body's ability to defeat cancer. For many years, there was no sound research on which to evaluate the effectiveness and safety of these supplements - patients just took their chances. Although there are still a lot of questions about herbal supplements, experts now say there is some basis for evaluating them. If you are a cancer patient considering one or more of these products, it is critical that you tell your doctor.Herbs have the reputation of being natural and gentle, but they contain compounds that can profoundly affect the body. Research continues on how to harness their bioactivity to make more effective or more tolerable cancer treatments. The strength that herbals may have for positive effects could significantly interfere with treatments if the wrong products are used at the wrong times.There is another misconception about herbal products, and all supplements for that matter, which everyone should be aware of. Consumers may not always attain the same benefits observed in research studies, because supplements may differ from what was used in research. Independent tests on a variety of herbal products have shown that some are missing significant levels of important compounds, or are contaminated with unlisted ingredients. One safeguard against this problem is to check the label for a mark by the United States Pharmacopeia (USP) that says dietary supplement verified in a circle. For a partial list of supplements verified by USP for quality you can visit www.uspverified.org. Another organization that independently tests the quality of supplements is ConsumerLab.com.Its website is www.consumerlab.com.Several reports highlight the problems that a use of herbs can cause during cancer treatment. For instance, depression and anxiety are common after a diagnosis of cancer. But when people take St. John's Wort as a remedy, this product can interfere with the actions of certain chemotherapy drugs, decreasing their effectiveness. Furthermore, this herb stays in the body for several weeks.Another common reason for using herbs is to deal with side effects of treatment. Ginger is widely used for nausea. But both ginger and garlic, when used in large amounts as supplements rather than the small amounts used in flavoring food, can slow blood-clotting times. Especially for someone using one of the chemotherapy drugs that also slows blood clotting, serious bleeding problems can arise.A third reason people use herbs or supplements is to boost their immune systems. Echinacea is widely used for this purpose. But studies suggest that after eight weeks, echinacea may actually suppress the immune system and damage the liver. Another herbal remedy, essiac tea, combines several herbs and is said to strengthen the immune system and relieve pain. So far no human clinical trials have been completed to support these claims. Past animal studies did not verify them either.A fourth use of herbs or vitamins as antioxidants may seem innocent, but it is potentially damaging. Chemotherapy and radiation therapy work by creating free radicals that destroy cancer cells. Researchers warn that taking high levels of antioxidant supplements during these therapies could actually counteract their effectiveness.Products without proven benefits may be safe for patients who want to try them. But you should always consult with your doctor in case there are particular risks for you.

For a long time, we've heard that whole grains like whole-wheat bread are good for us. Many Americans, however, still look upon them suspiciously as "health foods" that real people seldom eat. That attitude should soon change because the latest edition of the USDA's Dietary Guidelines for Americans clearly states that all adults should eat at least three servings of whole grains every day. A greater whole-grain consumption than Americans currently have is linked in several studies with lower death rates from both heart disease and cancer. Even after adjusting for the generally healthier weight, exercise and other habits of whole-grain eaters, whole grain consumption can result in 17 to 35 percent fewer deaths from these two diseases. The protection against heart disease may stem from whole grains' antioxidant vitamins and phytochemicals, fiber, or trace minerals. Apparently, by improving insulin sensitivity and decreasing the disordered insulin function people experience with metabolic syndrome, whole grains also help prevent diabetes. Some researchers suggest that these improvements in metabolic syndrome may be another protection against heart disease.The same substances in whole grains that protect against heart disease also seem to help prevent several kinds of cancer. Fiber and certain starches in whole grains ferment in the colon and form substances that may block the cancer-promoting effects of bile acids. New research presented at the most recent American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) conference also shows that these foods contain much higher levels of antioxidant phytochemicals called phenols than previously thought. These and other antioxidants in whole grains can ward off, and sometimes even repair, damage to cells that can occur from highly reactive molecules called free radicals. In addition, scientists believe that other substances in whole grains may affect hormone levels and possibly lower the risk of hormone-related cancers like breast cancer.Weight control is an added advantage to eating whole grains. In one study, women who ate more whole-grain foods weighed less and gained less weight during 12 years than those who consumed less whole grains. By moderating levels of the hormone insulin, whole grains seem to deter fat storage. Whole grains seem to cause less elevation in the hormone insulin, which promotes fat storage. Whole grains also seem to satisfy hunger for longer periods than do refined grains, allowing people to eat less.For years, guidelines from AICR have urged people to eat grain products mostly made from whole grains. With the release of the federal government's dietary guidelines, last issued in 2000, people may at last realize the health advantages of whole grains compared to refined grain products. Hopefully, the average of less than one whole grain serving a day will rise and meet the USDA recommended minimum of three.Food companies are responding to the research, public interest and USDA guidelines, and whole-grain cereal choices will soon be multiplying. For your breakfast or a snack, choose cereals that list a whole grain like whole wheat or oats as the first ingredient. To reach three servings each day, look for other whole-grain products like whole-grain frozen waffles, English muffins, bagels, tortillas and crackers. Make whole-grain bread an automatic choice. To make sure it's whole-grain bread, check the label, not the color. The term "multi-grain" does not mean it's a whole grain. For other serving ideas, cook whole-wheat pasta and brown rice. If you need a gradual transition to the heavier texture of whole-grain pasta, look for half whole-wheat and half white-flour pasta. For a great grain snack you won't have to develop a taste for, try popping your own popcorn in a bit of oil.

If you think controlling blood pressure means only taking pills and cutting sodium intake, you see just a small piece of the problem. Whether your goal is treating high blood pressure or preventing it, many eating and lifestyle choices have an impact. If you're one of the more than 50 million Americans who face a double risk of heart attack due to high blood pressure, you should start thinking differently.Weight control may actually be one of the strongest influences on blood pressure. By maintaining a healthy weight, you could lower your blood pressure 5 to 20 millimeters of mercury (mmHg), according to a recent government report. Even without reaching an ideal weight range, many overweight people can lower their blood pressure by losing ten percent of their body weight. Of course, this benefit holds only as long as the weight stays down, so it's crucial to find a weight loss strategy you won't abandon.For weight loss and an eating style that lowers blood pressure, consider the DASH diet. This plan emphasizes plenty of vegetables, fruits and whole grains, while encouraging a moderate use of low-fat dairy products and limited amounts of lean meats. Studies show that the DASH plan can lower blood pressure from 8 to 14 mmHg. Details of the DASH diet are available at ww.nhlbi.nih.gov/health/public/heart/hbp/dash. The extra potassium and magnesium from eating an abundance of vegetables, fruits and whole grains may explain some of the effect of the DASH plan. A low intake of these minerals may be related to 8 to 25 percent of high blood pressure cases. The calcium from the recommended three servings of lowfat or fat-free dairy products also seems to aid blood pressure control. But remember that weight control with a healthy plan still requires portion control.Restricting sodium is still important with DASH. Studies of the DASH diet with and without limiting sodium clearly show the benefit of limiting it. Some people appear more sensitive to sodium than others, but restricting sodium to 2,300 milligrams (mg) per day or less could drop blood pressure at least 2 to 8 mmHg. Lowering it to 1,500 mg is even better, and this lower limit is recommended for people with high blood pressure. Keep in mind that the saltshaker is not the primary source of sodium for most Americans. Canned soups and sauces, boxed dinner-mix products, frozen meals, snack foods and even cereals contain a lot of salt and sodium-based ingredients. Staying under the 1,500 mg sodium limit requires using these products wisely.The fourth major step in creating a lifestyle for a healthy blood pressure is regular aerobic activity such as brisk walking. You need to be active at least 30 minutes a day most days of the week. The result will be a blood pressure drop of 4 to 9 mmHg and greater weight control. Actually, for optimal weight control and greater health protection, you should push for an hour a day. Breaking an hour of exercise into several small periods is alright.Blood pressure can fall another 2 to 4 mmHg by limiting alcohol consumption. Women should have no more than one standard-sized drink per day, and men no more than two. The effect caffeine has on blood pressure and how much tolerance regular drinkers of caffeine develop is still unclear. Many physicians suggest, however, that people with high blood pressure limit their caffeine to 200 mg (two six-ounce cups of coffee) per day.Although blood pressure can usually be controlled with medicine, these medications can affect a person's quality of life and interact adversely with other medications or chronic conditions. Since health experts say that two or more lifestyle steps can regulate blood pressure as well as a prescription, these steps are worth trying first.

"Proven weight loss" is a claim often made by weight loss programs. Yet two recent studies of different weight loss programs show that the program is less important than how well you stick with whichever one you choose. These studies also underline why you should select an approach that will enhance your overall health.The reports of the two studies appeared in the Journal of the American Medical Association and the Annals of Internal Medicine. They illustrate how widely different current diets can be. Some emphasize low-fat eating, while others limit carbohydrates. Some commercial programs, like Jenny Craig, rely on pre-packaged meals to control eating, while popular diets, like Atkins, Zone or Weight Watchers, use eating plans - some more detailed and structured than others.The study that looked at popular diets showed that the average weight loss was 4.6 to 7 pounds after one year. This average amount factors in the large 40 to 50 percent of people who quit within the year. If you only look at those who followed a diet for the full year, weight loss averaged 8.5 to 14.5 pounds. These actual losses appear small compared to the advertising claims of the diets. Furthermore, calorie consumption declined only 140 to 250 calories a day from initial levels. Looking at average losses can also hide the wide variation people had within each diet. Some dieters lost over 20 pounds, while others actually gained weight on the same diet during the course of the year.The study that examined commercial weight loss programs discovered that most lack well-controlled studies supporting their claims. The one program with any solid research showed that typically people lost about five percent of their weight over three to six months. Special programs with extremely low calorie levels promoted faster weight loss, but their dropout rates were high, and those who continued frequently regained most of what they lost. The high numbers of people falling off diets in these two studies show how important it is to find a weight loss approach you can live with. The most talked about diet is useless if you can't stick with it. Support from a group of fellow dieters or a professional dietitian can make a big difference in your effort, but you'll probably need repeated meetings. A major obstacle for most people who want to lose weight is thinking in strictly black and white terms. If they can't follow a diet perfectly, they give up in frustration. But these two studies show that weight loss success does not require 100 percent adherence. Following even 60 percent of any diet brought weight loss. Certainly, if you fail to change any of your habits, you shouldn't expect to lose any weight. But if you are ready to make some changes, the evidence suggests that you can still be successful with these partial improvements. Similarly, a study on the dietary guidelines of the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) to lower cancer risk confirms that the more guidelines people follow, the lower their cancer risk. Yet following only some guidelines still reduces risk significantly.Reaching and maintaining a healthy weight offers enormous health benefits. Although many overweight people are unlikely to reach an ideal weight range through dieting, even small weight drops are beneficial. The eating changes you make to lose weight can impact your health directly by increasing your consumption of fiber, vitamins and phytochemicals, while decreasing your fat intake. So, instead of focusing on the claims and promises of popular diets or programs, look for healthy changes you can make and realistically learn to keep.

They boost levels of a particular molecule that puts the brakes on the cell reproduction cycle.They inhibit another set of molecules that are essential for cancer cell survival and cell growth. I3C and DIM reduce the high levels of these molecules that are found in tumors.The cruciferous vegetable substances also appear to discourage growth of new blood vessels that feed the cancer cells so they can progress. Because blood vessels play a role in cancer's ability to metastasize - that is, to spread to other parts of the body - I3C protects the body against this process as well.Finally, I3C and DIM prevent metastasis another way. In order for a part of a tumor to break away and spread to other parts of the body, a particular enzyme has to be activated. As Dr. Sarkar explains, "The tumor cells learn how to chew off the surrounding tissue before they proliferate and invade. I3C can shut off the molecule that tells the enzymes to attack healthy tissue."

These steps in the cancer process are only a few that I3C has been shown to help prevent. To date, Dr. Sarkar has conducted his laboratory experiments using breast and prostate cancer cells. However, there could be even more ways in which I3C works against cancer development that are not yet discovered.

Refrigerate produce that is most perishable in perforated plastic bags. Vegetables: Asparagus, corn, cucumbers, dark leafy greens (including spinach), green beans, lettuce, mushrooms, peas, scallions, squash and sweet bell peppers. (Fresh tomatoes should be stored at room temperature and eaten when ripe.) Fruits: Berries, grapes, cantaloupes, cherries, nectarines and ripened peaches and plums.

Stock up on longer lasting produce. Most root vegetables (including parsnips, potatoes, radishes, carrots and turnips), garlic, onions, unripe melons, mangoes and citrus fruit can be kept refrigerated for 1-2 weeks.

Use legumes. Beans, split peas and lentils (legumes) provide protein, fiber and folate in one tasty, low-cost package. If you don't have time to cook them, buy them canned, then rinse and drain to reduce added salt.

A:Look over the cover description and introduction of several cookbooks to see how their viewpoint on healthful eating matches what you are looking for. Remember that research shows good nutrition cant be defined by just one factor, like fat, sodium or sugar content. We know now that healthy eating means not only avoiding excess amounts of negative influences, but also getting enough nutrients and natural phytochemicals from vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans. Then think about what kinds of food and food preparation match your lifestyle and preferences. Flip through the recipes to see how they meet your needs regarding preparation time and simple versus exotic flavors. Finally, consider how the recipes and philosophy of the cookbook would impact weight control. Look for one like the new cookbook from the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR), called The New American Plate Cookbook. It is aimed at translating the highly acclaimed New American Plate program into 200 recipes that dont compromise good taste to achieve good nutrition.

A: The current Recommended Dietary Allowance (RDA) is 500 milligrams (mg) of calcium for children ages 1 to 3, 800 mg for children 4 to 8, and 1300 mg for those from age 9 to 18. Because we do get small amounts of calcium scattered throughout our food supply, children aged 8 and under can meet their needs with two servings of calcium-rich foods daily. Those aged nine to 18, however, need three (or even three-and-a-half) servings a day. An eight-ounce glass of milk is one example of a calcium-rich food. Other sources that also count toward the recommended total include yogurt (8 ounces),cheese (about one-and-a-half ounces), calcium-fortified soy milk or orange juice (8 ounces) and calcium-fortified cereal (usually 2 ounces). Cottage cheese doesnt help much in working toward calcium goals because it takes two cups to count as one serving, unless it is one of the special varieties with extra calcium added.

A: Studies of the herbal product known as St. Johns Wort show a potentially modest benefit for mild to moderate depression, and side effects from its use alone appear rare. But when people who take prescription medications use this product also, dangers can be dramatic. St. Johns Wort interacts with liver enzymes involved in the metabolism of more than half of all prescription medicines. Researchers say that this herbal product can decrease the effectiveness of digoxin (for congestive heart failure), blood thinners, some chemotherapy drugs, birth control pills, asthma medications, immunosuppressants (such as cyclosporin for organ transplants), certain HIV drugs, and more. People taking any prescription medications should not begin taking (or suddenly discontinue) St. Johns Wort without first consulting their personal physician. This is just one example of why it is vital to make sure that your health care providers know about any nutritional or herbal supplements you use.

A: They can be, but dont assume that absence of meat automatically means lower calorie content. A meatless meal that contains a lot of fat from foods that are deep-fried or cooked in a lot of butter or oil will not be low-calorie. Likewise, large amounts of high-fat cheese or concentrated sweets like syrup or sugar add significant calories regardless of whether a meal contains meat. To reduce calorie content, make low-calorie foods such as vegetables a major focus of the meal. The effect of meat and poultry on calories varies dramatically from high-fat choices like sausage, regular ground beef, and chicken wings to low-fat choices like pork loin, beef sirloin, and skinless turkey or chicken breast meat. Finally, one of the strongest influences of all on a meals calorie content is how much you eat. Overeating can turn any meal into a source of too many calories. The American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) has an educational program called the New American Plate, which shows how the combination of what and how much we eat determine the impact of our eating on health and weight control.

A: Cranberries contain two compounds that seem to prevent bacteria from sticking to cells in the kidney, bladder and other parts of the urinary tract. Effects on urinary acidity may also reduce the rate of infections. Studies to test the effectiveness of cranberry products in preventing urinary tract infections are hard to compare, because theyve used different products (cranberry juice concentrate, cocktail, or capsules) and different doses. We need more studies to provide clear answers, but most experts say that one or more forms of cranberry juice may help prevent recurrent urinary tract infections in women who are prone to them. Women who rarely get these infections may not derive any special benefit. Research does not currently support a role for cranberries in the treatment of urinary tract infections that already exist.

A: Process cheese is natural cheese that has emulsifiers added to enhance smoothness and melting qualities. Process cheese food and process cheese spread are similar to process cheese, but have additional ingredients such as salt, coloring, stabilizers, and flavorings, as well as added water, cream, or milk to create a higher moisture content. All process cheese products provide protein and calcium, but in less concentrated amounts than natural cheese. Thats why the amount that equals a standard dairy group serving size is one-and-a-half ounces of natural cheese, but two ounces of process cheese. Another important difference is that many of the emulsifiers added to make process cheese are sodium-based, so sodium content is often more than double that of natural cheese.

A:Yes, all major recommendations about how to avoid or control high blood pressure include the advice to avoid drinking too much alcohol. Health experts recommend a limit of no more than one standard drink a day for women and no more than two standard drinks a day for men. Incidentally, you should also follow these same recommendations to lower your risk of cancer. A standard drink is 12 ounces of beer, five ounces of wine, or 1.5 ounces of 80-proof liquor. However, the most important lifestyle influences on keeping a healthy blood pressure are weight control, regular exercise, limiting sodium consumption and getting enough potassium. Yet, in addition to these major influences, blood pressure is affected by many other factors as well. For instance, heart-healthy omega-3 fats (found in certain fish like salmon and albacore tuna), calcium and magnesium might help reduce blood pressure, while excess alcohol or caffeine could raise it. Although drinking alcohol within the recommended limits should not disrupt your pressure, individual circumstances may vary and should be discussed with ones physician.

A: While recipes vary, scones usually are lower in sugar than muffins. But they are often higher in calories due to greater fat content. Scones available at popular bakery and coffeehouse chains today generally contain anywhere from 410 to 560 calories each (without spreading any added butter or jam on them). Their sugar content of three to seven teaspoons of sugar is lower than that of many muffins, but fat content of 14 to 29 grams is a substantial load. Check nutrition information of restaurants or recipes you use, since different flavors (even from the same source) can vary substantially.

A: Colic is quite common, but remains poorly understood. Colic refers to an otherwise healthy infant regularly crying for extended periods, often drawing up legs, arching the back, or passing gas. It usually begins in the first few weeks of life and resolves itself within four months. Some researchers believe that colic involves an allergic reaction to something in infant formula or in a breastfeeding mothers diet. They suggest a trial of special low-allergen formula for bottle-fed babies, and a diet for breastfeeding mothers that omits either milk products or even a whole group of additional foods that sometimes cause allergic reactions (eggs, wheat, nuts). However, breastfeeding mothers need to make sure they get enough calcium from other sources if they omit milk. Other experts consider colic more likely a behavioral problem in which the baby is either over-stimulated or frustrated at inability to communicate an unsatisfied need (hunger, thirst, need to suck, boredom, fatigue, desire for affection). Good studies evaluating either approach are sparse. Attempts to treat babies colic with herbal tea are not recommended. Discuss the problem with the babys doctor so that other medical problems can be ruled out, then try either or both approaches above and be patient.

A: Nutrition experts agree that whole grains are a much healthier choice than refined grains. Whole grains supply more dietary fiber, and more of important nutrients like vitamins B-6 and E, and the minerals magnesium and zinc. Research presented at the most recent American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) conference shows that whole grains are also loaded with antioxidant phytochemicals that reduce our risk of cancer. Some evidence suggests they may even have a role in weight control. However, experts do not agree on the role of refined grains in a healthy diet. Some suggest that because refined grains provide a significant amount of calories, yet are lower in the benefits of whole grains, they dont belong in a healthy diet. Other experts point out that enriched refined grains can be an important source of the vitamin folate. To some extent, it probably depends on individual calorie needs. First, make sure that you eat at least three or four servings of whole grains every day. Theres no evidence that a serving or two of a refined grain, like Italian bread or white pasta, will hurt if you are active enough to still have room for them within a days healthy calorie limit. We dont need to eat perfectly for good health; we just need to eat smart.

A: Not at all. Certain inherited genetic traits can strongly increase someones odds of getting cancer, but they are rare. Most often, inherited differences may make somepeople more sensitive to particular influences on cancer development. Even so, a landmark report from the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) states that heredity accounts for only five to ten percent of cancer risk. Studies show that when migrants move, and change their diet and lifestyle in the process, their risk of cancer changes significantly. If cancer were simply an inherited condition, that wouldn't happen. A healthy lifestyle can't offer total protection from cancer, but a recent study shows that the closer we come to following cancer prevention guidelines, the lower our odds are for getting cancer. To lower your cancer risk, AICR advises eating a mostly plant-based diet, getting regular physical activity and maintaining a healthy weight.

A: Actually, the more concentrated a food is in calories, fat or sugar, the more your portion size matters. For people who feel so deprived without French fries that they reward themselves with other unhealthy foods, getting an occasional small order may actually work to their advantage. A small portions 200 to 300 calories and 10 to 15 grams of fat can average out to make little difference over the course of several days. But a large orders 500 to 650 calories and 25 to 35 grams of fat may be a quarter to a third of a days calorie needs and half a days limit on fat. Obviously, one of those large portions in a whole month wont matter, but if a small order is enough to satisfy your yearnings, small is clearly better. Besides, at some fast food restaurants, a large order of fries contains almost a days recommended amount of sodium.

It's the big picture  a persons overall eating habits  that counts most for good health, research increasingly shows. Whether the health issue is weight control, reducing the risk of cancer or heart disease, or general well-being, no single food or sole nutrient outshines the importance of a consistent, healthy eating pattern. This healthy eating pattern tends to focus on high-fiber, plant-based foods, like vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans. The barrier for most people in eating more healthfully is consuming more vegetables.

Consider, for instance, the effect of eating on weight. A continuing study at Tufts University following healthy men and women through their adult years shows that those who eat in a healthy pattern have slight changes in body mass index (BMI) from year to year. In contrast, those who follow a meat and potatoes pattern, consuming less vegetables and fruits, are likely to have a six times greater annual increase in BMI. Overdoing meat is only one unhealthy problem, however. People in the study who eat in a white bread pattern, which is also lower in vegetables and fruits, have a yearly increase in waist size more than three times those eating healthfully. Several other studies besides this one link a healthy eating pattern with lower weight or smaller gains in weight or waist size.

Of course, healthy eating habits mean more than greater vegetable and fruit consumption. They also include eating whole grains, reduced-fat dairy products and limited amounts of fatty meats and sweets. But the boost in vegetable and fruit consumption seems crucial to maintaining a healthy weight. Studies suggest that vegetables, in particular, provide hunger-satisfying bulk with fewer calories than the same portion of most other foods.

Like the issue of weight control, a persons long-term diet pattern seems to lower the risk of cancer or other health problems more than any one food or supplement. Nutrition researchers think that a wide range of vitamins, minerals, fiber, natural phytochemicals and beneficial types of fat, which are found in a healthy diet, help protect against cancer and other chronic diseases. An abundance of vegetables is an irreplaceable part of this eating style because they are unique sources of many phytochemicals.

It might seem odd that Americans have a hard time eating more of something, since overeating is common. But many Americans struggle to bring vegetables and other healthful foods into their meals and snacks.

Part of the problem stems from how often we eat out. Restaurants notoriously emphasize meats and refined grains rather than vegetables, fruits and whole grains. In contrast, meals at home can be put together that have ample amounts of these plant foods. Many consumers are unable to make the meals they would benefit most from, however, because of todays dual demands for speedy preparation and flavorful, interesting food.

The American Institute for Cancer Research has developed a new cookbook to address both of these demands. In fact this cookbook, The New American Plate Cookbook (University of California Press, 2005), goes further. Research now suggests that we need to combine healthy proportions of food  emphasizing a wide variety of plant foods  and serve them in portions suitable for our energy needs to protect our health the best. This cookbook shows how we can balance our meals, control portions and eat good-tasting foods without spending long hours in the kitchen. By satisfying our desire for interesting, tasty food, we can actually increase the nutritious quality of our meals and bolster our health.

From 1993 to 2003, the number of weight-loss surgeries increased 500 percent. That number was predicted to increase even further in 2004. Since almost two-thirds of our population is now overweight or obese, thoughts about surgical procedures to reduce weight frequently cross peoples minds. Yet misconceptions about them are common. People especially overlook all the necessary life changes for a successful operation.

Liposuction, one type of weight-control surgery, may seem like a simple way to remove excess fat around the waistline, which is most associated with health risks like diabetes and heart disease. Yet in a recent study of obese women, liposuction that removed large amounts of waistline fat did not lower blood sugar and insulin levels or biomarkers of inflammation. Although removing fat deposits under the skin can significantly change a persons appearance, the health risks from excess weight appear to come from fat deep in the abdomen around or inside organs, which liposuction leaves in place.

Furthermore, a new study suggests that people who opt for liposuction often have unrealistic expectations about the extra measures they must take to maintain the new look and lower weight. Although the patients were generally satisfied with the liposuction surgery, 43 percent regained weight. This large percentage seems to have underestimated the importance or ease of making lifestyle changes to prevent weight from returning. Almost all of those who regained weight did not increase their level of exercise or change their diet after surgery.

Other weight-control surgeries for obese people alter a persons digestive process to cause the body to lose weight over time. One of the surgeries reduces the size of the stomach. Another type, called a gastric bypass operation, forces food to bypass sections of the digestive tract, reducing the amount of calories and nutrients that the body can absorb. Bypass operations tend to produce more weight loss, but they also pose the most side effects, including nutritional deficiencies. Both kinds of surgery, however, are significantly more effective than medications or counseling.

Yet people may underestimate the permanent changes in eating habits they will need to adopt after either kind of surgery. Because of the changes in the digestive tract, people need to learn to chew their food more thoroughly than before. Liquids need to be consumed separately from solid foods.

Although some people adapt to the required lifestyle changes, experts say that many others continue to struggle with emotions related to food after surgery. Counseling to cope with stress and other emotions without turning to food should be a vital part of anyones plan to make these operations successful.

People who are considering surgery to treat obesity also need to think about the likely outcome. A 30 percent weight loss is about typical. Nevertheless, since candidates for these extreme procedures are so obese, the typical person remains overweight. Although people may not reach their ideal weight, these large weight losses can produce tremendous health benefits. However, if a person expects to be thin and envisions automatic life changes, like more friends, a better marriage and professional success, they can become depressed.

When people weigh the risks and benefits of surgery for weight reduction, complications should also be considered. Although rare, they can be severe. Severe obesity, however, also has health risks that include heart disease, diabetes, sleep apnea and cancer that can be just as harmful. Perhaps, surgery may be an ideal solution to a severe weight problem, but all the factors need to be weighed before people select this option.

New research suggests that phytochemicals in green tea may help prevent the spread of prostate cancer. Since earlier research suggests that the same natural plant substances might also help prevent the development of prostate cancer, scientists say that more studies are needed on green teas ability to fight this common cancer. The best way to reduce your risk of prostate cancer, however, still lies in eating a mostly plant-based diet.

In the new green-tea study, researchers observed that phytochemicals called polyphenols attack growth factors and proteins, interrupting processes that increase the size of tumors, thus preventing them from spreading to other parts of the body. Further study of green tea may help develop a treatment to prevent the dormant, nonthreatening type of prostate cancer many men have late in life from becoming aggressive and fatal.

Studies presented at the most recent American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) conference on diet and cancer also show that green tea in mice with an aggressive form of cancer can decrease the spread or metastasis of prostate cancer to liver, bone and other sites. About six cups of green tea per day would contain the equivalent amount of polyphenols for humans to alter the balance of bodily processes and substances that will help block the spread of cancer.

Furthermore, data presented at the AICR conference show that the phytochemicals in green tea could inhibit the early stages of prostate cancer development. For example, the phytochemicals seem to increase the number of enzymes that convert carcinogens to inactive, harmless forms. For now, however, many questions remain about the amount and frequency of green tea necessary to halt the formation of prostate cancer. Although black tea has shown similar benefits to green tea, it appears to have lower levels of the beneficial substances.

In any case, it would be a mistake to rely on tea alone for prevention. Studies suggest that there are a variety of nutritional influences on prostate cancer risk. Vitamin E may offer some protection. In several important studies, the antioxidant mineral selenium also seems protective. Almost all Americans get adequate amounts of selenium, but these scientific studies used supplements, so the study participants reached higher intake levels. It is unclear, however, whether men can protect themselves more from prostate cancer by taking supplements, including multivitamins, with selenium and eating more selenium-rich seafood, grains and vegetables. If a persons total selenium intake exceeds 400 mcg per day, nerve damage and other side effects can occur.

According to more research presented at the AICR conference, two or more servings per week of raw or cooked tomatoes lower the risk of prostate cancer about 25 percent. The antioxidant phytochemical called lycopene is often credited for the risk reduction, but other substances in tomatoes may play a role. Another protective phytochemical in cruciferous vegetables like broccoli was mentioned at the AICR conference. This phytochemical, indole-3-carbinol, seems to increase the bodys ability to block carcinogens and halt the development of prostate cancer cells. Phytochemicals in soy foods are also considered protective.

If men want to lower their risk of prostate cancer, they should not consider drinking green tea as a replacement for a healthy, plant-based diet. However, it is reasonable to replace less healthy drinks with tea. Although black tea has health benefits, green teas higher levels of phytochemicals called catechins may make it more potent. When combined with a mostly plant-based diet, the phytochemicals from tea could have an even greater effect as all the plant substances interact together to safeguard your health.

People may inherit a sense of taste that affects their desire to eat a lot of vegetables and fruits. Studies show that some peoples taste and lifestyle preferences make vegetable or fruit consumption easier. By being aware of your preferences, you can find ways to increase the number of these foods you have each day until you meet health recommendations.

One recent study classified people as vegetable lovers, fruit lovers, lovers of both kinds of foods or lovers of neither. According to the study, fruit lovers like sweeter foods and eat dessert more often than vegetable lovers. They may also prefer foods that require less time or effort to prepare. Vegetable lovers, on the other hand, eat spicy foods more often and enjoy bitter or savory flavors, including tannic red wine. They report trying new recipes more often, hosting more dinner parties and cooking more nutritious meals than fruit lovers.

Because of the differences between these groups, the researchers of this study suggest that people try to meet the goal of five to ten daily servings of vegetables or fruits within their preferences. Fruit lovers could always choose fruits for desserts and snacks. They could also incorporate fruits into their meals in many ways without much preparation. Vegetable lovers, in contrast, could make even greater use of spices and new recipes to eat more vegetables. For example, they could learn how to prepare a variety of ethnic dishes.

Vegetables and fruits can contain many of the same vitamins and minerals. Vitamin C can come from kiwi, orange, sweet pepper or cauliflower. Beta-carotene is found in cantaloupe, apricot, winter squash or spinach. Both vegetables and fruits can also be good sources of potassium, magnesium and to some extent folate. However, vegetables and fruits are nutritionally different, and everyone should eat both. Some important phytochemicals are found mainly in vegetables. For instance, the primary source of isoflavones is soybeans. In addition, anti-cancer indoles and isothiocyanates only come from cruciferous vegetables, like broccoli, cauliflower, bok choy and watercress.

Inherited taste preferences may explain why individuals differ in their enjoyment of super-healthy cruciferous vegetables. In one taste test, researchers tried to see how well people could detect a substance known as PROP in solutions of various strengths. Some people couldnt taste it, some people tasted it at moderate concentrations and others had a bitter taste from highly diluted solutions. People who were most often able to taste PROP tended to dislike eating vegetables. A dislike for cruciferous vegetables was especially related to an ability to detect PROP.

Studies suggest that PROP tasters make about 75 percent of the population, so taste preferences may be a significant barrier to meeting nutrition recommendations for many people. Fortunately food preparation methods can decrease a perception of bitterness.

Indian cooks are expert at pleasing our senses and filling our stomachs while also encouraging good health. They are especially skilled at including enough poultry, meat, or seafood to satisfy our palates in dishes that actually emphasize whole grains, fruits and vegetables in the most enticing way.

Chicken Biriyani (sometimes spelled Biryani, and pronounced bir-ree-YAH-nee) is a perfect example of this talent. This lavish Moghul specialty from northern India is traditionally a combination of chicken simmered in a creamy sauce rich with spices, then layered with fragrant rice, raisins and other ingredients, and garnished with nuts. It is often served as a banquet dish on special occasions such as weddings and, in the ultimate extravagance, may be finished with a breathtaking garnish of silver or gold leaf.

Although reserved for festive occasions in India, most Indian restaurants in America feature biriyanis as a permanent part of their menu. Usually listed under rice dishes because aromatic basmati rice is a key element, biriyanis are, in fact, hugely popular in this country. We enjoy them so much because a good biriyani is hearty yet light, and highly flavored yet comfortably spicy.

The version below is made with brown basmati rice and is ready to serve in 30 minutes. The Indian spice mix called garam masala is commercially available, or you can prepare your own version. Instead of ghee, the melted butter used by Indian cooks, this recipe calls for a mere tablespoon of butter. The modest amount of reduced-fat coconut milk used gives the biriyani a rich creaminess.

Heat oil in a deep, medium non-stick skillet over medium-high heat. Add onions and saut? until translucent, about 4 minutes. Mix in garlic and garam masala. Reduce heat to medium and cook until onions are very soft, 3 to 4 minutes. Add chicken and cook, stirring occasionally, until it loses raw color, about 5 minutes.

Thanks to the fourth Earl of Sandwich, the English get credit for inventing this now international favorite. We must also thank our British forefathers for bringing sandwiches to the Colonies, where we proceeded to perfect this efficient and handy creation.

Sandwich recipes appeared in American cookbooks as early as 1816. By the time of the Civil War, they became quite commonplace. Popular fillings were as diverse as oysters, minced beef, fried eggs, jam, watercress and cheese. Sandwiches themselves were either dainty and bite-size and offered from a passed plate at teatime, ladies luncheons, or midnight suppers, or they were big and manly. (The Earl of Sandwich invented his namesake so he could eat without interruptions at the gambling table.) Taverns and bars served hefty ones filled with slabs of ham or beef and were substantial enough to make a meal.

Proving there is seldom anything new in the culinary world, in 1893, according to The Oxford Encyclopedia of Food and Drink in America, Mrs. Alexander Orr Bradley included a sandwich filled with imported Italian canned tuna in her cookbook, Beverages and Sandwiches. During the 1890s, salad fillings for sandwiches also became widely used. Creativity in filling and assembling sandwiches continued to flourish and in 1936, one cookbook included 1,000 sandwich recipes.

Commercially-sliced bread, introduced in the late 1920s, made assembling a sandwich even easier. And children could now make their own lunch without using a knife, truly cementing the popularity of sandwiches in school lunchboxes.

Heat the oil in a medium skillet over medium-high heat. Saut? the onion and pepper until translucent, about 4 minutes. Add the garlic and saut? until the vegetables are soft, about 3 minutes. Add the turkey and cook, using a wooden spoon to break it up and stirring until it loses its pink color, about 4 minutes. Add the tomatoes, tomato paste and barbecue sauce.

Simmer vigorously until the mixture is thick, about 15 minutes, stirring occasionally. Season to taste with salt and pepper. If not using immediately, refrigerate, covered, for up to 3 days. Reheat gently in a microwave oven before using.

Place the bottom of each bun on a plate. Spoon over each equal amounts of the meat mixture. Top with the onion and some lettuce, if using. Cover with the top of the bun or set it to lean on one side of the meat topping. Serve immediately.

Each year in the 12-year cycle of Chinese astrology is represented by an animal. People born during the year, it is believed, show traits of that animal in their personality. Everyone born in this year of the Rooster, as well as in previous ones including 1933, 1945, 1957, etc. are quick-thinking and practical. You may also be vain and a perfectionist. If, however, you keep an open mind, you should have a rewarding year at work and in relationships.

In celebrating the Chinese New Year, symbols are also important in meals that mark the occasion. Oranges and tangerines represent happy abundance. Fish is served whole to ensure that your prosperity remains intact, and eating long noodles supposedly brings a long life.

For good health and longevity as well as a good life, serve bright green broccoli stir-fried with ginger for Chinese New Year and throughout the rest of the year, too. Both broccoli and ginger are packed with powerful substances that help protect your health from a range of chronic diseases. The recipe below does not call for soy sauce or other high-sodium ingredients, making this a perfect dish for Chinese-food lovers with restricted sodium intake. It contains only a small amount of oil, and the ginger, plus a touch of sugar, balances broccolis assertive taste.

What makes the dish special is the wonderful intensity of the ginger flavor. To produce it, Asians shred ginger using a special, inexpensive grater you can find at many Asian markets. After the ginger is grated, the wet pulp is squeezed and the resulting juice is used in the cooking, not the pulp. The microplane graters sold at cookware stores produce an equally fine pulp. You can also get ginger juice using a regular grater if you lay plastic wrap over the finest side, then rub the fresh root over it. When you lift away the plastic, the wet paste produced will come with it. Gather this up with your fingers, squeeze it and you have ginger juice.

Heat the oil in a large skillet or wok over the highest possible heat until hot. Add the ginger and garlic (if using) and stir-fry until the garlic starts to color, about 30 seconds. Remove the garlic with a slotted spoon and discard. Transfer the ginger to a small dish or cup. Add the broccoli to the pan and stir-fry, stirring frequently, until almost tender. Stir the broth mixture and pour into the skillet. Add the ginger. Stir-fry until most of the liquid has evaporated, about 1 minute. Turn the broccoli into a serving bowl. Serve warm or at room temperature.

To win someones heart or remind your family of how special they are, surprise them on Valentines Day by serving this unexpected French toast. With a little advance planning and preparation, you can make this French toast even though its for a Monday morning breakfast.

The sauce for this version of French toast can be made a few days ahead. The toast can too, if you prefer reheating already cooked and frozen toast just before breakfast. However, use a toaster or toaster oven and not a microwave oven, which will result in soggy toast and poor flavor.

The fruit and the filling for this cherry-stuffed French toast make it uniquely different. And a few clever techniques explained in the recipe below make this version easy to prepare. First, you cut out circles from the center of the bread slices with a cookie cutter. Then you cut up the circles and mix them with fruit to make the stuffing for the French toast. The stuffing and the bread slices are soaked separately in an egg mixture. At the beginning of the frying process, both are combined in the skillet. The result is moist French toast studded with fruit and flavored with spice all the way through a special breakfast treat for a special day.

Using a small, round cookie cutter (or fingers), remove the centers from bread slices, leaving about a 1/2-inch of bread inside the crust. Transfer slices to a shallow, flat container. Tear the circles into small pieces and place in a mixing bowl. Mix in the chopped cherries.

In a separate bowl, beat the eggs, then whisk in milk, zest, and vanilla. Pour half over the bread/cherry mixture and mix with a fork until combined. Pour the remaining egg mixture over the bread slices, and let stand until liquid is absorbed.

Heat oil in a large nonstick skillet or griddle over medium-high heat. Add the bread slices. (If the skillet holds less that 8 slices, cook the French Toast in batches, keeping each batch warm until all are cooked.) Fill in the empty centers of bread slices with spoonfuls of the filling, pressing down with the back of the spoon to firmly pack the mixture. Brown the bread on one side, 3 to 4 minutes, then carefully turn to brown the second side. Meanwhile, heat cherry sauce over low heat until very warm.

New research reported by the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) shows that whole grains like corn, whole wheat, oats and brown rice have powerful antioxidants cancer-fighting agents that have gone undocumented for years. Whole grains, the study found, exhibit a level of anti-cancer activity that is equal to, and sometimes greater than, the level known to occur in vegetables and fruits.

The finding may begin to clear up one of the most controversial and confusing questions in contemporary diet-cancer science: the role of high-fiber diets in lowering colon cancer risk. For years, scientists have wondered why people whose diets are high in fiber-rich whole grains consistently have lower risk for colon cancer. Yet short-term clinical trials involving small groups of subjects yield inconsistent results.

The answer may lie in the fact that clinical trials tended to overlook a role for whole grains and focused instead on the role of fiber alone in lowering colon cancer risk. The new research suggests that future clinical studies would benefit from a broader perspective one that accounts for the collective, interactive effects of whole grains themselves, the fiber they contain, and the various protective substances now revealed.

The finding underscores the need for Americans to choose whole grains whenever they can. Some simple adjustments in shopping and cooking can help. Use whole-wheat pasta, ask for brown rice at an Asian restaurant, make sure any bread you eat is 100 percent whole grain.

The scientists involved in the new study say that the key to whole grains enormous cancer-fighting potential lies in its very wholeness. A grain of whole wheat is composed of three parts: endosperm, bran and germ. When wheat or any grain is refined, the bran and germ where most of the protective phytochemicals and fiber are stored are removed.

This study reinforces AICRs commitment to meals with variety. Different plant foods have different phytochemicals. To ward off disease, the body needs synergy or teamwork among the various foods on your plate, including whole grains.

Microwave peas on high for 1 minute. In a medium salad bowl, combine peas, brown rice, red pepper and watercress. In a small bowl, whisk together olive oil, rice vinegar and garlic. Add to rice mixture, tossing well to combine. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Garnish with pine nuts.

It's the Season of the Grapefruit from the American Institute for Cancer Research In the 1970s, there was the grapefruit diet. The claim was that grapefruit enzymes would burn away fat. There's no scientific evidence to support this, but there is plenty of science that supports the claim that grapefruit is a nutrition-rich fruit.

All grapefruit are an excellent source of vitamin C, but red and pink varieties provide more of the phytochemical called lycopene. Lycopene is a carotenoid, a cousin to beta-carotene. Although it cannot be turned into vitamin A like beta-carotene, it is a much stronger antioxidant. So pick red or pink grapefruit instead of white when you can. The skins of all grapefruit are yellow, although some have a pinkish blush. Lycopene is also found in tomatoes and watermelon.

Some studies suggest that people who eat more foods high in lycopene may have a lower risk of prostate and other cancers, and less heart disease. But grapefruit can interfere with the effectiveness of some medications, so check with your pharmacist if you regularly take any medicine about which you may have doubts concerning counter-effects.

This is the peak of the season for grapefruit. Choose those that have thin, fine-textured, brightly colored skin. They should be firm but springy when you hold them in your hand and press them. The heavier they are for their size, the juicier they'll be. Grapefruit should not be left at room temperature for more than a day. They keep up to 2 weeks wrapped in a plastic bag and placed in the vegetable drawer of the refrigerator.

Holding the fruit over a medium bowl to catch juices, release sections from the membrane and collect them in the bowl. Cut sections crosswise into 1-inch pieces. Add tomato, cucumber, onion, beans and chile pepper and mix to blend. Pour in orange and lime juice. Season to taste with salt and freshly ground pepper. Set aside.

Bring a large pot of water to a boil. Add shrimp and cook until pink, curled and opaque all the way through, 6 to 8 minutes. Drain immediately. When cool enough to handle, peel and devein shrimp, then slit them horizontally along the back, cutting almost all the way through, but not completely, from tip to tail.

Arrange 4 shrimp in a pinwheel design, on each of 4 dinner plates. Spoon a tablespoon of salsa into the slit in each shrimp. Mound remaining salsa in the center of the plate. Sprinkle 1/4 of cilantro and mint over each plate and serve immediately.

George Washington loved ice cream, Andrew Jackson favored turkey hash and some reports have it that Ulysses S. Grant ate cucumbers soaked in vinegar for breakfast, no less. One of Abraham Lincolns favorite foods was chicken fricassee. He also liked corn, cheese and his wife Mary Todds almond cake.

Jambalaya is a chicken stew that combines cooked rice with a variety of meat, vegetables and spices. The dish varies widely from cook to cook. Its thought that the name derives from the French jambon , meaning ham, the main ingredient in many early jambalayas.

Replacing the ham with skinless, boneless chicken breast keeps unhealthful saturated fat low. A variety of vegetables tomatoes, celery and green pepper give thedish color and texture, and thyme, bay leaves, pepper flakes and a pinch of ground cloves provide spice.

Add tomatoes with liquid, breaking them up with a spoon. Mix in celery, bell pepper, scallion and tomato paste. Stir in bay leaf, thyme, pepper flakes and cloves. Bring to a boil. Reduce heat and simmer until chicken is cooked and sauce has thickened, about 20 minutes.

Root vegetables such as beets contain substances that not only fight cancer, but help strengthen resistance to other health problems, according to the American Institute for Cancer Research. They contain calcium and anti-oxidants, which help fight free radicals, the damaging forms of oxygen that attack the cells membranes and contents.

Both beets and oranges provide flavonoids, one group of phytochemicals that seems to help lower risk of cancer and heart disease. Flavonoids, too, can prevent injury from free radicals by converting them to more stable, less-reactive forms. Beets have even more of the antioxidant vitamin C than oranges.

Beets are exceptionally high in natural sugar (up to 8 percent of their weight), and the beets sweetness increases with oven roasting. When foods with natural sugars, like beets and other root vegetables, are roasted, a chemical process occurs which produces a sweet rich flavor.

The firm, round beet has a leafy green top, which is also edible and very nutritious. While the most common color for beets is garnet red, they can range in color from deep red to white. While beets are available year-round, their peak months are in fall and winter, after the first frost.

Choose beets that are smooth and firm, with a bright color. Small or medium beets are usually more tender than large ones. If the beet greens are attached, they should be removed as soon as you get them home because they take moisture from the beet.

Preparing beets for the following recipe is simple. And while the beets cook, you can prepare the rest of your Valentines meal. Be sure to rinse your hands and the cutting board thoroughly after working with beets to prevent pink stains.

Preheat oven to 400 degrees. Detach beets from their stems and retain for another use, if desired. Wash each beet and individually wrap in aluminum foil. Place beets on baking sheet and roast uncovered for about 1 hour, or until beets can be easily pricked with a knife.

Two studies appearing in the January 12 issue of the Journal of the American Medical Association (JAMA) investigate the relationship between specific dietary factors (meat intake and fruit/vegetable intake, respectively) and cancer risk. Both papers are valuable contributions to the ever-growing scientific literature on this vital topic.

When these new studies are considered in light of research that has come before, one thing becomes clear: the best available advice to lower the risk for cancer is unchanged. E ating a plant-based diet, increasing physical activity, maintaining a healthy weight and not smoking remain the most important things individuals can do to stop cancer before it starts.

The second JAMA study found no significant association between consumption of vegetables and fruits and reduced risk for breast cancer. This finding is harder to place in context; while previous evidence from large-scale population studies, case-control studies and laboratory investigations generally support the contention that diets high in vegetables and fruits protect against breast cancer, evidence from cohort studies like this one tends to be less consistent. At this time, the precise nature of the link between diets high in vegetables and fruits and the specific risk for breast cancer remains unclear. Evidence linking such diets to lower risk for colon, stomach, lung and many other cancers, however, is significantly stronger.

It should also be noted that post-menopausal women face an increased risk for breast cancer if they are overweight or obese. A diet rich in fruits and vegetables and other plant-based foods can help an individual maintain a healthy weight.

We at the American Institute for Cancer Research, in conjunction with World Cancer Research Fund International, are devoted to fostering diet-cancer research and educating the public about the results. Together we have convened a panel of international experts who are currently preparing a second comprehensive report, Food, Nutrition, Physical Activity and the Prevention of Cancer: A Global Perspective, which will rigorously assess thousands of published studies on this important topic  including these new JAMA studies. The report will weigh all of these findings together and produce a series of definitive, science-based recommendations for shaping a diet, organizing physical activity and managing weight. It will also contain recommendations for shaping public health policies that can help lower worldwide cancer incidence.

I discovered monkfish during the 1970s, in Europe, where this boneless and mild-tasting fish is prized for its firm yet tender texture. Called lotte in France, it is also sometimes known as poor mans lobster because its pearly white color and unflaky texture vaguely resemble the meat of a lobster tail.

You see only long, tapering monkfish fillets at the fish counter, never the whole fish, which can be three feet or longer. Also, this Atlantic native is startlingly ugly. A voracious species, it has an immense head with an enormous, wide mouth full of pointy, sharp teeth. Also called angler-fish, it brandishes its own fishing pole, an antenna-like projection on top of its head, used to attract its prey, mainly other fish. Its other names are goosefish and bellyfish, presumably thanks to its huge appetite, which some believe accounts for its pleasant flavor.

Europeans prepare monkfish with the same care as Dover sole. I have had it studded with garlic and roasted over fennel, like a leg of lamb, and embellished with a classic crayfish sauce. Though it was rarely seen in America in the past, I have recently enjoyed it in many different restaurants. At one, medallions of monkfish were served on a bed of smoky, dark green French lentils.

Monkfish has increased considerably in price from its cost in the 70s, and is now around eight dollars a pound. When buying it, ask if the thin membrane encasing the filet can be removed so you do not have to do it.

When ready to prepare it, trim away any purple spots, which are fine for eating but turn brown in cooking. You can roast monkfish, poach or braise it in whole filets, or cut the pearly white flesh into inch-thick medallions, as in this dish. Its mild flavor requires an interesting accompaniment, like these colorful roasted tomatoes stuffed with vegetables, and drizzled with warm sherry vinegar.

Preheat the oven to 375 degrees. In a bowl, coat the tomato halves, red pepper, onion, and garlic clove with the oil. Arrange them in one layer on a baking sheet with tomatoes cut-side up. Lightly sprinkle with salt. Roast the vegetables 15 minutes. Transfer the tomatoes to a plate, cut-side down and cover with foil to keep warm. Roast the remaining vegetables 15 minutes longer, until tender but still firm. Set aside, leaving the oven on.

Coat an oven-proof skillet with cooking spray. Spray the fish with the oil and season with salt and pepper. Place it in the pan and set over high heat for 1 minute. Transfer the skillet to the oven. Bake the fish 6 to 8 minutes, or until opaque in the center. The fish will curl up into nuggets resembling lobster meat.

Meanwhile, scoop out and discard the center of the tomato halves, leaving any juices. Chop the vegetables to resemble chunky salsa. Spoon them into the tomato halves. Boil the vinegar and sugar in a small pan over high heat until syrupy, like a sauce, about 2-3 minutes.

This light pasta is made from rice ground into a fine flour, mixed with water and slowly dried. It contains no wheat, gluten, eggs, cholesterol, or fat. Because they are already cooked, you need only soak rice noodles in hot water until soft before using them.

Traditionally, rice noodles are soaked in cold water until soft, at least an hour, then drained and plunged into boiling water. Today, many cooks just cover them with boiling water in a bowl and soak the noodles until soft and tender, three to 10 minutes, depending on their thickness. Always rinse the softened noodles under cold water before using. This washes away the starch that makes noodles stick together and turns soups and sauces cloudy. To reduce clumping. leave the reconstituted noodles moist if you are not using them immediately. If desired, use scissors to cut long noodles after soaking , so they are easier to eat.

Place ginger slices, lemongrass (if using), curry paste and broth in a deep saucepan. Bring it a boil, reduce the heat and simmer 5 minutes. Add the onion and simmer until almost tender. Add tomatoes and shrimp. Simmer just until shrimp turn pink. Add the mushrooms, soy or fish sauce, lime juice, noodles and chili pepper.

Walk into a room after someone has peeled an orange, and the fragrance is positively uplifting. This instant aromatherapy comes from essential oils in the zest, the colored outer layer of citrus skin. Polyphenols, the source of citruss fragrance, also add flavor in cooking, and they are potent cancer-blocking antioxidants.

The challenge in using zest is removing it from the fruit easily, and without including any pith, the bitter-tasting layer just beneath it. Even a tiny bit of pith left on the zest can result in a very unpleasant taste. To avoid this, chefs have devised a variety of instruments and methods over the years.

The fastest, simplest way to remove the zest from citrus is with a microplane. Thats right, the woodworking tool called a rasp. Resembling a long, narrow grater, its fine teeth whisk zest off in a wink as long as this is done with a light, gentle hand. A microplane can create angel-hair fine curls, pith-free and ready to use. Microplanes cost as little as ten dollars. They do a brilliant job grating hard cheeses and fresh ginger, too, and are far superior to a zester, a culinary tool that makes long thin strips, often with pith attached, and can leave a great deal of zest behind on the fruit.

A swivel-blade vegetable peeler neatly removes zest in wider strips that are excellent for making apple sauce, as with lemon zest, or butternut squash soup, using orange zest, and removed before serving the finished dish.

A sharp paring knife also works Slice the strips lengthwise into the thinnest strips, using a sharp knife. Turn them over to expose the interior side to check if any pith remains. If so, hold down the strip, cut side up, at one end with a fingertip and, with the blade of the knife almost horizontal to the zest, work it between the pith and the peel, slicing away the pith. If only small bits of pinch remain, they can be gently scraped off with the edge of the knife. The strips can then be cut crosswise and minced. Coarser than grated zest, these fine bits release delightful flavor bursts in baked goods, tabbouleh and rice salad.

Braising is one-pot cooking that is tenderizing, aromatic, incredibly flavorful and easy. Technically, it means cooking food, with just a little liquid and tightly covered, over low heat for a long time. Braising differs from stewing, which uses lots of liquid and can be done in an uncovered pot. It does not produce the seductively intense sauces you get from braising.

Because it tenderizes, braising is ideal for todays leaner, often tough cuts of meat, especially the less expensive ones. The moist heat is also ideal for making skinless poultry as succulent as possible. In fact, a recent cookbook, In Praise of Braising, by Molly Stevens, recommends short braising, which takes, at most, an hour of untended simmering, perfect for both poultry and fish because of its ability to infuse them with deep flavor.

The best pot for braising is heavy, ideally made of cast iron, enameled or not, or stainless steel-clad aluminum, both of which conduct heat slowly and evenly and work both on top of the stove and in the oven. A tight-fitting lid holds in the braising liquid along with the juices, so as the food cooks their flavors can mingle and concentrate. Use a pot that holds what you are cooking snugly. Placing a sheet of cooking parchment or foil between the pot and lid can assure a good seal if a lid does not.

Turn off heat under skillet to allow mixture to cool slightly. Stir in the drained yogurt. Reduce heat to low and continue stirring until mixture is hot, taking care not to let it boil or the sauce will separate. Spoon the mixture over the chicken and serve.

Pomegranates are the fruit of the moment. Thanks to their health benefits, the burst of culinary creativity they inspire, plus marketing promotions, this jewel-like fruit is receiving the attention it well-deserves.

Recent scientific studies report the various good effects pomegranates can produce, thanks to their abundance of vitamin C, heart-benefiting polyphenols, and high levels of flavonoids, antioxidants that also seem to protect against heart disease and cancer. Evidently, drinking pomegranate juice can be better for you than consuming red wine, green tea, or cranberry and orange juice.

Chefs are using fresh pomegranate seeds, pomegranate juice, and even more intensely flavored pomegranate molasses in a feast of ways. Menus with media appeal feature salads with its succulent, ruby seeds scattered over them. Pomegranate-enhanced main dishes and desserts also sparkle with these seeds. Using fresh pomegranates can be messy. The juice that can spurt out as you pry out the seeds can stain clothes. But there are tricks that help. Place a strainer or colander in a bowl and set it in the sink. Hold the pomegranate so the cut side is facing down, Pull the seeds from the fruits leathery skin and let them drop into the colander. Then detach the seeds from the membrane holding them in place.

Fresh pomegranates have a short season that runs from September to December. Fortunately, savvy producers now offer pomegranate juice at local supermarkets as well as natural foods markets. And pomegranate molasses, generally found only in Middle Eastern groceries, is now more easily available as well. The juice is perfect in savory dishes as well as delicious to drink. The molasses, made by reducing juice and sugar to a thick syrup that is pleasantly tart and astringent, is interesting added to tomato or citrus sauces. Pomegranate juice, excellent in this vinaigrette for spinach salad, also helps create a tempting dessert when drizzled over berries and other fruits.

Over high heat, boil the pomegranate juice in a small stainless steel or other non-reactive saucepan until reduced to 1/3 cup, about 9 or 10 minutes. Mix in the sugar, salt, vinegar and oil and set aside to cool.

Divide the spinach among four salad plates. Top each with one fourth of the grapefruit sections, 3 avocado slices, one-fourth of the jicama, and an onion slice. Spoon the warm dressing over the salad, and serve.

A: Dont wait. When children give up baby food, they should not stop eating vegetables and fruits. In fact, research suggests that new foods are often better accepted at age two to four than at four to eight. Experts say that the low level of fruit and vegetable consumption in the diets of teens and adolescents is probably related to habits and tastes that developed when they were very young. To improve the nutrition of your children and help establish good health habits for life, include one or two vegetables or fruits at each meal. These foods make great snacks, too. Obviously, portion sizes for children must be suited to their size. About a quarter of a cup is a suitable serving for preschoolers. Toddlers should have less. Dont be disappointed if your children reject foods. Most children need to see a food between eight and fifteen times before they begin to accept it.

A: People differ in how much their blood cholesterol is affected by diet, exercise, weight and an inherited tendency to produce lots of cholesterol. How much different eating habits can lower blood cholesterol also depends on how bad those habits are to begin with. Generally, studies show that a diet low in saturated fat reduces high LDL (bad) blood cholesterol about 10 percent. If significant amounts of soluble dietary fiber, which is found in fruits, vegetables and beans, are added, the decrease in LDL cholesterol can reach 20 percent. An even better result can be obtained through a multi-pronged approach called the Portfolio Diet, recent studies show. The Portfolio Diet can lower LDL cholesterol by 30 percent, which is equivalent to the effect of todays popular cholesterol- lowering medications. This diet is also a low-saturated-fat, high-soluble-fiber eating plan. In addition, it involves eating soy protein, nuts and products that contain plant sterols like special margarines.

A: Surveys show that eating more home-prepared foods leads to better weight control and improved nutrient intake. Time is not a crucial factor for making healthful meals at home. All you need is a well-stocked kitchen and good planning. You should always have on hand a weeks worth of healthy cooking staples, like whole-grain pasta, quick-cooking brown rice, canned garbanzo and kidney beans, frozen vegetables, olive oil, dried herbs and flavored low-fat cooking sauces. Stock the freezer with individual, three-ounce portions of skinless, boneless chicken breast and lean meat, as well as frozen fish, to thaw and cook in the microwave in minutes. Plan meals for several days or a week ahead of time. Good planning minimizes time spent grocery shopping and avoids last-minute pre-meal panic. For each meal, you should think of serving a source of protein (meat, poultry, seafood, dairy or beans), a whole grain, and some vegetable or fruit. Its better to serve both a vegetable and fruit. You can follow this simple meal formula by making soups, stews, casseroles, stir-fries over pasta or rice, main dish salads served with a whole grain roll, or sandwiches with raw fruit and veggies. You can freeze some meals for use later. Once youve made a plan, keep it and use it again another week.

A: The Daily Value for potassium, 3,500 milligrams (mg), applies to all adults. This figure comes from old recommendations of the Institute of Medicine (IOM) that formed the basis of the Recommended Dietary Allowances. Some experts still do approve of using this amount as a target for potassium intake. It is substantially higher than the current average intake. But the IOM has revised its recommendation for potassium. The Institute now suggests that from age 14 males and females might benefit from a daily potassium intake of 4,700 mg. If you follow the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) advice to eat an abundance of vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans, a higher potassium intake is one of the many nutritional benefits you will receive.

A: The Dietary Approaches to Stop Hypertension (DASH) diet was developed to lower blood pressure more than just limiting sodium consumption can. Studies show that the DASH diet can reduce blood pressure, as well as LDL (bad) cholesterol. Rich in vegetables, fruits, whole grains and low-fat dairy products, the DASH eating plan provides plenty of potassium, magnesium and calcium, all of which may help control blood pressure. The cholesterol-lowering effects of DASH probably stem from the fiber found in the abundance of vegetables, fruits and whole grains, along with the low level of saturated fat from the limited amounts of fatty meat. A new study further suggests that part of the health benefits from the DASH diet may come from its high level of natural phytochemicals. The interaction of phytochemicals and nutrients in a healthy, mostly plant-based diet is also thought to decrease the risk of other chronic conditions, like cancer.

A: By noticing your habits, youve made the first step toward changing them. Now, to improve them, you need to determine why youre snacking. Snacking can occur in response to hunger, emotional cues or behavioral cues. If you truly arent hungry when you snack, instead of switching to healthy foods, its better to break this nonhunger-related habit. Look carefully at the chain of events that leads up to this habit. Then come up with a way to break the chain. For example, if you snack when you get home because you stop in the kitchen, put your things down elsewhere. Go immediately to some other room and do something to occupy yourself for a while. If you change the cues that remind you to snack, the habit should be relatively easy to change. Continue the new pattern long enough to break the old mental links.

A: Yes. There are primarily two kinds of antioxidants in olive oil: phenols and vitamin E. The amount of phytochemicals in olive oil called phenols varies depending on how the oil is produced. Extra virgin oil is higher in these phenols than light olive oils. Olive oil also supplies the antioxidant vitamin E. Although olive oil contains less vitamin E than several vegetable oils that have more polyunsaturated fat, olive oil is mostly composed of monounsaturated fat. This is an important difference. Polyunsaturated fat is less stable and more vulnerable to oxidation reactions than monounsaturated fat. Human studies suggest that olive oil, because of its monounsaturated fat, can help prevent LDL (bad) cholesterol from converting to its most damaging form. By raising the antioxidant content of blood, olive oil could possibly lead to less DNA damage that can initiate cancer.

A: Just like cereal, the kind of waffles you choose determines their nutrition qualities. Some frozen waffles are made only with refined flour, whereas those with at least some whole-grain flour provide more fiber and nutrients. For people who have trouble meeting their calcium needs with dairy products or other enriched foods, there are even some frozen waffles that supply 30 percent of the Daily Value (DV) for calcium. A glass of milk contains the same amount of calcium. You should always check the fat content of waffles, too, when choosing. The ultimate nutritional value of waffles, however, depends on how you serve them. If you spread a waffle with peanut butter and place apple or pear slices or raisins on top, you have a healthy, portable treat that will satisfy your hunger much longer than a waffle topped with butter or margarine and syrup. Waffles spread with vanilla yogurt and a variety of fruits like kiwi, banana and fresh or frozen berries are also excellent breakfasts or snacks.

A: Stevia rebaudiana, commonly referred to as stevia, comes from a small shrub. In the U.S., it is promoted as a dietary supplement or sweetener. These two uses are regulated under different laws. It is legal to sell stevia in the U.S. as a dietary supplement, because no dangers have been proven to its use. Some studies suggest that stevia could help control high blood pressure and diabetes, but only a few well-controlled human studies have been done. If you really want to control high blood pressure and diabetes, you should concentrate on the primary lifestyle steps of portion control, regular exercise, balanced eating and sodium restriction. As a sweetener, the Food and Drug Administration has not approved stevia for use since adequate evidence of its safety has not been presented. In fact, research shows that the main chemical in stevia can be converted in the laboratory to a compound that causes gene changes. More study is needed to learn whether these changes could lead to cancer in people. The potential impact of stevia or any other sugar replacement on weight control, however, is easily overestimated. Excess weight comes from consuming more calories than you burn. At 16 calories per teaspoon, only people who add large amounts of sugar to their foods are likely to benefit from switching to a sugar replacement. Most of the large amounts of sugar Americans consume are added in commercial food processing.

A: Frozen dinners that limit fat and sodium content are a good start compared to many other frozen meals. Regular versions of these dinners can contain 30 to 55 grams of fat and 700 to 2,100 milligrams (mg) of sodium per serving. You should check the nutrition information on these healthier dinners, however. Some products designed for weight control reduce the fat and calorie content, but sodium content can still be 600 to 800 mg. Depending on your other food choices for the day, this high amount of sodium makes it difficult for a person to stay under the American Institute for Cancer Researchs (AICR) recommended limit of 2,400 mg for the whole day. In fact, the newest Institute of Medicine recommendations say that its best to stay under 1,500 mg to prevent and control high blood pressure. If you plan to eat frozen dinners frequently, the health-oriented meals that keep sodium at 400 to 600 mg are better. You should also keep in mind that even the healthier frozen dinners can have small quantities of vegetables. In fact, some products that feature vegetables in their name place cornstarch higher on the list of ingredients than any vegetable. If you create vegetable sides for the healthier kinds of frozen dinners, you can have a delicious meal that is much more nutritious. While convenient frozen meals are heating, open a bag of ready-to-eat salad. Or microwave a bag of microwavable, prewashed spinach, serving it with a splash of balsamic vinegar or a sprinkle of Parmesan cheese. Salad bars at grocery stores can provide either salads or chopped vegetables for a quick stir-fry at home. Many kinds of fully prepared fruits are also available. Since some health-oriented convenience meals can be a little low in calories, eating extra vegetables and fruits can make these meals more satisfying and sustain your energy for several hours.

A: A target of 10,000 steps a day has been linked with many health benefits. However, middle-aged women in a recent study, who began using pedometers, had an average step count below 5,000 steps a day. Only seven percent walked over 10,000 steps a day. To see what is a realistic goal for you, record your step count on several typical days that dont include any extra walking. If your present count is considerably below 10,000 steps, it will be physically and psychologically easier for you to start by setting a target of 1,000 more steps a day. Even a 10 percent increase is a good goal. After a week or so, increase your target again. Studies show that people can walk significantly more with simple lifestyle changes. For example, change where you park or exit from mass transportation. Take the steps instead of elevators. To reach 10,000 steps, however, people usually have to set aside time for walking. Even if you fall short of 10,000 steps, any increase you do achieve and continue long-term will help you control your weight, lower your cancer risk and improve the state of your health.

A: Fibrocystic breast disease is a condition in which women develop noncancerous lumps in their breasts. Some experts urge women with this condition to avoid caffeine. But current research does not indicate a strong link between the two. More studies are needed. In the meantime, women with fibrocystic disease might benefit from trying to reduce or avoid caffeine. If no effect appears after several months, these women could resume having caffeine in moderation.

A: In the few studies to date, lasting six months or more, low-carbohydrate diets did not cause a rise in LDL (bad) cholesterol as many nutrition experts expected. Apparently, the amount of weight loss offset the cholesterol-raising impact of fatty high-protein foods. However, studies have shown possibly negative effects of these diets on the liver, kidney and the risk of gout. Since peoples responses varied widely in these studies, individuals who choose to follow a high-protein diet should have their physician regularly give them blood tests. Although all the studies conducted so far seem to support the safety of low-carb diets, there are still other health concerns. The risk of heart disease posed by LDL cholesterol is based on the form of this cholesterol, not just its blood level. Antioxidants help keep LDL cholesterol in a form that poses less risk. Yet vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans, which are the sources for most antioxidant vitamins and phytochemicals, are limited by low-carbohydrate diets. Weight control is an important step toward lower cancer risk, but the nutrients and phytochemicals in plant foods play a crucial role in good health and cancer prevention and should be a part of your meals.

A: Not necessarily. Portion size has a huge impact on the calorie and nutrient content in wraps. The one-ounce flatbreads and tortillas used for wraps often contain 70 to 90 calories, which is the same as a one-ounce slice of whole grain bread. But some wraps are two to three ounces and contain 110 to 160 calories. Low-calorie bread, on the other hand, is usually about 50 calories, often because it is sliced thinner. Low-carb claims can be deceiving. Breads and tortillas labeled low carb dont actually contain any fewer carbohydrates or calories than regular products. The extra fiber added to low-carb choices is subtracted from the total carbohydrate content, yielding a lower net carb amount. The other aspect of any sandwich you should weigh when judging its nutritional value is the contents: The larger the quantity of stuffing, the higher the calories. At fast food restaurants, when wraps are smaller than sandwiches, they are lower in calories. At restaurants where the two are equal in size, wraps can be higher in calories because their fillings may include more mayonnaise, bacon and other high-fat ingredients.

A: All grapefruit is an excellent source of vitamin C, but red and pink varieties provide more of the phytochemical called lycopene. Lycopene is a carotenoid, a cousin to beta-carotene, as well as a pigment. Although it cannot be turned into vitamin A like beta-carotene, it is a much stronger antioxidant. Consequently, choosing red or pink grapefruit instead of white makes good sense. The darker red flesh signals a higher lycopene content. Lycopene is also found in tomatoes and watermelon. Some studies suggest that people who eat more foods high in lycopene may have a lower risk of prostate and other cancers, and less heart disease. Because phytochemicals like lycopene appear to work best in combination with other phytochemicals, it is preferable to eat them from foods rather than supplements. Some people on certain medications should avoid eating any kind of grapefruit before they consult their pharmacist.

Americans have a love-hate relationship with buffets. At a restaurant or a party, we cheerfully anticipate the different foods available. Afterwards, we gripe about how much we ate and how many unhealthy choices there were. But it is possible to outwit the enticing spread of a buffet and be satisfied.

The many choices that buffets pose is one reason they are a challenge to eating a reasonable amount. Studies show that people tend to take more food when more is present. Even when people think they will only taste everything, this nibbling tends to involve more food than their typical meal. Indeed, one study found that greater variety in almost every food category leads to increased calorie consumption. The only exception is vegetables. More variety of this food lowers calorie intake. Unfortunately, buffets often offer either few vegetables or selections high in fat.

The accessibility of buffets makes all the variety even harder to resist. Research shows that when food is within easy reach, people are much more likely to follow their innate biological impulse and grab it. The buffet environment often encourages this natural impulsiveness. People dont want to hold up the line or look silly lingering over a food choice. They quickly take something that they might have skipped if ordering from a menu.

The sheer amount of food is another reason buffets are problematic. Studies at Pennsylvania State University, New York University and Cornell University have all shown that people eat more when larger amounts are available. The size of buffet selections increases the size of portions people take and raises the amount they eat. Even if people want to take portions appropriate to their needs, research shows that they have trouble visually measuring what they see. People have a particular difficulty judging the amount of foods that dont hold a shape like noodles, rice and casseroles, which are common at buffets. It is probably true that the abundance of food available to the average American  not just at buffets  contributes to the current epidemic of obesity.

A final drawback to buffets is that many Americans have been taught from a young age to clean their plates. We tend to keep on eating even when our bodies say weve had enough. This unhealthy behavior is reinforced by a desire to get our moneys worth by overeating at a restaurant. At a social gathering, many people oblige themselves to eat out of a misplaced sense of politeness. We should always remember that a variety of choices is made for our pleasure of choosing what we want. A buffet shouldnt be considered a requirement to gorge ourselves.

To truly enjoy a buffet and feel good about yourself later, look over the selections first. Decide which options appeal to you the most, reminding yourself that there will be time to take more. To maximize the healthfulness and satisfying power of your meal, balance one-third or less of your plate with some source of protein, like meat, fish, poultry, cheese, beans, eggs, or tofu, with two-thirds or more vegetables, fruits and grains. If you want a higher-fat food, accompany it with several lower-fat choices. Although a buffet can be distracting, try to follow your bodys hunger signals as a guide for how much to eat. When you are done, remove any plate or bowl with food in front of you. At a party, your good intentions to eat only what you need will be strengthened the farther away you stand from the buffet.

Although potassium is a mineral found in almost every food group, poor eating habits can leave you short. Even if its deficiency is still not directly linked to a disease, like vitamin C to scurvy, this nutrient serves many vital functions in the body.

Its commonly known that sodium can raise blood pressure and should be controlled. To help control blood pressure even more, the National High Blood Pressure Education Program strongly suggests getting enough potassium. In fact, the famous DASH diet, which is low in sodium and saturated fat and high in potassium and calcium, has proven successful at lowering blood pressure. A recent study of this diet indicates that the key elements are a substantial reduction in sodium intake and a boost in potassium consumption.

Several large studies also link a higher level of potassium in the diet with a lower risk of stroke. Potassiums impact on blood pressure could be the link, since high blood pressure raises the risk of stroke. But potassium may also help prevent harmful changes in the walls of blood vessels going to or inside of the brain.

Besides lowering blood pressure and the risk of stroke, potassium helps balance many different processes in the body. Adequate levels of potassium decrease the amount of calcium excreted in urine. This reduction of calcium in the urine lessens the chance that calcium-based kidney stones will form. It also helps protect bones from osteoporosis.

For all the benefits of potassium, there are a few precautions. As long as our kidneys work properly, any excess amount of potassium is excreted in urine. But if the kidneys are compromised, high levels of potassium from supplements or excess use of salt substitutes can accumulate and cause abnormal heart rhythms. Certain medications also limit the bodys ability to eliminate excess potassium.

Food processing often reduces the amount of potassium people get. Refined white flour is lower in potassium than whole-wheat flour. Vegetables boiled in large amounts of water lose potassium during cooking. Snacks and baked goods high in fat and sugar, which play a large role in some peoples diets, are generally very low in potassium.

Ideal sources of potassium include vegetables, fruits and fish. Potassium found in grains, meats, dairy foods and supplements is mostly potassium chloride or potassium phosphate. These forms do not neutralize body acids as effectively as the forms of potassium found in fruits and, especially, in vegetables. You can build your potassium intake, as well as help lower your cancer risk, by striving to eat the eight or more servings of vegetables and fruits each day recommended by the DASH diet to reduce blood pressure.

Its common knowledge that antioxidants protect us from dangerous substances called free radicals that can create damage leading to many chronic diseases. Yet scientists say there is more to learn about the health benefits of antioxidants.

Studies demonstrate that vegetables, fruits and whole grains supply an abundance of vitamins and natural phytochemicals that act as antioxidants. A greater consumption of these antioxidant-rich foods has been shown to lead to higher blood levels of antioxidant power.

Studies also show that when people eat diets high in antioxidants, their risk of cancer and heart disease decreases. However, if antioxidant vitamins and phytochemicals are responsible for the health benefits seen, antioxidants from supplements may not yield the same results. A higher dose of antioxidants from supplements could actually be counterproductive by upsetting the natural balance of antioxidants in the body.

The various kinds of antioxidants are now believed to work in different parts of the body. People may also vary in their need for each kind of antioxidant, depending on how much damage from free radicals, or oxidation damage, they are exposed to from tobacco smoke, overeating and other influences.

To measure the amount of oxidation damage in a person, researchers examine certain biomarkers or physical signs. The level of biomarkers is usually determined through blood sample tests. Elevated biomarkers of DNA damage are linked to cancer risk. Signs of damage to blood vessel walls and oxidation of LDL cholesterol are connected to heart disease risk. Some research even suggests that oxidation damage to nerves may be linked to age-related brain changes. Although oxidation damage has been liked to these diseases, this damage cannot be said yet to cause them.

One reason that the effect of antioxidants on disease is still unsure is that many studies of antioxidants use people known to be at an increased risk. For example, scientists will see if antioxidants offer any protection against heart attacks to people who have already had one. Since antioxidants seem to offer protection from damage that occurs early in the development of diseases, these studies may miss measuring some of the impact of antioxidants. In later stages, other factors may be more decisive.

At one time, people thought that oxidation damage to cells was always bad. But studies now show that certain highly reactive compounds (free radicals) stimulate cancer cells to commit suicide. Radiation and chemotherapy work in this way. That is why many experts recommend avoiding antioxidant supplements during chemo and radiation therapy. The body may naturally combat the early stages of cancer, too, in this way, when abnormal cells are forming. Consequently, scientists are working to discover the amounts and combinations of antioxidants that best protect our cells without interfering with this natural defense mechanism.

For now, you would be wise to limit major sources of oxidation damage and boost your intake of antioxidants through healthy eating. Major sources of oxidation damage are tobacco smoke and unprotected exposure to the suns ultraviolet rays. Since free radicals are formed when the body processes calories, avoiding excessive calories may also limit the oxidation damage to your body, as well as weight gain.

By following the mostly plant-based diet recommended by the American Institute for Cancer Research, your intake of antioxidants will rise. Most importantly, by eating a wide variety of vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans, you will receive a wide range of antioxidants which science shows work most effectively together.

Even when some people dine alone, they have the company of four or more internal voices. These people dont suffer from mental illness. Their brains are merely replaying conflicting and possibly negative messages about what to eat and how much. To successfully change your eating habits, behavior experts say you should learn to recognize these voices and put them in perspective.

One internal voice is the Indulger. This one can be fun to eat with because he or she says, Go ahead, you deserve it, and This isnt really so bad. The Indulger is likely to visit you when youve had a tiring or difficult day. This voice can be comforting and convincing. If you listen to it, however, you may make choices that you later regret, like a third portion of pasta or three brownies.

A far less pleasant voice who visits some people frequently is the Critic. The Critic rattles off all your unhealthy food choices, criticizes your body shape, points out what you neglected to do, or reminds you of all your mistakes. People who hear the negative thoughts of the Critic are more like to have grown up with perfectionistic authority figures, according to some experts.

Some other experts say these negative thoughts arise when people try to live by overly-restrictive rules. Studies show that Americans tend to go on and off many diets throughout their lives. But even if you stop a diet, the rules may still stick in your mind as the ideal goal. If you try many diets, you could end up with quite a crowd of critics in your mind. One voice would tell you to avoid all foods with fat, another might forbid you sweets, and yet another might condemn any more than one-half cup of pasta as overeating.

The Rebel could also answer the Critics voice, however. The Rebel is the inner voice that says, Do it anyway. A wide body of research shows that those people who have made the strictest rules about what to eat and how much are the ones who are most likely to rebound into overeating, especially when stressed. If the Critic starts to speak to you, admit that you are not perfect and opt for a realistic way to improve your health.

The pitiful voice of the Victim will whine that you are utterly helpless at making healthy eating choices. The Victim will give you excuse after excuse. For instance, he or she will note that others are getting seconds, that you never stick to a diet, or that you surely cant eat healthfully when dining out. Experts say that when you hear this victim talk, you need to talk even louder, reminding yourself that you always have choices. Instead of perfect choices, strive for ones in which the benefits outweigh the negatives. These are choices you can feel good about later.

If you have been putting on weight, some advertisements claim that hormonal changes from high stress may be to blame. These ads offer products that will supposedly normalize your hormones, thus decreasing your waist size. But is stress related to weight? Are hormones the link? And should you use these products?

When people are stressed they can also have trouble falling asleep. They may stay up late working or waiting to fully unwind. Even without any mental stress, studies show that a lack of sleep leads to lower levels of the hormone leptin, which can cause an increased appetite. Tired people often turn to food, too, to replenish their energy.

Cortisol  the hormone most often mentioned in connection with stress  has many different jobs. When we feel threatened or stressed, cortisol levels rise in a fight or flight reaction, making fuel available for us to fight or run away. Yet in todays world we may never burn all the energy released by this hormone because stress is largely emotional and doesnt require a physical response. A recent study suggests that cortisol levels increase with chronic work overload and worry.

It is important to keep in mind that individuals vary in their response to stress. In one study, cortisol levels increased with stress in both men and women, but the kind of stress that caused this reaction differed. Normally, repeated challenges fail to draw a cortisol response, but cortisol rises in some people even when they face familiar problems.

Some research suggests that cortisol may affect where body fat is stored. In one study, baseline levels of cortisol had no relation to womens fat distribution. But those whose cortisol levels jumped the most in response to stress tended to have proportionally more waistline fat  even if they had a healthy weight. A greater proportion of fat at the waist was related to increased levels of ongoing stress related to work or finances, or lower levels of self-esteem. This waistline fat that gives people an apple shape poses the greatest health risks.

Although advertisements for some herbal products claim to lower cortisol levels and bring rapid loss of large amounts of weight  specifically from the waistline area  no evidence from respected research studies exists to support these claims. In fact, the Federal Trade Commission (FTC) has filed a legal complaint against marketers of two of these herbal supplements. The defendants have agreed to stop making such claims and advertisements, but the products remain on the market.

To control stress and its influence on weight, researchers recommend other strategies. Kelly Brownell, Ph.D., of Yale University, proposes a two-pronged approach. By making life changes such as scaling back commitments, learning better time management, or becoming more assertive, he suggests, we can reduce our stress. Exercise, meditation and yoga can then be used to cope with the remaining stress that we cant eliminate.

Another way to counteract stress is to change our psychological response. Part of what makes challenging situations stressful is a feeling of hopelessness. If we explore different options for a situation, we may empower ourselves to overcome this feeling. For instance, if you tend to overeat when stressed, develop a list of non-food ways to handle the pressure. Learning to wait out the urge to eat  usually just ten to fifteen minutes  can also be a simple psychological change that makes a significant difference.

Obesity in the United States has become a public health issue. In response, the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) is recommending that Americans shift the proportions as well as the portions on their plates.

The AICR recommends a plate with two-thirds or more vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans and one-third or less of animal protein. Research suggests that a diet rich in vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans will have both short-term and long-term benefits. It can help with weight management and impede the process that leads to cancer. Natural plant substances, called phytochemicals, have been shown to have cancer-fighting properties. So the AICR recommends increasing the intake of fruits and vegetables while cutting back on animal fats.

Cold-water fish are the best dietary source of omega-3 fatty acids, but recent concerns about toxins in some fish have confused many people who are looking to get more omega-3s into their diet. One solution is to add plant foods that contain omega-3s. These include green leafy vegetables such as kale, spinach and broccoli.

Cruciferous vegetables such as these are rich in antioxidants and a group of phytochemicals called dithiolthiones, which are believed to fight carcinogens and help inhibit the development of cancer. Another substance found in many cruciferous vegetables, isothiocyanate, is one of the most effective cancer-fighting agents known. Kale, spinach, okra, and collard and mustard greens contain phytochemicals that appear to help ward off macular degeneration and decrease the risk of lung cancer.

A member of the cabbage family, kale has a mild flavor and frilly leaves. It is best in the winter, although its available year round. Choose kale with a rich color and no limp or yellowing leaves. It can be stored in the refrigerator for 2 or 3 days. After that, the flavor becomes strong and the leaves become limp.

Remove stems from kale, incluidng the large spine running through the center of the leaf. Place a few leaves on top of each other and cut into thin strips. Repeat until all the kale is cut. Add kale to a pot of boiling water and boil uncovered 10 minutes. Drain and set aside.

In a large skillet, heat oil over medium heat. Add carrots and saut? 2 minutes. Add garlic and saut? 1 more minute. Add coriander, salt and pepper to taste, and cayenne, if using. Cook 15 seconds. Add kale and cook 1-2 minutes.

A Hearty Stew With a Light Touch from the American Institute for Cancer Research A cold winter night calls for a rich, hearty stew. But it doesnt have to be fat-laden or heavy to be hearty. A warming stew can easily be part of a healthful diet.

The type of fat that seems to have the most negative health consequences is saturated fat, found mainly in meats and full-fat dairy products. So its important to choose low-fat forms of these foods. Enjoy lean meats such as loin cuts of pork and beef. Avoid regular bacon, sausage, fatty lunch meats and ribs most of the time.

Adding fruit to otherwise savory dishes boosts the cancer-protective properties of a meal, according to AICR. In Southeast Asia, fruit is used to provide the sweet element in the hot-sour-salty-bitter-sweet balance that cooks strive to achieve.

Heat oil in the pan until hot. Add onion, green pepper, garlic and chili pepper and saut? until onion is translucent, about 4 minutes. Return meat to the pan. Add 1 cup water, Worcestershire sauce, ginger, salt and pepper. Drain liquid from the can of pineapple into the pan. Cover, reduce heat and simmer 30 minutes.

Meanwhile, drain pineapple chunks, reserving juice for another use, if desired. Add the fruit, tomato and cucumber to the stew. Simmer, uncovered, until the meat and vegetables are tender and the liquid has thickened slightly. Serve the stew over the rice. If desired, the stew can be made ahead and stored 2 to 3 days, covered, in the refrigerator.

Research has found that eating broccoli and tomatoes together may maximize the amount of cancer protection both foods afford. In a recent study, lab animals fed a combination of tomatoes and broccoli had markedly less prostate tumor growth than both those who ate diets containing either food alone, and those on diets containing the specific cancer-fighting substances isolated from tomatoes and broccoli.

Lycopene is one natural substance in tomatoes that has attracted a great deal of attention in the last decade as a prostate cancer fighter. Tomatoes also are rich in vitamin C and contain good amounts of vitamins A and B, potassium, iron and phosphorus.

Broccoli also has been recognized for its anti-cancer potential. It is known to contain phytochemicals called glucosinolates, which break down into compounds that help enzymes flush carcinogens from the body. Broccoli also is an excellent source of vitamins A and C, as well as riboflavin, calcium and iron.

The take-home message of the recent study on broccoli and tomatoes is not to focus on specific foods to ward off serious diseases. The larger lesson of health-related research appears to be that the interaction, or synergy, between a variety of foods is more powerful in protecting our health than the unique features of particular foods. Nutritionists and other health experts advise that eating a wide variety of vegetables, fruits and other plant-based foods is a more effective approach to a healthy, longer life than concentrating on the magic bullet of individual foods. In other words, variety is not only the spice of life, but the key to a healthier life.

When buying broccoli, select heads with a deep, strong color, tightly-closed buds, and crisp leaves. When choosing tomatoes, try grape tomatoes for a change of pace. They are sweet, firm and not overly juicy. They can be used interchangeably with cherry tomatoes, both as part of a meal and as a garnish. They should be stored at room temperature never be refrigerated, which turns them into tasteless pulp.

In a medium bowl, gradually whisk together mustard with the vinegar and oregano, then the oil. Add broccoli, tomatoes and onion, and toss to coat. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Transfer to a serving plate and sprinkle toasted sesame seeds over the salad.

Oats are so healthy that foods containing a certain amount may carry a health claim approved by the Food and Drug Administration, such as: Diets low in saturated fat and cholesterol that include soluble fiber from oatmeal may reduce the risk of heart disease." The part about a diet "low in saturated fat and cholesterol" is a reminder that a bowl of oats wont make up for a diet of ice cream and brownies.

Oats are a whole-grain food containing insoluble and soluble fiber. Insoluble fiber moves food easily through the digestive system. The most health benefits come from the beta-glucans, a type of soluble fiber shown to reduce blood cholesterol levels, particularly the LDL badcholesterol. High LDL levels are considered a risk factor for heart disease, the leading cause of death in the United States. Scientists have compared oats to tiny sponges that pick up cholesterol and carry it out of the body.

Studies have shown that people who start the day with a breakfast high in complex carbohydrates (with fiber), like oatmeal, report less hunger and fatigue and greater alertness in the morning. Instant oatmeal, especially when processed with added sugar, may not have the same effect.

Either because of time constraints or the desire to lose weight, at least 17 percent of Americans regularly skip the morning meal. But studies show that people who skip breakfast take in more calories later in the day than people who eat three evenly spaced meals. Other studies show that breakfast skippers tend to have higher blood cholesterol levels as well.

Fresh fruit is a perfect topping for oatmeal. For an extra twist, mix berries with a tiny sprinkling of grated lemon or orange zest, plus two drops of vanilla extract. Dried fruit also works well, adding sweet chewiness for a satisfying contrast in texture. Most dried fruits are sweet enough that you won't need sugar. For a change of pace, have your oatmeal in these tasty pancakes.

Add egg white and extract to oat mixture and stir together. Add to the flour mixture and stir until moistened but with small lumps remaining. Dont overmix. Let stand in the refrigerator for 30 minutes.

Preheat a nonstick frying pan or griddle coated with cooking spray over medium heat. Working in batches, pour 1/4 cup batter for each pancake onto hot pan. Cook 3 to 4 minutes or until top starts to bubble and bottom is browned. Turn and cook 1 to 2 minutes longer, or until golden brown.

Drop Out of the Clean Plate Club from the American Institute for Cancer Research The high-fat, high-calorie holidays are over and its the time of reckoning. But this doesnt have to be painful. There are many ways to bring your weight down and, at the same time, help safeguard your health as well.

One of the keys is to remember that portion size is critical to success. The most healthful, low-calorie dishes won't lead to slimmer bodies and better health if theyre eaten in super-sized portions.

Many Americans, the survey suggests, have lost sight of the relationship between how much you eat and how much you weigh, focusing instead on cutting out specific types of food such as carbohydrates or fat.

Research studies suggest that eating more plant-based foods is a smart strategy for managing weight. Along with eating smaller portion sizes and increasing physical activity, this strategy should lead to gradual and sustainable weight loss.

In our hearts we know its smart to eat a balanced diet, with a larger proportion of vegetables, fruits and whole grains, reduce our portion sizes of animal protein and increase physical activity. No banned foods, no empty promises of fast weight loss just a sensible way of living that leads to gradual and sustainable weight loss.

Preheat oven to 400 degrees. In a medium bowl, mix together artichoke hearts, red onion and celery. In a small bowl, mix sour cream with mustard. Place salmon filets on 4 individual sheets of aluminum foil. Sprinkle each filet with salt and pepper.

"Special desserts are a cherished tradition we look forward to at holiday time," says Melanie Polk, RD, AICR's Director of Nutrition Education. "But they can be improved so they are better for our health and kinder to our waistlines - without sacrificing the satisfying flavors we expect."

AICR created two cheesecakes and a trifle that are relatively low in fat and calories. However, Polk maintains, "They offer the wonderful, comfort-food gratification we expect from a dessert with rich flavor and moist creaminess. And our versions are impressive enough for the most elegant holiday event."

The trifle, a classic English-style dessert, is usually made with fruit preserves and high-fat custard. In AICR's version, cranberries, a traditional holiday ingredient, make a more nutritious and substantial filling. The custard contains less saturated fat but has a rich taste - and is easier to make than a classic custard.

Preheat oven to 400 degrees. Lightly spray interior of a 9-inch springform pan with canola oil spray. Mix crumbs, pecans and oil in a medium bowl until well blended. Press mixture in a thin layer on the bottom and sides of the pan. Bake crust until set and lightly browned, 7 to 10 minutes. Remove from oven and cool on a rack. Reduce oven temperature to 350 degrees.

Pour half of the sweet potato mixture into the prepared pan. Gently add half of the plain cream cheese mixture. Swirl a knife or thin spatula through the mixture to create a marbled effect. Add remaining filling and swirl to complete the marbled appearance.

Place oats and ginger in a blender or food processor and pulverize at high speed until they turn to fine crumbs or powder. Transfer to a medium bowl. Add the graham cracker crumbs and sugar and mix to combine. Drizzle oil over the mixture while mixing it in until well blended.

Brush a light coating of melted jelly over the top of the cheesecake. Arrange papaya slices in a pinwheel design, then add kiwis the same way to fill the center. Arrange diced mango along the edges. Gently, so as not to disturb fruit, brush on a light coating of melted jelly.

Meanwhile, in a medium saucepan bring cranberries, water and sugar to a boil. Lower heat to medium-high and cook until cranberries pop. Reduce heat and gently simmer 5 minutes. Remove from heat and allow to cool. Taste and add additional sugar, if needed.

About an hour before serving, whip the cream in a chilled bowl until it begins to thicken. While continuing to beat, add vanilla, then confectioners sugar to taste. Beat only, until cream is thick but still soft. Spread whipped cream on top of the trifle to completely cover the surface evenly. Cover and refrigerate 30 to 45 minutes, or until the whipped cream is completely chilled. Remove and garnish top, if desired, with frosted cranberries (see recipe below.) Serve trifle immediately.

When ready to garnish the trifle, add cranberries in clusters of three by inserting the toothpicks into the whipped cream and cake underneath, so that only the berries are visible. Add a mint leaf to each cluster of berries.

The American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) is one of the nations largest cancer charities, focussing exclusively on the link between diet and cancer. The Institute provides a wide range of education programs that help Americans make dietary changes for lower cancer risk. AICR also supports research in cancer prevention and treatment at universities, hospitals and research centers across the U.S. The Institute has provided over $70 million in funding for research in diet, nutrition and cancer. AICRs Web address is www.aicr.org. AICR is a member of the World Cancer Research Fund International.

One of the more unusual wraps, Polk notes, calls for dried wrappers made of rice that take only a quick soak in water to become pliant and ready to use. AICRs version is not fried in oil, as so many Asian versions are. And because they are extremely thin, they are low in carbodydrate as well as light in character.

Often sold under the label Spring Roll Skins, rice wrappers are enjoying a new popularity in this country. Many supermarkets, especially those that focus on organic and other specialty foods, stock them regularly, as do Asian markets. Most are packaged in one of two sizes  6 1/4 inches and 8 1/2 inches.

Whole-grain versions of tortillas and pita bread, observes Polk, also make great wraps. Compared to refined versions, they offer far more nutrients and dietary fiber that help protect against chronic diseases, including cancer.

In addition to vegetables and some type of meat, fruit is also suggested as a filling option. Although not a typical ingredient most Americans encounter when eating wraps, fruit can add a delicate sweetness and juiciness  plus a different crunchy texture  as well as health-protective nutrients and phytochemicals.

Set out filling ingredients before making wraps. Set out a round baking dish big enough to hold a rice wrapper. (A shallow bowl or plate with a little depth also works.) Fill it with enough warm water to submerge a wrapper. Place a cutting board or large, flat-bottomed plate next to it. Using fingers to hold a wrapper along the edge, about 3-4 inches apart, immerse the wrapper into the water for 2-3 seconds, then immediately remove it when edges begin to soften. (Wrappers continue to soften.) Place it flat on the cutting board or plate, allowing the edge of the wrapper nearest you to hang over the side a little. Add filling ingredients in long, narrow rows from left to right. Be careful not to use too much or the wrapper may tear when rolled up.

Lift the overlapping edge of the wrapper and fold it over to cover the filling. Fold in the ends, if desired, pressing gently to seal. Continue rolling the wrapper, gently pulling itl toward you, to create a snug fit. Be careful not to use too much pressure or wrap it too tightly, which may create a tear. Gently press in the remaining outer edge to help seal the wrap. Transfer the roll, seam side down, to a serving plate. Continue making remaining wraps in the same way.

Place a lettuce leaf on top of the damp wrapper. (The frilly edge of the leaf can extend slightly beyond the edges on one side, if desired.) Arrange 1/4 of the cucumber strips in a narrow row from left to right, across the third of the wrapper nearest you. Spread shrimp halves (cut sides down) end-to-end on top of the cucumber. Place a thin row of carrot next to the shrimp (on the side opposite from you). Place strips of pear or mango (if using) on top of carrots. Arrange cilantro (or mint) leaves (if using) end-to-end, lengthwise, between fruit and cucumber. Lift edge of wrapper closest to you and fold over the filling. If desired, fold ends over the wrapper. (If lettuce extends beyond one end, do not tuck in at that end.) Finish rolling the wrapper over the filling. Gently press outer edge into the wrap to help seal it.

Make one wrap at a time. Place a lettuce leaf on a tortilla or, if using a pita pocket, gently insert a lettuce leaf so that it lines the interior. Without adding too much filling ingredients, add to each about 1/4 of the vegetables, chicken and mango (if using), in the following order: cucumber, chicken, spinach and mango (if using). Spread a thin layer of the dipping sauce along the tortillas edges that will be exposed once the wrap is rolled up. Roll up the tortilla, pressing the outer edges in so the sauce will help seal the wrap.

Make the dipping sauce before the wraps to allow flavors to meld. In a bowl, mix together all the ingredients until well combined. The dip can be made ahead and stored overnight, covered with plastic wrap, in the refrigerator. Bring chilled sauce to room temperature before serving.

Fill tortillas one at a time. Place a tortilla flat on a cutting board.. Place a lettuce leaf on top of the tortilla. (The top of the leaf can extend a little beyond the edge of the tortilla.) Along the length of the tortilla, in the third closest to you, place 1/4 of the filling ingredients in the following order: red bell pepper, jicama, green bell pepper, meat, apple (if using), and a small amount of herbs. Spread a thin layer of the dipping sauce along the tortillas edges that will be exposed once the wrap is rolled up.

LONDON  A group of the worlds leading scientists is gathering in London today to address a pressing and perplexing question: what does sciencetell us about the foods we should eat and things we should do to prevent cancer?

Why will it take so long to answer the question before them? Professor Martin Wiseman, who heads the project for World Cancer Research Fund International and the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR), estimates that at least 10,000 studies relating food, nutrition and physical activity to cancer prevention have now accumulated. These studies vary in their approach, design and in the method of measurements they use, and do not always agree.

The panel is sorting through these thousands of studies to find where there is convincing agreement. AICR and WCRF International have developed a procedure that will take another two years, cost over $7.5 million and involve countless advisors, seven research centers in four different countries on two continents, and input from six international observer organizations, all coordinated with the 21-member panel of experts.

The panel members are following a procedure developed on advice from a taskforce commissioned by AICR and WCRF International. In efforts to maximize the projects transparency and maintain its scientific objectivity, the seven independent research centers have been tasked with reviewing the available scientific data using a uniform method. Teams of scientists at each research center are compiling evidence relevant to specific cancers.

Each group then produces a report on the evidence and presents that report to the expert panel. At this weeks meeting, the panel will assess some of this evidence and draw conclusions on the links between foods, nutrition, physical activity and those cancers.

Ultimately, the panel will publish a set of recommendations for lowering cancer risk aimed at governments, industry, health professionals and the public. Their report, Food, Nutrition, Physical Activity and Cancer: a Global Perspective, will be available in print and in a searchable, multimedia electronic format. The full reviews completed by each of the research centers will also be available electronically.

But even that wont end the rigorous process of analysis. Now that AICR and WCRF International have put in place a uniform and manageable process for reviewing the data, the panel says it will be easier for the organization to periodically review emerging evidence and place it in context.

The first expert report, published by WCRF/AICR in 1997, has become the essential text in the field of cancer prevention; over 30,000 copies have been distributed to policy makers, health professionals, researchers and individuals around the globe. The expert panel behind that first report examined over 4,500 separate documents to come away with 14 recommendations that continue to be cited regularly in the scientific literature.The American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) is the cancer charity that fosters research on diet and cancer and educates the public about the results. It has contributed more than $70 million for innovative research conducted at universities, hospitals and research centers across the country. AICR also provides a wide range of educational programs to help millions of Americans learn to make dietary changes for lower cancer risk. Its award-winning New American Plate program is presented in brochures, seminars and on its website, http://www.aicr.org/. AICR is a member of the World Cancer Research Fund International.

Scientists are beginning to understand the variable results from past studies. Recent evidence suggests that the compounds derived from these vegetables may only safeguard individuals who inherit particular forms of enzymes or cell receptors. Other evidence suggests that people who eat diets with high levels of carcinogenic substances from meat cooked at high temperatures or grilled benefit the most. Despite the abundance of positive news about the healthfulness of cruciferous vegetables, if memories of over-cooked, slightly bitter side dishes keep you from eating these plant foods regularly, its time to learn new preparation methods. Cook these vegetables only until tender because overcooking produces bitterness. Avoid boiling them in lots of water because this method leaches vitamins. Briefly steaming or stir-frying these vegetables produces much better flavor and texture. Some, like parsnips and Brussels sprouts, are excellent when roasted in the oven. In the winter months when traditional salad greens become more expensive and less fresh, try switching to salads based on raw broccoli, cabbage, and cauliflower. By countering the assertive taste of these vegetables with equally assertive flavorings, like a drizzle of extra virgin olive oil, you can smooth out their flavor even more.To find new, easy and healthy recipes for cruciferous vegetables, go to the American Institute for Cancer Researchs website, http://www.aicr.org/. It offers a searchable database of healthy, delicious recipes in the Recipe Corner, a weekly recipe email you can sign up for, and other recipes you can browse through in the Press Corner. You can also visit the websites http://www.aboutproduce.com/ or http://www.5aday.com/. Each of these also has a searchable database, so you can look for recipes that call for a particular vegetable like broccoli.

Calciums Effect on CancerKaren Collins, MS, RD, CDNAmerican Institute for Cancer Research For some time, nutrition researchers have thought that sufficient amounts ofcalcium in the diet may protect people from colon cancer. The results of studiesvary, however. Two new explanations for this inconsistency have been offered:First, the source of calcium may make a difference. Second, inherited differencesin the receptors on cells that process nutrients could safeguardsome people more than others.There are still good theoretical reasons linking calcium consumption to a reducedrisk of colon cancer, however. These reasons tend to be supported by both laboratoryand human studies.One of the most recent analyses pooled data from ten different studies in fivecountries. People who consumed the most calcium had a 20 percent lower risk ofcolorectal cancer than those people who consumed the least calcium. In anotherstudy, women who met or nearly met current adult calcium recommendations (Seelast paragraph for recommended amounts) reduced their risk of colorectal canceralmost 30 percent compared to those who ate half the recommended amount. In thisstudy, total calcium consumption was more significant than dairy product consumption,and vitamin D was not linked to risk. In addition to these studies, others haveshown from 15 to 30 percent drops in colorectal cancer risk for people with highcalcium consumption. Although an association between calcium intake and colon cancer risk is not seenin all studies, many scientists still think such a link exists. Calcium consumptionvaries widely, so studies showing no cancer risk reduction among those with thehighest calcium consumption must be examined closely. Sometimes, study participantswith the highest calcium intake actually consume significantly less than therecommendedamounts.For consumers, the message from the research is ambiguous. Studies have shown that a lower colon cancer risk can come from calcium supplements as well as milk. But the amount of vitamin D needed from the diet at the same time is unclear. Milk or calcium supplements that contain vitamin D would provide both nutrients. But people who get their calcium mostly from cheese, yogurt or supplements without vitamin D might be missing enough of this vitamin.Calcium may also affect the risk for other cancers. The large Nurses Health Study showed that premenopausal women with the highest calcium consumption faced a 20 percent less risk of breast cancer than those with the lowest consumption. The greatest consumers of low-fat dairy foods had a 30 percent lower risk than those eating the fewest. This last finding could reflect the benefits of other components in milk like vitamin D. Although the Nurses Health study showed no benefit for postmenopausal women from calcium or dairy products, another study of postmenopausal women did. The lack of an association in the Nurses Health study could stem from the rather low dairy intake even among the postmenopausal women who ate the most dairy products. However, another review of studies found no link between calcium and breast cancer risk, so the possible link may be small.In regard to whether calcium can increase the risk of prostate cancer, risk only seems to rise if a mans calcium consumption exceeds 2,000 milligrams (mg) daily. An excessive use of supplements is generally needed to reach this level, the equivalent of more than one-and-a-half quarts of milk. To get enough calcium for your bones and possibly lower your risk of colon cancer, most adult men and women need only 1,000 mg of calcium a day. This recommended amount increases to 1,200 mg after age 50. You can reach either of these amounts withthree servings of calcium-rich foods a day.

SWEET HOLIDAY STRATEGIES By Dana Jacobi for the American Institute for Cancer ResearchDuring the holidays, including the weeks of special parties leading up to them,surrendering to the seasons sweet temptations can actually produce lessguilt, and add less to your waistline, if you take an active role in producingthose temptations. Here are some strategies that will create great pleasure andminimize the regret. Take dessert along wherever you go. Make it a surprise if you are not asked tocontribute something to the menu. Make cookies and other baked desserts, butsubstitute an ingredient low in fat for a high-fat ingredient. Evaporated skimmilk, for example, can be used in place of cream, and lite oliveoil can replace butter in many recipes. You can also reduce at least slightlythe sugar called for. Decorate the tops of cakes with a light dusting of confectionerssugar rather than those high-fat, super-sweet icings. If ice cream will be served,make fresh fruit compote. Its as simple as dicing up apples, for example,that are cored but with their peel on, and cooking them slowly (tightly covered)with apple juice concentrate, grated citrus zest and a vanilla bean until tenderand slightly caramelized. The whole bean adds a mellow sweetness extract doesnot. It lets you also add little or no other sweetening, depending on your taste.(One bean costs a small fortune, but I reuse mine at least 10 times in fruitdesserts. Or you can substitute a cinnamon stick.) For a sophisticated but healthful treat, try these whole-wheat biscotti withalmonds and fruit.

GOURMET GIFTINGBy Dana Jacobi for the American Institute for Cancer Research To give is to receive, and you can feel especially good when offering a homemadepresent that is both personal and unique. In this time-pressed day and age, whenmaking traditional gifts like cookies or jam takes too much time, one of my favoritesis a generous jar of Chocolate Spiced Chai Mix. Spooned into a mug containinga tea bag, boiling water turns this unique instant mix into an aromatic, heart-warmingtreat. Combined with hot milk, it makes a lovely, soothing cup of cocoa. Supermarkets carry everything you need to make this mix. Assembling it requiresonly measuring the ingredients into a large mixing bowl. And the recipe can bedoubled or tripled, making it an easy present for coworkers or everyone in yourclub, neighborhood, or class.For packaging, I scoop the mix into one-pint canning jars, or empty jam and mustardjars I saved because of their pleasing shape. To dress up the jar, you can cutout squares of fabric and tie them in place over the cap using a length of ribbon.If you dont have fabric, use squares of heavy gift paper, pleating themto fit round the cover.One reason I love this gift is its flexibility. For casual giving, I simply tiea tag with instructions around the neck of the jar. Sometimes I also tie on afew cinnamon sticks to use as stirrers. For more special recipients, I line asmall basket with an inexpensive cloth napkin, and set in the jar of Chai mixplus a box of black tea bags and a bundle of cinnamon sticks. For very specialfriends, I might take time to bake biscotti, which keep well and whose shapelooks nice in the basket. Or, instead of cookies, include a decorative mug ortwo. The ingredients in this mix also offer options. If you can spend a bit more onthem, try using ground chocolate (sold in a canister and found next to unsweetenedcocoa in some stores), which makes an even richer cup of chai. For the powderedmilk, those with a larger grain dissolve most smoothly and rapidly.

Q: Can someone develop liver disease from being overweight? I thought alcohol causes liver disease.A: Alcohol abuse is a significant cause of liver disease, but it is not the only way livers can become damaged. According to the National Institutes of Health (NIH), two to five percent of Americans have developed fatty livers because of obesity. In most cases, extra fat deposits in the liver cause no serious harm, but these deposits can lead to scarring and more advanced liver damage. People with fatty liver, however, can be unaware of any liver problem. The only clues to the existence of fat deposits in the liver are blood tests showing increased liver enzymes or a liver scan. There is no specific treatment at this time for fatty livers. People with fatty livers due to obesity should avoid alcohol, reduce their calorie consumption to lose weight and exercise regularly.

Q: How does the fat content of venison compare to other meats? A: Venison is a very lean meat. Trimmed of outside fat, a three-ounce portion the size of a deck of cards contains just over one-and-a-half grams of fat, which is about equal to three-ounces of turkey breast. Even when their fat is trimmed, the same portion of lean cuts of beef (top, eye, and tip of round) and the leanest pork (tenderloin, sirloin, or loin chops) contains four to eight grams of fat. Other lean pork (rib chops, ribs or sirloin roast) yields eight to ten grams of fat in three ounces. Higher fat cuts of meat (beef rib, brisket, pork spareribs, salami or bacon) contain 10 to 15 grams. Whatever cut of meat you choose, keep your portion moderately sized to allow yourself plenty of room for the vegetables and whole grains that are so vital to good health.

Canola oil cooking spray6 medium Yukon Gold potatoes, peeled2 large carrots, scraped1/4 cup all-purpose flour1/4 cup flat-leaf parsley, finely minced1/4 cup green onion, finely chopped2 large eggs, beaten1 Tbsp. canola oil1/2 tsp. salt1/2 tsp. freshly ground black pepperreduced-fat sour cream or applesauce (optional)Preheat oven to 450 degrees. Spray large non-stick baking sheet with oil spray. Coarsely grate potatoes and carrots. Place them in large sieve. Set sieve into a large bowl so it nestles securely. Squeeze vegetables to wring out as much liquid as possible. If vegetables still feel wet, pat dry with paper towels, then transfer them to a mixing bowl. Stir in flour, parsley, onion, eggs, oil, salt and pepper, making sure ingredients are well combined. Spoon small mounds of the mixture on the baking sheet to form 2 1/2-inch pancakes, leaving 1 inch between each. Bake latkes until golden brown, 6 to 8 minutes per side, turning once with spatula. Pancakes can also be made in a pan, preferably non-stick, with a light coating of canola oil spray on the bottom. Heatpan to high, then reduce to medium or medium-high heat. Transfer cooked pancakes to warm plates or a serving platter and serve at once. If desired, serve with low-fat sour cream or applesauce.Makes about 16 pancakes or 8 servings.Per serving: 251 calories, 3 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 50 g. carbohydrate, 6 g. protein,5 g. dietary fiber, 185 mg. sodium.

The next time you bake your famous cranberry bread or try a new recipe, invite the children you know to help you. Besides creating memories, you can also teach them nutritious, cancer-preventive habits.Cooking with children can instill healthy eating patterns that will last a lifetime. Learning how to follow step-by-step instructions, measure ingredients, wash produce and follow kitchen safety rules are valuable lessons that will create future cooks who are capable of making nutritious and safe meals at home.Research shows teaching healthy eating at a young age can help encourage a child to learn good habits that may reduce risk for obesity, cancer, diabetes and heart disease later in life. You'll also be spending quality time together."Try It - You Might Like It!"First, disregard the myth that kids don't like vegetables. When children watch adults enjoying healthy foods they develop a willingness to try these foods too. Also, seeing each ingredient as it goes into a recipe - perhaps a soup or casserole - makes them more willing to eat the finished product.Kids love adventure, so experiment with different kinds of vegetables and fruits such as jicama, snow peas, starfruit, kiwifruit, kale, Portobello mushrooms, tomatillos and pomegranates. It's okay if they don't like an item one week. Just try something different next time. Try introducing new items with old favorites, perhaps mixing half white and half brown rice or combining chopped green vegetables with corn. Cut foods into small pieces to make them more appealing. A broccoli floret is less daunting to eat than a stalk.Getting StartedLook for kid-friendly cookbooks that focus on vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans, particularly those endorsed by registered dietitians or reliable health organizations. Check www.aicr.org and other health websites for recipes. Read recipes carefully beforehand to decide which tasks are appropriate for your future chefs.Involving children in deciding which foods they would like to eat and which recipes they want to make gives them a sense of ownership in the meal. Let older children prepare breakfast and pack their own lunches. Bringing the kids to the grocery store, visiting a farm or local farmers market, or even starting a small vegetable garden will inspire their curiosity in foods. Talk to them about the nutrition of the foods you see.Expect a MessNaturally, cooking with children involves more spills and requires more patience. You may want to double the recipe's usual preparation time to allow for teaching, assisting and clean-up. Have young children stand on a sturdy chair and measure ingredients over the sink. Photocopy recipes or cover with clear plastic wrap to avoid food stains on your cookbooks or recipe cards.Kid-Friendly RecipesChildren find the following kinds of cooking projects especially fun. You can even help them think of clever names for the finished creations.

WASHINGTON, DC  Using a new method, researchers have discovered that whole grains like corn, whole wheat, oats and brown rice exhibit a level of anti-cancer activity that is equal to, and sometimes greater than, the levelknown to occur in vegetables and fruits.

The answer may lie in the fact that clinical trials have tended to overlook a possible role for whole grains in favor of focusing on the role of fiber alone in lowering colon cancer risk, often to the point of giving subjects isolated fiber supplements. Dr. Lius revelation about whole grains protective activity suggests that future clinical studies would benefit from a broader perspective  one that accounts for the collective, interactive effects of whole grains themselves, the fiber they contain, and the various protective substances Dr. Lius work has revealed.

For years, scientists have been measuring the antioxidant power of many natural plant substances (which are collectively called phytochemicals). But researchers tended to measure only the free forms of these substances  the kind that dissolve quickly and are thus immediately absorbed into the bloodstream. They did not concern themselves with the bound forms of these substances  the kind that are attached to the walls of plant cells and do not get absorbed into the bloodstream until they are released by intestinal bacteria during digestion.

Phenolics are one major class of phytochemicals that have been widely studied. Included in this broad category are such compounds as quercetin, curcumin, ellagic acid, catechins, and many others that make frequent appearances in the health news. Phenolics are powerful antioxidants that work in multiple ways to prevent disease, said Dr. Liu.

Dr. Liu and his colleagues measured the relative amounts of phenolics  and the forms in which they occur  in common vegetables like broccoli and spinach. They found that, on average, phenolics in the free form made up 76 percent of the total number of phenolics present. In common fruit like apple and red grape, free phenolics again averaged about 76 percent of the total.

Yet despite these relative differences in phenolic make-up, the total antioxidant activity in produce and in whole grains is similar, according to Dr. Lius research. The researchers measured the antioxidant activity of different foods, and assigned each a number based on a formula (micromoles of vitamin C equivalent per gram.) Broccoli and spinach measured 81 and 80, respectively, in total antioxidant activity, while apple and banana measured 98 and 65.

Or, try this oatmeal cooked with pear nectar and a grated Bartlett pear for natural sweetness. (Feel free to use apple cider and grated apple in their place.) With the fruit in the oatmeal, cool, creamy vanilla yogurt is the ideal topping for this cinnamon-spiced porridge.

CARIBBEAN-INSPIRED HOLIDAY YAMSBy Dana Jacobi for the American Institute for Cancer ResearchYams, always a holiday favorite, are perhaps the best way to indulge a sweettooth during the holiday season. The inner flesh of these copper- bronze- orpurple-skinned tubers gets its brilliant orange color from beta-carotene, a keyantioxidant. They are also a good source of fiber, while their natural sweetnesscomes from complex carbs that move into the blood stream more evenly than theadded sugar in prepared desserts, especially classic holiday temptations.Of course, you lose this glycemic benefit if you make candied yams, loading themwith sugar or marshmallows. (Not to mention those unhealthful gobs of butter.)Instead, try tossing sliced yams with apple juice concentrate, arrange them ina heatproof dish under a layer of thinly-sliced apples brushed lightly with meltedbutter, and bake until tender. For this years holiday table, I found aneven easier and more exciting way to serve yams. Although yams and sweet potatoes are botanically different, they are both inthe sweet potato family, but what is marked sweet potatoes in the store are oftenyams. When you can, check with your grocer to make sure you know what you aregetting. Some sweet potatoes have flesh that is dry, dense and floury ratherthan moist and creamy. To serve yams at Thanksgiving this year, the Caribbean is my source of inspirationthanks to a friend and chef, Maricel Prescilla. At her New Jersey restaurant,Cucharamama, I had a fabulous dish of cubed pumpkin and pineapple, both roasted,then tossed while still warm with a tangy, sweet balsamic and apple cider dressing,then garnished with toasted pumpkin seeds. It is even better, I think, usingroasted yams and fresh pineapple grilled under the broiler.

LEFTOVER TURKEY CAN BE WELCOMEDfrom theAmerican Institute for Cancer ResearchIn just a few weeks, youll have more leftover turkey than you know whatto do with. Its a good time to start collecting recipes that give youan alternative to endless turkey sandwiches.Cooked turkey stashed in the freezer can be a welcomed sight during the hecticweeks after Thanksgiving. You can toss it with pasta and vegetables, add it toa main course salad, or do all kinds of creative things combining it with otheringredients for a one-dish meal. The mild flavor of turkey makes it a good choice for many cooking styles andethnic cuisines. Most seasonings and sauces go well with turkey. So you can makean Italian spaghetti sauce, a Mexican taco, an Indian curry, or an Asian stir-fry. A good, healthful way to use leftover turkey is the base for a casserole. Witha whole grain, you can make a flavorful and rich-textured but healthful one-dishmeal.You might start with barley a grain thats been popular since theStone Age. A single cup of this easy-to-prepare grain contains eight grams offiber the same amount of fiber found in seven cups of white rice. Barleyalso is rich in protein, potassium, calcium, iron and B vitamins. Barleys nutty flavor goes well with onions, mushrooms, or peas. Butternutsquash also is a good complement. This large, pear-shaped winter squash has sweet,orange flesh. With onion, green pepper and sage, youll be glad you hadturkey leftovers.

Cruciferous vegetables contain substances, called indoles, which seem to offer extra help against breast and perhaps other hormone-related cancers. In a study of Swedish women, those who ate cruciferous vegetables most often had about 24 percent lower risk of breast cancer than those who ate them the least. The American Institute for Cancer Research encourages making cruciferous vegetables a part of a healthful diet because they may play an important role in stopping cancer before it starts.

ITS WELL WORTH TAMING WILD RICEfrom theAmerican Institute for Cancer ResearchWild rice is not rice at all. It is a grass seed with a rich, nutty flavor thatis a welcomed guest at the autumn table.Native to the Great Lakes area, truly wild rice is still harvested by local NativeAmericans and sometimes called Indian rice. Because gathering wild rice is solabor intensive, it has always been expensive. Now, however, cultivated wildrice is being produced in California and some Midwest states, and the price islower.Its important to clean wild rice thoroughly before cooking it. The bestmethod is to place the rice in a large saucepan and fill it with cold water.Stir it several times and set aside for a few minutes. Any debris will floatto the surface and the water can then be poured off. Depending on the methodused, wild rice can take up to an hour to cook. Taste-test to make sure the kernelsare completely tender, but not too soft.In addition to being high in protein, wild rice contains the phytochemical calledphytic acid, which, in lab and animal studies, appears to slow formation of cancersas well as help control blood sugar, cholesterol and triglycerides.

AICR SCIENCE NOW Volume 10Fall 2004   Tracking the Data on Flavonoids  Most of the antioxidants in our diet come from a group of phytochemicals called polyphenols, one of which is flavonoids. A grant from AICR allowed Johanna Dwyer, R.D., D.Sc., and Julia Peterson, Ph.D., to enlarge a flavonoid database so that it might be possible to determine in the future if a higher intake of flavonoids decreases breast cancer recurrence.Polyphenols, one group of phytochemicals, make up the most abundant antioxidants in our diet. By protecting cells against damage caused by excessive amounts of free radicals (unstable molecules), antioxidants can potentially stop changes that could lead to heart disease or cancer. Polyphenols may also have other properties that are beneficial to health.	Because of the variety in chemical structures of polyphenols, it is difficult to estimate their number in foods. Several thousand, however, have been identified. The most numerous polyphenols belong to the subcategory known as flavonoids. More than 4,000 flavonoids are known. The other main subcategories of polyphenols are phenolic acids, lignans and stilbenes. (See cover story for more about carnosol, a phenolic acid.)	Flavonoids are common in vegetables and fruits, and they are further divided into seven classes: flavones, flavonols, flavanols, flavanones, isoflavones, anthocyanins and proanthocyanidins. Individual foods can contain several different classes of flavonoids. (For more about flavanols, or catechins, in tea, see EGCG in Green Tea next page.) Flavonoids and Cancer Risk	Although the consumption of flavonoids has sometimes been associated with a lower risk of heart disease, the association between flavonoid consumption and cancer risk is still speculative. "What we do know is that vegetables and fruits rich in flavonoids are associated with decreased cancer risk at some sites," says Dr. Johanna Dwyer, Professor of Medicine at both the Friedman School of Nutrition Science and Policy and the Medical School of Tufts University, as well as Director of the Frances Stern Nutrition Center at Tufts-New England Medical Center Hospital.Laboratory studies support an association by pointing to many possible ways in which flavonoids could decrease cancer occurrence and recurrence. They include scavenging compounds that could alter DNA structure or function, neutralizing unstable molecules known as free radicals, inhibiting enzymes and producing antiestrogen effects.	To better determine what role flavonoids play in cancer prevention and cancer recurrence, AICR awarded a grant to Dr. Dwyer. Collaborating with U.S. Department of Agriculture (USDA) scientists and others, Dr. Dwyer and her team had already helped to develop a flavonoid database to estimate the kinds and amounts of flavonoids in foods."The development of this database took USDA and collaborators like us about seven years," Dr. Dwyer reports. "We think we now have fairly good estimates for measuring people's intake of flavonoids."The database can be accessed through the USDA Nutrient Data Laboratory homepage at www.nal.usda.gov/fnic/foodcomp/index.html.Identifying the Good Flavonoids	With the support of AICR, Dr. Dwyer, Dr. Peterson and colleagues were able to extend the database to cover flavonoids in common dietary supplements. They also calculated the flavonoid content in the diets of 300 postmenopausal breast cancer survivors. "Like many people as they age or suffer a chronic disorder, these women are fairly high dietary supplement users," she says. To get a more accurate view of their flavonoid intake, database values were created for supplements containing green tea, soy, pycnogenol (an extract of pine bark), grape seed extract and other substances with flavonoids.	It remains to be determined if women who eat more flavonoids have lower rates of cancer recurrence. With the help of the database, Dr. Dwyer's group hopes to pin down the flavonoids with the greatest protective effects. "At this point, we can't be more specific than what AICR advises," she says. "Eat an abundance of vegetables and fruits for preventing primary, as well as recurrent, cancers."ReferenceDwyer JT et al. Measuring flavonoid intake: need for advanced tools. Pub Health Nutr. 2002;5(6A):925-30.

Shows how to add nutrition to meatloaf, macaroni and cheese and other favorite dishes without sacrificing their traditional flavors. Includes recipes and a list of healthy substitutions for baking and cooking.

In time for National Prostate Cancer Awareness Month, the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) is offering a free brochure that outlines the simple steps men can take to help prevent prostate cancer.

The brochure, Reducing Your Risk of Prostate Cancer, lays out the latest science in a clear, easy to understand style. The brochure is filled with practical advice about the hottest topics in the study of diet and prostate cancer, such as tomatoes, soy, vitamin E and the role of physical activity.

Nearly 26 percent of Americans73 million peoplelive alone. Whether single, widowed or divorced, many of these people eat an excessive number of their major meals at commercial eateries or assemble them at home from prepared foods.

According to a U.S. Department of Energy study, more than 42 percent of all singles do not cook even one meal per day at home. Figures from the U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics indicate that singles spend 47 percent of their food dollar on food prepared away from home as opposed to 42 percent for households of two or more and 37 percent for households of five or more.

The prospect of maintaining a kitchen for one, cooking alone and dining alone seems to drive many singles to eat out, take out, or order out. Unfortunately, commercially prepared meals often have too many calories, too much fat, too much sodium and too few vegetables and fruits for maintenance of a healthy weight and protection against chronic disease.

To assist singles in meal preparation, AICR has published a new brochure entitled Cooking Solo: Homemade for Health. It explains how to organize shopping, storing and preparing food for the single household. It offers tips for fitting cooking and healthy meals into a busy contemporary life.

Cooking Solo lists the basics: simple kitchen tools, smart grocery shopping tips, safe food storage and healthful cooking methods. It tells how to choose frozen dinners that have the most nutrition and how to supplement them with vegetables and whole grains.

The new brochure also explains what makes a meal healthy. For good health and lower cancer risk, AICR advises filling two-thirds or more of your plate with vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans, and limiting meat and dairy products to one-third or less of your meal.

This kind of predominantly plant-based diet can provide plenty of protective substances, called phytochemicals, that studies link with lower cancer risk. If Americans ate the recommended 5 or more daily servings of vegetables and fruits, researchers estimate that the incidence of cancer would drop by 20 percent.

In the CEBP study, Mexican researchers compared the self-reported diets of 475 breast cancer patients to the reported diets of 1391 healthy women who were similar in age, weight and other factors. Researchers found that subjects whose reported diets contained the most carbohydrates were more likely to have breast cancer than subjects who ate the least carbohydrates.

Carbohydrates are the dietary mainstay of most cultures around the world. The category encompasses unprocessed, fiber-rich foods such as vegetables and fruits as well as highly processed chips, cookies and cupcakes. Thus, it is unlikely that any generalizations about carbohydrates will stand up to scrutiny.

What has been largely overlooked, however, is that the researchers also analyzed how consumption of insoluble fiber  found in vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans  affected cancer incidence. Women in the study who ate the most insoluble fiber had lower breast cancer risk.

The distinction between refined and unrefined carbs is shaping up to be an important one, and one that will figure largely in future studies of diets link to cancer and other diseases. We at AICR believe that every effort must be made to keep that distinction clear in the publics mind.

The AICR experts said they chose to ask Americans about their most recent dinner in order to take a snapshot of how the country is actually eating. Other surveys that look at American eating patterns tend to rely on marketing data from supermarkets or self-reported beliefs about overall eating trends.

Research compiled in the landmark AICR/WCRF expert report, Food, Nutrition and the Prevention of Cancer: a global perspective, suggests that diets rich in many different kinds of vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans are linked to lower risk of cancer and other chronic diseases. The interaction of different substances within these foods seems to be responsible for the observed protective effect. Diets that lack a broad spectrum of plant foods simply dont permit that kind of interaction.

And there is evidence that this crucial interaction is lacking from American diets. According to the Economic Research Service of the US Department of Agriculture, one third of the average Americans daily vegetable intake consists of frozen potatoes (mainly French fries), potato chips, and Iceberg lettuce.

AICR advises Americans to prepare meals in which a wide variety of fruits, vegetables, whole grains and beans take up at least 2/3 of the plate, with animal products taking up 1/3 or less. Meals that aim for such proportions can lower risk for cancer, heart disease, stroke, diabetes, obesity and other diseases.

Most Americans (69 percent) are still eating a traditional dinner that combines some form of protein (meat, poultry, fish or tofu) with some amount of vegetables, pasta, rice, potatoes, or other foods from plant sources. Of that number, 72 percent contained unhealthy proportions, high in meat and low in plant foods.

Only 6 percent of Americans said they had eaten a salad for dinner the night before. Although most of these salads contained healthy proportions, a remarkably high number -- nearly 1 in 5 (19 percent) -- of those salads contained an unhealthily high proportion of meat and dairy products.

Too Much JunkKaren Collins, MS, RD, CDNAmerican Institute for Cancer ResearchA new report on American eating habits reveals that almost a quarter of the calorieswe consume come from nutrient-poor selections  better known as junkfood. This surprising fact clashes with the advice of many nutrition expertson how to eat more healthfully and control weight. To counteract the effect ofescalating portion sizes, many experts recommend decreasing the amounts of thefoods we eat. But if one-fourth of what we eat is junk food, weight reductioncampaigns should emphasize eating differently, not just eating less.The new report is based on surveys of about 4,700 people. According to the responses,soft drinks are the number one source of calories. They accounted for 7.1 percentof the calories these people consumed in 19992000. Altogether, the categoriesof soft drinks, sweets and desserts, and alcoholic beverages contributed 23.8percent of the calories that these survey respondents consumed. Salty snacksand fruit-flavored drinks added another five percent of calories. Since thesefoods are relatively concentrated in calories, you dont have to eat alot of them to increase your daily calorie total. Another study looking only at youths aged 8 to 18 reports similar findings. Candy,table sugar, sweetened drinks, baked and dairy desserts, salty snacks, fattyfoods like butter and gravy, along with some other nutrient-poor foods made upmore than 30 percent of the calories these youths consumed. In fact, dessertsand table sweeteners alone comprised almost 25 percent of the total calories.Furthermore, those who ate the most junk food tended to eat the least amountof nutrient-dense, healthful foods. They took in less vitamins A, B-6 and folate,as well as calcium, magnesium, iron and zinc.Although both of these studies are based on large national surveys, they included larger than representative proportions of blacks, Hispanics and low-income individuals. Consequently, the results may poorly characterize the eating habits of the average U.S. population. However, a third study, which used a randomly selected group, confirms that people who eat a lot of junk food suffer nutritionally. This study looked at the impact of salty snack foods, like potato chips, corn chips, crackers, pretzels and cheese curls. Those who ate the most of these high-fat salty snack foods had diets high in total and saturated fat and low in fruits and vegetables. These people scored poorly for dietary healthfulness. Other people who ate more fat-free versions of these snacks tended to eat more fruits, vegetables and fiber. But even fat-free snacks, when heavily consumed, can be detrimental to your health because of too many calories. The amount of sodium consumed by heavy users of both regular and fat-free snack foods also went well beyond recommended limits.These three studies of nutrient-poor food consumption highlight several important messages. Between-meal snacks and drinks may be the best place to start substituting healthy choices and cutting back. Second, people who are overweight can still be undernourished. Eating more healthful foods may be an important goal for these people, too. Finally, these studies and others like them refute the commonly heard idea that as long as someone maintains an appropriate weight, junk food is OK. Eating substantial amounts of high-calorie, low-nutrient foods tends to be part of an eating pattern that ignores nutrient-rich vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans. Even if you dont gain weight with this eating pattern, it could increase your health risks, like the risk of cancer, by depriving you of protective nutrients and phytochemicals.

Q: I know that portion sizes are important, but must I measure everything? A: For many people, choosing appropriate portions is one of the most significant steps they can take to eat more healthfully. Yet studies show that most of us dont estimate food portions accurately. Fortunately, with a little practice, people can improve their accuracy substantially. It is not necessary to measure all the food you eat. One easy trick to help estimate portion size is to compare your food portions to other objects. For instance, how does your hand compare to a measuring cup? Since its always with you, it can make an excellent guide. For an average adult, a rounded handful is about a half-cup and a fist is about one cup. You can also make comparisons to other things that youre familiar with, like a deck of cards, a computer mouse or a checkbook. These all closely represent a three-ounce serving of meat, poultry or fish. An ounce of cheese looks like four dice. But see how your thumb or fingers compare to four dice for an easy, always-with-you guide. A second way that studies show you can improve your ability to estimate food portions is practice. Serve a typical portion you would eat and then measure it. Then measure out half-cup, one-cup and two-cup portions of foods and see how they look on a plate, or in a bowl, glass or mug that you usually use. After a few tries, you should be able to estimate how much food is in front of you. Soon you should fall into a habit of thinking about and correctly gauging portion size when you serve and eat food.

Q: Can a vegetarian be overweight? I became a lacto-ovovegetarian to lose weight, but the change hasnt helped.A: Like everyone else, vegetarians can be overweight. The wish to lose weight shouldnt be the sole reason for adopting a vegetarian lifestyle. Excess body weight develops when anyone consumes more calories than she or he burns. How likely you are to burn the calories you eat depends in part on how active you are. But you also need to consider the number of calories you eat. The foods that vegetarians rely on for protein, like beans, nuts, seeds and cheese, can be higher in calories than meat. These foods supply nutrients for good health, but they need to be balanced by plenty of low-calorie vegetables. Like everyone else, vegetarians also need to be careful of beverages. The calories in soft drinks add up quickly. The same is true for juices, sweetened milks and alternative-to-milk drinks. And like everyone else, vegetarians should match their portions to actual physical hunger. Overeating, even of healthful foods, will almost surely lead to weight gain.

To assemble salad sticks, alternate light- and dark-colored vegetables and push them through skewers far enough down so top pieces are firmly speared. (If using bread, leave at least an inch at the sharp end which will be inserted into the loaf.) Place enough dressing for 12 servings into one large bowl or into 12 separate serving bowls to use as a dip for the vegetables.If using the bread, place it on a large serving platter. Insert the sharp end of each skewer into the bread at an angle, to mimic sparklers. Makes 12 servings.Per serving: 11 calories, 0 g. total fat (0 g. saturated fat), 2 g. carbohydrate, less than 1 g. protein, 1 g. dietary fiber, 5 mg. sodium.

In a medium saucepan, bring water to a boil. Add barley and 1/2 teaspoon salt, if desired. Reduce heat, cover and simmer until barley is tender, about 20 minutes. Drain well and allow to cool to room temperature. In a large bowl, combine barley, beans, bell pepper, tomato, zucchini, jicama (if desired), cheese, scallion, oregano and lime juice. Toss with a fork. Sprinkle lime juice over top of salad, tossing at the same time to evenly distribute juice. Season with salt and pepper, according to taste. Makes 5 servings. Per serving: 197 calories, 6 g. total fat (3 g. saturated fat), 25 g. carbohydrate,11 g. protein, 8 g. dietary fiber, 359 mg. sodium.

Sprinkle cumin over the chicken and rub in. Add chicken and lime juice to a container with a tight lid, cover and shake to mix well. Marinate in the refrigerator, 2 to 24 hours, shaking the container occasionally. About an hour before cooking the chicken, remove it from the marinade, pat dry with paper towels and set aside to allow it to come to room temperature. Add half of the oil to a medium, nonstick skillet over medium high heat. Stir in the onion, green and jalapeno peppers. Saut? until onions are lightly browned, about 10 minutes. Transfer vegetables to a plate and set aside. Do not clean the pan.Heat remaining oil in the pan over high heat until hot. Add chicken and cook until slightly browned, 1 to 4 minutes, depending on thinness. With a slotted spoon, transfer chicken to a plate.Place a tortilla on each of 4 plates. Add one-fourth of the chicken to each in a narrow band, leaving a 1-inch margin at each end of the tortilla. Top chicken with one-fourth of the vegetables, then one-fourth of the salsa, then one-fourth of the cilantro. Fold ends of the tortilla over the filling. Roll up as tightly as possible. Serve immediately.Makes four servings.Per serving: 190 calories, 5 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 26g. carbohydrate, 17 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 350 mg. sodium.

In large saut? pan with a lid, heat olive oil over medium heat until hot. Add garlic and saut? until golden. Add green beans, reduce heat to medium, sprinkle with salt and pepper to taste and cover with lid. Cook, stirring occasionally, until green beans are almost tender but firm. Remove lid, add tomatoes and basil, turn up heat and cook for 5 to 6 minutes, stirring frequently. Transfer bean mixture to a serving bowl. Sprinkle with feta cheese and serve. Makes 6 servings.Per serving: 89 calories, 6 g. total fat (1 g. saturated fat), 8 g. carbohydrate,4 g. protein, 1 g. dietary fiber, 130 mg. sodium.

THE MAGIC OF MARINADESfrom theAmerican Institute for Cancer ResearchWhile they're used year round, marinades are especially popular in the summerbecause they enhance the tenderness as well as the taste of meats. And in waysscientists don't completely understand, marinades combat the harmful carcinogensformed when meat is cooked at high heat, as in grilling. As a matter of fact,marinades may be the single most effective way to reduce the amount of the cancer-causingsubstances created.Scientific research has found that marinating meats before grilling can reducethe amount of these carcinogens by as much as 90 to 99 percent. Even brieflymarinating meat has been found to help prevent carcinogens from forming. Althoughscientists don't know exactly why marinades offer this protective effect, somebelieve it is due to the protective nature of the marinade in coating the meat,or possibly the antioxidant compounds in certain ingredients used in marinades. Marinades contain three basic components: an acidic ingredient (vinegar or citrusjuice), flavoring (vegetables, herbs and spices) and some form of enabler (usuallyoil) that binds the ingredients and helps the marinade to perform effectively.The marinade ingredients that contain antioxidants include citrus juice, manyvegetables, herbs and spices. Use about half a cup of marinade for every pound of food. (Large pieces may needmore marinade.) Some acidic ingredients react badly with metal, so only use glass,ceramic or plastic containers. Turn the food occasionally so all surfaces aresoaked in marinade.Or, use a heavy-duty resealable plastic bag to hold the marinating foods. Just turn the bag upside down every now and then.Never baste with marinating liquid, which may be contaminated by harmful bacteria in raw meats. Instead, discard the marinating liquid and make a fresh batch to baste with or serve as an accompanying sauce.

Combine all the ingredients until well blended in a non-metal container large enough to comfortably contain the food to be grilled. Add meat and turn several times until all sides are well coated.Cover and refrigerate 30 minutes or more, depending on the size of the food portions. Periodically turn food to distribute flavors evenly.Drain and remove excess marinade with paper toweling. Grill, turning often to prevent charring.Quantity: sufficient for marinating 4 servings (1 lb.) of meat, fish or poultry.Per serving: 35 calories, 2 g. total fat (0 g. saturated fat), 5 g. carbohydrate,less than 1 g. protein, less than 1 g. dietary fiber, 1 mg. sodium.

Researchers at the Mayo Clinic Cancer Center analyzed data from the Iowa Womens Health Study to document how following AICR recommendations affected cancer risk among the 29,564 women whose diets and lifestyles were tracked for 13 years. The AICR recommendations include a diet high in vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans, maintaining a healthy weight, getting regular physical activity and not smoking.

AICR SCIENCE NOW Volume 9Summer 2004 A Gut Reaction Could a diet high in animal protein and fat increase colon cancer risk by suppressing "good" bacteria and promoting the growth of "bad" microbes that damage the colon? With AICR support, Stephen J. O'Keefe, M.D., is trying to find out. His findings may offer particular promise for African Americans, who have the highest incidence of colon cancer of any ethnic group in the U.S.When Dr. O'Keefe worked as a gastroenterologist in South Africa, 			he was "astounded" by how rarely he saw native African patients with colon cancer or colon polyps, which are benign growths in the lining of the colon that often precede cancer."Out of 100 native Africans over age 50, two or three might have colon polyps," says Dr. O'Keefe, now at the University of Pittsburgh Medical Center. By contrast in the U.S. population as a whole, colon polyps may be found in three or four out of 10 otherwise healthy patients over age 50 who have their colon examined.Thirty years ago, native Africans' low rates of colon cancer were attributed to their high-fiber diet, which consisted mainly of homegrown whole grains. Today, most native Africans subsist on commercially grown, low-fiber refined cornmeal.	"Their fiber intake is five to 10 grams a day - less than that of someone eating a typical Western diet," says Dr. O'Keefe. "Yet polyps and colon cancer remain extremely rare in native Africans. Clearly, dietary fiber consumption can't be the explanation." Animal Fat and Protein SuspectedDr. O'Keefe and his colleagues wondered whether the explanation could be found in another major difference between African and Western diets: Africans consume very few animal products.	"Epidemiological evidence from around the world shows that a diet high in animal fat and protein may be linked to an increased risk of colon cancer. Our preliminary studies suggest that the low incidence of colon cancer among native Africans is related to a diet low in animal fat and protein," says Dr. O'Keefe.	The researchers are studying whether a diet high in animal fat and protein suppresses healthful bacteria in the colon and promotes the growth of damaging microbes, setting the stage for polyps - and ultimately cancer - to develop. 	About 400 species of bacteria live in the human colon. Until recently, very little was known about them. Sensitive molecular probes can now be used to identify these microbes and show how they interact with different dietary components. Dr. O'Keefe and his colleagues are focusing on four types of colonic bacteria: Methanogenic bacteria break down dietary carbohydrates to produce short-chain fatty acids (SCFAs), important nutrients for the lining of the colon. These microbes also generate methane. Having a lot of them in the colon results in gas - a sign of a healthy colon, says Dr. O'Keefe. In a preliminary study, he found methanogenic bacteria in the colons of 82% of native Africans, but in only 45% of white South Africans who eat a different, typically Western diet.Sulfur-reducing bacteria are a byproduct of a diet high in animal protein. These microbes suppress methanogenic bacteria, thus reducing the production of SCFAs. Sulfur-reducing bacteria also produce toxic substances that damage colon cells. Dr. O'Keefe and his colleagues think this damage may create conditions that promote polyp growth.7-alpha-hydroxylating bacteria fuel the production of substances harmful to a healthy colon. A high-fat diet stimulates the liver to produce bile acids that enter the colon. 7-alpha-hydroxylating bacteria convert one of these bile acids into a secondary substance that is toxic to the colon's lining. Recent studies indicate this bacteria strain to be much more common in the colons of Westerners, regardless of race, than of native Africans.  Lactobacilli are microbes that produce lactic acid, which numerous studies have shown suppress the growth of harmful colonic bacteria. Studies suggest that lactobacilli are plentiful in the colons of native Africans, but rare in Westerners, regardless of race, unless consumed in probiotics (see page 2).	Conducted in both the U.S. and South Africa, O'Keefe's study compares dietary intakes and levels of the four types of colonic bacteria among 20 African Americans, 20 white Americans and 20 native Africans, all of whom are healthy. He expects the study to end in 2004.	Depending on the results of this study, he may conduct a dietary intervention study to see whether the risk and incidence of colon cancer can be reduced in African Americans.ReferencesO'Keefe SJD et al. The rarity of colon cancer in Africans is associated with low animal product consumption, not fiber. Am J Gastroenterol. 1999;94:1373-80.O'Keefe SJD et al. Differences in diet and colonic bacterial metabolism that might account for the low risk of colon cancer in native Africans. Gastroenterology. 2004;126(4):M2097.

AICR SCIENCE NOW Volume 9Summer 2004 The Best Time for Cancer TherapyRegular fluctuations in body characteristics, like temperature and hormone levels, that occur in a day are called circadian rhythms. The body's biological clock, located in the brain's hypothalamus, controls these rhythms. Metabolically active tissues, including cancerous tumors, in many parts of the body are now known to have their own circadian rhythms. Scientists have discovered that the effectiveness of some drugs can be improved, or side effects minimized, by administering them according to the circadian rhythms of these tissues. This practice is known as chronotherapy.In both human clinical trials and laboratory settings in recent years, researchers have used chronotherapy to try to establish the optimal times to administer more than 30 cancer drugs. Such studies show that the tolerability of certain medications can vary by 50 percent or more, depending on when they are given.Timing the Attack Against Prostate CancerJack Burton, M.D., a researcher at the Center for Molecular Medicine and Immunology in Belleville, N.J., is using an AICR grant to investigate the dietary possibilities of chronotherapy. He's seeing how effective selenium, a vitamin D derivative called paracalcitol, and curcumin (a compound found in turmeric) are in slowing the growth of prostate cancer tumors when administered to mice at different times of the day. These three compounds were chosen because they have been shown to inhibit cancer cells grown in culture at "doses that are achievable in humans - not terribly high," Dr. Burton explains.In the study that Dr. Burton and co-investigator, Rosalyn Blumenthal, Ph.D., are performing, mice that have been injected with one of two types of human prostate cancer cells will be given daily doses of one of these dietary compounds for three weeks. The dosings will occur at different times of the day. The mice will then be monitored for six to eight weeks and their tumor growth tracked. Since blood flow to tumor tissues follows a circadian pattern, the uptake of the three dietary agents into the tumor at various time points will be assessed.Markers Point to Most Effective Time"In cancer, there are general markers that are associated with whether a treatment will shrink the tumor or not. One of our goals will be to look at whether these markers, or proteins, are cycling up and down during the course of the day and whether they provide a clue as to why the treatment is actually more effective at one time of day than the other," Dr. Burton says.Dr. Burton is about a third of the way through this study, having completed the selenium experiments. "We've seen already that the selenium is slowing down the progression of the prostate cancer and that there are differences in terms of administering it at different times of the day. Some of our preliminary results show that these protein markers do vary in their levels according to the time of day." "I'm an oncologist but I also run a laboratory, so we're trying to do work that can be readily transferred to the clinic," Dr. Burton says of his research.ReferenceBlumenthal RD et al. Chronotherapy and chronotoxi-city of the cyclooxgenase-2 inhibitor, celecoxib,in athymic mice bearing human breast cancer xenografts.Clin Cancer Res. 2001;7:3178-3185.

The recipes below include a classic favorite, meatloaf, and fun alternatives to familiar vegetable stand-bys. They reflect AICRs healthful approach to eating, the New American Plate, which advocates two-thirds (or more) of the plate devoted to plant-based foods like vegetables, beans and fruit, and one-third (or less) of the plate to meat, poultry, or fish. The Kids-Tested Gourmet Meatloaf achieves a number of goals. It fits the New American Plate guidelines and is more healthful than most traditional meatloaves, maximizing the use of healthful vegetables and grains. It also produces a light, moist and flavorful meatloaf through ingredients that provide more flavor than fat. The variety of ingredients creates a rich flavor that raises this meatloaf from the ordinary to the gourmet level, yet one that can be enjoyed by childrenas well as adults.

The magic of the following vegetable dish, which looks like mashed potatoes, is that it is made with cauliflower, not potatoes, yet is mild and creamy enough to fool all but the most experienced palate. The AICRs staff who tasted this dish without knowing its ingredients did not identify the main ingredient on their own. Children who make this easy-to-prepare dish will enjoy having a secret that will surprise the rest of the family at dinner. Young children can activate the microwave and blender in the preparation of this vegetable dish. Older children can handle the entire preparation process, with guidance from the parent. As a bonus, children can learn why cauliflower is superior to potatoes when parents tell them about its health-protective substances that are believed to be a great fighter against birth defects, cancer and heart disease.

The following Rainbow Salad is especially appealing to children who like to dip finger-sized foods into sauces, which the food industry already recognizes and capitalizes on with its new products. Children find the wide range of colors appealing and enjoy making individual dipping cups out of bell peppers. Young children who are still not ready to chop and slice with a knife can make the dipping sauce. Children who can safely use a knife can also prepare the vegetables. Children of all ages should be involved in deciding what vegetables to serve with the sauce, with parental encouragement to max out the number of vegetables used.While preparing this dish, parents can point out that a vegetables color is often an indicator of special substances (phytochemicals) that protect health in a very specialized way. For example, red and orange signify the presence of beta carotine, which helps protect the eye from several health problems and prevent certain types of cancers. The red of tomatoes and tomato-based products indicates the presence of lycopene, which helps protect against several cancers.

Make dip by placing yogurt, mayonnaise, sour cream, garlic paste or powder, if using, and Worcestershire sauce in a blender. Mix on medium speed until well blended and smooth. Before transferring dip from the blender, season to taste with salt and pepper. Taste to check if additional Worcestershire sauce or other seasoning is desired. Transfer dip to a container with a cover and refrigerate about 1 hour to allow flavors to develop. Bring dip to room temperature before serving.Either shortly before or about an hour before serving time, cut green peppers about two-thirds below the top so that the bottom section can serve as a cup to contain dipping sauce. Remove seeds and any fibrous tissue in the bottom sections and set aside. Reserve top portions of the peppers for a future use. Cut remaining bell peppers into quarters. Remove seeds and fibrous tissue. Cut quarters into strips suitable for dipping in a sauce. If preparing in advance, wrap pepper cups and strips in plastic wrap and refrigerate until serving time.When ready to serve, fill each bell pepper cup with dipping sauce. Place each bell pepper cup on a salad plate. Arrange one-fourth of the bell pepper strips,in each color, next to or around the bell pepper cup.

Tomatoes and tomato products (pink grapefuit and watermelon, too) contain lycopene, which helps fight cancer.Red, orange and yellow vegetables contain beta carotene which is believed to fight cancer and cataracts, and enhance the immune system.Dark, leafy greens, like romaine lettuce, spinach and collards, fight cancer and eye disease.Cruciferous veggies like cauliflower, broccoli and cabbage contain five important groups of phytochemicals that help protect against cancers in different ways.Garlic helps protect against heart disease and cancer, especially if cut-up garlic is allowed to sit 10 to 15 minutes, which helps develop its effectiveness.Meat like beef contains the building blocks for muscles, skin and most other parts of the body, plus important vitamins, like B6 and B12, and minerals like iron and zinc.Involve children in tasting dishes as seasonings are added. Give them the power to decide, with your help, when a dish has enough salt or other seasoning. Involve children in clean as you go and other steps that can be done during cooking or baking times.Make sure the family gives credit to the helpers for the important role they played in preparing a dish or a meal.

Cold-water fish are a chief source of healthy omega-3 fats, which research shows may protect against cancer and other diseases. But concerns about toxins in some fish may be scaring the public away. Here's how to navigate fish choices and add other foods that provide omega-3 fats.There are plenty of good reasons to eat fish: It's high in protein, low in unhealthy fat, and rich in healthful omega-3s. But recent reports have questioned the safety of eating fish, due to potentially unacceptable levels of PCBs and mercury.PCBs (polychlorinated biphenyls) and mercury are industrial pollutants that find their way into fresh waters and oceans where they are absorbed by fish. Large predator fish at the top of the food chain, such as shark, swordfish and king mackerel, accumulate the most mercury and other contaminants.A recent study made headlines when it reported unacceptable levels of PCBs in fish feed given to farmed salmon. The study said that PCB levels in farmed salmon,especially those from Europe, were about seven times higher than in wild salmon.PCBs have been linked to a variety of health problems, but there is no official agreement that the amount of PCBs in farmed fish poses a health hazard. Until more research results are available, it is reasonable to eat farmed salmon less frequently and eat wild salmon more often among a wide variety of fish, along with plant sources of omega-3s.As for mercury, high levels may damage the developing nervous system. Federal agencies recommend that women of child bearing age and young children avoid swordfish, king mackerel, shark and tilefish. However, it is safe for these women to eat up to 12 oz. (2-4 servings) per week of other fish.Albacore (white) tuna is higher in mercury, so the FDA advises these women to limit albacore tuna to 6 oz. per week, counted as part of the 12 oz. of fish per week. Children can have up to 3 smaller servings per week. Canned light meat tuna is much lower in mercury, but also lower in omega-3 fats. Fish safety research is ongoing; check with the FDA for revisions to advisories.Adding plant foods that contain omega-3s to a diet that only has limited amounts of fatty fish is advantageous. Plant sources contain a shorter-chain fatty acid, called ALA (alpha-linolenic acid), that humans can convert to the type of omega-3s fish has, but it is not as effective as obtaining omega-3s from fish.What to Do?

Additional Findings of the AICR SurveyRespondents to the survey were asked which specific dietary and nutritional supplements, if any, they took to lower their risk of cancer. Vitamin C was the most commonly used supplement, reported by 17 percent of Americans. Vitamin E came in second, at 16 percent. A surprising 9 percent of respondents said they took garlic supplements for lower cancer risk. Folic acid came in fourth, at 8 percent, and beta-carotene was the fifth most popular dietary supplement used to fight cancer, taken by 7 percent of Americans. Vitamin C, vitamin E and beta-carotene are widely known antioxidants, substances that protect the body from the kind of cellular damage that can lead to cancer. We know that antioxidants are important protective compounds in the diet, said Polk. But we certainly dont know whether or not they are protective against cancer as supplements. There is some concern among scientists that very large doses of single anti-oxidants may have a promotional effect on cancer growth. In a series of studies, beta-carotene supplements were linked to increased lung cancer incidence among smokers.When it comes to folic acid, its certainly true that a lack offolic acid in the diet may increase the risk of certain cancers  and birthdefects as well. But so far there is no evidence that oversupplementation offersany protection.Garlic supplements provide many of the phytochemicals that have shown the ability to protect against cancer, but most are missing the compounds that convert those substances into their active, cancer-fighting forms. The bottom line is this: a diet that contains these nutrients, as wellas a host of additional phytochemicals, is the surest way to achieve real, enduringcancer protection.Just over half of the surveys respondents (51 percent) said they take neither multi-vitamins nor supplements for the purpose of lowering their cancer risk. About one in four (27 percent) said they take a multi-vitamin for this purpose. 16 percent said they take both multi-vitamins and supplements, and 6 percent said they take only supplements to lower their cancer risk. Conducted for AICR by International Communications Research (ICR), the survey involved 1,010 adults, 18 years or older, chosen at random. Respondents were interviewed by telephone during a five-day period in late July.

The Effect on HormonesA little research has directly tested the idea that sleep deprivation leads to weight problems. In a Japanese study of six- and seven-year-olds, children who slept nine to ten hours a night were compared to those who slept only eight to nine hours. The latter group was almost twice as likely to be overweight. Children sleeping less than eight hours a night were almost three times as likely to be overweight.A lack of sleep may change hormone levels and thus influence weight gain. For instance, higher levels of insulin  a condition known as insulin resistance  have been linked to a shortage of sleep. Since insulin promotes fat storage, as well as controls blood sugar, extra insulin could make weight loss more difficult. Further research needs to confirm any hormonal changes. But even without affecting hormones, sleep deprivation can promote weight gain by changing our behavior.

Dragging from DrowsinessWhen people low on sleep find their energy dropping, many turn to food for a pickup. The short-term rise in blood sugar gives a more energetic feeling, but often the extra calories are unneeded and stored as body fat. Furthermore, the most appealing foods when we feel low on energy are often sweets or refined carbohydrates with low nutrient density, like cookies. If sleep deprivation promotes insulin resistance, overconsuming these types of carbohydrates worsens the problem.Tired people may burn fewer calories, too, because they are too fatigued to exercise. Or if they do manage to exercise, they work out less intensely than usual. For example, a rested person may walk two miles in a half-hour. Someone fatigued will probably go a much shorter distance in the same time. The tired person would burn fewer calories, despite walking just as long.Shutting off the TV or computer an hour earlier means an hour less munching time. It could also improve your metabolism. It could even leave you with more energy to exercise. Definitely, these are propositions to sleep on.

Pack a Power Picnicby the American Institute for Cancer Research In the corporate world, people sometimes have a power lunch to discuss business. This summer, for your health and eating pleasure you should try a power picnic. Fill your cooler or old-fashioned basket mostly with fresh vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans. These plant foods are full of phytochemicals  powerful substances that help protect your health and prevent cancer.Think of plant foods as natural health kits. They contain vitamins, minerals, fiber and thousands of phytochemicals. Although our bodies cannot manufacture phytochemicals, scientific research shows that these substances bolster the bodys immune system and neutralize toxins.Some phytochemicals that have shown ability to protect health are: gingerol in ginger, allicin in garlic, ellagic acid in cranberries and glutathione in asparagus. Many phytochemicals, however, have yet to be studied. Researchers believe that the more we find out about them, the more reasons well have to eat vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans daily in abundance.

A Word About WheatWhen choosing your bread, pasta, rice or other grain foods, its important to pick whole grain products. Researchers have discovered that whole grains contain phytochemicals like lignans, flavonoids and saponins. Brown rice is noted for protease inhibitors and oryzanol. Bread made from whole grains instead of refined flour also has more fiber, vitamin E and selenium, all of which help prevent cancer.To tell if youre buying whole grain bread, the first word listed in the ingredients should be whole. Sometimes, enriched flour breads are tinted with caramel coloring to resemble whole wheat. You should also check the Nutrition Facts panels to find the whole grain bread with the greatest amount of fiber per slice. To start your picnic plans for better health, try this satisfying salad as your main dish. Finish the meal with a fresh fruit salad for a real phytochemical feast.

Cut asparagus into 1-inch pieces. In vegetable steamer set into large saucepan, lightly steam 2-3 minutes. Set aside to cool. In large bowl, combine white beans, orange pepper and red onion. Gently toss in asparagus. In separate bowl, whisk together olive oil, lemon juice, mustard, salt and pepper. Gently pour dressing into beans mixture. Adjust seasonings to taste. Line salad bowl with leafy greens. Top greens with white bean salad. Serve with hearty whole grain bread.

For more inspiration planning healthy meals throughout the year, subscribe to the quarterly American Institute for Cancer Research Newsletter. Its free and full of recipes. You can sign up online at www.aicr.org/publications/news.lasso.

Bring 2 quarts of water to boil in large saucepan. Add shrimp and cook until they turn pink and curl, 3 to 4 minutes. Drain and peel. Halve shrimp crosswise, and place in a mixing bowl. Add tomatoes, beans, mango, onion, jalapeno pepper and the orange and lime juices. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Tear lettuce into bite-size pieces and divide among 4 plates. Top each with one-fourth of the shrimp mixture and serve. Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 162 calories, 2 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 20 g. carbohydrate, 16 g. protein, 5 g. dietary fiber, 294 mg. sodium.

Few foods are as uniquely diverse as coriander, the plant that supplies both a spice and an herb. Its beige seeds are used as an aromatic spice in Europe, Asia, North Africa and the Middle East. The pungent green leaves, used widely as an herb from China to Mexico, inspire either love or intense loathing. Coriander has multiple names, including Chinese parsley and cilantro, a Spanish variation of the word culantro, which are usually applied only to the leaves. The leaves resemble flat-leaf parsley, although at farmers market I have seen locally cultivated coriander as large and frilly as a bouquet, with delicate little pink and white blossoms. Thanks to its popularity in Latin American, North African, Middle Eastern and Asian cooking, cilantro tends to be more familiar than coriander seed. We use it all the time, in salsa, chili, on salads and to garnish soups. Thai cooks even use the brownish, carrot-like root sometimes left at the base of cilantro clusters.Coriander seed, which resembles white peppercorns, is used whole and ground. Its complex flavor is sweet and faintly resinous, with citrus notes. The whole seed is used in pickling spice, crab boil and for making poached fruit. Ground coriander is important in Indian curries, Ethiopian berbere, and for flavoring baked goods like cookies and gingerbread. It is also used to flavor gin and in perfumes, thanks to its essential oil, linallol. Medicinally, coriander and cilantro both help digestion and may be anti-bacterial. Bringing cilantro and coriander together, I use them both in a burrito combining the flavors of India and the American Southwest.

Combine ground spices in a bowl. Add chicken and press spices in so they adhere. Cover and refrigerate overnight. Bring to room temperature before cooking. Heat 2 teaspoons oil in a medium skillet over medium-high heat. Saut? chicken until cooked through, about 5 minutes. Transfer to a plate. Cut chicken into bite-size pieces and set aside. Add remaining oil to the pan. Saut? onions and pepper until soft and lightly browned, about 8 minutes. Transfer with a slotted spoon to the chicken, mix in and set aside. Add beans to the pan and cook, stirring until they are warmed.Warm tortillas in a large, dry skillet over medium high heat. Spread one-fourth of the beans in center of each. Top with rice, then chicken mixture. Add a dollop of sour cream and a sprinkle of cilantro leaves. Fold sides of tortillas over the filling, then fold in ends. Turn the burrito over. Serve with salsa sauce on the side. Makes 8 servings.Per serving: 346 calories, 10 g. total fat (2 g. saturated fat), 48 g. carbohydrate, 16 g. protein, 6 g. dietary fiber, 562 mg. sodium.

With the abundance of fresh fruit now appearing in markets, it should be easy to get the two or more servings of fruit a day recommended by health experts. And as the American Institute for Cancer Research stresses, variety is as important as the number of servings. Fruits (and vegetables) each provide a different array of the phytochemicals that help protect us from chronic diseases like cancer, stroke and heart disease. So the challenge is to maximize the variety of fruit eaten over the course of time. Fruit salad is my preferred solution. I prepare a base, to save time, and as the days go by, I mix in new fruits, plus juice (to prevent discoloring) and accents like cinnamon, ginger, or mint. That way, my fruit salad keeps evolving as it lasts for several days. The result is deliciously varied, as new fruit becomes available. Once or twice a week, I start a completely fresh batch. To simplify the process of adding variety, buy containers of cut-up fruit, or loose fruit from the salad bar of markets.

Each of the seven research centers will work independently to produce systematic literature reviews (SLRs) that gather and evaluate evidence using a uniform methodology supplied by WCRF International. The different review centers will gather evidence for different kinds of cancer.

At the Pennsylvania State University, researchers have received a grant to review evidence that has linked food, nutrition and physical activity to cancers of the mouth, larynx, pharynx and esophagus. At Johns Hopkins University, grantees will confine their search to cancers of the lung and nasopharynx. At Kaiser Permanente in Oakland, California, grantees performed a test of the methodology that the other centers will use. This test was conducted by searching for literature on food, nutrition and physical activity and cancers of the endometrium.

The researchers at each center will work with a review coordinator to ensure that the process is as uniform as possible. The centers will use a portfolio approach to the evidence, which strives to give equal weight to each of the different kinds of scientific study used to study cancer.

According to the cancer experts at AICR and WCRF International, however, such a hierarchy is useful for studying the treatment of chronic disease, but is too narrowly focused to provide meaningful insight into how chronic disease is caused, or how it can best be prevented. Use of a portfolio approach expressly acknowledges that each kind of study has specific strengths and weaknesses, and allows researchers a more comprehensive overview of how the evidence is shaping up.

The task of the research centers is to gather evidence using such a portfolio approach and place it in a standard format called a systematic literature review, or SLR. Ultimately, these SLRs will be submitted to a separate, independent panel of 21 internationally known experts chosen WCRF/AICR. Six observers from the United Nations and other international health organizations will also participate.

It will be up to this panel to assess the evidence, draw conclusions and issue a series of recommendations that apply to individuals and to shapers of public health policy throughout the world. They will publish their findings in the second WCRF/AICR Report, Food, Nutrition, Physical Activity and the Prevention of Cancer: A Global Perspective. Publication is currently scheduled for late 2006.

Until that time the previous report, published in 1997, represents the best advice currently available for lowering cancer risk. Its conclusions are widely used by governments and official agencies to help shape international and national cancer control efforts, and by universities, health professionals, and individuals around the globe.

The 1997 report received worldwide attention by estimating that between 30 to 40 percent of all cases of cancer are preventable by making small changes in diet and physical activity. These changes include diets rich in vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans, getting regular physical activity, maintaining a healthy weight, limiting consumption of alcohol and avoiding tobacco.

French Onion Soup requires a long simmering period to allow its flavors to build slowly. Japanese miso soup is ready in minutes. So what might they have in common? The answer, surprisingly, is miso.A savory, peanut butter-like paste made from soybeans, miso ranges in color from creamy ivory to earthy black-brown. It can be used many ways in Japanese cooking, but primarily to make a pale gold or deep russet soup. Misos flavor can also take several different forms, but generally has a salty-sweet taste or even a slight meaty flavor, like beef broth.Which brings us to Miso Onion Soup. Classic onion soup recipes, like the one in Julia Childs Mastering the Art of French Cooking, get their flavor from deeply browning the onions, then adding wine and beef broth. By using the same technique for the onions and adding miso, you can make a golden brown, fabulously flavorful onion soup. When I serve this soup topped with the traditional toasted bread and grated Parmesan cheese the few people who notice a difference want the recipe.Supermarkets offer several kinds of miso. For onion soup, I use brown rice miso (sendai in Japanese) or red (aka) miso. Mellow barley (mugi) miso is good, too. You must cream the miso before adding it to the soup. This simply means combining it in a small bowl with an equal amount of liquid by mashing the miso with the back of a spoon against the side of the bowl until it dissolves. If you dont cream the miso, it forms tiny balls that never dissolve in the hot liquid. Stored in the refrigerator, miso keeps for a year or more. Use it to make regular miso soup, and to increase the flavor in other soups and stews.

HAPPY BREAKFAST BLUESBy Dana Jacobi for the American Institute for Cancer ResearchBlue food has been popular with kids for a surprisingly long time, particularly in sweets, from ice pops to candy-coated chocolate. There is a healthy blue food, though, that I encourage you and your family to try.Blue corn is no gimmick. It is special, and for more than its color and its Southwest Native American heritage. Particularly sacred to the Hopi and other pueblo Indian tribes, blue corn, cultivated primarily in the southwestern U.S. for over 400 years, sends down exceptionally deep roots that help it tolerate extreme heat and dryness. It has not become more widely cultivated, despite these strengths, because it also grows slowly and has a lower yield than other types of corn.Ground blue corn feels lighter than other cornmeal. Native Americans use it to make a creamy, sustaining, hot drink called atole. For blue corn tortillas, which are thicker, coarser and grainier than others, the grain is first treated with lime to remove its tough hull, then ground into the doughy masa from which tortillas and corn chips are made.Chefs and a few home cooks have discovered that blue cornmeal makes exceptional pancakes, waffles, and muffins. In addition to their eye-catching color, they have its stronger, earthy yet sweet flavor, which blends especially well with whole-wheat flour, as in these delectably light pancakes. Mix in blueberries, or serve with the accompanying blueberry syrup.

A new blood test for colon cancer risk may be on the horizon that measures levels of C-reactive protein (CRP), which is produced by the liver during periods of acute inflammation. High levels of CRP in the blood are regarded as an inflammatory marker. They are also associated with a greater risk of heart disease. A new study now links this inflammatory marker with the risk of developing colon cancer.The study, recently published in the Journal of the American Medical Association, found that levels of CRP were significantly higher in people who developed colon cancer up to eleven years later compared to people of similar age, sex and race who remained cancer-free. If further research confirms these results, colon cancer screening recommendations could change. People with elevated CRP levels might need screening tests more often than currently suggested. Laboratory studies already show that inflammation can promote the conversion of noncancerous colon cells to cancerous forms.If increased CRP levels correlate with greater colon cancer risk, then weight control becomes much more important. Studies have shown that overweight, not just severe obesity, raises CRP levels. Excess body fat releases substances that promote inflammation. In addition, when fat accumulates in the liver, that organ produces inflammatory substances as well. Inflammation, however, is not the only reason to avoid excess weight. Scientists already consider overweight a risk factor for colon cancer because of the elevated levels of the hormone insulin that often come with excess body fat. Besides excess weight, the researchers in this study also confirmed a potential link between smoking and colon cancer. Both in this study and others, smokers had higher CRP levels than former smokers and those who never smoked. A healthy diet appears to be an effective way to reduce inflammation throughout the body, thus lowering colon cancer risk. A balance of different types of fat seems to be an especially useful prevention strategy. Consuming enough omega-3 fats found in seafood and certain nuts and oils, which an American diet tends to be low in, reduces production of enzymes that stimulate inflammation. Some scientists believe that antioxidants and other substances in fruits and vegetables might help control inflammation, too. A healthy diet that fights inflammation is the same as one that helps prevent cancer. An excellent choice is a mostly plant-based diet like the one the American Institute for Cancer Research recommends. High in fiber, this diet has healthy kinds and amounts of fat, when eaten in portions suitable for your calorie needs. Such a diet provides cancer-fighting nutrients, while it helps control weight, along with inflammation and hormones like insulin. Physical activity is another important way to fight off chronic inflammation, as well as reduce cancer risk. Although this new study tracked individuals for 11 years, that may be too little time to establish the link between CRP and colon cancer. Scientists say colon cancer develops over a 10- to 20-year period. Consequently, it is possible that the observed higher levels of CRP are a consequence, not a cause, of early colon cancer formation. While we wait for a clearer answer, weight control, a plant-based diet, exercise and, of course, tobacco avoidance, are smart steps to safeguard your health, regardless of why they work.

The latest study of infants and toddlers eating habits concludes that parents feed their babies better than in the past. Unfortunately, parents then let their toddlers adopt the familys poor eating habits at an early age. The results of the study identify several opportunities parents have to improve their childrens health and fight the growing diabetes and obesity problem among children.The Feeding Infants and Toddlers Study (FITS) selected a random group of more than 3,000 children aged four months to two years and looked at the foods the children ate in a day. Parents appear to know the importance of good nutrition for babies: Compared to past findings, more babies are breastfed. They are breastfed for longer periods. And virtually all who are fed formula receive the recommended iron-fortified type. However, as babies grow into toddlers, parents seem unaware of how to prevent them from picking up eating habits that are causing weight and health problems in the rest of the family.For example, toddlers do not receive the recommended five servings of fruits and vegetables a day. Among toddlers aged one to two years, fruit was absent for about half at breakfast, for half at lunch and for about 60 percent at dinner. In the same group, about half had no vegetables at lunch and about one-third had none at dinner  even when French fries were counted as vegetables. Incidentally, French fries turned up as one of the three most common vegetables eaten by those aged nine to eleven months. This fatty, high-calorie choice was the most common vegetable from fifteen months onward. Twenty to 26 percent of the children in the study ate French fries at least once a day.Researchers warn that the avoidance of fruits and vegetables seen in older children, adolescents and adults most likely originates in life experiences before two years of age. Early and repeated exposure to a variety of foods, including fruits and vegetables, has been shown to increase childrens liking for them. Experts say parents and caregivers should include one or two fruits or vegetables at each meal. Ideally, everyone would eat at least as many, if not more servings. Snacks are another way for toddlers, as well as others, to get fruits and vegetables. Yet FITS shows that the most common snacks for toddlers are cookies, crackers, chips, milk, water and fruit drink (not fruit juice). The majority of babies and toddlers over eight months old had at least one dessert or sweetened drink every day. Snacks play a major role in the nutrition of young children, since their stomach capacity limits the amount of food they can eat at meals. Parents should limit high-calorie, low-nutrient snacks. Better choices include fruit, cheese, yogurt and low-sugar cereals.Experts also urge parents to give toddlers milk to drink. FITS suggests that juice, fruit drink and carbonated drinks often displace milk in toddlers diets. The American Academy of Pediatrics (AAP) recommends that juice be held from babies until they are six months old. From ages one to six years, children should be limited to a four to six ounce portion of juice a day. The AAP also stresses that whole milk should be served until age two.Parents often give up too easily when offering new foods to their infants and toddlers. Studies repeatedly show that a new food should be served eight to fifteen times. With familiarity, children often accept a food. Yet in this study only six to nine percent of caregivers offered a new food even six times. About 25 percent gave up after serving a new food only once or twice. Another 38 to 55 percent threw in the towel after three to five tries. For the long-term health of their children, caregivers should make an extra effort to introduce wholesome foods.

Most older adults, even highly active ones, skip strength training. Strength training, also called resistance training, is exercise that requires muscles to move against a weight or resistance. Muscles become stronger as a result. This type of exercise may involve free weights, like dumbbells, large machines, or simple calisthenics. Current exercise habits among seniors fall far short of the national health objective of at least 30 percent of this group doing strength-building exercises. According to the 2001 National Health Interview Survey of more than 5,500 people, only about 11 percent of adults age 65 and older participate in strength training at least twice a week. Individuals in fair-to-poor health were among the least likely to be strength training, as were women, the obese and the less educated.Many people think that beyond a certain age, you become too weak to strength train or benefit from it. But research shows the complete opposite. Without adequate muscle exercise, most adults lose 20 to 40 percent of the muscle they had as young adults. With too much muscle loss people have difficulties performing daily activities that allow them to live independently. Experts say that even small gains in muscle  too small to see  can make significant differences in how seniors live. Strength training can affect whether an older person can get out of a chair without help. It can also influence their sense of balance, risk of falls and fractures, and the ability to climb stairs or carry groceries. Strength training can even make bones stronger and weight control easier.One recent study of seniors showed that after six months of strength training, strength in a variety of muscle groups increased 31 percent for the duration of the two-year study. Other studies show benefits for the frail elderly living in nursing homes. People who had formerly needed walkers to get around could use a cane instead.The National Institute on Aging (NIA) recommends strength training of all major muscle groups: arms, shoulders, chest, abdomen, back, hips and legs, as well as exercise to enhance grip strength. The NIA has even developed a free exercise guidebook to help seniors train safely. It includes 12 strength-training exercises, equipment options, safety cautions (especially for those who have had hip replacements) and resources for additional free information. View it at www.nia.nih.gov/exercisebook or call the National Institutes of Health information center at 1-800-222-2225 to request a free copy.Seniors often identify access to appropriate equipment as a barrier to strength training. While free weights or Nautilus-type equipment at fitness centers are one option, elastic bands or resistance tubing, which are sold at sporting good stores and discount chains, are effective at keeping seniors strong. Even cans of food or water bottles filled with beans or sand can work.The American Institute for Cancer Research emphasizes regular exercise, ideally an hour a day, as a vital part of a lifestyle to lower cancer risk and promote good health and a healthy weight. Aerobic exercise like walking, biking and swimming can be the mainstay of your activity. But we all need to include exercise that maintains our flexibility, balance and strength. And that doesnt change as we age.

Although most Americans think of tea as simply a beverage that can either stimulate and refresh or sooth and relax, tea is also a remarkable and versatile ingredient. The great variety of types also means it is infinitely varied in flavor. An almost universal beverage in countries from Tibet to England, tea can be as common as drinking water or an exclusive luxury. Tea is also an essential to the culture of countries as diverse as England, Morocco and Japan. Also important are teas significant health benefits. Thanks to antioxidant compounds called flavonoids and polyphenols, tea helps protect against heart disease, stroke and some cancers. And for all this, you need only steep a tea bag in hot water for about three minutes to enjoy a nice, bracing cuppa, as the Brits would say. You do have to use real tea, meaning the dried leaves of Camellia sinensis, an Asian evergreen bush related to the camellia. This is an important point since we often refer to herbal drinks as tea when they are really infusions steeped from herbs. While herbal teas have their virtues, they do not provide the same health benefits as green and black teas. Green teas are made by steaming freshly picked tea leaves so they do not ferment before being dried. Black tea leaves, on the other hand, are fermented before roasting. Green tea, produced mainly by China, Japan and Taiwan, makes a delicate, pale brew and, depending on the type, any of a wide range of aromas, from floral to sharp. Black tea, grown mainly in South Asia and Africa, brews dark and hearty, but can vary in flavor. And black teas are often sold already spiced up with additional flavorings, like orange peel and spices like cinnamon and cloves.Tea is often used in cooking. Chinese tea eggs are hard-cooked in tea and soy sauce. In Vietnam, a tuna and pork dish is simmered in either lotus-flavored or black tea. The Japanese make delicate sweets with green tea. I follow my Russian grandmothers custom of making a fruit compote by soaking and simmering dried fruits in black tea and spices. The following fruit-studded rice dish uses a spiced black tea, too. Serve it in place of cereal for breakfast, as a salad for lunch or dinner, or a light but filling snack.

In a small bowl, mix together vinegar, salt and oil. Add cucumber and toss to coat all sides. Cover and refrigerate while preparing the other vegetables.Cook the egg until it is hard-boiled. Place under running cold water until egg has cooled down to warm. Set aside.From the watercress, pluck about 2 dozen tender sprigs off the larger stems. Tear lettuce into bite-size pieces into a large mixing bowl. Add watercress and toss to mix. Shell the egg and cut in half lengthwise. Place the yolk in a small bowl. In a separate bowl, chop the white into small dice. Using a small fork, break the yolk up until it is fluffy and powdery.Drain the cucumbers, reserving the dressing for later. Divide the leafy green mixture among 4 salad plates. Scatter a quarter of the cucumber slices over the top of each. Sprinkle one-quarter of the peas over each salad. Drizzle or spoon the dressing over the salads. Sprinkle egg whites and egg yolks over the tops of salads. If using, sprinkle dill on top. Serve immediately.Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 66 calories, 4 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 5 g. carbohydrate, 4 g. protein, 2 g. dietary fiber, 619 mg. sodium.Something Different is written for the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) by Dana Jacobi, author of The Joy of Soy, and recipe creator for AICRs Stopping Cancer Before It Starts.

Shred the potato and set aside. (It will darken in color, but this will not affect hash.)Heat 1 tbsp. butter or oil in a medium/large non-stick skillet. Add onion, bell peppers, celery and garlic. Saut? until lightly browned, 5 minutes. Push vegetables to one side of pan. Add remaining butter or oil. Add potatoes and mix with oil to coat them. Mix and combine well with the vegetables. Cook 3 minutes. If potatoes stick, scrape pan vigorously and move contents around pan to spray the bottom with cooking spray. Mix in chicken, milk, cayenne, salt and pepper. Spread and flatten out the mixture into a thick cake. Use the edge of a pancake turner to cut it into 4 sections. (Or, hash can be broken into rough pieces while cooking.) Cover the pan. Cook until potatoes are tender and hash is lightly browned, 3 to 5 minutes, turning so bottom sides can also brown. (Spray pan with oil spray if necessary while turning hash.)When hash is done, divide equally among four plates. Serve with barbecue sauce drizzled on top or around each portion. (If desired, sauce can be first be thinned, by mixing 4 tablespoons sauce with 4 tablespoons milk.) Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 235 calories, 9 g. total fat (5 g. saturated fat), 13 g. carbohydrate, 23 g. protein, 1 g. dietary fiber, 195 mg. sodium.

Try your hand at easily-made malfatti and youll be able to boast about making pasta so light it floats. Better yet, these bite-size spinach and ricotta dumplings take barely 15 minutes to make and serve, starting from scratch.Malfatti, which translates as badly made, are essentially the same as the filling for spinach ravioli. But instead of being enclosed in sheets of pasta, the spinach-cheese mixture is shaped into finger tip-size rolls, then lightly floured and cooked in water. They are also called gnudi or nudies by some people, again referring to ravioli that lacks its outer envelope. Making this pasta is as easy as combining chopped spinach and cheese with an egg. Roll tablespoons of the mixture in flour, toss into simmering water and, when the malfatti rise to the surface, in about three minutes, set them on a plate with warm tomato sauce. Presto: you have home-made dumplings for dinner.Malfatti are easily confused with gnocchi (nee-yok-ee), another type of diminutive Italian dumpling. Gnocchi can be made from semolina, which is coarsely-ground durum wheat, or using mashed potatoes and regular flour. Either way, they are exceptionally hard to make well. They should be airy and light, but instead are often doughy and tough. Turning out cloud-light malfatti however, is in my experience almost foolproof, even the very first time. In fact, if your children like to get involved with cooking, or if you want to lure them into learning some cooking skills, rolling the malfatti in flour is a perfect experience for them. Kids like to watch them sink into the water, then quickly bob back up. Its almost like magic. And parents should note that helping to malfatti is often a good way to get kids to eat spinach.When buying marinara sauce, check the label for the fat content. Some prepared sauces contain as much as a whopping nine grams of fat per half-cup serving, others a mere one-half gram.

In a medium saucepan, cook spinach according to package directions until just barely tender. Drain in a colander. When spinach is cool enough to handle, press or squeeze out to remove as much moisture as possible. Place spinach in a mixing bowl.Add cheeses, nutmeg, salt and pepper. Mix until well combined. Mix in egg. Sprinkle flour over a dinner plate. Using a generous tablespoon of the spinach mixture, gently form into 1 1/2 by 1 ovals and place on the flour. Repeat using half the spinach mixture. Roll formed ovals gently to coat them in the flour. One at a time, pick them up and gently shake in your palms to knock off excess flour. Set on another plate. Repeat, forming and flouring the rest. Discard excess flour.Bring a large pot of water to a simmer. With a slotted spoon, gently place dumplings into the water. Cook until they float to the surface, about 3 minutes. Meanwhile, gently heat tomato sauce. As the dumplings rise to the top of the water, lift them out and drain on paper towels. Ladle sauce out to cover the center of four plates. Dividing dumplings equally, set them on the sauce. Garnish with a sprinkling of the remaining cheese and serve.Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 162 calories, 5 g. total fat (2 g. saturated fat), 21 g. carbohydrate, 10 g. protein, 4 g. dietary fiber, 739 mg. sodium.Something Different is written for the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) by Dana Jacobi, author of The Joy of Soy, and recipe creator for AICRs Stopping Cancer Before It Starts.

Q: Are Pilates-type exercises a good way to get rid of my belly fat? A: Pilates-type exercises are great for toning muscles in your middle section, but they wont completely burn off excess fat in this area. These exercises focus on strengthening what is called the bodys core: the abdominal and back muscles. They also improve flexibility and joint mobility, while building strength. By using one's own body weight as resistance, participants go through a series of progressive, range-of-motion exercises. Attention is also made to the mind/body connection. According to its adherents, Pilates can help you develop long, powerful muscles, a flat stomach, a strong back and better posture. But fat on top of those muscles can still remain. If you have an unhealthy amount of fat there, you probably need to change the calorie balance in your diet. Take a look at your eating habits to see where you might be eating or drinking a couple hundred unnecessary calories a day. In addition to cutting back on calories, you should increase your physical activity. Since Pilates-type exercises are generally done just two days a week, you should plan other types of exercises for other days to keep up your overall health and burn off any excess body fat.

Whether dieters reach their goal or barely lose a pound, the day almost always comes when they go off the diet. Although this break can mark the beginning of a downward spiral that sends a person right back to the starting point, studies now show it doesnt have to. In fact, taking a break need not have any long-term effect on weight loss at all. The key is how you handle your time off the wagon.The first step in managing these lapses is to overcome your guilt. For example, one study compared weight loss among people in a 14-week continuous program with people who took a six-week break midway or several two-week breaks. Although the programs with breaks slowed or temporarily stopped weight loss, the total reduction among the different programs at five and 11 months was the same. During breaks, participants ceased to diet, keep records and check their weight, but continued to exercise. This study suggests that a break from weight loss efforts can work if you avoid negative, self-critical thought, like I knew I didnt have enough self-discipline to do this. Also notice that a break can be partial. Like the participants in this study, you could halt diet rules and still exercise.Making exercise a habit seems to be essential for long-term weight control success. Experts at the American College of Sports Medicine say to exercise at least two-and-a-half hours a week. They claim, however, that three to five hours a week is better for long-term weight maintenance. For good health and cancer prevention, the American Institute for Cancer Research recommends an hour a day of exercise.By itself, exercise is not enough for weight loss. In one study, a 16-month exercise program without diet advice helped women hold a steady weight, but produced no decrease in weight.Another important part of long-term weight loss is relapse prevention training. If youre dieting, you need to think ahead to situations, like family celebrations, arguments and television watching, that undermine your weight loss efforts. Studies show that those who can create more ways to cope with tough situations lose more weight. The recommended approach involves learning to see multiple ways to respond to a problem, not just one or two. Learning to handle emotions and negative thought patterns is also vital. In one study, women who regained weight had a tendency to regulate their mood with eating. It is necessary to deal with mood swings and other emotional and mental problems without turning to food. Weight loss often does not solve all the problems people hope it will. For example, those who emphasize their weight and shape in judging their self-worth may struggle with self-esteem. This matter requires its own attention.As difficult as it may seem to continue healthier behaviors, over time they become easier. So take a break when you need to, but dont let habits slide so much that lost weight is regained. Women who lose weight and regain it are unlikely to lose it again, according to another recent study.

For years, population comparisons around the world have linked high-fat diets with greater breast cancer risk. Laboratory and animal studies support such a link. But studies of individuals have had mixed results. Consequently, many researchers began to think that other factors related to high-fat diets might be the real problem. Now, several reports have us looking at the link again. A recent analysis of many studies concludes that consumption of fat, especially saturated fat, may have a significant effect on breast cancer risk. One problem in establishing the link between fat consumption and breast cancer lies in measuring peoples fat consumption. A common method uses a checklist that asks how often various foods were consumed. In one study, when such a list was used to assess fat intake, no significant link with breast cancer was seen. But when the same peoples consumption was measured with detailed food diaries, breast cancer risk increased 22 percent with each 20 percent increase in saturated fat consumption. People had significantly underreported their fat intake with the checklist.A second problem is that some studies suggest that women who consume more fat, especially saturated fat, during adolescence may experience more breast cancer in later adult life. Breast tissue undergoes an accelerated development during adolescence and may be most affected by diet and other influences then. But accurately assessing diet patterns from decades earlier is difficult. Trying to match a womans fat consumption five or ten years ago with her risk of breast cancer may really miss the critical period when dietary fat affects a womans health. Another difficulty is that earlier studies that observed no link between total fat consumption and breast cancer may even have looked at fat incorrectly. We now know that different types of fat act differently. Omega-3 fats from fatty fish are a case in point. These fats seem to block the development of breast cancer. Findings from one study show that women who consume more omega-3 fat face 26 percent less breast cancer than those who consume the least. Perhaps, the decisive fat factor is the balance between omega-3 fats and the omega-6 fats found in most polyunsaturated oils. Some studies show that women who consume high levels of omega-6 fats are at greater risk. Others studies indicate that high omega-6 consumption is a problem only when omega-3 fats are low. The ratio between the two kinds of fat may significantly affect all womens cancer risk, or just premenopausal women. Other nutrients, like vitamin E, may also influence the effect that dietary fat has on breast cancer risk. Due to conclude in 2005, a Womens Health Initiative (WHI) trial should provide good answers about the effectiveness of a low-fat diet to reduce breast cancer risk. This large study sets the goal of fat intake for women participants to 20 percent of calories. Their plant-based diet emphasizes plenty of vegetables and fruits.According to some researchers, women are more likely to lower their risk of breast cancer through weight control, regular physical activity and proper portion sizes. These researchers think that consuming a variety of whole grains, vegetables and fruits and decreasing red meat intake matters more than decreasing total fat consumption. But without limiting fat, long-term weight control is unlikely. Because excess fat in the diet can also increase breast cancer risk in several ways, a low-fat diet is the prudent choice.

All body fat is not the same. Researchers and health care professionals often measure overweight in pounds or with a calculation called the Body Mass Index (BMI). But some of the nations premier researchers now say that although these tools are easy to use and reliable, waistline fat poses far more health dangers than fat stored elsewhere. Medical experts are urging greater use of a waistline measurement when assessing health risks.Men who have waists over 40 inches and women who have waists over 35 inches have too much waistline fat and are considered obese. In one study, these people were 70 to 80 percent more likely to develop high blood pressure within five-and-a-half years than those with smaller waists. Waistline obesity is also one of the most common characteristics of metabolic syndrome. People with metabolic syndrome are at greater risk for diabetes, as well as high blood pressure. Metabolic syndrome doubles the risk of heart attack or stroke, according to one study. A person with metabolic syndrome has out of range values for any three of the following: waist measurement, HDL (good) cholesterol, blood triglycerides, fasting blood sugar, and blood pressure. They also are at increased risk for inflammation, high uric acid (which can lead to gout), an increased tendency for blood clotting, and other blood vessel abnormalities. Studies also link large waists with greater risk of some cancers. Scientists believe that the higher levels of insulin and insulin-like growth factors commonly seen with excess abdominal fat stimulate cancer cell growth. Excess waistline fat seems to approximately double the risk of breast cancer in women after menopause, regardless of overall weight status. Since prostate cancer is hormonally related, it may also be affected by sex hormone proteins, which abnormal insulin levels disrupt. When men adopt low-fat diets and exercise regularly, insulin levels shift to more normal levels. Other research tentatively links metabolic syndrome and high insulin levels with a greater risk of colon cancer.Body fat can be carried just under the skin or deeper in the body. Excess waistline fat often indicates greater fat in deep abdominal storage, or in organs like the liver. These deep deposits are associated with greater elevations of insulin. When fat cells enlarge, they also produce more of some immune system proteins. These proteins are transported directly to the liver, where they release inflammatory substances that raise the risk of heart disease, stroke, diabetes, and probably cancer. In addition, fat cells release blood-clotting factors that can affect blood vessels and put the body in a state favoring clots. This is why the risk of heart attack and stroke rises.People can inherit a susceptibility for metabolic syndrome, and possibly for storing fat on the waist. But lifestyle choices, like a high-fat diet and sedentary behavior, coupled with aging and some medications or health problems, can actually trigger the syndrome. Regular exercise and a balanced diet are the best strategies to control waistline fat and prevent metabolic syndrome. When needed, doctor prescribed medications can be taken to improve insulin abnormalities.

Preheat oven to 450 degrees. Firmly hold one end of the strip of orange peel skin side down on a cutting board. With the other hand, holding a knife at a low, almost horizontal, angle, cut away the white pith, starting at the end being held down and working down the strip. Cut the strip lengthwise into 4 long, narrow strips. Cut four pieces of foil about 12 inches long. Place a fish fillet in center of each piece. Rub garlic into fish. Sprinkle lemon juice over fish. Sprinkle one-fourth of the zucchini, onion, orange zest strips and basil on top of each fillet. Season fillets with salt and pepper and drizzle with oil. Crimp edges of foil together to seal. Bake fish 15 minutes. Remove and let cool slightly. Carefully open packets and transfer fish to plates. Top with vegetables and juices and serve. Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 154 calories, 5 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 2 g. carbohydrate, 24 g. protein, less than 1 g. dietary fiber, 62 mg. sodium.

Place cabbage in a large bowl. Pour enough boiling water over to cover. Let stand 5 minutes. Drain well. Pat dry with paper towels, then cut into thin slices.Spray large heavy saucepan with oil. Saut? onions until tender but not brown (about 10 minutes). Add cabbage and potato and cook, stirring, about 5 minutes. Add nutmeg and flour and stir 2 minutes. Gradually add milk and broth. Bring to a boil, stirring often. Reduce heat and simmer until vegetables are tender, about 20 minutes. Set aside to cool.Puree vegetables in batches in blender or food processor until smooth. Return to saucepan, season with salt and pepper. Bring to a simmer, ladle into bowls and sprinkle with parsley, chives and Parmesan.Makes 5 servings. Per serving: 121 calories, 3 g. total fat (2 g. saturated fat), 18 g. carbohydrate, 7 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 334 mg. sodium.

In the northern half of the world, March 20 is the first day of spring and the time to begin putting away the winter sweaters and roasting pans.Meals begin to lighten up and the first spring greens come to the market. A dish of grains and greens is a nice way to welcome spring. Barley and spring greens is a good transitional dish, light but hearty.Barley is a grain dating back to the Stone Age. It is used in breads, soups, stews and other dishes. It is usually sold as pearl barley, which is barley that has been steamed and polished. Aromatic fennel is a nice complement to the earthy taste of barley. Fennel is a plant with pale green celery-like stems and feathery fronds attached to a broad bulb. The whole fennel can be eaten raw in salads or cooked in a variety of ways. It has a slight licorice flavor sweet and delicate, not overpowering. Fennel is rich in vitamin A and contains a good amount of calcium, phosphorous and potassium.When buying fennel, look for bulbs with no brown spots or edges. The greenery should be a fresh, bright green. Store fennel wrapped tightly in a plastic bag, refrigerated, for up to five days. Baby spinach is another green that works well in this dish, and offers a different mix of nutrients. Spinach is full of folate, the natural form of the B vitamin found in dark green leafy vegetables, legumes, strawberries and oranges. Scientists believe folate could be essential to the bodys efforts to prevent cancer. Spinach also is a rich source of iron as well as of vitamins A and C.Baby lima beans add another shade of green, texture and flavor to this dish. Top with fresh basil for some lively zip, and this dish becomes a virtual bowl of spring.

Generously coat a large heavy pot with spray oil and place over medium-high heat. Add the onions and fennel and saut? until tender, 5 to 10 minutes. Add oil and heat until hot. Add the garlic and bell peppers and saut? lightly for 1 to 2 minutes. Stir in barley, thyme, marjoram and broth. Bring to a boil, immediate reduce heat to low and simmer until the liquid is almost absorbed, stirring occasionally, 40 to 50 minutes or until barley is tender. Midway through the cooking process, add salt and pepper to taste.When barley is cooked, add spinach, cheese and basil. Stir to blend and adjust seasonings with salt and pepper, to taste.Makes 6 servings.Per serving: 172 calories, 3 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 32 g. carbohydrate, 7 g. protein, 7 g. dietary fiber, 464 mg. sodium.

Rinse the broccoli rabe in cold water and drain completely. Cut 2 inches off the stems then chop the rest into 2-inch pieces. Blanch in boiling water about 3 minutes. Drain well.Heat oil in saucepan large enough to hold broccoli. Add garlic and red pepper and saut? quickly until garlic turns golden. Add broccoli and saut? until just tender. Season to taste with salt and pepper.Makes 5 servings. Per serving: 90 calories, 5 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 7 g. carbohydrate, 5 g. protein, less than 1 g. dietary fiber, 40 mg. sodium.

Q: Should people on blood thinners stop eating lettuce? A: No. Although vitamin K, found in lettuce, enhances blood clotting, people on blood thinner medications may continue eating lettuce. Doctors set medication levels to accommodate a patients normal intake of vitamin K. Thus, its important that the amount of vitamin K in the diet remains fairly even. Lettuce contains vitamin K, but the major sources are dark leafy greens, like kale, collard, mustard, beet greens, turnip greens, Swiss chard and spinach. If someone eats large amounts of these foods regularly, medication levels will be set to accommodate higher levels of the vitamin. People not taking blood thinners adapt to varying intakes of vitamin K without a problem.

Q: Are some people more likely to develop diabetes? A: Yes. We are all more likely to develop diabetes as we get older. But those who are overweight, have a parent or sibling with diabetes, or lack regular exercise are much more likely to develop the disease. Women who have delivered a baby that weighed more than nine pounds at birth, or who had gestational diabetes while they were pregnant, are also at greater risk. The good news for those overweight is that modest weight loss (5-10 percent of starting weight), along with thirty minutes of walking at least five days a week, can slash the risk. Some research suggests that a diet low in fat (especially saturated fat) and high in fiber can offer further protection. Each of these steps can also help lower the risk of cancer as well.

Q: How much sodium is too much? A: Unless someone has a medical condition that requires a stricter limit, total sodium consumption should be 2,400 milligrams (mg) or less per day. The greatest reason for limiting sodium is to control high blood pressure. When people keep sodium within this recommended level and eat more vegetables, fruits and beans, blood pressure drops markedly. People who cannot control their blood pressure with this limit and a mostly plant-based diet might find a limit of 1,500 mg effective. This low level requires extremely careful food choices. Another reason to limit sodium is the risk of stomach cancer. The American Institute for Cancer Research warns that diets high in salt and foods preserved with salt probably increase the risk of stomach cancer.

Spaghetti Chicken sounds like a four year-old exclaiming the name of his or her favorite meal. I created this versatile creation in the days when sharing the rent and grocery bills with a roommate was a necessity. It remains a favorite comfort food, convenience food and cost-saver, all still necessary on occasion.Convenience first. Spaghetti Chicken is a one-pot that you cook once and eat twice. Well, maybe it is a three-pot dish, if you include the skillet for making the chicken, a pot for boiling the spaghetti and a saucepan for the soup I make from the rest of the chicken. As for its economic virtues, not only are the ingredients inexpensive, but it lets you use about one and one-half pounds of chicken to feed four, twice.As comfort food, pasta topped with savory, homemade sauce, studded with mushrooms and freshly cooked chicken, rates high at my house. I usually use the leftover white meat in soup, most often a chicken-and-vegetable combo with beans, rice, or both  comfort food, again.Good eating, as in healthy, is another virtue of this dish. It provides lean protein for two meals. And it works equally well with whole-wheat or regular, semolina pasta. Sometimes, I use rice instead, preferably brown, or spoon the chicken and sauce over polenta. Spaghetti Chicken also provides one to two servings of vegetables, along with grain and chicken the first time around. It can include whatever you choose the second time around. If you like, increase the amount of vegetables. As for seasoning, anything goes, including fresh herbs, chili powder, or sun-dried tomatoes. I have even added a touch of curry powder or cinnamon, which give this down-home dish an ethnic note.

VALENTINE'S DAY DINNERBy Dana Jacobi for the American Institute for Cancer ResearchThe desire to create a romantic evening at home often collides with the reality of everyday chores. Saturday night may at first glance seem the conclusion of a leisurely day, but you may have little time to prepare the dinner you envision, especially if you have a family.Dining out is one solution. But this is one night when restaurants are very crowded. Staying home is quieter, more personal, and you can have the dinner you would like to share, whether you arrange a delicious evening for two or a special Valentine meal the whole family can enjoy.One option is a catered affair for two, which is not so far-fetched. It can be as formal or informal as you want. You might even arrange for a private chef to prepare the dinner of your dreams right in your own kitchen. (And I can assure you that few clients had the dream kitchen you might think a professional chef requires.) A more private version of this splurge is having a caterer drop off dinner, ready to heat and serve. They will have recommendations, but will also cook the exact meal you want, if given some notice.If you want to cook, a luxurious three-course meal can be easier than you think. Start with endive salad with a light vinaigrette and a touch of blue cheese. Then serve salmon with an elegant but easy mustard-horseradish sauce, and finish with fruit sorbet accompanied by cookies from your favorite bakery, or a big bowl of fresh strawberries and chocolate truffles. Although we have been plotting a romantic dinner for two, the following recipe is scaled to the more traditional, family-oriented four servings. However, it is easy to halve the ingredients for a special dinner for just the Valentine couple.

Blueberries are hot in terms of todays culinary trends. Since they are the berry I love most, I am delighted to see the praise they are garnering from health and nutritional studies.Ounce for ounce, blueberries contain the most potent combination of antioxidants, putting them on top of spinach, strawberries, and 47 other foods rated in a study at Tufts University for their antioxidant content. In animal tests, these white-blushed berries not only stopped effects of brain aging, but appeared to reverse it. Plus they are a good source of vitamin C and fiber, too.Blueberries offer so much that some experts recommend eating them every day. This can be a challenge, since they are far less abundant than strawberries and raspberries, especially outside of the few months when they are in season. Even then, blueberries are more costly than other fresh berries, so I have been looking at other alternatives.These include dried blueberries and frozen fruit. The dried berries, though are expensive, particularly when you calculate their price by the pound. This leaves frozen blueberries as the prime choice for most of the year, and for many consumers.Fortunately, frozen blueberries are a good choice for eating, as well as for nutrition and cost. They make great smoothies. Unlike frozen strawberries and raspberries, they are as good as, and sometimes better than fresh, in muffins and pancakes, cobblers, and for making jam. For most of us, frozen is also the only way to enjoy wild blueberries. Grown in Maine, Michigan and Canada, this intensely flavored fruit is an even better source than cultivated berries for the phytochemicals that make blueberries one of the best foods you can eat.For maximum nutritional benefit, the less blueberries are cooked, the better. This makes smoothies, muffins and pancakes among the best choices. I also like using frozen berries to make blueberry syrup, where the fruit is briefly cooked, and little sugar is needed.

Mustard greens are one clan in the immense, and immensely varied, brassica family of greens. About all this assortment of vegetables has in common, from a cooks standpoint, is their feisty flavor. Visually, and in texture, brassicas range from the pale white, crisp and sweet-tasting stems of bok choy to the ruffled and zingy leaves of wine-red Japanese mustard greens.Most of us associate mustard greens with Southern cooking, where the curly leaves of green mustard are stewed into submission, usually along with some part of a pig, and served up as a mess of greens with pot likker. Maybe it is because I am a Yankee, but for me, this tender mustard tastes better briefly wilted in a bit of oil or broth, then mixed into rice or served with beans. I also like it cut crosswise into strips and tossed to simmer in hot soup a few minutes before it is served. These short-cooking methods keep more of the greens true flavor, which I do enjoy. They also retain more of the considerable good nutrition in mustard greens, which includes vitamin C, beta-carotene, and calcium.If you prefer less aggressive-tasting greens, look in Asian markets for poetically named wrapped heart mustard, whose wide leaves, flaring from crunchy, ribbed stems, wrap into a head resembling a muscular romaine lettuce, and red-in-the-snow. This deceptively named mustard green has long, thin stems and bright green leaves. Although the Chinese usually use it to make what they call preserved cabbage, chopping it, then pickling it in salt, it is delicious braised in chicken broth, or added to a stir-fry.Mustard greens are more tender and far sweeter than kale, collards, or dandelion. They also cook faster than most other dark, leafy greens, including broccoli raab and Swiss chard. All mustard greens shrink enormously in cooking, so one pound may yield as little as a half cup of cooked greens. Try them in place of spinach. Baby mustard greens are often included in the elegant salad mix called mesclun, where they add just a nice amount of bite.

Q: Should I keep a food record to help me change my eating habits? A: An eating log is a great idea. Studies show that keeping track of behaviors makes a real difference in changing them. Some people realize they overeat or lack balance in their food choices, but remain unsure when, why, and how much they eat. Experts often recommend that people trying to lose weight record what they eat all day long, noting the time, portion sizes, location (for example, restaurant or home, at the kitchen table or on the sofa in front of the TV), how hungry they are on a 1 to 10 scale and whatever thoughts or emotions they have. All these notes yield crucial information about specific problem areas and give hints about what to change. Some people, however, already know what behavior they want to change and why. For them, a simpler record of what they eat in what portion sizes may be enough to chart their progress. A person could even find it effective to record eating related only to a particular behavior she or he is trying to change, like evening snacks or sodas. This kind of log can keep track of successes, like how many fruits and vegetables were eaten during the day, and foster a positive can-do attitude.

The importance of motivating our sedentary society to move more will grow in 2004. There are already signs and predictions that how we exercise is going to change as well.Many people think of exercise as a weight loss project. Yet studies suggest that if people who have a healthy weight remain inactive they are likely to gain more weight than those who become active. Regular exercise definitely promotes heart health. But in recent years exercise has become seen as a major step in lowering the risk of many health concerns, including diabetes and several types of cancer, like colon, kidney, uterine and postmenopausal breast cancers. The American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) recommends daily exercise as a full partner with healthy eating to lower cancer risk.The American Council on Exercise (ACE) claims that several changes in how we exercise will take place in the near future. The strongest trend involves efforts to develop efficient workouts that require less time. Recent government guidelines have repeated the long-held advice of AICR that an hour of physical activity each day is best for most people. However, it may be possible to obtain complete health benefits in less time. A recent study found that shorter, more intense workout programs had fewer dropouts and produced good muscle-building results. Research is needed to see if newer methods can produce all of the same benefits in less than an hour. Some fitness experts suggest interspersing brief periods of fast or hard exercise with moderate activities to shorten a workout. As long as people do not push themselves beyond the safety of their fitness level, this can effectively burn more calories in less time. Because both strength-training and aerobic exercise are important to overall fitness, some exercise specialists are developing ways to combine these two forms. Instead of 20 to 30 minutes of each type of exercise, a complete workout could take just 30 minutes.Exercise will increasingly aim for a holistic view of health  benefits for both the body and mind. Bits of yoga are already incorporated into a variety of different exercises, and this trend is expected to grow. Breathing, body awareness and posture will become more important. A stronger holistic emphasis should enhance exercises proven ability to reduce stress. ACE also predicts that technology will make various forms of telephone and Internet coaching more common. Coaching will address not only fitness and performance, but also wider concerns such as stress reduction, time management and nutrition. As independent coaches become more available, consumers will need to check qualifications more than ever. Alongside trained individuals, some without training will inevitably offer their services.For a financial advantage, employers and insurers may increasingly encourage, provide and partly pay for programs to promote healthy lifestyles. Treatment of long-term health problems, like diabetes, high blood pressure, heart disease and cancer that stem from overweight, lack of exercise and poor eating habits take a bigger and bigger chunk of health care dollars. Healthy living can be a money-saver.Finally, ACE predicts a return to sensible weight loss programs and nutrition as millions of Americans complete the latest round of restrictive diets without lasting success. People should see the benefits of sound advice, such as AICRs New American Plate, which emphasizes portion control and a wide variety of health-protective vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans.

Hundreds of newly available low-carb foods are actually making weight loss more difficult. Dieters are falling into the trap of thinking that low-carb foods automatically cause pounds to drop off. In grocery stores, they try to make sense of the variety of low-carb claims on packages. Many consumers have lost track of the basics of healthy eating, like portion control and balanced food choices. Whats more: Sometimes people even gain weight eating low-carb foods.Research news about insulin may be part of the problem. Insulin is a hormone that allows blood sugar to enter cells to be used for fuel, but it can also promote energy storage, according to a widely accepted theory. Changes in insulin levels may make it easier for the body to store more fat or to lose it. Low-carb foods appear to affect insulin levels less.But even if this theory about changing insulin levels is verified, energy balance is still the crucial factor in weight control. If you eat more calories than you burn up, your body has no choice but to store the extra as fat, regardless of whether those calories are carbohydrate, fat or protein.People who consume more calories in food and drink than they burn up need to become more active, reduce calorie consumption, or do both. Some people have grown accustomed to large servings of grain products: double- or triple-size bowls of cereal, bagels that are equivalent to four slices of bread, pasta platters that equal anywhere from four to eight standard half-cup servings. For these people, cutting back on carbohydrates is a smart weight loss strategy. But any consequent weight loss will be due to reducing excessive calorie consumption, not metabolic mysteries.Dont let food package claims deceive you. Grocery shelves are now filled with low carb muffins, protein bars, brownies and cheesecake. Package fronts might announce one or two grams of carb, but check the full nutrition label. For instance, a 2 gram carb protein bar could have 240 calories.You should be aware that no legal definition exists for the term low carb. Food companies use it at their own discretion. Food companies  not nutrition experts or government sources  have also generated terms like net carb or effective carb to promote new products.Many of these products use sugar alcohols (including sorbitol, mannitol and xylitol) instead of sugar. Because sugar alcohols are absorbed more slowly from the digestive tract than sugar, blood sugars do rise more slowly. However, some companies subtract the grams of sugar alcohols, along with the grams of dietary fiber, from the total carbohydrate count to get effective or net carbs. But sugar alcohols still bring all their calories along, no matter how slowly theyre absorbed. And its the total number of calories that affect fat storage. Besides, too much of sugar alcohols can cause uncomfortable gas and diarrhea.If you look at calorie balance, its clear that some foods on popular diets no-no lists make more health sense than low-carb diet foods. You have the potential to lose more weight with a snack of 80 calories from popcorn, grapes, apples or carrots, which are filling and supply important nutrients, than with 150 or 250 calories of low-carb diet foods. People mistakenly gobble multiple servings of low-carb products because theyre called diet food.If you want to lose weight, remember that successful weight loss comes with eating fewer calories, not fewer carbs. Long-term habits of regular exercise and eating only to satisfy hunger will help your results come sooner and endure.

The importance of eating at least three servings of whole grains is becoming clearer and more widely publicized. Research shows that whole grains do much more than help clean the digestive tract. Yet surveys suggest that Americans still eat no more than a single serving a day. Consumers seem unaware of the range of benefits whole grains offer and may have difficulty identifying them in stores. Price, familiarity and perceived palatability may also deter shoppers.A recently discovered benefit should help win wide acceptance. Research now points to whole grains as a part of sensible weight control. Women who ate more whole-grain foods weighed less and gained less weight over the course of a recent 12-year study than those who consumed less whole grains. Another study found that the average annual increase in waist measurements of white bread eaters was more than three times higher than that of healthy eaters, who ate more whole grains and other healthful foods. Whole grains may aid weight control by causing less elevation in the hormone insulin, which promotes fat storage. Furthermore, whole grains satisfy hunger for longer periods than refined grains do. The benefits extend far beyond weight control. Whole grains may improve your overall health. During a recent 11-year study, greater whole-grain consumption was linked with lower death and heart disease rates. In Norway, whole-grain consumption led to a 25 to 35 percent lower mortality rate, even after adjusting for the better eating and lifestyle habits of whole-grain eaters. In the U.S., men who ate one or more servings of whole-grain breakfast cereal had 17 percent fewer deaths than those who rarely or never ate them. The influence of weight, tobacco avoidance, exercise and other healthy habits was taken into consideration. Eating refined-grain cereals did not reduce risk. The death rate reduction associated with greater consumption of whole grains apparently comes from decreases in both heart disease and cancer rates. The protection against heart disease may stem from whole grains antioxidant vitamins and phytochemicals, fiber, trace minerals or other kinds of phytochemicals. The cancer protection may derive from the fermentation of fiber and certain starches inside whole grains in the colon. The fermented substances may block the cancer-promoting effects of bile acids. Other substances in whole grains may affect hormone levels and the risk of hormonally-related cancers. While there is no strong impact on breast cancer risk, whole grains are linked to 10 to 60 percent drops in endometrial (uterine) cancer and 37 to 40 percent drops in ovarian cancer. Unfortunately, many consumers dont seem aware of the significant differences between whole grains and refined grains. People looking for a whole-grain eating adventure can add bulgur, quinoa, kasha and other uncommon whole grains to their diet. But switching to higher-fiber whole grain cereals for breakfast or snacks is an easy, great idea. Whole grain pasta and quick-cooking brown rice are other good choices, readily available. Picking up whole-grain bread should be an automatic choice. Just remember to check the label, not the color of the bread.

A TRULY HEARTFELT MEALfrom theAmerican Institute for Cancer ResearchA salmon dinner is a good way to say I love you on Valentines Day, or any other day of the year, for that matter. A home-made meal is a gift both from the givers heart, and salmon is a gift for the recipients heart. And since February is National Heart Month, its particularly appropriate. For added measure, salmon is a pretty, heart-warming color for a Valentines dinner.Salmon is known for its abundance of omega-3 fats, the polyunsaturated fats that act in several ways to lower the risk of heart disease and promote a healthy immune system. Studies link consumption of one or two servings of fish each week with about a 30 percent drop in the risk of heart-related deaths. According to a study in the International Journal of Cancer, this practice could also help reduce the risk of various cancers 12 to 30 percent or more. Omega-3 fatty acids also have been linked to reduction of some autoimmune problems, such as rheumatoid arthritis.Fish high in omega-3s include salmon, white (albacore) tuna, mackerel, herring, rainbow trout and swordfish. You would need to eat three or four times as many servings of a lower-fat fish such as cod, haddock or catfish to get the same amount of omega-3s. Omega-3 fat also is contained in walnuts, flaxseed, and flaxseed and canola oils. Smaller levels of Omega-3 consumption also is thought to offer some health benefits.All fish are excellent sources of protein, vitamins and minerals. And all types of fish are lower in saturated fat than red meat, which is better for blood cholesterol levels and possibly better for protection from cancer. Fish are an excellent choice for healthy eating as long as you dont use a great deal of oil in the cooking, or smother them in a high-fat cream sauce or melted cheese. Some health experts recommend aiming for two servings of some type of fish each week. There have been warnings recently about mercury in salmon and pollutants in farmed salmon. Unless you are pregnant or breastfeeding, experts currently believe that two servings of salmon per week wont harm adults. (Choose wild salmon when you can get it even if it is frozen.) Research on these issues continues, but at this point, the benefits from salmons rich source of omega 3 outweigh any known risks to adults. The following recipe not only offers heart-healthy salmon but the flavorful herb rosemary, a symbol of remembrance.

Spray a broiler pan or a grill with the cooking spray. Preheat oven broiler or a grill.Mix the oil, lemon juice, salt, pepper, garlic and rosemary. Brush mixture on both sides of the fish. Place fish under the broiler or on the grill. Broil about 4 inches from the heat for 5 minutes per half-inch of thickness, or until fish is flaky in the middle. Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 230 calories, 15 g. total fat (3 g. saturated fat), less than 1 g. carbohydrate, 23 g. protein, 0 g. dietary fiber, 67 mg. sodium.

For more than two decades, Americans have opted for convenience in meal preparation. Theyve chosen to eat out, order out, take out and drive thru in order to preserve time for other activities or due to the fatigue other activities cause.

But recently those segments of the food industry that produce prepared meals have been heavily attacked for formulating, sizing and marketing products in ways that contribute to overweight and obesity, as well as chronic disease. Some major corporations have even pledged to reformulate and resize many of their products. Until that is accomplished, nutritionists at AICR recommend that people consider taking food preparation into their own hands.

In a brand new brochure, entitled Homemade for Health, AICR nutritionists lay out strategies for integrating meal preparation into todays busy schedules. It recommends involving the whole family, since food preparation should not be the responsibility of just one family member. Furthermore, children should learn through participation as well as precept how to prepare healthy meals, an activity that will involve them throughout their adult lives.

Set aside a convenient time for relaxed cooking, perhaps during the weekend or a weekday evening.Double or triple a recipe and cook it.Divide the finished item into individual serving-size portions and freeze them.On evenings when time or energy for cooking is scarce, defrost the right number of portions of your healthy, homemade meal in the microwave and serve.

Mothers busy carting kids to school and to after-school activities often say drive thru is their only recourse. Polk suggests that teaching children how to cook a healthy meal is as important as other late afternoon activities, since they will be responsible for feeding themselves throughout their adult lives.

Couples with two careers often say neither partner has time for kitchen duty. Polk says they should try the cooking-on-weekends-and-freezing strategy. They may come to regard food preparation as an enjoyable activity that they can share.

Other people say frankly that they want to relax when they get home, not cook and clean up in the kitchen. Polk suggests putting a small TV in the kitchen and cooking Wednesday nights dinner on Tuesday evening while watching your favorite sitcom.

Homemade for Health offers guidelines for healthy cooking as well as ten recipes that exemplify this style of food preparation. For instance, it advises cooking with a variety of vegetables and fruits. Ideally, 2/3 (or more) of your plate should be vegetables, fruit, whole grains or beans and 1/3 (or less) animal protein.

Use fats in moderation, and replace saturated fats with poly- and monounsaturated fats. That means using olive and canola oils for cooking instead of butter or shortening. Drizzle olive oil on bread or potatoes. Always use low-fat versions of your favorite dairy products.

Reduce each serving of meat to 4 ounces raw or 3 ounces cooked, and serve it with a fruit or vegetables sauce. Add vegetable sources of protein such as beans, lentils or nuts to your grain dishes, vegetables, stews, soups and salads.

Lastly, the brochure recommends finding the right portion size for you. Americans have grown accustomed to commercial products that are two or three times as large as USDA standard sizes. Reduce serving sizes until you find a portion that satisfies without supplying excess calories.

Make sauce by whisking together yogurt, hummus and oregano in a small bowl. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Set aside.Coat a grill or a ridged grill-pan with cooking spray. Heat until very hot. Put vegetables on skewers, one type of vegetable per skewer. In a bowl whisk together garlic, cumin, cinnamon, pepper flakes and oil. Add salt and pepper to taste. Transfer to a flat pan big enough to hold the skewered vegetables. Place vegetables in the pan, turning to coat all sides, using a pastry brush, if desired, to coat surfaces. Grill vegetables, turning occasionally, until tender, checking frequently. (Tomatoes will cook the fastest; the other vegetables will take varying amounts of time.) Remove each when done. Slide vegetables off skewers and into a bowl. Cover the bowl with plastic wrap for 10 minutes so vegetables release juices and soften. Meanwhile, heat pita bread until warm and soft.Tuck one-fourth of the vegetables into the pocket of each pita. Top with a quarter of the sauce and serve. Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 288 calories, 8 g. total fat (1 g. saturated fat), 46 g. carbohydrate, 9 g. protein, 4 g. dietary fiber, 373 mg. sodium.

LEMONS APPEAL, ZEST AND ALLBy Dana Jacobi for the American Institute for Cancer ResearchWe rarely eat a lemon or use the entire fruit in pies, chutneys, or salt-pickled as they are for North African dishes. Yet we use lemons all the time, often several times a day, to enliven both savory and sweet dishes, sauces, dressings and beverages. Mostly, we use the juice, and occasionally the aromatic, yellow outer layer of skin called the zest.A lemon is a lemon to Americans, since the two commercially grown varieties, Lisbon and Eureka, are almost indistinguishable. Dark yellow Meyer lemons, in season from November to March, are now becoming more available, as well. A cross between a lemon and an orange, their abundant juice is sweet enough to drink straight. It makes a killer lemonade.Fresh-squeezed lemon juice has a bright, sweet-tart taste. I highly recommend using it rather than bottled juice. To extract the most juice, microwave a lemon for 30 seconds, then roll it on the counter top, pressing down firmly. Using a reamer, a good-size lemon yields as much as four tablespoons of juice.Lemon peel has two layers, the top layer of golden zest, rich in the health-protective phytochemical called limonen and a spongy underlayer of white, bitter-tasting pith. I favor two methods for removing the first and avoiding the second. If possible, get a rasp. Chefs discovered that this wood-working tool zips zest off neatly, yields more and cleans up more easily than a grater or zester. Alternatively, use a vegetable peeler or sharp, thin paring knife to cut the zest away in strips. If any white clings to the underside, pin the peel on a flat surface, using your thumb at one end. Holding a paring knife so its blade is almost horizontal, gently slide the blade between the zest and pith, starting at the thumb-end and moving slowly down the strip. It doesnt matter if the strip tears, as you will probably be chopping it up anyway.

Grilled tandoori, puffed nan bread and creamy spinach saag are classic dishes from the north of India. Recently, though, thanks to our increasing interest in heat and spice, Americans are being attracted to the hotter food of southern India. Rather than the pounded blend of dry-roasted cinnamon sticks, cardamom, cloves and other spices called garam masala, cooking in southern India uses lots of hot chili peppers and whole mustard seeds. It also emphasizes vegetarian dishes and seafood more than the inland, meat-oriented cooking of the north.Southern India is the subcontinents tip, bordered by the Bay of Bengal on the east and the Arabian Sea on the west. Important southern Indian cities include Madras to the east, and the port of Cochin in the western state of Kerala. A fabled source of spices, like Malabar pepper, the Malabar Coast of Kerala was a magnet for ancient Phoenicians, Romans, Arabs and Marco Polo in 1294. Christopher Columbus was headed there rather than the Americas, where he eventually landed. Vasco de Gamma, the Portuguese explorer, reached Cochin in 1498 and is buried there.These foreign visitors brought foods that enriched the local cooking, particularly the tomatoes and chile peppers carried by the Portuguese from the New World. When Christians, Muslims, Parsees and Jews joined the local Hindus and stayed on, Kerala became an ethnic melting pot and a community of remarkable tolerance, a place where palcharcha is the custom of sharing celebratory dishes of your own faith with friends of other religions.At home, when you want to give shrimp or salmon sizzling Indian flavor, serve them with this chunky tomato chutney. Inspired by a recipe from Suvir Saran of Amma, a New York City restaurant, it is also splendid as an omelet filling, or served with cottage cheese.

Combine coriander, curry powder, paprika, cayenne pepper, pepper flakes, and turmeric in a small bowl and set aside.Halve tomatoes lengthwise. Scoop out and discard seeds and inner flesh. Cut each half into six pieces. Heat oil in a medium non-stick skillet over medium-high heat. Add mustard and cumin seeds. When mustard seeds begin to pop, 1 or 2 minutes, stir in dried spices. Add tomatoes, tomato paste, sugar and salt. Cook, stirring often to prevent sticking. When skin at the edges of some of the tomatoes curls, but they are all still firm and chunky, about 4 minutes, transfer the chutney into a bowl. Serve chutney warm (not hot), or at room temperature.Makes 2 cups, for 4 servings as a side dish or 8 as a condiment.Per condiment serving: 70 calories, 4 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 9 g. carbohydrate, 2 g. protein, 2 g. dietary fiber, 15 mg. sodium.

If you really believe in your ability to lose weight, will that make your attempt successful? More and more studies show that positive thinking is definitely part of successful changes in health habits, including weight loss.Many years of research have investigated how our thoughts and actions influence each other. One prominent concept in this area is self-efficacy. It refers to a persons belief in his or her ability to overcome barriers and perform a particular task. Studies show that people tend to pursue a goal or new behavior more diligently if they believe they can succeed. When people think a task exceeds their abilities, most will avoid it or give up easily when faced with obstacles. Keep in mind that self-efficacy is not the same as self-confidence or self-esteem. For example, someone can think that they are a good person and intelligent, but feel too uncoordinated for sports or too undisciplined to cut back on extra eating. That person has low feelings of self-efficacy for changing his or her sports involvement or refraining from unnecessary eating.Self-efficacy can predict a variety of health behaviors, including smoking cessation and balanced food choices. Previous studies show that those with a high belief in their ability to lose weight lost more and were more likely to stay in a program. Positive belief also correlates with exercise. A recent study compared two types of programs for obese, sedentary women: a traditional one and one that tried to change the way the women thought about activity. In the latter program, fewer women quit. In it, the womens degree of fitness, physical activity and self-efficacy was also affected significantly more.One of the latest studies focuses on self-efficacy and weight loss. Overweight college students were assigned to one of two different weight control programs: either a program meant to develop healthy eating patterns, or a similar one with added weekly activities designed to increase self-efficacy. After 12 weeks, those in the second group showed more nutritious eating habits and slightly better weight loss. The standard weight loss group averaged slightly less than a half-pound per week, while the self-efficacy group averaged three-fourths of a pound each week. The weight loss between the two study groups is not statistically significant. But over time the difference could be considerable  more than 10 pounds in a year.Although self-efficacy is important, clearly we have much to learn about how to change it. In this last study, even within the self-efficacy treatment group, participants showed wide ranges of improvement. Some barely changed, while others made major improvements. People with a history of failing, or who are repeatedly told by others or themselves that they will fail, probably have a much harder time developing positive feelings for success.Of course, simplistic optimism is not the goal. To change health habits, it is probably crucial to believe that you can learn to follow healthful eating and exercise patterns. The stress is on learning. Those who say they have a permanent personality fault or a goal that is too difficult may just give up. Those who realistically see challenges and still persevere may succeed best. For those who are ready and think they can change, reliable sources, like the American Institute for Cancer Research and government web sites, offer loads of good health information.

Do you need to lose weight? Then, turn off the television or computer an hour earlier and go to bed. Were sleeping too little, experts warn. Too much sitting instead of being active is clearly part of why overweight is now common. But studies suggest that a lack of sleep may make weight loss and weight control more of a challenge by altering our metabolism, as well as our eating and activity patterns.A little research has directly tested the idea that sleep deprivation leads to weight problems. For instance, in a Japanese study of six-and seven-year olds, children who slept nine to ten hours a night were compared to those who only slept eight to nine hours. The latter group was almost twice as likely to be overweight. Children sleeping less than eight hours a night were almost three times as likely to be overweight.Changes in hormone levels have been linked to sleep deprivation in several studies. One hormone, cortisol, regulates metabolism of sugar, protein, fat, minerals and water. Physical or emotional stress raises cortisol levels. Lack of sleep may also raise levels at certain times of the day. Second, higher levels of insulin  a condition known as insulin resistance  have also been linked to a shortage of sleep in several studies. Excess cortisol could be the link. Since insulin not only controls blood sugar, but also promotes fat storage, extra insulin makes weight loss more difficult. Further research needs to validate the hormonal changes observed. But even without any hormonal impact, sleep deprivation can promote weight gain by affecting our behavior.When people low on sleep find their energy dropping throughout the day, many turn to food for a pickup. The short-term rise in blood sugar gives a more energetic feeling, but often the extra calories are not needed by the body and must be stored as body fat. Furthermore, the most appealing foods when we feel low on energy are often sweets or refined carbohydrates with low nutrient density. If sleep deprivation causes insulin resistance, overconsuming these types of carbohydrates may be especially problematic.Not only is it easy to take in excess calories when sleep deprived. For many people, calorie burning decreases. If your extra waking hours are spent in sedentary activities at a desk or computer or in front of the TV, you're not burning many more calories than when asleep. And when sleep deprived, people are often too tired to exercise. Or if they do manage to exercise, they work out less intensely than usual. For example, a rested person may walk two miles in a half-hour, while someone more fatigued may go much less. The tired person would burn fewer calories, despite walking just as long.Sleep experts recommend at least eight hours of sleep a night for most adults. Yet Americans average just under seven hours during the workweek, according to the National Sleep Foundation. In fact, a third of adults reportedly sleep no more than six-and-a-half hours nightly.Shutting off the TV an hour earlier means an hour less munching time. It could also shift your metabolism to make weight control easier. It could even leave you with more energy to exercise. Definitely, these are propositions to sleep on.

TRAVELING NEAR AND FAR FOR SOfrom theAmerican Institute for Cancer ResearchJanuary is the time to stay in, sit in front of the fire and enjoy a bowl of steaming soup. You can do all this and travel to distant places from your armchair just by flipping through a cookbook.A good stop this time of year would be Southeast Asia. Vietnam has a complex, sophisticated cuisine influenced by Chinese cooking techniques, French influences and Indian spices. One of the most common Vietnamese dishes served at any time of the day is called pho. It is made of a rich but lean broth, rice noodles and lean beef or chicken. Pho is a great flu-season comfort food, but its also fun to serve at an informal winter dinner party. Give each guest a large soup bowl filled with the pho, noodles and meat, or put a soup tureen in the center of the table, and let everyone help themselves.Each person can then choose toppings from bowls of bean sprouts, fresh herbs and lime. Chili flakes or hot sauce is customary for those who want a little more heat, as is a bottle of fish sauce, for a dash that adds a certain authentic zing.Mint, a slightly different version from ours, is traditional with pho, as is cilantro. Asian varieties of basil are also good with pho. They are available in Asian markets and some supermarkets.Pho is usually made with a rich but lean beef or chicken stock. This quick version uses sliced roast beef from the supermarket deli counter and canned beef broth.Special seasonings, like fish sauce (nuoc nam in Vietnamese, nam pla in Thai) and five-spice powder, are usually found in the Asian section of local supermarkets (five-spice powder may be in the spice section), or at Asian or other specialty food markets.

When shopping for cauliflower, look for a firm head with compact florets that have no brown spots. The leaves should be crisp and green and not yellowing. The size of the head doesn't affect the quality.Cauliflower is made up of bunches of tiny florets. While most cauliflower is white, some may have a purple or greenish tinge. The entire floret portion is edible. The green leaves at the base also can be eaten, but take longer to cook and have a stronger flavor than the florets.Separate cauliflower head into florets and wash. Adding lemon juice or milk to the cooking water will prevent discoloration. It is preferable to steam cauliflower rather than boiling it. In boiling, the vegetable may retain too much water and become mushy.

Just before baking, sprinkle remaining cheese evenly over top of bread pudding. Bake, uncovered, in a preheated oven at 350 degrees until bread pudding puffs and top is golden brown, about 40 minutes.

The American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) is the only major cancer charity focusing exclusively on the link between diet, nutrition and cancer. The Institute supports innovative research in cancer prevention and treatment and has provided more than $65 million in research funds. Information about reducing the risk of cancer, plus recipes for healthful dishes, can be found at AICRs website: www.aicr.org.

A DASHing Discoveryby the American Institute for Cancer Research Eating a diet rich in vegetables and fruits can do more than reduce your risk of cancer. It can also significantly lower high blood pressure, which affects 1 in 4 Americans. Although less frightening than cancer, high blood pressure can decrease a persons expected life span by about 10 years. This good news about diet comes from clinical studies of the Dietary Approaches to Stop Hypertension (DASH) eating plan, developed through the National Heart, Lung and Blood Institute. A recent study found that people could successfully adopt this high vegetable and fruit diet and other healthy habits all at the same time with counseling. Step-by-step change wasnt necessary.The DASH eating plan is similar to long-standing recommendations for cancer prevention from the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR). Both emphasize vegetables, fruits and whole grains. Both are low in saturated fat, cholesterol and total fat. The major difference is the degree of detail. While AICR advises people to eat a mostly plant-based diet, the DASH eating plan outlines actual servings for different food groups. The DASH eating plan outlined here is for a person who needs 2,000 calories a day. Servings refer to USDA standard serving sizes.

It should be noted that AICRs Dietary Guidelines differ in regard to meat. Cancer experts suggest keeping your daily intake of red meat, including pork, to one 3 oz. serving or less. Research indicates that red meat raises cancer risk. Poultry and fish are preferable choices. Besides this minor difference, other lifestyle changes recommended to control or prevent high blood pressure repeat more of AICRs guidelines to reduce cancer risk. They include: maintaining a healthy weight, being physically active, eating food low in salt, limiting alcohol or not drinking it at all and never smoking.

For the earliest British settlers, desserts meant hearty puddings, porridge-like concoctions of flour and milk, usually sweetened with molasses or maple sugar, and flavored with spices. Wheat, sugar and spices, however, were in short supply in colonial America, having to be shipped in from England. Food historians believe the early settlers made do with native corn, which was far more plentiful than wheat, to make their favorite puddings. The first colonial holiday feasts are thought to have included a cornmeal-based pudding adapted from the Narragansett Indians. Eventually, this desert came to be called Indian Pudding.Indian Pudding was originally made with milk, molasses and, when available, cinnamon and nutmeg. For special occasions, eggs, raisins and diced apples might be added. In New England, where it is still popular, Indian Pudding was traditionally served on Saturday nights.

In a medium saucepan over medium-low heat, heat milk with salt until small bubbles appear along sides. (Dont let milk get too hot or boil. Scalding takes place just below the boiling point, which is 212 degrees.) Gradually stir in cornmeal. Cook over low heat, stirring constantly, until mixture is thick like cooked cereal, about 5-10 minutes. Remove from heat and cool to lukewarm. When cornmeal mixture is nearly cooled down to lukewarm, preheat oven to 350 degrees. Using canola oil spray, coat insides of 6 single-serving baking cups or ramekins, or an 8-inch baking dish and set aside.In a medium bowl, whisk together egg, molasses, sugar and spices until well blended. Gradually, a little at a time, whisk egg mixture into cornmeal mixture. Pour mixture into prepared cups, ramekins, or baking dish. Bake until almost set (Pudding continues to set after it is taken out of the oven.) If cups or ramekins are used, check every 10 minutes or so to monitor how quickly the pudding sets. If a baking dish is used, baking time is about 1 hour.Remove from oven and allow pudding to cool slightly before serving. To serve from a baking dish, use a sharp paring knife to cut into portions and flexible metal spatulas to lift each portion out and onto individual plates. (Puddings baked in individual cups or ramekins can be served in the containers.)Serve warm with cider sauce, if desired.Makes 6 servings.Per serving: 174 calories, 4 g. fat (2 g. saturated fat), 28 g. carbohydrate, 7 g. protein, less than 1 g. dietary fiber, 286 mg. sodium.

In a separate, large bowl, whisk together molasses, applesauce, oil and egg until well blended. Add dry ingredients and stir until well blended. Whisk in boiling water. Pour batter into baking pan. Bake until cake begins to pull away from pan and tester inserted near center comes out clean, about 35 minutes. Transfer to a baking rack and cool in pan 30 minutes. Invert cake onto a platter and cool to lukewarm warm, about 15 minutes.Cut into squares and serve warm or at room temperature, with cider sauce, if desired.Makes 10 servings.Per serving: 134 calories, 5 g. fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 22 g. carbohydrate, 1 g. protein, less than 1 g. dietary fiber, 162 mg. sodium.

The Glycemic Index is a ranking of how specific carbohydrate-containing foods, when eaten alone, affect the blood sugar levels of a small group of test subjects. The Index was conceived as an attempt to help diabetics gauge their dietary intake. However, over 20 years after the Index was developed, the American Diabetes Association remains unsure that the Index is a practical guide for individuals to follow.

Today the AICR experts went further, saying that because of several inherent limitations in the way the Glycemic Index is conceived, it does not fully address the complexity of a persons diet. Because of this, its relation to weight management remains unproven.

Specifically, the experts noted that by using a scale of 0 to 100 to rank different foods, the Glycemic Index makes relatively minor differences in rates of digestion appear much more significant than they actually are. But the AICR experts arent just focused on the methodology behind the Glycemic Index  in fact, theyre more worried about the way these diets have touched off a fundamental shift in the way Americans approach diet and health.

The AICR experts say that effective and long-term weight management grows out of a healthy change in lifestyle, not a brief commitment to eating only certain foods because of where they rank on a theoretical chart.

But many Americans are daunted by such a commitment to long-term change, and find the quick-fix promises of Glycemic Index diets appealing. Another reason the Glycemic Index has taken hold, despite its questionable applicability to the world outside of the clinic, is that it seems to explain something many Americans already believe: foods high in fat and protein fill you up more than pasta, bread and salad.

And despite the tendency of many diets based on the Glycemic Index to shunt vegetables and fruits to the side, these foods contain fiber that promotes fullness without the excess calories found in animal fat, and belong at the center of weight-management efforts. Recent studies at the University of Pennsylvania show that people who added a large, low-calorie green salad at the start of a meal actually lowered the number of total calories they ate during the meal  and felt just as full.

The AICR experts said that a simple way to ensure a filling, healthy meal without excess calories is to look at the proportion of food on the plate. Aim for meals composed of 2/3 or more vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans and 1/3 or less animal protein (meat, eggs, cheese)  this will provide filling fiber and long-lasting energy at a substantially reduced calorie cost.

The Glycemic Index ranks carbohydrate-containing foods by how quickly they elevate blood sugar levels. It is measured by comparing the increase in blood sugar after eating 50 grams of carbohydrate from a single food to the increase in blood sugar that occurs after eating 50 grams of carbohydrate from a reference food, either glucose or white bread.

Proponents of the Glycemic Index argue that foods that raise blood sugar quickly  foods that have a high GI ranking  stimulate hunger, increase enzymes that promote the storage of fat and reduce the bodys ability to burn fat.

Critics of the Glycemic Index maintain that it is only a reference tool, and as such has several limitations that cannot account for the kind of complexities that occur outside of a laboratory environment.

The GI of a food is based upon an arbitrary amount of carbohydrate (50 grams) that may or may not correspond to the amount of food that is typically eaten. Attempts to correct for this built-in abstraction (by calculating the glycemic load) only serve to magnify the abstraction even further.

There is still disagreement about how to calculate the Glycemic Index in the first place. Basic questions about the method of calculation, timing of blood sugar testing, and whether to use glucose or white bread as a reference food  along with a host of other factors  still need to be resolved. For a more in-depth look at the Glycemic Index, including citations of studies that have investigated its use, go to www.aicr.org/press.

As long as your doctor doesnt tell you to lose weight, does that mean your weight is in the healthy range? While it may be a tempting assumption, several studies show that physicians dont discuss weight loss with 25 to 50 percent of their overweight patients. Many people might think their doctors will speak up if their weight becomes a problem, but many physicians assume that if patients want advice, theyll ask.Before the 1998 guidelines of the National Institutes of Health (NIH), which urged physicians to address the growing obesity problem, studies in the Journal of the American Medical Association and the Archives of Family Medicine showed that 35 to 42 percent of obese patients reported that a health care provider advised them to lose weight. Even among those with weight-related health problems, only slightly over half were advised to lose weight.In a more recent study, 50 percent of overweight or obese patients with diabetes were counseled about weight loss on routine medical visits. Among those without diabetes, however, physicians counseled only 21 percent about weight loss. Unfortunately, the methods used in this study dont tell us whether patients who said they received no counseling from their physician counted referrals to a registered dietitian or fitness trainer. Another new study gives a more positive picture: 80 percent of obese patients said their physician advised them to lose weight, and almost 70 percent received counseling on diet change or exercise. Attention to weight control as an important part of health may be increasing, but still, you cant assume theres no problem just because your doctor hasnt mentioned your weight.A similar situation exists for those who are still couch potatoes despite recommendations from the American Institute for Cancer Research and other experts about the health benefits of regular exercise. In earlier studies, 11 to 34 percent of patients reported being advised to begin or continue exercise, but more current studies suggest that group may have increased to about 60 percent. However, studies show that advice is often saved for middle-aged, more educated people who already have heart disease or diabetes; physicians seem less likely to discuss exercise as a preventive health measure.Physicians are not totally to blame for this lack of attention to weight control and regular exercise. Only in the past few years have insurance and government groups begun to recognize obesity as a medical problem and a covered medical expense. Since our medical system is often geared to caring for illness, it makes sense that more attention is given to obesity in people with medical problems affected by weight, such as heart disease and diabetes. Although weight control has been shown to help prevent these illnesses, as well as cancer and high blood pressure, it does not seem to have gained the status of smoking cessation as part of routine medical exams and preventive care.Physician-patient communication problems may also play a role. Overweight and obese are medical terms with specific definitions that describe different degrees of excess body fat. A new survey in Obesity Research indicates that many patients medically diagnosed as obese find terms like obesity and fatness hurtful and offensive. According to this survey, weight is the preferred term (presumably sounding more objective and less judgmental). The author of this survey commented that obese individuals dont bring up weight because they are embarrassed, and doctors dont bring it up for fear of hurting feelings or because they feel weight control efforts are futile.

A lack of vitamin D  thought to be a problem of a bygone era  is showing up in growing numbers of women, children and the elderly, increasing the risk of bone disease and possibly other health problems. Exposing only the face, hands and forearms to sunlight for 10 to 30 minutes, just two or three days a week, can usually produce all the vitamin D we need. Longer exposure doesnt produce more of this vitamin. Yet today, many peoples lifestyles and locations do not allow them to produce enough, making dietary sources vital.Many Americans have low blood levels of vitamin D, which might be caused by one of many reasons. For example, the dark skin of African-Americans tends to form active vitamin D in response to sunlight more slowly than does skin with less pigment. A lack of vitamin D is also common among the elderly, especially those who are institutionalized or homebound. Other reasons include low consumption of milk or breakfast cereal, no intake of vitamin supplements, seasonal changes and urban location.Vitamin D helps our bodies absorb calcium from food and also plays a vital role in the constant remodeling of our bones. Calcium cant be used properly for bone formation when children lack vitamin D, leading to skeletal deformities in the condition called rickets. Inadequate vitamin D isnt as obvious in adults, but bone weakening can be significant. In one study of women with osteoporosis, those who consumed the most vitamin D from food and supplements developed 37 percent fewer hip fractures than did women who consumed the least. Other studies show that raising inadequate vitamin D intake can increase bone density, but results are not completely consistent.Some studies link adequate calcium and vitamin D intake with a lower risk of colon cancer. At the American Institute for Cancer Researchs most recent conference on nutrition and cancer research, scientists discussed several mechanisms by which the active form of vitamin D seems to block the formation and growth of colon cancer cells. Experts recommend different amounts of vitamin D for people of different ages, since the formation of vitamin D in the skin and activation in the kidney decreases after age 50. For adults 19 to 50, the official recommendation is for 5 mcg (micrograms; equal to 200 IU) of vitamin D daily. From age 51 to 69, that increases to 10 mcg (400 IU), and from age 70 onward, increases again to 15 mcg (600 IU).Two eight-ounce glasses of milk supply the 200 IU of vitamin D recommended for young adults; older adults need four to six glasses if milk is their only source of vitamin D. Yogurt and cheese provide calcium, but they are not fortified with vitamin D. The primary food sources of vitamin D are milk (including soymilk, if its fortified), fortified breakfast cereals, naturally high-fat fish (such as salmon and mackerel) and egg yolks. Excessive amounts of vitamin D can raise blood levels of calcium high enough to cause changes in heart rhythm and kidney damage. But such levels could generally only be reached by overdoing on supplements or cod liver oil. While we aim for 200 to 600 IU, some researchers suggest that elderly people with low blood levels, people who are not exposed to sunlight, people with intestinal diseases that keep them from absorbing fat properly, and people on chronic steroid medications may need even higher amounts. But even somewhat higher goals can be achieved without exceeding the 2000 IU (50 mcg) maximum set as the upper limit of safety.

Research continues to link tea with lowered risk of several types of cancer, yet many questions remain unanswered. Studies have identified several pathways through which substances in tea can fight cancer development. And several population studies link tea consumption with lower cancer risk. But many specific details remain unknown.A new report in the Journal of Nutrition identifies many different types of studies that show how tea could help in the prevention of cancer. Laboratory research with human cancer cells show that a natural phytochemical in tea, called EGCG, can block several enzymes necessary for these cells to reproduce and flourish. But many of these experiments have involved concentrations of EGCG higher than those found in human tea drinkers, so its difficult to know how much this benefit we can actually experience from tea. Further laboratory studies show that EGCG and other polyphenol substances in tea are strong antioxidants. Antioxidants prevent and repair DNA damage that could otherwise lead to cancer, and also help to protect our heart and blood vessels. Animal studies have consistently shown that tea and polyphenols in tea can inhibit cell damage linked with cancers of the skin, lung, colon, liver and pancreas. Scientists say that we now need research that includes good markers of oxidation damage in animals and humans, to further identify the effectiveness of antioxidants from green and black tea.Many (but not all) human studies show important increases in antioxidant capacity with the consumption of one to six cups of tea per day. This research suggests greater antioxidant potential in the blood after drinking green or black tea better protects our cells DNA, but again, scientists say we need better studies that can clearly measure such damage.Teas potential protection against colon cancer may not be surprising, since its antioxidants would be closely available to protect digestive tract cells. Yet another report in the Journal of Nutrition examines 30 different studies of tea consumption in 12 countries. It concludes that support for tea as a strong anti-cancer influence is not consistent. One of the problems encountered in looking at large populations is that its not always easy to tell whether the effects we see are really due to tea. For example, in some studies, people who drink tea may also eat more vegetables and fruits, or exercise more regularly.A new study of the potential link of green tea consumption with lower risk of breast cancer does suggest a protective benefit. Asian-American women who averaged at least three six-ounce cups of green tea per week were about half as likely to develop breast cancer as those who drank none. One of the strengths of this study is that researchers statistically adjusted for the effects of many other influences on breast cancer risk, such as family history, smoking, exercise, body size, menstrual and childbearing history, and even consumption of soy and dark green vegetables. Adjusting for these influences reduces the chance that the protection seen was really due to some other factor. But it is possible, for example, that these Asian-American women who drank green tea more often also followed traditional Asian diets with less meat and more fish, or made other lifestyle choices that offered protection.Many consumers also wonder whether they need to drink green tea to get health benefits. Green tea is higher in antioxidants than black tea. Some population studies have shown green tea consumption most strongly linked with lower cancer or DNA damage, but others have shown no significant difference in impact.

Preheat oven to 375 degrees. Coat a casserole dish with canola oil spray and set aside. In a large mixing bowl, place the parsnips, sweet potatoes and apples and set aside. In a microwave-proof bowl, mix together the canola oil and honey. Place in a microwave and warm for 10 seconds. Mix in balsamic vinegar. Pour onto vegetables and apples. Toss to coat well. Transfer to casserole dish, cover and bake until tender, about 1 hour.Makes 6 servings. Per serving: 116 calories, 3 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 24 g. carbohydrates, 1 g. protein, 4 g. dietary fiber, 91 mg. sodium.

DRESS UP BRUSSELS SPROUTS FOR THE HOLIDAYSfrom theAmerican Institute for Cancer ResearchThe holiday season is a good time to make Brussels sprouts festive looking. With a little red bell pepper, for example, you can have Christmas on a plate.Brussels sprouts are said to have been cultivated in 16th century Belgium hence the name. They are part of the cabbage family and look just like tiny cabbage heads. They can make attractive table decorations as well as tasty dishes. Sprouts vary in size, but the smallest are the most tender and delicately flavored. They are available from late August through March. Buy sprouts that are bright green and have tightly compact heads. They may be refrigerated unwashed in an airtight plastic bag for up to three days. After that, their flavor gets too strong.When properly cooked, Brussels sprouts are tender but not soft. Before cooking, trim the stem end and remove the outer leaves and any other leaves that are discolored or full of holes. Cutting a shallow X into the stem will help speed cooking the interior without overcooking the rest. Gentle cooking techniques, such as steaming and braising, usually prevent the sometimes off-putting strong flavor Brussels sprouts can develop.Like their cabbage cousin, Brussels sprouts are cruciferous vegetables an important part of a healthful diet. Scientists believe that cruciferous vegetables contain natural phytochemicals that can alter cancer-related enzymes, reducing the damage caused by carcinogens. Although broccoli has received most of the publicity for this research, the entire cruciferous family including cauliflower, kale, chard, bok choy, collards and radishes contains related substances. Cruciferous vegetables also are full of calcium, beta carotene, vitamin C and lutein, which is associated with a reduced risk of liver cancer as well as age-related macular degeneration, a leading cause of blindness in people over 65.To give this red-and-green dish an even more Christmassy look, serve the sprouts in a shallow dish lined with the leaves of red cabbage or red Swiss chard.

Steam the Brussels sprouts just until tender, either on top of the stove or in a microwave at medium power. While the sprouts are cooking, whisk together the olive oil with the vinegar and garlic. Set the dressing aside. When the sprouts are done, drain them well and place in a shallow serving bowl. Re-blend dressing and drizzle over sprouts. Sprinkle top of sprouts with the red pepper and parsley. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Serve hot.Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 98 calories, 7 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 8 g. carbohydrate, 2 g. protein, 2 g. dietary fiber, 195 mg. sodium.

In a large saucepan, heat the canola oil over medium-high heat. Saut? the shallots for about 4 minutes until the shallots are translucent and soft. Add the chestnuts, potato and broth. Add the thyme and cook for about 40 minutes, partially covered, until the potatoes and chestnuts are very soft. Transfer soup to a blender and puree. Return to the saucepan and add the milk. Heat through over medium heat. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Ladle into in individual bowls and garnish with pecans, if desired. This soup keeps for up to 3 days in the refrigerator. (Once refrigerated, soup becomes very thick. To achieve the consistency of a creamy soup, add equal amounts of milk and water, or broth.)Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 205 calories, 5 g. total fat (1 g. saturated fat), 36 g. carbohydrate, 6 g. protein, 5 g. dietary fiber, 419 mg. sodium.

Rinse buckwheat and drain it in a strainer. In a medium saucepan, heat oil over medium-high heat. Stir in buckwheat. Cook, stirring with a spoon until fragrant, 2 to 3 minutes. If kasha sticks, scrape bottom of pot firmly. Off the heat, pour in broth. Return pot to heat, cover, and cook over medium-low heat until kasha is fluffy, 10 to 15 minutes. Remove from heat, let sit, covered, for 10 minutes. Turn kasha into a mixing bowl, fluffing it with a fork.Stir scallions, red pepper, and parsley into the warm kasha. In a small bowl, whisk lemon juice and vinegar with salt and pepper, until the salt dissolves. Whisk in the oil. Pour over the kasha, mixing with a fork until the salad is evenly coated. Set aside for 1 hour to allow flavors to meld, or cover and refrigerate it up to 24 hours. Let chilled salad come to room temperature before serving.Makes 10 servings.Per serving: 92 calories, 3 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 14 g. carbohydrate, 3 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 239 mg. sodium.

Cook rice in 1 1/2 cups water until completely tender throughout the kernel, about 1 hour or more. Drain rice in colander and let sit until it is dry to the touch, about 15 minutes. Place warm rice in a mixing bowl.Using paper towels, squeeze as much moisture as possible from potato, a handful at a time and transfer to the bowl with the rice. With a fork, mix in the egg and scallions. Sprinkle with flour and mix in. Add salt and pepper to taste.Coat a large skillet with cooking spray until well coated. Place over medium-high heat. Place walnut-sized spoonfuls of the mixture in the pan, one at a time, pressing each firmly with the back of a fork to make thin, 2-inch pancakes with lacy edges. Space latkes 2 inches apart. When lightly browned on the bottom, 2 to 3 minutes, gently turn latkes and brown on the other side, about 2 minutes. When done, transfer to a warm plate and keep warm. Repeat with remaining mixture, re-spraying pan before adding more pancakes.Serve immediately. If desired, arrange thin strips of smoked salmon on each pancake, forming an x, and dab with low-fat sour cream; or, top them with a dollop of sour cream and a dab of lumpfish caviar. Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 179 calories, 4 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 32 g. carbohydrate, 5 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 315 mg. sodium.

Work has officially begun on the production of the 2nd WCRF/AICR Expert Report, Cannon said. Due in 2006, the report will evaluate the many thousands of published, peer-reviewed scientific studies that have investigated how factors related to food, nutrition and physical activity affect the chances of developing cancer.

The WCRF/AICR Expert Panel has adopted a portfolio approach to the science, Cannon said. Essentially, a portfolio approach endeavors to consider evidence from different kinds of scientific studies without favoring one type over another.

In so doing, it differs from other methods that have been used in the past to evaluate scientific data. Such methods consider evidence from randomized controlled trials (RCTs) to be the gold standard that supersedes evidence from other study types.

The decision to employ a portfolio approach in the 2nd Expert Report, Cannon said, was dictated by the need to address questions about overall diet and cancer development that short-term clinical studies like RCTs are simply not designed to answer.

RCTs are generally short-term interventions, lasting anywhere from a few days to as long as five years. But cancer is a disease that develops slowly, over many years and even decades. Also, RCTs that involve dietary factors typically administer isolated food substances at doses considerably higher than would be found in the diet.

A review of the above epidemiological evidence might be enough to suggest that certain diet and lifestyle factors are associated with cancer risk. But the 2nd WCRF/AICR Expert Report will also seek to pinpoint those specific aspects of diet and physical activity that exert a direct influence over the cancer process.

When evidence from all of these different kinds of studies is weighed together in a systematic way, a fuller understanding of the connections between diet (including nutrition, physical activity and weight management) and cancer will develop. The goal of the 2nd WCRF/AICR Expert Panel Report is to objectively determine what the preponderance of evidence dictates about food, nutrition, physical activity and the prevention of cancer.

Ginger Spice BiscottiCanola oil spray11/4 cups unbleached, all-purpose flour1 cup whole-wheat flour or whole-wheat pastry flour4 tsp. ground ginger1 tsp. cinnamon11/2 tsp. baking powder1/4 tsp. allspice1/4 tsp. salt2 large eggs1/3 cup canola oil1/4 cup unsweetened apple butter or applesauce1/2 cup packed dark brown sugar1/2 cup dried cranberries, chopped dried pineapple or other dried fruitPreheat oven to 325 degrees. Spray large cookie sheet with canola oil spray and set aside. In medium bowl, mix next 7 ingredients and set aside. Using electric mixer or food processor, combine eggs with oil and apple butter for 10 seconds. Add sugar and blend for 30 more seconds. Add half of dry mixture and process until smooth. Add remaining dry mixture and process until a soft and sticky dough forms. Transfer dough to large bowl; fold in dried fruit. Divide dough in half and place on either end of cookie sheet. With damp hands, form each piece of dough into a log 3 inches wide and about 3/4-inch high. Bake 25-30 minutes, or until firm to the touch. Logs will spread during baking. Remove from oven and cool 10 minutes. With serrated knife, slice each log into 1/2-inch cookies, cutting on diagonal. Bake 10 minutes. Turn each cookie over and bake 10 more minutes. Turn oven off and leave biscotti in oven for 10 minutes. Remove from oven and cool on wire rack. Store at room temperature. Makes 40. Per cookie: 60 calories, 2 g total fat (<1 g saturated fat), 10 g carbohydrates, 1 g protein, <1 g dietary fiber, 36 mg sodium.

Place mayonnaise, garlic, miso, sugar, and wasabi in blender or mini-food processor. Add carrot juice, vinegar, and sesame oil. Whirl until dressing is smooth. (If you do not have a blender or food processor, cream miso into carrot juice in a small bowl using the back of a spoon to combine them.)Squeeze grated daikon in your hand, making a fist to extract as much moisture as possible. Add daikon to dressing, and blend in well. (For optimum taste, the dressing should be made about an hour before using so that the flavors of the wasabi and daikon have sufficient time to develop and meld with the other ingredients.) Transfer dressing to a jar or small bottle with tight-fitting lid. Just before adding dressing to the salad, shake vigorously to combine dressing.Divide greens among four salad plates. Arrange one-quarter of carrots on top of greens. Arrange 4 tomato wedges around the greens, like points of star. Drizzle one-quarter of the dressing over each salad, and serve immediately.Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 96 calories, 6 g. total fat (<1 g. saturated fat), 10 g. carbohydrate, 2 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 310 g. sodium.

Cut off hard end at bottom of each Brussels sprout. With your fingers, pull off one or two layers of outer leaves and discard. Small Brussels sprouts can remain whole but large ones should be cut in half lengthwise.Heat oil in a medium non-stick skillet over medium-high heat. Saut? garlic until lightly colored on both sides, turning pieces once, about 1 minute in all. Remove garlic from pan and set aside. Add Brussels sprouts to pan, stirring with wooden spoon until they are bright green, 1-2 minutes. Pour in broth. Return garlic to pan. Add pepper flakes, if using. Reduce heat to simmer, cover and gently simmer just until Brussels sprouts are tender, about 6 minutes. Season Brussels sprouts to taste with salt and pepper, and serve.Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 52 calories, 2 g. total fat (<1 g. saturated fat), 7 g. carbohydrate, 3 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 90 g. sodium.

It is almost the day after Thanksgiving. By Friday, you will have a refrigerator loaded with leftovers, your favorite dish will be gone, and you may wish you had bought a larger bird. Regardless, it is time to think about eating enjoyably during the entire holiday weekend while getting meals back into healthy balance.This means making sure plenty of fruit, vegetables, whole grains and beans accompany those delicious, sinful leftovers. And please dont bother pointing out the apples in leftover pie, the marshmallow-topped pureed yams, and the creamy green bean casserole. These are good choices, and they should be enjoyed, but I mean making sure fiber-rich beans, simple steamed vegetables, cooked barley or brown rice, and fresh, unsweetened fruit accompany those leftovers.Sandwiches are a great way of turning Thanksgiving leftovers into a healthy meal. I think turkey, especially white meat, tastes better on toasted whole grain bread, especially when topped with thick tomato slices. In place of lettuce, use a handful of raw spinach leaves. Then, reduce the fat in low-fat mayo (so much better-tasting than the fat-free kind) by mixing it fifty-fifty with mustard, and slather it on. If your bird came out a bit dry this year, adding some juicy veggies will more than compensate. For side dishes, think casserole and soup. Mix cooked brown rice or a can of white beans into your green bean casserole. Discard the marshmallow topping, please, and mix a can of black beans, corn, and some chipotle salsa into the yams. This spicy-sweet blend could become a new family favorite. Or make a chunky soup by adding chicken broth, diced turkey, corn and cut frozen green beans to the creamed onions. (Dark meat leftovers are particularly good here.)Finally, salads like this one are a great way of turning leftovers into healthy, new dishes.

In mixing bowl, combine turkey, apple, cranberries, and pecans. Add orange sections. Set aside.In small bowl, whisk together yogurt, mayonnaise and mustard. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Drizzle dressing over turkey mixture while using a fork, to gently mix in. Arrange two lettuce leaves on each of four salad plates. Mound one-quarter of salad on top of lettuce, and serve immediately, accompanied by whole-grain crackers, if desired.Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 203 calories, 6 g. total fat (1 g. saturated fat), 20 g. carbohydrate, 19 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 391 g. sodium.

For decades, alcohol has been linked to breast cancer risk. Yet many women wonder just how big a risk alcohol actually represents. Recently, a major review in the British Journal of Cancer examined 53 studies and provided an answer: as daily consumption of alcohol rises, a womans risk of breast cancer does indeed steadily increase. That doesnt mean, however, that an occasional drink is enough to push your luck. According to the review, a woman who consumes no alcohol at all has an 8.8 percent chance of developing breast cancer before she reaches 80. A woman who drinks one alcoholic drink daily faces a 9.4 percent chance of doing so. Two drinks a day raise the odds to 10.1 percent, and four drinks a day raise her chances to 11.6 percent.These figures are a bit deceptive because alcohol does not pose equal risks for all women. Its effects may vary with the quality of a womans diet. For example, several studies show that women who dont get enough folate  a B vitamin found in dark, leafy greens and other plant foods that is essential for repair of damaged DNA  are at greater risk. This makes sense, because one of the ways alcohol is believed to increase cancer risk is by damaging our DNA. Genetic changes can also affect a womans susceptibility to damage from alcohol. All of us, for example, possess a gene for producing a specific enzyme that detoxifies potential carcinogens before they can damage our DNA. But some of us have an abnormal form of this gene that doesnt produce the enzyme; women with this abnormal gene experience nearly double the risk of post-menopausal breast cancer. And if women possessing this genetic variation drink fairly regularly  say, an average of 13 alcoholic drinks per week for 25 years or more  their risk increases seven-fold. Another kind of mutation in this gene doesnt raise breast cancer risk  at least, not by itself. But if women with that trait drink any amount of alcohol, their risk of breast cancer becomes more than twice that of women with the same trait who dont drink at all. Alcohol also increases the risk of breast cancer much more in women who possess still another kind of genetic variation that affects enzymes that metabolize alcohol. Unfortunately, women dont know which form of these various genes they have. Thats why its best to exercise caution. A drink now and then, or even daily, is not enough to double or triple a womans risk of breast cancer. Nevertheless, the risk does increase  especially in amounts beyond one drink a day. It is also important to note that alcohol may have a greater impact when consumed at younger ages. Between puberty and a womans first pregnancy, breast cells are more susceptible to damage from cancer-causing agents. And keep in mind that limiting or avoiding alcohol is just one way a woman can reduce her breast cancer risk. Eating more vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans is another. Diets too low in these foods, according to a major report from the American Institute for Cancer Research, are responsible for at least as many breast cancers as alcohol. Being overweight after menopause raises risk as much as drinking three to four drinks a day, and being obese represents an even greater risk. One new study demonstrates that as little as two hours a week of brisk walking can actually protect as much as alcohol damages.

When people decide they need to eat better, many try to adopt a rigid, rules-based approach. They categorize foods as good or bad. They resolve to eat only good foods and none of the bad. Research, however, suggests that this outlook on eating is not helpful in the long run. Experts in nutrition and behavior encourage people to enjoy a mix of healthy foods without making any foods forbidden territory.Some studies suggest that all-or-nothing attitudes lead to overeating in what might be called a Blown It syndrome. As long as someone feels they are following the rules, they are well disciplined. But once they eat a forbidden food, they often feel theyve blown it. They give up all the rules and eat more of these once prohibited foods. So if theres a less-than-healthy food you eat too often, long-term change may be more likely if you learn to simply reduce your consumption instead of giving it up completely. While it might seem that stricter diet rules would bring more success, they often just bring more anxiety. Studies suggest that people with more restrictive attitudes tend to think about food more often, which, of course, complicates dieting. They also have a tougher time maintaining their eating rules when stressful situations come along.Anxiety over eating a bad food is unnecessary. The effects of one nutritional extravagance are almost always undetectable. Even a super-rich, 500-calorie dessert on top of a normal diet leads to an imperceptible gain of about two ounces. Its only when extra treats become part of usual eating habits that trouble develops.But if do you want to have a bad food, theres no sense in making a full meal of it. In fact, one of the ways that foods with extra calories, fat or sodium can fit into a healthful diet is to counterbalance them with foods low in those ingredients. If you love ice cream, dont automatically scoop out a huge portion of the richest kind and load it with whipped cream. For many people, a little will satisfy their craving. They can be quite happy with a small amount because they know they can eat it again. Others may be just as happy with the sweet, cool smoothness of a lower-fat version. The same is true for other foods. Dont order the bacon burger and fries combo, if all you really want is a regular burger.Another place to avoid restrictive, all-or-nothing thinking is portion size. Some people decide if theyre going to have fries, they might as well have the super-size portion. Yet that choice adds an extra 350 calories and 15 to 20 grams of fat to the splurge. Remember that the higher in calories, sugar or fat a food is, the greater the impact portion size has. So take a realistic look at your portion. Today, excess has become the norm. Theres no need to limit yourself to so skimpy a size of your treat foods that you feel deprived and overeat later. Instead, aim for eating only as much as you truly savor. Stop when youre not focusing on the enjoyment anymore. Many people find that when they really pay attention to their eating, they are happier with smaller portions of their treats than they expected.The goal is to find the middle ground. Accept that how we eat has a major impact on our health. But healthy eating doesnt mean perfect eating.

Heat oil in large non-stick skillet over medium-low heat. Add garlic and cook until fragrant but not too brown, about 2 minutes. Add onion, squash and thyme and cook until onion is golden and caramelized and squash is almost tender, stirring occasionally, about 20 minutes. Add broccoli and cook, stirring occasionally, until broccoli is tender, about 5 minutes. Add broth and chicken and bring to a simmer. Cover and continue gently simmering until chicken is opaque, about 5 minutes.Meanwhile, cook pasta in large pot of boiling salted water until pasta is al dente (just tender), 8-12 minutes. Drain pasta and return to same pot. Stir in chicken mixture. Season to taste with salt and pepper.Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 356 calories, 5 g. total fat (1 g. saturated fat), 48 g. carbohydrate, 29 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 213 g. sodium.

Preheat oven to 250 degrees. Arrange bread slices on oven rack and leave in oven until very dry but not brown, about 30 minutes. Shut off oven and allow bread to cool until easily handled. Transfer bread to large bowl. Turn oven back on and preheat to 325 degrees.

AICR SCIENCE NOW Volume 6Fall 2003    Soy and Female Sex Hormones   Breast cancer is the most common cancer among women in the U.S., excluding skin cancer. In 2002, there were approximately 200,000 new cases. Because many of the known risk factors for breast cancer relate to hormones from the female reproductive system, reducing exposure to these hormones is an important area of investigation. It has been observed that women with high levels of ovarian hormones, one of which is estrogen, over long periods of time are at increased risk.Diet is suspected of influencing these hormone levels. But the parts of the diet that are responsible, along with the mechanisms, remain unknown. Nonetheless, several epidemiological studies of Asians in China, Singapore, Japan, Hawaii and California have shown an inverse relationship between breast cancer risk with soy intakes and urinary excretion of phytoestrogens. Such studies account for the familiar, but often challenged, hypothesis that soy phytoestrogens - plant chemicals that act like the hormone estrogen - may help decrease the risk of breast cancer.The Effect on Premenopausal WomenWith a grant from AICR, Lee-Jane Lu, Ph.D., at the University of Texas Medical Branch in Galveston, has examined levels of ovarian hormones in premenopausal women fed soy. Her studies with 16 premenopausal women show that a soy diet (36 oz. of soy milk in place of the evening meal) maintained for only one month reduces ovarian hormones by 25-45 percent, compared to diets without soy. The change is comparable to the difference that exists among populations with significantly different soy intakes and breast cancer risks."These studies may partially explain why Asian populations with high soy intakes have lower risk for breast cancer than many populations in Western countries," says Dr. Lu. "Such reductions in hormone levels hold exciting prospects for reducing the incidence of breast cancer."Soy Protein May ProtectNow Dr. Lu's laboratory is investigating what elements in soy account for the reduction in ovarian hormones. Originally, Dr. Lu's group of researchers looked at isoflavones in soy. Their subsequent studies, however, showed that soy diets with or without isoflavones effectively lower the levels of estradiol, estrone sulfate and progesterone (all ovarian hormones) in premenopausal women. Other parts seemed responsible.Later, they reported - for the first time - a link between protein intakes and ovarian hormone levels. Dr. Lu's data suggest that both the total amount and the source of protein (soy protein vs. animal protein) influence progesterone levels. From the results of these initial studies, she predicts "less total protein and higher soy protein intake will synergistically and favorably lower the levels of female hormones in women, reducing breast cancer risk." Dr. Lu ascribes the effect of soy protein to its inhibition of sex hormone production.ReferenceLu L et al. Decreased ovarian hormones during a soya diet: implications for breast cancer prevention. Cancer Research. 2000;60:4112-21.

The First Warning from AICRThe projections from WHO echo the announcement six years ago by the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) in a landmark global report on diet and cancer. AICRs report called for changes in public policies and strategies that could make healthier diet and lifestyle choices preferable and more accessible for individuals. Guidelines stated clear dietary and lifestyle changes that could help prevent cancer.Eliminating the use of tobacco is one. Half of regular smokers are killed by their use of tobacco. A regular smoker faces 20-30 times greater risk of lung cancer than a nonsmoker. Increased use of tobacco in many developing countries, and in youth worldwide, is particularly worrisome.Sedentary lifestyles that are growing worldwide are also a cancer risk. Both WHO and AICR call for one hour of moderate exercise (like walking) daily. Moderate exercise can help directly fight colon and certain other cancers. Exercise is also a vital step toward reaching and maintaining a healthy weight.A healthy weight is important because the international epidemic of obesity is a major part of the cancer threat. Diets too high in calories, particularly from fat and sugar, along with inadequate physical activity, are the primary causes of worldwide obesity. In the U.S., excessive portion sizes also supply more calories than people need.

Plant Foods to the RescueIn developing nations, the rising number of urban poor who move from rural areas into vast cities is the major contributor to the growth in cancer risk. This demographic migration takes people away from an active lifestyle and a traditional agricultural diet. These people begin eating more processed foods and drinks that are high in calories, fat and sugar.Consequently, both WHO and AICR stress the need for people to eat plant foods, like vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans, to decrease the risk of many cancers. AICR estimates that if everyone ate 5-10 servings of fruits and vegetables daily 20 percent of cancers could be prevented. Other steps that can further reduce your cancer risk include limiting meat (red meat, in particular) to no more than 3 ounces daily, reducing calories from fat (especially saturated fat) and avoiding alcohol or drinking it only in moderation.

A. Fiber counteracts cancer-causing conditions in the large intestine by speeding up the transit time of waste material.B. Fiber absorbs bile acids that, in excess, are associated with cancer.C. Fermentation of fiber in the colon creates a byproduct called butyrate, which has anticarcinogenic effects.D. Fiber provides a sense of fullness that may help reduce overeating and unwanted weight gain.E. All of the above.

III. Scientists divide fiber into two categories: insoluble and soluble. The amount of insoluble fiber in foods almost always exceeds the amount of soluble fiber. Can you match each type with its description?

A. Dissolves in water and becomes gummy. It can help lower blood cholesterol and blood glucose levels. High levels are in oats, barley, beans and potatoes.B. Holds onto water and adds bulk. Also known as roughage, it is not absorbed by the body. High amounts are in whole wheat and wheat bran.

Since fiber is found exclusively in plant foods, to increase your consumption of this important nutrient you need to eat more vegetables, fruits, whole grains, beans, nuts and seeds. Slowly increase the amount of fiber you eat and drink more water. A high-fiber breakfast cereal is an easy way to improve your fiber intake.

Salmon is now the third most popular seafood in the U.S., with an annual consumption that ranks below only shrimp and canned tuna. Because it is an excellent source of essential omega-3 fatty acids, salmon has developed a reputation as a particularly healthy option. But much of salmons popularity is due to other factors -- its appealing, mild flavor, its ease of preparation, and its increasingly reasonable price. Fresh salmon is best when it is just that  impeccably fresh, which means buying it carefully and serving it promptly. Canned salmon, on the other hand, is more convenient and costs even less: if you wait to buy it when its on sale, you can sometimes get hold of a 14.5-ounce can for about a dollar. But while canned tuna can be found in most everyones pantry, and recipes for novel things to do with canned salmon abound, fresh salmon has become so commonly available that many people now unfairly shun its canned form. This is a significant change from fifty years ago, when people often reached for canned salmon to make a quick casserole, salmon loaf, or salmon cakes to serve with baked spaghetti -- a dish I remember fondly. Why this shift in attitudes? Well, some people think a newly opened can of salmon, complete with skin and bones, is a less than appetizing sight. They probably never watched their mothers quickly and efficiently discard the skin and remove the bones  although the bones are a good source of calcium  and dont realize how easy it is. Sodium is the other issue when serving canned salmon. The fish alone may taste salty, but in the finished dish, I find it to be just right. Used in a recipe like these salmon burgers, the final sodium content per serving is reasonable. If you enjoy old-fashioned fish cakes, I promise you will love these burgers.

Realtors know the smell of baking is so enticing that it can help them sell a house. And nothing beats the rich taste and mouthfeel of fresh-baked bread, either.But making bread takes too long, you say. Not necessarily. True, it does require proofing the yeast until it bubbles, letting the dough rise (usually twice) -- not to mention the work of kneading. A couple of years ago, however, I discovered a recipe for something called batter bread. Although batter bread avoids many of the most time-consuming steps, it is still made with yeast and thus retains the wonderful aroma, fully developed flavor and satisfying texture you expect in a really good bread. For this bread, based on a recipe from Myrtle Allens Cooking in Ballymaloe House, you combine the proofed yeast and the flour in a bowl, stirring until they form a soft dough, then turn this dough into a loaf baking pan and let it rise once. This rise generally takes about 15 minutes. (As a living organism, yeast is not entirely predictable, so the rising time might be as long as 20 minutes, or as brief as ten minutes if your kitchen is particularly warm.)This hearty loaf is made almost entirely with whole-wheat flour. The best choice is stone-ground bread flour, which many supermarkets carry. Made from hard spring wheat, this flour includes the nutrient-rich germ of the whole grain and fiber-rich bran that are polished away in white flours. It is also higher in protein than all-purpose white flour. Flour with high protein content makes better bread because it has more gluten, the particular protein that helps a loaf rise. Kneading, which activate this gluten, transforms the dough from a tight ball to a smooth, elastic mass. In this recipe, stirring vigorously does the job of kneading, and more quickly, too.Walnuts and herbs complement the bold, whole-grain taste of this bread. Serve thick slices with cream of tomato or chunky vegetable soups. I also like it toasted and topped, still warm, with low-fat cottage cheese.

Coat a 9-inch square baking dish with cooking spray. Line pan with plastic wrap, letting edges hang over sides of pan. Coat plastic with cooking spray. Coat a wooden mixing spoon with cooking spray and set aside, close to stove.In large saucepan over medium heat, cook marshmallows and butter until they are melted and start to color, about 3 minutes, stirring constantly. Take pot off heat.Using coated spatula, stir in two cereals, nuts and raisins until dry ingredients are well coated with marshmallow mixture. Turn mixture into prepared pan. Using wet hands, smooth and press mixture into an even layer. (You can also lightly spray your hands with cooking spray to do this.). Set aside to cool. Invert pan over cutting board. Lift off plastic. Using serrated knife, cut into squares, or rectangles about the size of a small candy or power bar. Makes 12 servings.

The vast majority of Americans now recognize tobacco and excess sunlight as cancer risks. Yet there are many other equally legitimate cancer risks that the public continues to disregard. Were still blaming cancer on factors beyond our control instead of concentrating on making simple lifestyle changes that could dramatically lower our risk.In a random telephone survey of over 1000 American adults conducted earlier this year by the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR), 91 percent agreed that tobacco significantly increased cancer risk. Eighty-eight percent named excess sunlight exposure as a risk. The reality supports these opinions. About 30 percent of U.S. cancer deaths are due to tobacco. And according to the National Cancer Institute (NCI), each one-percent increase in a persons exposure to UVB radiation raises skin cancer risk 1 to 4 percent. Hereditary factors were cited as a significant cancer risk by 89 percent of those surveyed. The accuracy of this view depends on what respondents mean. Some forms of inherited genes do make a tiny minority of Americans more susceptible to damage from cancer-causing influences, but experts say lifestyle still has over-riding impact. In fact, numerous studies have shown that when populations migrate, their cancer risk changes as their lifestyle changes. Survey respondents next identified external influences, such as industrial pollution, radiation and nuclear power, as cancer risks. But these factors impact only very small segments of the population. Industrial chemicals are primarily a concern for workers who might receive high-dose exposures on the job. Low-level exposures from pollution pose negligible cancer risk to the general population. Low-frequency radiation (the kind produced by microwave ovens) seems to have no effect on cancer. Only high-frequency radiation, such as ultraviolet radiation (from sunlight or tanning booths), x-rays and radon can influence human cancer. To minimize these risks, medical and dental x-rays are set at the lowest dose levels. Radon is a legitimate concern, although its precise role in raising risk has chiefly been observed in studies among underground miners and smokers.Less than half the adults surveyed understood that diets low in fruits and vegetables significantly affect cancer risk. Such a poor showing suggests that years of research and public campaigns promoting fruit and vegetable consumption have not yet achieved their objective. According to the AICR expert report on diet and cancer risk, if we boost fruit and vegetable consumption to at least five standard servings a day, 20 percent of todays cancers could be prevented. To make an even greater step towards cancer prevention, AICR advises eating a plant-based diet with five to ten servings of fruits and vegetables daily. Only about a third of people surveyed identified diets high in red meat or lack of physical activity as cancer risks. Yet researchers say that limiting red meat, getting regular exercise, and a wide range of other lifestyle choices can dramatically lower our risk of cancer. Overall, simple lifestyle changes could reduce cancer risk 30 to 40 percent.One encouraging improvement in public awareness came in the number of people who correctly identified obesity as a cancer risk. Forty-five percent named obesity as a risk  10 percent more than two years ago. This is good news, since overweight and obesity are estimated to account for 14 to 20 percent of all cancer deaths. The question now is whether this awareness will motivate more people to take action to thwart our epidemic of obesity.

LADLE UP A COLUMBUS DAY MEALfrom theAmerican Institute for Cancer ResearchPasta is widely regarded as the quintessential Italian meal, but when famous Genoan Christopher Columbus first spotted land on Oct. 12, 1492, he just might have celebrated with a bowl of soup. After all, in many parts of Italy, both light and hearty soups are considered more central to daily meals than noodles. Soup can be a comfort food, a cure for the common cold, a quick meal or a first course. In fact, it is such a versatile food that, in a varied and healthy diet, soup can supply many of the different nutrients necessary for overall health and well-being. After all, surveys of food intake show that few Americans consume enough daily servings of vegetables and fruits. Soup is an easy, efficient way to fit more servings of vegetables into the American diet. And thats important, because studies continue to show that diets high in vegetables and fruits are associated with lower risk for many chronic diseases. New research on ovarian cancer, one of the five most deadly cancers among women in developed countries, suggests that a balanced plant-based diet may help in its prevention. One recent study conducted in Italy, for example, showed that higher consumption of legumes (dried beans and peas) was linked with a 33 percent lower risk of ovarian cancer. Protective benefits may come from the fiber and natural phytoestrogens found in legumes.If soup is the main course, it should be a good source of protein, both to meet nutritional needs and to keep hunger satisfied. Draining and rinsing a can of beans is an easy way to give a soup protein, fiber and a whole variety of vitamins and minerals that todays meals may lack.Beans also are a good source of folate, which has been associated with decreased risk of cancers of the breast, cervix, lung and esophagus; magnesium, which has been linked to lower blood pressure; and flavonoids, a group of phytochemicals that seem to protect against both cancer and heart disease.Soup can fill you up without filling you out, which is why it has a potential role in helping people manage weight. Of course, ladling out generous helpings of broccoli-cheese soup or New England clam chowder every day is unlikely to result in weight loss or health enhancement. Broth-based soups are lower in fat than cream or cheese-based soups. So a hearty bowl of basil-flavored Italian white bean soup makes a satisfying, low fat, nutritious meal as well as a good tribute to Columbus.

APPLES GOOD FOR YOU IN ANY FORMfrom theAmerican Institute for Cancer ResearchIf an apple a day keeps the doctor away, a dash of cider cant hurt.Cider is somewhat under-appreciated for both its culinary uses and its nutritional properties. It makes a good base for cooking many fall vegetables, and the rich flavor of the cider brings out the natural sweetness of vegetables like squash and sweet potatoes. It also cuts the sharp taste of vegetables like cabbage, onions and leafy greens.Like apples, cider contains health-protective substances, including quercetin and other members of the flavonoid group of phytochemicals that offer a wide array of specialized protections.Studies have shown that quercetin stops the growth of prostate cancer cells and appears to slow the growth of tumors. Eating foods rich in quercetin has been linked to lowered risk of stomach, prostate, ovarian and breast cancers.October is National Breast Cancer Awareness Month, so cooking with apples and cider is a good way to remember the connection between food and cancer prevention. The following recipe uses apples as well as cider. Onion, another ingredient, is also rich in quercetin.

A MEAL IN ONE VEGETABLEfrom theAmerican Institute for Cancer ResearchYou want to know one of the best ways to get lots of flavor and texture into one simple dish? Well, stuff it.Most stuffed foods can be made ahead and freeze well, so they are good choices for entertaining or quick mid-week meals. These foods can contain a variety of the vegetables, grains and protein necessary for a well-balanced, nutritious meal. Favorite vegetables to stuff are tomatoes, zucchini, onions and peppers. To stuff tomatoes, simply scoop them out and pack in the filling. For zucchini, cut the squash lengthwise and use a teaspoon with a pointed tip to scrape out the soft, seedy center into a wide, deep channel. Add enough filling to cover the entire surface of the squash.Stuffed onions take a little more time and effort. Boil a whole, peeled, medium-sized onion for 2 minutes. Use a melon baller to scoop out the inside, leaving a shell two layers thick. Stuff the onions with your choice of filling and bake. As they cook, the natural sugar in the onions caramelizes, making them soft and sweet.Sweet red bell peppers an excellent source of vitamin C have a mild, sweet flavor and crisp, juicy flesh. With their tops cut off and seeds removed, they make perfect containers for the stuffing of your choice.

Preheat the oven to 400.Taking care not to make any holes, cut a very thin slice off the bottom of each bell pepper, just enough to help them stand straight and firmly. Set aside.For the filling, in a large bowl, combine the turkey, rice, onion, garlic, corn, parsley, oregano, salt and pepper. Add beans, mixing in lightly with a fork so beans arent mashed. Set aside.Divide the filling into four portions, packing each pepper with the mixture, mounding any extra at the top. Place stuffed peppers in a baking dish just large enough to hold them. Pour in 1 cup of water. Cover the dish with foil and bake it in the center of the oven for 40 minutes. In the meantime, combine cheese with the breadcrumbs in a small bowl.After 40 minutes of baking, uncover peppers. Sprinkle cheese mixture over top of each pepper. Continue baking the peppers, uncovered, 15 to 20 minutes or until the peppers are soft when pierced with a knife but not collapsing. Cool just long enough to be able to eat, 10 to 20 minutes, and serve. Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 249 calories, 5 g. total fat (2 g. saturated fat), 31 g. carbohydrate, 19 g. protein, 6 g. dietary fiber, 505 mg. sodium.

GET TO KNOW YOUR PUMPKINfrom theAmerican Institute for Cancer ResearchCarving pumpkins is nothing new. People have been making jack o lanterns for centuries. In Britain, they carved scary faces on turnips and beets and set them in windows to scare away evil wandering spirits. When immigrants from Ireland, Scotland and England came to the United States, they found that pumpkins made perfect jack o lanterns. Only very recently have Americans begun to recognize that pumpkins are as good to eat as to carve. First there was pumpkin pie. Then pumpkin showed up in muffins and cheesecake. But pumpkins members of the gourd family can be used in the same ways as any other winter squash. The French use pumpkin almost exclusively to make soup. The dark orange meat has a mild, sweet taste. The French sometimes turn the pumpkin into a tureen filling it with cheese and bread and baking the whole thing until the interior becomes a thick, rich soup. Pumpkins are available in the fall and winter months, and pureed pumpkin is available in cans year-round. When using fresh pumpkin, the smaller ones are usually best. Small, sweet jack-be-littles, cheese pumpkins or sugar pumpkins are all good choices.In fact, one of the few pumpkins not fit to eat is the kind you carve. Jack o lantern pumpkins have watery, stringy pulp. But you can save and toast the seeds, which have a nutty flavor and are good snacks or soup garnishes. For cooking, pick unblemished pumpkins that are heavy for their size. Canned pumpkin is the easiest way to add the distinctive flavor and orange color indicating the presence of cancer-fighting beta-carotene to a dish. Pumpkins also are a good source of Vitamin A. The following recipe makes a thick rich soup or bisque with pieces of apple for a nice color contrast and some crunch a perfect way to welcome fall and celebrate Halloween.

A Lot of Nutrition in a Little Brown Bagby the American Institute for Cancer Research If you bring your lunch from home, youre bagging a bargain. Besides being easy on your wallet, homemade meals can be good for your health as well. The portion size, calories and fat content are under your control. At the same time, you can serve yourself a delicious variety of vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans that lower the risk of cancer and other chronic diseases. The most popular lunches people purchase to eat at the office are sandwiches, wraps and salads. These can be full of hidden fats and calories and poor nutritional choices. The only way to get a true bargain is to make your own.

Wholesome Whole GrainsBefore you start making the central dish of your brown-bag lunch usually the traditional sandwich consider its main ingredient. Since about 60 percent of a sandwich is bread, find bread made of whole-grain flour. Some breads are dark brown, but there may not be many, or any, whole grains in them. Caramel color or molasses is often added to give a deep color. Whole grains, which are much more nutrient-dense than refined white flour, are full of fiber and filling. They are rich in many health-protective substances, like antioxidants, phytochemicals, vitamin E, folic acid, zinc, selenium and magnesium. When selecting a loaf of bread, the ingredient label should list as the first item either "100 percent whole grain" or the word "whole" followed by the grain used.Try purchasing different kinds of whole-grain breads, if a particular one doesnt appeal to you. Multi-grain breads with oats on the outside tend to be slighter sweeter. For a wonderfully soft and chewy taste, bake your own with whole-wheat flour, or look for freshly baked loaves. Whole-grain tortillas and pita bread are also great alternatives that you may prefer.Todays Special, Made by YouHere are some fast and easy ideas to help you pack your bag with pizzazz and good health.

Pocket Sandwich: Spread prepared hummus inside a whole-wheat pita. Fill it with slices of cucumber, onion, tomato and green bell pepper with lettuce or spinach. Add green or black olives and a little feta cheese, if desired.

Mediterranean Pasta: Mix leftover, preferably whole-wheat pasta, like bowties, with halved cherry tomatoes, sliced mushrooms, canned and rinsed artichoke hearts and green and black olives. Toss with lowfat Italian or tomato vinaigrette dressing. Garnish with oregano and basil. Sprinkle on Parmesan cheese, if desired.

Hearty Bean and Veggie Sandwich: Rinse and mash canned white beans with lowfat plain yogurt, mustard and fresh dill. Spread on whole-grain bread. Top with spinach leaves and slices of cucumber, tomato and onion.

Spicy Chicken Salad Sandwich: Stir lowfat mayonnaise into leftover, diced chicken or turkey. Add chopped celery, red bell pepper, halved red grapes and curry powder. Serve on whole-grain bread with fresh spinach and tomato slices.

But the AICR experts who commissioned those recent surveys say that longtime membership in the Clean Plate Club is linked to obesity and the many health risks associated with that condition, including increased risk for heart disease, stroke, diabetes and cancer.

But even the staff of the countrys premier library was daunted by the task, at least at first. A few leads turned up in an extensive newspaper search of the past century -- mostly casual references to the term -- but there was remarkably little else to go on. I was surprised at the dearth of information about this phrase, said one reference librarian in the LOCs Humanities and Social Sciences Division.

AICR experts thanked the librarian for her efforts, and resigned themselves to the fact that their search had turned up another blind alley. Two days later, the librarian, who had evidently taken up the experts query as a personal challenge, contacted AICR with what would prove to be the biggest break in the search: the Lever Act of 1917.

The first step Wilson took was to issue Executive Order 2679-A, creating the U.S. Food Administration, which was tasked with assuring the supply, distribution and conservation of food during the war. Wilsons choice to head the Food Administration was Herbert Hoover. Wilson instructed Hoover not to take any salary for his new position, which would, he thought, lend Hoover the moral authority to ask the American people to make sacrifices.

One website that compiles folk etymologies widely repeated tales about the origins of phrases that are often less-than-true claims that the term clean your plate originally referred to the practice of wiping ones dinner bowl clean with a piece of bread. The bowl would then be turned upside down so that ones dessert could be placed upon it. Some food historians argue that practice of cleaning ones plate grew directly out of the table manners of our European ancestors. In Western Europe, they argue, it is customary to serve yourself and consume all that you take. Leaving food that you have served yourself is considered an insult to the host or hostess.Today, variations on the phrase The Clean Plate Club are often adopted by groups who wish to identify themselves with comforting, homey images of food and food preparation, such as catering companies, restaurant consortiums, food magazines, and recipe-swapping social groups.A 1986 article in the School Foodservice Journal hails a food program called the Clean Plate Club in the Dayton Ohio School District. Schoolchildren were offered an incentive to finish their lunch offering each day. The incentive for this institutionalized excess calorie consumption? A popular dessert in other words, even more calories. A restaurant in Walt Disney World, styled after a 50s diner, employs a variety of retro-themed gimmicks: the waitstaff applauds patrons who finish their meals, and pins emblazoned with the motto, Clean Plate Club are sold in the gift shop.

Depending on the type, fruit can offer a different note of flavor to a dish. Bosc or Asian pears as well as apples add a delicate sweetness and crunch. Pineapple, berries, grapes, oranges and grapefruit produce bursts of tangy, citrus taste. And a full-mouth, often subtly rich taste is achieved with mangos, plums, persimmons, peaches and nectarines.

A diet focused mostly on plant-based foods supplies a greater amount and array of phytochemicals than one in which animal meats predominate. In their work to help prepare AICRs landmark report, Food, Nutrition and the Prevention of Cancer: A Global Perspective, scientists reviewed more than 4,500 studies on the connection between diet and cancer. They found convincing evidence that diets high in vegetables and/or fruits protect against many different types of cancers.

To serve, remove plastic wrap and use a very sharp knife to cut wraps. Cut wraps at an angle into 3 or 4 slices. Arrange on a serving plate. Divide dipping sauce between individual small bowls, one per serving.

Make marinade by mixing together the soy sauce, sugar and mirin in a glass, plastic or non-reactive metal pan large enough to hold the chicken. Mix in chicken and marinate up to 30 minutes at room temperature or, covered, up to overnight in the refrigerator. If chilled, bring chicken to room temperature before beginning to stir-fry.

Before beginning to cook, mix sauce thickener in a small bowl or measuring cup. Stir or whisk together cornstarch with broth until well blended. Stir in fish sauce or soy sauce, according to taste. Stir in chili flakes according to taste. Set aside.

Just before beginning to stir-fry, bring water in a large pot to a boil. Add sweet potatoes, lower heat to a simmer and cook until half-tender, about 3 minutes. Drain potatoes into a colander and set aside.

Heat 1 tablespoon oil in a heavy large skillet or wok over medium-high heat. Add garlic, ginger and cayenne. Saut? 15 seconds or until garlic turns color. Add chicken to skillet and stir-fry until just cooked through, about 6 to 8 minutes or until juices run clear. Transfer contents of pan to a bowl.

Heat second tablespoon of oil in the pan over medium-high heat. Add drained sweet potatoes, bell pepper and water chestnuts. Stirring constantly, stir-fry until bell peppers are not quite crisp tender and sweet potatoes are not quite tender, about 3 minutes.

Combine all ingredients except the carrot in a bowl. Stir to dissolve sugar completely. Add carrot. Let stand at least an hour to allow flavors to meld. Store tightly sealed in refrigerator up to 3 days.

According to the new brochure, breakfast should be regarded as one of three basic meals that supply sufficient energy to maintain us through the day and at the same time supply the minerals, vitamins and phytochemicals needed to reduce risk of cancer, stroke and heart disease. To play this dual role in our daily diet, the American breakfast may need to be made over into something radically different.

According to the new brochure, the proportions are off in most of the traditional breakfasts Americans choose. That is, they lack an appropriate balance of plant-based foods and lean animal protein. The new brochure offers alternative breakfasts that correspond to the originals in some respects but offer a more healthful balance of ingredients.

For instance, people in a rush to get out in the morning often grab a donut and coffee and consume them on the way to work. Donuts, Danish and muffins  most of the sweetened pastry we eat in the morning  provide an excessive amount of refined flour and sugar.

An alternative breakfast should contain whole grain flour and a small amount of protein to stabilize our energy supply. The new brochure recommends a whole wheat bagel with peanut butter, or a whole wheat English muffin spread with apple butter and low-fat string cheese.

Eggs with bacon or sausage and the inevitable hash browns are a second American favorite for breakfast. This hearty classic, often preferred by people with ample time in the morning, is high in animal protein and the saturated fat that comes with it. If prepared on a restaurant griddle, it may also be high in trans fats, which act like saturated fat.

Studies have shown that saturated fat raises cholesterol levels and contributes to the clogging of arteries. Furthermore, such egg and fried meat breakfasts lack the protective phytochemicals found in plant-based meals.

The Institutes new brochure recommends three possible substitutions for the traditional egg and fried meat breakfast: the Confetti Breakfast Burrito, which includes a whole wheat shell, vegetables and egg; an Italian Breakfast Strata, which incorporates layers of whole wheat bread, egg as well as onions, mushrooms and tomato; and a Southwest Vegetable Frittata, which includes eggs, beans, peppers, onions and salsa.

A third traditional breakfast is sugar-laden dry cereal with milk. Although a grain and milk combination does provide balance, many commercial cereals have an extraordinary amount of added sugar. This heavy load of added sugar in addition to refined grains burns rapidly and can leave people tired and hungry in a few hours.

Other alternatives to sugar-coated cereals include oatmeal with fresh sliced apples, walnuts and cinnamon, or a homemade Maple Raisin Granola, soymilk and sliced peaches. In each instance a whole-grain is sweetened with fruit, sprinkled with nuts, and served with low-fat milk or soymilk to provide a delicious and healthy breakfast.

Among the most popular traditional breakfasts is no breakfast at all. Either because of time constraints or the desire to lose weight, at least 17 percent of Americans regularly skip the morning meal.

A series of convincing studies have shown that people who skip breakfast take in more calories later in the day than people who eat three evenly spaced meals. Other studies show that breakfast skippers tend to have higher blood cholesterol levels as well.

The new brochure suggests a Strawberry Melon Smoothie, or small, whole wheat, fruit muffin in place of no breakfast. It offers recipes for smoothies that can be whipped up quickly in the morning and healthy muffins that can be baked on the weekend and frozen for use during the week.

The new breakfast brochure is the latest in AICRs New American Plate series and applies the principles of proportion and portion size to the morning meal. It contains a detailed explanation of how to manage portion sizes at breakfast and a review of the debate on the relation of fat and carbohydrates to weight management.

In addition the brochure contains a list of five imaginative, but simple breakfasts that dont require recipes and 13 recipes for novel, but healthy breakfasts. It contains recipes such as Breakfast Banana Smoothie, Pumpkin-Spice Muffins and a Breakfast Fruit Wrap that takes minutes to prepare and Veggie Pita Pizza, Southwest Vegetable Frittata and Confetti Breakfast Burritos, which are more suitable for weekend breakfasts or brunches.

Place oven rack in the center of oven. Preheat oven to 350 degrees. Arrange onions to make a bed in the middle of a small roasting pan. Set aside.In a small bowl, combine tarragon, rosemary, thyme, salt, and pepper. Mix in oil until herbs are coated. Remove 1 tablespoon of mixture and set aside. Lightly coat chicken with cooking spray, then with remaining herbs. Set chicken on the onions in roasting pan. Pour in 1/2 cup broth. Cover pan loosely with foil.Bake chicken until tender and juices run clear when thickest part of chicken is pierced with a knife, about 20 to 25 minutes. Remove chicken from pan and keep warm, covered with foil. Using a slotted spoon, remove onions and set aside. Pour liquid from pan into a large measuring cup. Add enough of remaining broth to make 2 cups.Place bulgur in a mixing bowl. In a small saucepan, heat broth to a boil. Pour broth over bulgur. Mix in reserved onions and chopped herbs. Let sit, uncovered, until bulgur absorbs liquid and is tender, about 30 minutes. Meanwhile, cut chicken into bite-size pieces.Make a bed of bulgur on serving plate. Top with chicken and serve.Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 298 calories, 3 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 30 g. carbohydrate, 38 g. protein, 7 g. dietary fiber, 606 mg. sodium.

Cut tops off beets, leaving one inch of stems above tops of beets. Place beets in a deep saucepan and cover them to a depth of 2 inches with cold water. Cook over high heat. When water boils, reduce heat, boiling gently until beets are easily pierced in the center with a thin knife, about 35 minutes. Meanwhile, put potatoes in medium pot and cover with an inch of cold water. Cook until potatoes are done, as tested with the beets, about 15 minutes. Drain each vegetable when done and transfer to a plate until cool enough to handle. Pull skin from beets, then potatoes. Cut beets into 1-inch cubes. Cut potatoes into 8 pieces. Combine them in a bowl. Set aside until beet and potatoes are completely cooled. Place beans in a small bowl.For the dressing, whisk together vinegar and mustard in a small bowl, then add and whisk in the oil, salt and pepper. Spoon 1 tablespoon dressing over beans and toss to coat. Add dill to remaining dressing, mixing well. Add dressing to beets and potatoes and toss to evenly distribute. Heap dressed beets and potatoes on a serving plate. Arrange the beans over them. Serve immediately.Makes total of 4 cups or X servings.Per serving: 110 calories, 4 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 19 g. carbohydrate, 3 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 95 mg. sodium.

Place rack in center of oven. Preheat oven to 350 degrees. Coat a 9-inch square baking pan with cooking spray. Peel and finely grate sweet potatoes into a large bowl. Peel and finely grate baking potato into a smaller bowl. A handful at a time, squeeze as much water as possible from the baking potato, then add to sweet potatoes. Add carrot and raisins and mix until well combined.In a small bowl, whisk together eggs, juice, oil, cinnamon, nutmeg, salt and pepper. Add to potatoes and mix to blend well. Add bread crumbs and mix until well combined. Turn mixture into prepared baking pan. With the back of a spoon, press firmly to compact it and then smooth and even the surface. Cover pan with foil.Bake 20 minutes. Remove foil. Continue baking until vegetables are tender and top is lightly browned, about 30 minutes. Cool on a rack until lukewarm. Cut kugel into 8 rectangles and serve while still warm. To save for a later time, cover snugly with foil and refrigerate overnight. Before serving, reheat in a 350-degree oven until heated through, about 20 minutes.Makes 8 servings.Per serving: 151 calories, 3 g. total fat (1 g. saturated fat), 29 g. carbohydrate, 4 g. protein, 2 g. dietary fiber, 375 mg. sodium.

Cut leaves off heads of escarole about 3 inches above the base to remove thick, white stems. Discard bruised leaves. Fill sink with cold water. Add escarole, swishing leaves vigorously to rinse off sand and grit. Drain and rinse sand from sink. Repeat this procedure. (This can be done up to 4 hours ahead. Shake most of the moisture off greens and store them in a plastic bag in refrigerator.)Bring a large pot of water to a boil. When water boils, add the escarole. Cook greens 2 minutes. Transfer greens to a strainer. Run cold water over greens to cool. Drain well. Press greens to extract excess water, then use hands to squeeze greens, in several batches, to remove as much water as possible. Slice each batch of squeezed greens into roughly 1/2 to 1-inch strips.Heat oil in medium skillet over medium heat. Saut? garlic until golden, about 3 minutes. Turn slices and cook until lightly colored. Remove garlic to a small bowl and set aside. Add escarole to pan, stirring to coat it with oil. Pour in broth and add pepper flakes. Bring liquid to a boil, then immediately reduce heat to a simmer. Cook until escarole is tender, according to taste.Remove from heat and season to taste with salt and pepper. Serve hot, warm, or room temperature, garnished with reserved garlic slices.Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 109 calories, 7 g. total fat (1 g. saturated fat), 10 g. carbohydrate, 4 g. protein, 8 g. dietary fiber, 273 mg. sodium.Something Different is written for the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) by Dana Jacobi, author of The Joy of Soy, and recipe creator for AICRs Stopping Cancer Before It Starts.

The American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) estimates that 30 to 40 percent of cancers are preventable. But if that much can be eliminated, who should take action and how? According to a new report from the Institute of Medicine (IOM), people need to change their habits for maximum cancer-stopping results. And health care providers, insurers, employers, policy makers and communities can also help.Cancer screening tests cant prevent cancer, but by catching the diseases development in early stages, they can mean less drastic and more successful treatment. The IOM report, Fulfilling the Potential of Cancer Prevention and Early Detection, notes that screenings for breast, cervical and colorectal cancers are highly effective, yet greatly underused. The report recommends that health insurers offer more coverage for tests whose accuracy in detecting cancer is well supported. Reducing peoples need to pay part of the screening costs might increase test use. In addition, the report urges health care administrators to develop effective screening reminder systems for physicians and patients.Even if rates of screening improve, however, without large-scale preventive actions, cancer rates will increase alarmingly in the next 15 to 20 years. For instance, tobacco is a major cancer risk. The IOM report states that smoking cessation programs are effective for only 5 to 10 percent of those involved. Although thats a small percentage of success, it ultimately adds up to a large number of individuals. Health care providers should follow smoking cessation guidelines to help smokers quit. Federal health programs should also cover smoking cessation. To discourage use of tobacco products even more, states should set prohibitively high taxes on them, and communities should reduce teen access to them. Attention to obesity, unhealthy diet and physical inactivity is also needed. Surveys show that many Americans are still unaware of the link between obesity and cancer risk. A recent study in the New England Journal of Medicine concludes that overweight and obesity may account for 14 to 20 percent of overall cancer deaths. Sedentary lifestyles may increase cancer incidence by making weight control more difficult and causing other more direct effects.A national strategy to address these issues is needed. There are also obvious changes that can occur at work, in communities and at school. Worksite fitness programs and on-site healthy eating choices are benefits that can pay off for employees and insurers. Communities can create comprehensive transportation plans with sidewalks, bike trails and safe places for physical activity. Funds are available to states to support these initiatives. Schools can institute healthy school lunches, physical education programs and after-school recreation.Overall, public understanding about the role of a healthy lifestyle needs to be strengthened. A few years ago, AICRs landmark report stressed the importance of a mostly plant-based diet with five to ten servings of fruits and vegetables daily. By providing phytochemicals, vitamins and fiber, this diet is strongly linked with a lower risk of cancer and better overall health. If people ate a mostly plant-based diet, exercised regularly and maintained a healthy weight, cancer rates could fall by 30 to 40 percent.Healthy lifestyles for lower cancer risk also involve limiting portions and avoiding excess alcohol, red meat and saturated fat. Although we are all responsible for our own conduct, the IOM report makes clear that we all health providers, insurers and individuals benefit by acting together to help prevent cancer.

Research shows that heredity has a large influence on how our skin ages. How we live is also a major player, affecting our skins appearance and our risk of skin cancer.Presentations at the most recent American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) conference noted that ultraviolet radiation initiates the development of skin cancer by damaging our cells DNA. The inflammation promotes cancer growth and other cell changes. This sun-related damage also leads to age spots and wrinkling.Thats why sunscreen is such a potent weapon against skin damage. Unfortunately, most of us either completely ignore the need for it or apply too little. Many of us save sunscreen for when we will have significant sun exposure. But even brief periods of exposure each day can create damage that accumulates. Wearing a daily moisturizer with a Sun Protective Factor (SPF) of at least 15 is recommended.The National Cancer Institute (NCI) emphasizes, however, that a sunscreen cannot substitute for avoiding sun exposure. NCI and the American Academy of Dermatology advocate staying out of the midday sun whenever possible. Sunglasses, brimmed hats and other protective clothing are strongly recommended.Its not only sunlight that damages skin. Regardless of the advertising claims, no UVA or UVB tanning device is safe. The only safe tan comes from self-tanning lotions. Smoking is another source of damage. It seems to increase skin wrinkling and sagging by reducing blood flow to the skin and breaking down elastin fibers.Antioxidants are currently considered to be potent skin protectors. Normal body processes produce free radicals, highly reactive molecules that damage the DNA of our cells. Ultraviolet light, smoking, alcohol and pollution increase free radical formation. Researchers say damage from free radicals leads to skin wrinkling, redness, brown age spots and increased risk of skin cancer. Antioxidants neutralize free radicals and even repair some of the damage done. For now, scientists arent sure whether antioxidants are best applied in lotions or creams or consumed in foods or supplements. Dermatologists note that some lotions contain ineffective amounts or forms of antioxidants that are not well absorbed by the skin.A healthy diet, on the other hand, supplies thousands of antioxidants, including vitamins C and E, beta-carotene and other carotenoids, and a variety of natural phytochemicals. We know that the mostly plant-based diets recommended by AICR raise blood levels of antioxidants and lower overall cancer risk. A healthy diet may help in other ways. Several presentations at AICRs latest research conference focused on how blocking inflammation might reduce skin damage and skin cancer. Several phytochemicals in herbs, spices and soy foods have anti-inflammatory effects. So do omega-3 fats, found in fish like salmon, mackerel, white (albacore) tuna and herring, as well as in flaxseeds, walnuts and canola and soybean oils. Animal studies also show that restricting calorie consumption reduces skin cancer development, apparently through its effects on hormones. A healthy lifestyle with regular exercise may improve skin health by improving blood flow to the skin, increasing the delivery of oxygen and nutrients to the cells. Although more research is needed, a good strategy for the present includes minimizing sun exposure, ending tobacco use and eating a balanced plant-based diet.

A LITTLE MELON GOES A LONG WAYfrom theAmerican Institute for Cancer ResearchThe eye is often bigger than the stomach when buying ripe end-of-season melons. After a few end-of-meal desserts, theres often a big piece of melon left over. A melon salad is a tasty, colorful solution.Watermelon in salads has become trendy on restaurant menus, often paired with cheese and tomatoes. Adding honeydew and cantaloupe just means more of a good thing.There are two classes of melons: muskmelons, which include honeydew and cantaloupe, and watermelons, which are in a class by themselves. Both honeydew and cantaloupe have netted skins and seeds in a fibrous center cluster. While they are available throughout the year, these melons are most abundant in late summer and early fall.When they are ripe, muskmelons are slightly soft at the blossom end and have a sweet smell. Choose those that are heavy for their size. Cantaloupe is an excellent source of vitamins A and C, and honeydews a good source of vitamin C.In addition to containing fair amounts of vitamins A and C, watermelon has been promoted as a good weapon in the fight against disease. New research shows that watermelon may be a good source of lycopene, the phytochemical (natural plant substance) that could help prevent certain cancers and other health problems. Lycopene is the substance that gives red and pink grapefruit, watermelon, tomatoes and guava their color.Even before this finding, watermelon was considered good for snacks, desserts and salads. Each cup (about half a large slice) contains 16 to 19 percent of the recommendeddaily intake of vitamin C. And a one-cup serving can satisfy a sweet tooth with just 49calories, making it one of the fruits least concentrated in sugar and calories.When picking a watermelon, look for those without any flat sides. If you slap the side of the melon and hear a hollow thump, its probably ripe. A watermelons rind should be dull, not shiny. If youve got the space, its best to store watermelon in the refrigerator. Fruit is a nice addition to any salad. Oranges add color and a sweet taste to a green salad. Crisp apple slices can take the place of water chestnuts in an Asian chicken salad. Tart dried berries are good in both green salads and meat salads. A salad of melons, mint and feta is refreshing to both the eye and the palate.

In a large bowl, combine wild rice, corn, scallions, mint, nuts and onion. In a small bowl, whisk together the vinegar and oil, then add to rice mixture. Toss to combine. Season to taste with salt and pepper. If possible, cover and let stand 30 minutes before serving to allow flavors to develop. Keeps 24 hours if tightly covered and refrigerated.Note: For the corn, cut the kernels off 1 ear of cooked corn or use defrosted frozen or canned corn. Yellow and white corn are equally good.Makes 8 servings.Per serving: 94 calories, 4 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 14 g. carbohydrate, 3 g. protein, 2 g. dietary fiber, 3 mg. sodium.

AICR experts agree, citing their own 1997 AICR Expert Report, Food, Nutrition and the Prevention of Cancer: a global perspective. That report examined over 4500 studies and found convincing evidence that diets high in a variety of foods like vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans lower risk for cancer. The report found no evidence that nutrients in supplement form can lower cancer risk.

But getting Americans to give up their faith in magic bullets might prove difficult. In a survey conducted by AICR in 2000, 43 percent of Americans said they take a daily multi-vitamin to reduce their risk of cancer. The belief that vitamin supplements can help prevent cancer seems particularly entrenched among seniors: in the AICR survey, 54 percent of those 65 and older said they take a multi-vitamin to lower their cancer risk.

The same survey also found that Americans are more likely to look to a vitamin bottle for cancer protection (43 percent) than they are to make the kind of overall dietary changes that have been proven to lower risk (39 percent).

This is why AICR urges consumption of a varied diet featuring many different plant foods. Although it would be ideal for individuals to get the nutrition they need directly from such a diet, Polk acknowledged that there are some cases where dietary supplements may be necessary.

The American Institute for Cancer Research is one of the nations largest cancer charities. AICR supports research in cancer prevention and treatment at universities, hospitals and research centers across the U.S. The Institute has provided over $67 million in funding for cancer research. AICR also provides a wide range of education programs that help millions of Americans learn to make everyday changes for lower cancer risk. The AICR website is http://www.aicr.org/.

Polk says that Southeast Asian cooks distinguish between a wide range of individual flavors: hot, sour, salty, sweet, bitter, pungent, astringent and umami, a flavor component sometimes described as depth or mouth feel. And, Polk notes, because smell is involved in the perception of flavor, a richer combination of flavors produces a richer aroma. For example, instead of simply relying on ordinary salt for a bit of saltiness, Polk observes, Asian cooks often use fermented fish or soybean products that, in addition to a salty flavor, also add some pungency and depth as well as umami. Onion, radish, ginger, garlic, mustard, anchovies and various herbs also provide a pleasant pungency to prepared foods. The slightly bitter component of a dish, says Polk, derives from dark leafy greens like kale, spinach, mustard greens and many herbs, as well as vinegar and some citrus juices. Umami flavoring, according to Polk, is the full-bodied taste Westerners associate with broth and well-matured Parmesan cheese. In Asia, umami is associated with broth as well as dried mushrooms, soybean paste (miso) and fish sauce.

Polk points out that Southeast Asian cooking uses a wide variety of herbs and flavorings to maximize the flavor of a dish. That great variety also maximizes the health-protection of the many different phytochemicals contained in those herbs and flavorings.In other words, she says, the rich variety of seasonings in Southeast Asian cooking offers more bang for the buck in fighting cancer and other chronic diseases. And when you consider that Asian cooking usually makes use of a wide variety of vegetables that are also rich in phytochemicals, the result is a dish that is super-healthful as well as super-tasty. In Southeast Asia, great use is made of many herbs, like cilantro, basil and mint. Cilantro is rich in phytochemicals believed to combat breast and liver cancers. Basil, another commonly used herb in the region, contains compounds that hunt down free radicals and seem to interrupt cancer development. Basil also is rich in phytochemicals that curb the oxidation of LDL (bad) cholesterol and prevent blood clotting. Mint contains powerful anti-cancer agents that can block the development of breast tumors and make them shrink. The following recipes for Southeast Asian-Style Grilled Marinated Chicken with Hot Sweet-Sour Dipping Sauce combine a wide range of herbs and seasonings for flavor, and also offer a rich array of phytochemicals. Two options are given for a marinade, both of which use cilantro, which is also called coriander.The marinades also contain fish sauce, a concentrated flavoring used throughout Southeast Asia as an all-purpose condiment like Worcestershire Sauce, which itself is based on salted anchovies.

Although heavily used in Southeast Asia, a little fish sauce can go a long way. The modest amounts called for in the recipes that follow may be further reduced, according to taste, or soy sauce may be used in its place, if desired.

Make marinade in a blender, stopping occasionally to scrape down sides of blender with a rubber spatula after each step. Blend together until well mixed: oil, juice, ginger, lemongrass (or lemon zest), chili, garlic and red pepper flakes. Add soy sauce, fish sauce, vinegar and both sugars. Blend well. Gradually add basil, mint and cilantro leaves, scraping down sides of blender after adding each batch. Continue blending until mixture is smooth.If not using immediately, store in refrigerator, covered, up to 3 or 4 days. Before using refrigerated marinade, bring to room temperature.

Southeast Asian cooks try to make use of every part of a fresh ingredient so that nothing goes to waste. The roots of cilantro have a unique flavor that makes a different but equally effective marinade. Some supermarkets sell fresh cilantro with the roots attached. After being rinsed clean under cold running water, cilantro roots can be kept stored in the refrigerator, tightly wrapped in plastic wrap, for two to four days, or longer when frozen.

Place peppercorns, garlic and cilantro roots in a blender, food processor, or a clean spice or coffee grinder. Mix on high speed until mixture turns into a paste-like mixture. Mix in 2 teaspoons of fish sauce. Store refrigerated, tightly covered, until ready to use or for up to 4 days.When ready to use as a marinade paste, turn paste into a large bowl and allow to come to room temperature. Mix in just enough additional fish sauce so paste is thin enough to spread on chicken. Use about 1 teaspoon paste per cutlet, spread marinade thinly on all sides of chicken. Cover and refrigerate overnight or at least 8 hours. Makes 2-3 tablespoons paste marinade, or enough to marinate 6 chicken cutlets.

In addition to serving it as an accompaniment to Grilled Marinated Chicken, the following dipping sauce can be used for many types of cooked foods, such as grilled vegetables. In Asia, this sauce is also considered an all-purpose condiment that is kept on the dinner table so it can be added to any cooked dish, much as ketchup is often used in the United States.

Prepare sauce well before serving. Place vinegar and 2 tablespoons of sugar in a small, non-reactive bowl and whisk or stir until sugar is completely dissolved. Taste and adjust amount of sugar, according to taste. Stir in chili or chili flakes. Allow flavors to meld at least 30 minutes before serving. Stored in a sealed container and refrigerated, sauce will keep up to 5 days.Makes about 1/2 cup dipping sauce. Per tablespoon: 19 calories, 0 g. fat (0 g. saturated fat), 5 g. carbohydrate, 0 g. protein, 0 g. dietary fiber, 1 mg. sodium.

WASHINGTON -- A new report released today by the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) shows that more Americans than ever are eagerly polishing off whatever amount of food is in front of them. The new data also seem to confirm something health experts have feared: Americans have lost sight of the basic relationship between the portions they eat and the weight they carry, and focus too exclusively on cutting out specific types of food such as carbohydrates or fats.

According to the new AICR report, 69 percent of Americans now say that when dining out at table service restaurants, they finish their entrees most of the time or all of the time, up 2 percent from 2000. The number of women who say they finish their entrees every time they eat out has doubled, from 9 percent to 18 percent. This concerns experts at AICR, who point to scientific studies tracking the steady growth of portions in restaurants and fast food outlets over the past 20 years.

Figures from the report, called Awareness and Action: AICR Surveys on Portion Size, Nutrition and Cancer Risk, indicate that Americans have even adopted this passive approach to portions at home. Fully 30 percent of Americans now say they generally base the amount of food they eat on the amount they are served, up 4 percent from previous surveys. Nearly half  42 percent  say they base the amount of food they eat on the amount they are used to eating, up 8 percent from 2000 figures.

These findings are particularly troubling in light of recent scientific studies cited in the AICR report, which show that individuals can and do unconsciously consume more calories  as much as 56 percent more  when served larger portions.

Prince was referring to another set of figures from the new AICR report, which show that 78 percent of Americans still believe the specific kind of food they eat is more important for losing weight than the sheer amount of food they eat. Evidently, a spate of recent health messages about portion distortion have gone unheeded  the tendency to ignore the importance of total calorie intake is just as strong as it was three years ago. Chain Reaction Leads to Increased Risk for Cancer The cancer experts at AICR are concerned about a chain reaction of factors leading to increased cancer risk. Scientists have now documented the steady growth of U.S. portion sizes, and their contribution to the current obesity crisis. Overweight and obesity are significant risk factors for cancer, said Prince.

In one of the surveys, AICR asked Americans to estimate the standard USDA serving sizes for common foods like green beans, nuts, mashed potatoes and cereal. Survey respondents were given several possible amounts for each food, and asked to choose.

Prince was quick to add that USDA standard serving sizes are a unit of measure, not a recommended amount of food. He maintained, however, that Americans fundamental lack of familiarity with such a basic nutritional concept is symptomatic of a large and potentially dangerous problem.

Americans are also getting better at estimating portion sizes. In 2000, 76 percent of those surveyed failed the portion size test administered by AICR, 15 percent more than the number who failed this years test. A whopping 31 percent of Americans in 2000 only got one question right, compared to 7 percent today. Awareness of Obesity-Cancer Link on the RisePerhaps the most encouraging figure in the report, Prince said, dealt with Americans beliefs regarding causes of cancer. When asked to identify significant risk factors for cancer, only 35 percent of Americans surveyed in 2001 recognized the role played by obesity and overweight. Other factors, including many with no proven link to cancer scored much higher, including pesticide residue on produce (72 percent), food additives (53 percent) and stress (48 percent).

Few Americans Acknowledge Portion Creep at Home  Despite the fact that several studies have suggested that bigger portions are finding their way into American homes, only 1 in 5 say that they are eating larger amounts of food at home, and this number has held steady.

It is the opinion of the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) that the FDAs proposed loosening of regulations governing health claims made by food marketers and manufacturers represents a grave disservice to the American public.

AICR is an organization that is deeply involved with ongoing dietary research  we fund science that focuses on how the foods we eat influence cancer risk and overall health, and we hear from an increasingly confused and increasingly frustrated public every day.

Yet scientific consensus builds slowly  particularly when its subject is the myriad and ever-changing combination of foods, nutrients and phytochemicals found in the human diet. After many years and thousands of scientific studies, the international research community has reached agreement on a number of general principles about diet and health. The importance of diets high in a variety of plant foods and low in animal fats is one such principle. But that unanimity was not achieved lightly. The mass of research took many years to build and involved a wide range of scientific studies that differed in design, scope and origin. Because the scientific study of diet and health is still in its infancy, however, the nature of dietary advice remains broad and expansive, not precise and specific.

But food manufacturers and marketers are not concerned with the overall human diet, they are concerned with their product line. They may tout promising but preliminary results with little regard for a wider context. We at AICR believe that the kind of highly specific  and thus premature  health claims made by food manufacturers under the proposed changes will only confuse the public.

Tomatoes are rich in so many good things, including vitamin C, lycopene and assorted carotenes, that eating them every day is a good idea especially now, while local, ripe tomatoes are at their peak. Here are ideas for serving tomatoes in a variety of ways. Delicious now, they will be even more welcome when out-of-season tomatoes need a flavor boost.With their thick, sweet flesh, round cherry and oval grape tomatoes can be a better choice than the regular kind because even if bought at the supermarket, they taste good year round. Theyre great for adding color to a green salad, but they also do well on their own. Halve these miniatures, then toss them with a light dressing of lemon juice, rice wine vinegar and a few drops of olive oil. This dressing makes it possible to serve them as a salad, heaped on a bed of lettuce that gets bathed with their tangy juices and the dressing.Fresh salsa is another treat. Think of adding diced mango, jicama, cucumber, or other produce when making a salsa. A freshly made salsa richly textured with many ingredients can be so irresistible that your family members will each eat a whole cup, providing a healthy two servings of the minimum recommended five-a-day for fruits and vegetables.Remember that juice counts, too, toward those recommended servings. Try this refreshing savory, salsa-flavored smoothie.

Combine cornstarch, curry and sugar in a small bowl. Mix in soy sauce, then chicken broth. Set aside. In a wok or heavy skillet, heat 1 tsp. oil over high heat. Add asparagus, pepper, peas, ginger and garlic. Stir-fry until vegetables are brightly colored, about 1 minute. Transfer them onto a plate with a slotted spoon.Heat remaining 2 tsp. oil. Add shrimp and stir-fry until they turn pink, about 1 minute. Return vegetables to the pan. Stir sauce mixture to recombine and pour into the pan. Simmer gently until shrimp are white in the center, about 2 to 3 minutes. Serve immediately over hot cooked rice.Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 334 calories, 7 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 43 g. carbohydrate, 24 g. protein, 5 g. dietary fiber, 375 mg. sodium.

In a deep, medium skillet over medium heat, toast paprika, cinnamon, and ginger until fragrant, about 1 minute, stirring constantly with wooden spoon. Take care they do not burn. Add squash, eggplant, peppers, onions and garlic. Pour in 3/4 cup water. Add lemon juice. Cover, and bring liquid to boil. Reduce heat and simmer until vegetables are tender, about 15 minutes.Add basil. Season ratatouille to taste with salt and pepper. Cook until eggplant is very soft and stew is thick, about 10 to 15 minutes, stirring occasionally. Cook partially covered if stew is swimming in liquid. Serve at room temperature or slightly chilled. This vegetable stew keeps, tightly covered in refrigerator, four to five days.*Eggplant may be used with or without peel. I cut away and discard outermost parts that are nearly all peel, leaving about half the eggplant with peel on it.Makes 6 servings.Per serving: 46 calories, 0 g. total fat (0 g. saturated fat), 10 g. carbohydrate, 3 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 5 mg. sodium.

New research on ovarian cancer, one of the five most deadly cancers among women in developed countries, suggests that a balanced plant-based diet may help in its prevention. The National Cancer Institute says this strategy is important since ovarian cancer often produces no clear symptoms until late in its development and is difficult to detect through current tests and screenings. Several different studies now show that a mostly plant-based diet offers multiple ways to lower risk of ovarian cancer. In four separate studies in the past two years, women who ate more vegetables and fruits slashed their risk of this cancer one-third to two-thirds compared to women who ate the least produce. Vegetables and fruits contain a variety of protective substances that fight a broad range of cancers. In a new report in the Journal of Nutrition, diets high in fiber were linked with 57 percent lower risk of ovarian cancer, and those highest in carotenoids (beta-carotene and its cousins) faced 67 percent lower risk. In Italy, higher consumption of legumes (dried beans and peas) was linked with 33 percent lower risk, according to a report in the International Journal of Cancer. Protective benefits could come from the fiber and natural phytoestrogens in legumes. Greater use of beans could also reflect more meatless meals; in the same study, higher red meat consumption was linked with more than 50 percent higher ovarian cancer rates.Dietary fat may have positive or negative influence on risk of ovarian cancer. A summary analysis of studies involving more than 6,000 women published in Nutrition and Cancer found that those with higher fat consumption faced greater risk; in particular, eating more animal fat was linked with a 70 percent increase in risk. Yet not all fat is bad. A new study in the International Journal of Cancer reports 40 percent lower ovarian cancer in women with diets highest in omega-3 fat (the type found in salmon and certain other fish, flaxseed and walnuts). Olive oil and certain seed-derived oils may also offer some protection, since an Italian study in Cancer Causes and Control noted women consuming the most faced 32 percent less ovarian cancer than those who ate the least. However, more olive oil consumption may be a marker for diets with more cooked vegetables and salads (especially in Italy), and it could be the higher vegetable consumption truly offering protection. A study of more than 62,000 women showed that body fat may also affect risk. Published in the American Journal of Epidemiology, women with enough excess weight to be classified as obese were almost 70 percent more likely to develop ovarian cancer than those in a healthy weight range. The same study noted earlier that linked greater vegetable, fruit, fiber, and carotenoids with lower risk also reported 25 percent greater risk among those who consumed the most calories. Results like these can be hard to interpret, since such links could reflect the hormonal changes from high caloric intake or excess body fat, or could be a reflection of diets low in fruits and vegetables. More research is needed, but for now, the mostly plant-based diet recommended by the American Institute for Cancer Research to lower overall cancer risk 30 to 40 percent is a good way to help protect against ovarian cancer. But since ovarian cancer can be difficult to detect, talk with your doctor about risk factors and possible ways to help protect yourself.

Although only 2.5 percent of U.S. adults never eat meat, poultry or fish, that is still a considerable 4.8 million people. In addition, 20 to 25 percent of U.S. adults report that they usually or sometimes eat a vegetarian diet. Among the adolescent through college age population, those numbers are estimated to be even higher. For all these people who eat vegetarian-style, the traditional USDA Food Guide Pyramid doesnt indicate how to assure an adequate supply of certain nutrients that can be absent in the diet. A new food guide published in the Journal of the American Dietetic Association, however, illustrates how to go meatless nutritiously.Old recommendations that plant sources of protein must be combined in certain proportions were disproved some time ago. A variety of protein sources throughout the day can add up to meet needs. For children age eight and under and for adults, the new vegetarian food guide calls for five daily servings of protein-rich foods. Adolescents and teens should have six. These can be beans, nuts, seeds, tofu, other soyfoods, vegetarian meat substitutes (such as veggie burgers), eggs, or dairy products. Although five servings may seem like a lot, relatively small amounts, such as a half-cup of beans, a quarter-cup of nuts, or one egg, count as one serving.Meeting calcium needs is a concern for everyone, but this is especially true for vegetarians who dont eat dairy products. The new food guides group of calcium-rich foods includes protein-rich foods (such as cows milk products, soymilk and soynuts), as well as vegetables (broccoli), fruits (fortified fruit juice), and grains (calcium-fortified cereal). The guide recommends a number of servings based on a persons age. It is important to note that vegetables such as bok choy, kale and mustard greens count as calcium-rich foods, but not all dark greens do. Spinach, beet greens and Swiss chard are high in calcium, but their high levels of oxalate bind calcium and reduce its absorption. However, even with calcium-rich greens, it takes a whole cooked cup of them to provide the calcium in a half-cup of milk. While these veggies may help meet calcium needs, most people will need other good calcium sources.Tips for meal planning issued with the new food guide list vital additional recommendations, such as including at least three good sources of vitamin B-12 daily. Those who dont consume enough dairy products, eggs, fortified soymilk, cereal, or nutritional yeast need a supplement. Moreover, according to a new statement from the American Dietetic Association, people need soymilk, cereal fortified with vitamin D, or a supplement with D to preserve bone health, if they dont have dairy products regularly or lack adequate sun exposure.The food guide also highlights our need for healthy fats. Omega-3 fats, important for heart health and possibly cancer prevention, can be low in the diet without fish, eggs or sea vegetables. The guide calls for two servings daily of omega-3 sources, such as flaxseed or flaxseed oil, canola or soybean oil, or walnuts. Small amounts of olive and canola oils, mayonnaise, soft margarine, or the fat inherent in nuts, seeds and avocados provide other needed nutrients.The new vegetarian food guide provides detailed guidance for people who want to plan healthy meatless meals and diets. The guide makes clear that a diet is not healthy because of what you leave out. On the contrary, a good diet comes from including all the foods you need to bolster good health.

WINTER'S NOT THE ONLY SOUP SEASONfrom theAmerican Institute for Cancer ResearchSoup may not be the first thing that comes to mind for a summer meal, but a light vegetable soup makes a refreshing change from the more typical vegetable dishes of the season. And summer is a great time to make soup with vine-ripe tomatoes, corn straight from the field, freshly dug new potatoes and other locally grown vegetables at the peak of flavor.Great fresh vegetables elevate minestrone and sweet corn chowder to perfection. Other ingredients less often associated with summer soups should also be given a second look.A light lentil and vegetable soup with eggplant and parsley, like many Italian soups, is quick and easy to make. Lentils are rich in protein and have long been used as a meat substitute. They are popular in parts of Europe and a staple throughout much of the Middle East and India.They are good sources of many phytochemicals, natural compounds with the ability to prevent the cancer process from beginning, or to stop already cancerous cells from becoming tumors. Lentils have a fair amount of calcium and vitamins A and B, and are a good source of iron and phosphorus.Unlike dried beans and other legumes, lentils dont require soaking. They also cook in less time than dried beans or other legumes, and have fewer calories per serving than many kinds of beans. Lentils are not used fresh, but are dried as soon as theyre ripe. They should be stored airtight at room temperature and will keep up to a year.

In a small bowl, combine all spices and salt together. Mix 1 tablespoon of the mixture into the mayonnaise and set aside. Lightly rub each side of the fillets with the dry spice mixture and let it sit 10 minutes. (This spice mixture is also delicious on other kinds of fish as well as on chicken and pork.)Lightly coat fish with corn meal. Heat oil in a medium skillet over medium-high heat. Saut? fish until browned on both sides. Reducing heat, if necessary, cook until fish is opaque in the center at the thickest points, about 4 to 5 minutes. Spread a thin layer of seasoned mayonnaise on the surface of the bottom and top buns. Reserve remaining mayonnaise mixture for another use.) Cover bottom of each bun with one-quarter of the lettuce. Add a slice of tomato to each. Top each with a fillet. Add a tomato slice on top each fillet and cover with top of bun. Serve immediately.Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 313 calories, 14 g. total fat (2 g. saturated fat), 29 g. carbohydrate, 18 g. protein, 4 g. dietary fiber, 603 mg. sodium.

Q: Is it safe for teenagers to be vegetarians? My son has been exhausted since he became one.A: Vegetarian eating is safe, but it poses a special challenge to teenage boys because of very high calorie needs during growth. Since vegetarian eating, with its emphasis on grain products, fruits and vegetables, contains so much bulk, it can be difficult for those with high energy needs to eat enough. Without the fat otherwise found in meats, there is room for oil, margarine and salad dressing several times daily as a source of calories and needed fat. Another problem may be inadequate protein. We dont need meat for protein, but just eating more pasta and fruit wont meet needs. A teenage boy needs two to three daily servings of meat alternatives that supply the protein and minerals such as iron and zinc found in meats. One serving might be a half-cup of beans in chili, soup, or salad; a quarter-cup of nuts or seeds; one egg; or two tablespoons of peanut butter. Perhaps hed like to try some of the veggie burgers and vegetarian versions of foods, like chicken nuggets or sausage, available in grocery freezer sections. These meat alternatives are needed in addition to the three servings of milk products needed each day to provide the calcium (as well as protein) that teens need. If he tries all these suggestions and still seems more tired than usual, check with his doctor for other possible problems.

Fiber fell out of the limelight over the last few years, but two major new studies have put it back in the spotlight, confirming what experts have said all along: fiber matters. In a new study of more than half a million people across Europe, those who ate the most fiber had 42 percent less colorectal cancer than those who ate the least. As we try to understand a complex picture, additional insight is offered by another new study that links diets higher in fiber to a reduced chance of non-malignant colon polyps. The idea that fiber could help prevent colon cancer was based on observations that colon cancer was very rare among those who had a high-fiber diet. Laboratory studies showed several ways fiber could offer protection: diluting the concentration of cancer-causing substances in the digestive tract with greater bulk; speeding passage through the tract, binding digestive substances to prevent them from developing into carcinogens; and fermenting, which forms substances that seem to protect against colon cancer. Then, in 1999 and in 2001, several studies showed no relation between fiber intake and the risk of colon cancer or polyps. Reports on colon cancers strong tie to nutrition and lifestyle have lately focused more on a combination of factors about how excess weight can increase that cancers risk: a sedentary lifestyle and diets too low in fruits and vegetables but too high in red meat.Now, we are brought back full circle with the EPIC study (European Prospective Investigation into Cancer), which appeared in the medical journal, Lancet. The study involved people from more than 10 European countries and shows major differences in the incidence of colon cancer, based on fiber intake. Along with an American study sponsored by the National Cancer Institute (NCI), linking fiber with less risk of colon polyps (also published in Lancet), the EPIC study adds new insight that shows why the other studies may have missed seeing what fiber can do.Looking only within one population  only American women, for example  may not involve enough variation in fiber consumption to see any difference in the effect. Studying the widely varying diets of men and women from across Europe shows the true impact on cancer risk more clearly.These studies should sound a wake-up call to many Americans. In a recent study in the International Journal of Epidemiology, which shows no link between fiber and lowered cancer risk, the American women who consumed what was considered the most fiber were getting an amount similar to the lowest fiber-consuming group in the EPIC study. In fact, average American fiber consumption is similar to the lowest 20 percent of fiber consumption in the EPIC study, the level associated with greater colon cancer risk. The amount of particular types of fiber consumed may also play a role. The recent European (EPIC) and American NCI studies suggest that the fiber from grain products and fruits may have more impact on cancer risk than fiber from other foods. In the earlier studies, even the high-fiber group consumed relatively less grain fiber compared to those in the EPIC study. That may account for the failure to find a link between fiber and reduced risk of colon cancer.Fiber cant do it alone, but the mostly plant-based diet advocated by the American Institute for Cancer Research  focusing on whole grains, fruits, vegetables and beans  can lower the risk of colon cancer and the polyps from which such cancers can arise.

A recent review of weight loss ads by the Federal Trade Commission (FTC) found that more than half the ads contained one or more false or unsubstantiated claims. The FTC warns that consumers trying to lose weight are spending billions of dollars on products and services that are not effective, and may even increase their health risks.The FTC review covers over 300 ads from television, radio, magazines, newspapers, the Internet and direct mail. Of those ads, 57 percent included misleading claims for rapid weight loss. Many claimed that weight would be lost in just two days, or that people could lose eight to ten (or more) pounds a week. Experts say that such weight loss is unlikely to happen, but would be potentially harmful if it did. They generally consider a loss of one to two pounds a week a safe rate. Almost half the ads baldly suggested that no diet or exercise is needed, which completely contradicts sound research. The old phrase, If it sounds too good to be true, it probably is, applies here.Forty-one percent of the FTC-reviewed ads claimed that their product could produce permanent weight loss, but provided no scientific studies to substantiate these claims. Such a claim may be particularly appealing to the many people who have lost weight on various diets but then regained it. Permanent weight loss is hard to achieve. The National Weight Control Registry, which tracks people who have successfully maintained substantial weight loss, finds that key factors include continued changes in eating habits and frequent physical activity. People who have lost and regained weight dont need special products to achieve permanent weight loss. They need eating and exercise changes they can really stick to.Claims that a product is clinically proven or doctor endorsed are also misleading. If scientifically proven, the research should be found in scientific or medical journals that are peer-reviewed, assessed by scientists or others with established expertise on the subject. That is rarely the case. Also suspect are ads that do not disclose whether an expert endorsing the product has any financial interest in its promotion.Money-back guarantees were included in 52 percent of the ads reviewed. But the FTC notes that it has had to pursue a number of companies who dont follow through on such promises.Claims that a product is safe or natural are often made. But many dont list the ingredients so consumers can check on their safety. Some products with a safety claim list warnings that people who have high blood pressure or take heart medications should not use the product  but in small print. Some ads are misleading: 48 percent of products listing ephedra as an ingredient noted their products were safe. But an analysis in the Journal of the American Medical Association examined 117 studies of ephedra and concluded that it significantly raises the risk of heart and other health problems.A common strategy was the use of before and after photos. Experts reviewing ads for the FTC noted that these testimonials rarely portray realistic loss. Somewhere in the fine print the ads often note individual results likely to differ. When the photos are examined closely, differences in posture, lighting, expression and photo quality make it difficult to make accurate judgments. And photos can be altered. The FTC urges consumers trying to lose weight to be skeptical about ads and commercials promising a quick fix. To lose and maintain a healthy weight, experts like the American Institute for Cancer Research advise a combination of a diet rich in vegetables and fruit and portion control, plus regular exercise.

ASK FOR GRAINS ON THE SIDEfrom theAmerican Institute for Cancer ResearchSummertime and the cooking as well as the living should be easy. Perhaps something grilled, with boiled corn and fruit for dessert. Adding an easy salad or side dish will provide a touch of simple elegance to the meal.The American Institute for Cancer Research urges Americans to fill at least two-thirds of their plates with plant-based foods primarily vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans that actively fight chronic diseases like cancer, while reserving one-third or less of the plate for meat, poultry or fish.Summer side dishes are a good way to meet this goal. With a few, simple additions, for example, you can turn any cooked grain into an attractive, flavorful dish. Whole-grain dishes can take full advantage of the flavors, textures and colors of additional plant-based ingredients, like vegetables, fruits and nuts. They also increase the vitamins, minerals and other natural, cancer-fighting substances in a meal.Research done in the last decade shows that plant foods contain thousands of natural compounds called phytochemicals, with the ability to prevent the cancer process from starting, or stop already cancerous cells from becoming tumors. Because phytochemicals seem to work together in complex ways that are not yet fully understood, the ideal diet is one that is rich in a wide variety of plant-based foods.A whole grain is one that has all three major elements of the grain: the outer layer, or bran; the large, middle section; and the core, or germ. Processing removes the nutritious bran and germ, and are therefore missing from refined breads and other refined grain products. Whole grains and refined grains differ in a number of ways. Unlike refined grainproducts, whole-grain foods are rich in many substances that are cancer-protective, like antioxidants, phytoestrogens, vitamin E, folic acid, zinc, selenium and magnesium. Because whole grains are more nutrient-dense, they provide more dietary fiber and keep you feeling full longer than refined grains do.A grain-based dish can be as rich in flavor as it is in health-protective substances. With a few simple, colorful additions, a bowl of rice can be the star of the meal.

Fill a wide, shallow container with cantaloupe and place in microwave. Cook at 50 percent power for 2 minutes, or just until melon softens slightly. Transfer cantaloupe to a blender or food processor. Add honey, lime juice and cardamon, and blend until smooth. Refrigerate until cold. Before serving, taste and adjust seasoning if necessary with more honey, cardamon and/or lime juice. Garnish with strawberry slices and mint leaves. Makes four 1-cup servings.Per serving: 85 calories, 0 g. total fat (0 g. saturated fat), 22 g. carbohydrate, 1 g. protein, 1 g. dietary fiber, 26 mg. sodium.

Drain pineapple, reserving 2 tablespoons juice for dressing. In a small bowl make the dressing by whisking the reserved pineapple juice with garlic powder, oil, vinegar, lemon juice, mustard and basil. In a large bowl, toss together remaining ingredients. Drizzle in dressing and toss to combine well. Chill before serving. Garnish with parsley, if desired.Makes 12 three-quarter cup servings.Per serving: 102 calories, 2 g. total fat (0 g. saturated fat), 20 g. carbohydrate, 3 g. protein, 2 g. dietary fiber, 82 mg. sodium.

Place yogurt, lemon juice and seasonings in a blender and mix at low speed until well combined.Place chicken breasts (or other kinds of meat) in a non-metal pan. Add yogurt mixture, mixing with a wooden or plastic spoon until chicken is well coated. Cover the pan and marinate in the refrigerator up to 60 minutes.Take chicken out of marinade and remove excess marinade with paper toweling. Grill chicken until cooked through (when juices run clear), turning frequently to prevent charring.Makes enough for 4 servings (for 3/4-1 lb. skinless chicken breasts).Per serving: 62 calories, 1 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 8 g. carbohydrate, 5 g. protein, 0 g. dietary fiber, 65 mg. sodium.

Combine all ingredients in a blender and mix on low speed until smooth. Transfer to a non-metal pan. Add meat, poultry, or fish and mix with a non-metal spoon until thoroughly coated.Cover and let stand for 30 minutes at room temperature or refrigerate for 1 hour. Take food out of marinade and remove excess marinade with paper toweling.Grill until cooked, turning frequently to prevent charring. Makes enough marinade for 3/4-1 lb. meat, chicken or fish, or 4 servings. Per serving: 31 calories, less than 1 g. total fat (0 g. saturated fat), 8 g. carbohydrate, less than 1 g. protein, 1 g. dietary fiber, 518 mg. sodium.

Preheat oven to 375 degrees, with the rack in the center. Coat an 11x7x1-1/2-inch square baking dish with cooking spray.In a blender or food processor, mix ricotta cheeses, cream cheese and eggs until creamy. Add sugar, flour, salt, vanilla and lemon juice. Whirl to blend well.Use a hand mixer or whisk to beat egg whites in a medium bowl until soft peaks form. Pour in one-quarter of the cheese mixture. Mix gently with rubber spatula, leaving mixture streaky. Pour in remaining cheese mixture and fold it gently into the whites. Pour mixture into the prepared baking dish. Arrange peaches in three long rows on top.Bake 40 minutes, or until souffl? is browned and puffed, and knife inserted in the center comes out almost clean. Let souffl? sit 15 minutes before serving. Spoon onto dessert plates to serve. Makes 6 servings.Per serving: 326 calories, 12 g. total fat (7 g. saturated fat), 42 g. carbohydrate, 14 g. protein, 1 g. dietary fiber, 407 mg. sodium.

Heat the oil in a medium Dutch oven or deep, heavy pot over medium-high heat. Saut? onions and celery until onions are translucent, about 5 minutes. Add garlic and chiles. Cook 1 minute. Mix in tomatoes and cook until they start to soften, about 5 minutes, stirring occasionally.Mix rice into the vegetables, making sure kernels are coated with oil. Stir in tomato sauce. Add water, bay leaf and salt. Cover pot tightly. When the liquid comes to a boil, reduce heat to medium-low and simmer until rice is done, about 45 minutes, stirring and checking cooking progress occasionally. Let rice sit, covered, for 15 minutes. Season rice with salt and pepper to taste. Fluff moist rice with a fork before serving. Garnish with the parsley. Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 236 calories, 5 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 43 g. carbohydrate, 5 g. protein, 5 g. dietary fiber, 71 mg. sodium.

In a non-stick skillet, toast sesame seeds over medium heat until fragrant. Transfer seeds to a bowl. Heat 1 teaspoon oil in the skillet over high heat. Sear meat until browned on one side, about 1 minute. Turn and cook until meat is pink in the center, about 2 minutes. Transfer to a large bowl along with any juices.Heat 1 teaspoon oil in the pan over medium-high heat. Saut? the onion until browned, about 5 minutes. Add to the bowl of meat. Reheat the pan. Stir in carrots and garlic. Add 2 tablespoons broth. Stir-fry 1 minute. Mix in squash and remaining broth. Stir-fry until squash is bright green but still al dente. Add mushrooms and heat through. Add vegetables to the meat.Use hands to break up dry rice noodles into short lengths. Place noodles in a bowl and cover with boiling water. Let sit until just tender but not mushy, about 1 to 2 minutes. Drain. Add to meat and vegetables.Combine soy sauce, juice, black pepper and remaining oil. Pour over salad. Add sesame seeds. Toss to mix well. Season salad to taste with salt and pepper. Serve warm.Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 306 calories, 9 g. total fat (2 g. saturated fat), 30 g. carbohydrate, 24 g. protein, 2 g. dietary fiber, 310 mg. sodium.

Cancer rates are set to increase another 50 percent by the year 2020 if we dont take preventive steps soon, according to a new report from the World Health Organization (WHO). But the report also notes that if populations act now, we could get cancer rates down to even lower levels than todays. The key? The report says behavior changes in diet and in tobacco and alcohol use could prevent far more cancers than eliminating toxins like industrial pollution, car exhaust and dioxins.The new World Cancer Report predicts that the ten million new cancer cases globally as of the year 2000 could increase to 15 million new cases by 2020. This projection is the same as that of a landmark global report on cancer by the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) six years ago. Both WHOs and AICRs reports call for strategies and policies directed at changes in behavior by both individuals and communities that could make healthier diet and lifestyle choices preferable and more accessible.The World Cancer Report is based partly on the WHOs recent Expert Report on Diet and Chronic Disease, which looks at the increasing worldwide rates of cancer as well as heart disease, diabetes and obesity. Both the recent WHO Expert Report and the earlier AICR report note that in developed countries, cancer risks are climbing due to increasingly sedentary lifestyles and diets that are high in fat and sugar but low in fruits, vegetables, legumes and whole grains. In developing nations, the risk is mounting due to rapid growth of the urban poor who move from rural areas into vast cities. That migration results in a loss of traditional agriculture and dietary habits, plus an increased use of processed foods and drinks.The new WHO World Cancer Report states that half of regular smokers are killed by their use of tobacco. A regular smoker reportedly faces 20 to 30 times greater risk of lung cancer than a nonsmoker. Increased use of tobacco in many developing countries, and in youth worldwide, is particularly worrisome.Sedentary lifestyles worldwide are identified in all three reports as another significant cancer risk. Both WHO and AICR call for one hour of moderate exercise (like walking) daily. Moderate exercise could directly fight colon and certain other cancers, and form a vital step in reaching and maintaining a healthy weight. To foster more physical exercise, our outdoor environments need to be created so that people can walk, jog and cycle safely.All three reports agree that the international epidemic of obesity is a major part of the growing cancer threat. The WHO report blames diets too high in fat and sugar, along with inadequate physical activity, as the primary worldwide causes of obesity. In recent years, AICR has stated that, at least in the U.S., escalating portion sizes are also involved.The other major recommendation of the new WHO report focuses on increasing consumption of fruits and vegetables in order to decrease the risk of many cancers. AICR estimates that eating five to ten servings of a variety of fruits and vegetables daily could prevent at least 20 percent of cancers. Other recommended steps include a plant-based diet (limiting red meat in particular to no more than three ounces daily), limiting fat consumption (especially saturated fat) and avoiding or carefully limiting alcohol.Back in 1997, the AICR report set a target of decreasing global cancer incidence 10 to 20 percent by about 2020 or sooner. Five years later, WHOs cancer report underscores this target, saying we could significantly lower cancer incidence by then. But WHO also reminds us that we need to act soon to avoid the other possibility, a dramatic rise.

If you cant figure out how to cut down calorie consumption, or if youre having trouble getting all the fruits and vegetables you know your body needs, the answer may be right in front of you. Look at whats on your plate: any time you see fruit or vegetables in tiny, garnish-like amounts (or absent completely) is an opportunity to trade some food on your plate for more fruits or vegetables. In the process, youll probably cut calories, too.Simple trades in portions solve a lot of problems. For example, although the serving size posted on a box of cereal is often one cup, many people find that, if they actually measure their usual portion, its close to two cups, or 180 to 200 calories more than they thought they consumed. If they would eat just one cup of cereal and filled the rest of the bowl with sliced fruit, theyd be just as full. They would also have consumed about 100 fewer calories. And they would be starting the day with the fruits fiber and nutrients that are so important to good health.Pasta salad is another great place to make a switch. Most versions contain 90 percent pasta. A little chopped celery, carrot, or pepper is added for color and crunch, but not enough to provide a servings worth of antioxidants and health-promoting phytochemicals. Many people concerned about calorie content focus on the amount and type of salad dressing they use. But there is another, major consideration. Each half-cup of pasta supplies about 100 calories, but the same amount of chopped vegetables supplies only about 25. By switching the proportions of salad ingredients so there are at least equal amounts of vegetables and pasta (preferably, more veggies), you can cut at least 75 calories from each one-cup portion.You can use this technique even if you buy your salad at the deli. Start with the regular pasta salad and add an equal amount of chopped vegetables. (Use the salad bar if youre rushed.) So much dressing is usually used on these salads that yours will likely still be moist with the added vegetables. But, if needed, use only a dash more dressing or light mayonnaise to reach the right consistency.Proportions can also get out of control with sandwiches and subs. To keep hunger at bay for several hours, adequate protein is important. But a towering sandwich or sub with a mountain of meat and a single lettuce leaf and slice of tomato is out of proportion. Start with two to three ounces of turkey or other lean meat, or a low-fat cheese or vegetarian filling. Then supersize it by piling on tomatoes, cucumbers, peppers, zucchini and other veggies. The same principle applies to eating ice cream, which sometimes is garnished with a dab of strawberry sauce. Turn that bowl of ice cream into a colorful fruit fiesta. Stick to a half-cup of ice cream (preferably low-fat), and fill the rest of the bowl with whatever fruit is in season. The calorie savings add up quickly, and its a delicious way to feast on fruit. The idea is to have a little ice cream with your fruit, not a little fruit with your ice cream.Each half-cup (a handful-size) portion of potatoes, pasta, rice, or cereal has about 100 calories. Lean meat, poultry and fish contain about the same amount, but high-fat ground meat and deep-fried or breaded choices are at least double that. On the other hand, the same one-half cup filled with most vegetables (without added fat) is only 25 calories, and a similar portion of fruit (without added sugar) averages about 50 calories. Each half-cup trade to boost fruit or vegetables saves 50 to 75 calories. Yet youll still eat the same total amount of food. And youre a half-cup closer to the recommended five to ten servings of fruits and vegetables recommended by health experts.

WASHINGTON The first results from the largest scientific study to ever investigate the links between diet and cancer risk are in, and they strongly support a role for dietary fiber in the prevention of colon cancer. Experts at the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) and the World Cancer Research Fund International (WCRF International) today welcomed these newly published findings, and expressed hope that they will help to clarify what has become to many a confusing and controversial issue.

Results from the European Prospective Investigation into Cancer (EPIC) study appear in the May 3 edition of the British journal The Lancet. Researchers tracked the diets of 519,978 subjects in ten European countries for an average of 4.5 years. They found that those subjects who ate the most dietary fiber (averaging 35 g/day) had their risk of colon cancer reduced by 40 percent, compared with subjects who ate the least fiber (averaging 15 g/day). The study focused strictly on dietary fiber, and did not investigate the effect of fiber supplements.

A 1997 expert panel report by AICR/WCRF concluded that there is convincing evidence that diets rich in dietary fiber (i.e., diets centered around a variety of fruits, vegetables, whole grains and beans) are linked to lower risk of several cancers, including colon cancer. In the past few years, some studies that have investigated the specific role of dietary fiber in colon cancer risk have found no protective association. These studies received a great deal of attention, and convinced many in the public to conclude that no link exists.

AICR experts have repeatedly urged caution in interpreting research results, and insist that any new scientific study can only add to the scientific debate, not close it. Scientific consensus builds slowly, which is why its always necessary to view new results in the context of what has gone before, said Ritva Butrum, Ph.D., AICRs Vice-President for Research.

Studies that investigate populations where there is little variation in the amount of fiber consumed, or in the kind of food that fiber comes from, have a more difficult time isolating links between fiber and disease risk.

The debate on the existence of a fiber-colon cancer link continues. The authors of a paper appearing in the May 3 issue of the International Journal of Epidemiology (IJE) found no evidence that dietary fiber protected against colon cancer among a group of older women. The 45, 491 women, whose diets had been previously assessed in a breast cancer study, filled out follow-up dietary questionnaires over a period of 8 years.

Dr. Butrum noted, however, that even those subjects who reported consuming the most fiber in the IJE study were eating amounts below the 20-35 g/day recommended by health experts for chronic disease prevention. In fact, the amount of dietary fiber eaten by the subjects in IJE studys high-fiber group was roughly equal to the amount eaten by subjects with the lowest fiber intake in both of the two Lancet studies.

Cancer Number Threeby the American Institute for Cancer Research Among the cancers men and women develop in the U.S., colon cancer ranks third. Yet scientists estimate that dietary changes could prevent up to 75 percent of these cases. While a high-fiber, lowfat diet is considered crucial, getting enough folate, vitamin D and exercise, as well as avoiding meat cooked at high temperatures, are also important.

Fiber FirstTraditional diets composed mainly of fiber from vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans, such as in Asia, appear to help prevent colon cancer. Although scientists are not sure how, three theories exist. First, fiber is thought to counteract cancer-causing conditions in the large intestine by speeding up the transit time of waste. Second, fiber absorbs bile acids, which researchers have claimed to be an important factor in preventing colon cancer. The amount and type of fat in the diet strongly influence the amount of bile acids in the colon. Third, fermentation of fiber in the colon creates a byproduct called butyrate, which has anticancer effects.

Other Factors That Lower RiskVegetables (especially leafy greens), fruits and beans provide both fiber and folate, a B vitamin and essential nutrient. Because the body stores only a small amount of folate, a healthy diet must regularly include foods that contain it. Diets with a folate deficiency  even if they are low in fat and high in fiber  are associated with colon cancer risk. Vitamin D, which comes from milk, fatty fish and the sun, also has been linked to lower colon cancer incidence. Twenty minutes of daily sun exposure provides the recommended amount of vitamin D.Meat cooked at high temperatures seems to increase risk. Well-cooked meats contain carcinogenic substances called heterocyclic amines (HCAs). Studies show that people who frequently eat well-browned meat containing high levels of HCAs have an increased risk of colon cancer.Lastly, convincing evidence links exercise with a 40-50 percent reduction in colon cancer risk. Exercise may protect the colon because it speeds the movement of food through the intestine and decreases bile acid secretion. The American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) recommends an hour a day of moderate activity that raises the heart rate and causes a slight perspiration, like a brisk walk.

Be Cool with a Smoothieby the American Institute for Cancer Research Smoothies have spilled out of health food stores and gone mainstream. Juice bars serve blender-whipped yogurt and fruit drinks in the mall and at the market. They can be a great way to increase your daily servings of fruit. But like many commercialized foods, the store-bought smoothie can contain more fat, sugar and calories than its healthy appearance suggests. Some varieties claim to lower cholesterol, increase athletic performance and boost your intake of vitamins. But you should watch what goes in the mixture. Peanut butter and chocolate, for example, dont make a low-fat, nutritious meal.

Brush bread slices on one side with the oil. Grill, oil side down, until well marked, 3-4 minutes. Turn and grill on second side, 1-2 minutes. This can be done directly on rack in center of oven, turning bread after 4 minutes, or on top of stove, in ridged grill pan. Using cut side of garlic, rub warm bread liberally on oiled side. Arrange 2-3 tomato slices to cover each bruschetta. Arrange on serving plate, and set aside.

In bowl, beat eggs with milk, cheese, oregano, and pepper until well combined. Coat medium non-stick skillet with cooking spray. Set pan over medium-high heat. When pan is hot, reduce heat to medium. Pour in egg mixture. Using wooden spoon or spatula, stir and gather egg together as it coagulates, keeping it moving until softly scrambled and moist, but cooked through.

Coat nonstick skillet with cooking spray, and place over medium high heat. Saute shiitakes until tender and lightly browned, 6-7 minutes. Place mushrooms in large mixing bowl. Add beans, salmon, and scallions.

In large pot of boiling water, cook soba until it is still slightly hard in center, about 5 minutes. Pasta must be slightly underdone, or it becomes mushy. Immediately drain, rinse soba in cold water, and drain well. If using linguini, follow package directions, cooking it al dente. Rinse drained pasta, as for soba. Place pasta in bowl with vegetables and salmon.

In small bowl, whisk together lemon juice, soy sauce, sugar, ginger, pepper flakes, and black pepper. Whisk in oyster sauce and sesame oil. Pour dressing over pasta and vegetables. Using two forks, gently toss pasta to coat lightly with dressing, leaving most of the other ingredients in bottom of bowl.

Arrange pasta on serving platter. Spoon green bean and mushroom mixture over pasta. Pour dressing remaining in bowl over salad. Sprinkle on sesame seeds. Serve within one hour, covering and refrigerating salad if not serving immediately.

The quality of the feedback provided by various diet analysis sites varies. Some compare your intake to the Recommended Dietary Allowances (RDAs) for your specific age and sex. If so, make sure those RDA values are up-to-date. Other sites compare intake to the Daily Values used on food labels, but this is less accurate, because that single standard for average adults may not apply to you. Check, too, whether you can individualize your nutritional goals. Those with high blood cholesterol might have been instructed to aim for no more than 7 percent of their calories from saturated fat, instead of the 10 percent advocated for most of us. One of the problems with the feedback from these automated diet analysis sites is that it can only compare your intake to a quantifiable goal, like RDAs or a specific number of daily calories. Yet experts like the American Institute for Cancer Research point out that while you may meet RDAs through fortified drinks and cereals, if you dont get enough fruits, vegetables, whole grains and beans, you are still missing powerful natural phytochemicals that may help prevent cancer and other diseases.Finally, nutrition analysis is not the same as nutrition counseling. See a registered dietitian if you want help setting nutritional goals appropriate to your individual health needs, or for coaching on how to go from the here identified by online diet analysis to the there of your personal health goals.

Canola oil spray3/4 cup unbleached flour1/4 tsp. salt1/4 tsp. baking soda1/2 tsp. ground cinnamon1/4 tsp. ground allspice1 cup quick-cooking oats (not instant)1/3 cup raisins1/4 cup chopped walnuts1 large egg white3 Tbsp. butter (preferably unsalted), cut in 1/2-inch pieces1/2 cup (packed) dark brown sugar1 small banana, cut in 1-inch pieces1 tsp. vanilla extract Set baking racks in top and lower thirds of the oven. Preheat oven to 400 degrees. Coat 2 baking pans or cookie sheets with oil spray.Whisk together flour, salt, baking soda, cinnamon and allspice in a mixing bowl. Mix in oats, raisins and nuts. In a blender on medium speed, mix egg white, butter and sugar until smooth. Blend in banana and vanilla until mixture is smooth. Pour banana mixture into bowl with dry ingredients, mixing with spatula until well combined. Batter will be fairly stiff.Drop batter by walnut-size spoonfuls onto prepared baking sheets, spacing cookies at least 2 inches apart. Flatten them slightly with the back of a wet spoon, wetting spoon frequently between cookies, to make 2-inch cookies.Bake 10 minutes. Switch position of pans in oven. Bake an additional 5 to 8 minutes or until cookies are golden brown and almost firm in the center when pressed with a finger. Transfer cookies to a baking rack and cool. Stored in airtight container, these cookies keep up to 1 week.Makes 2 dozen cookies.Per cookie: 76 calories, 3 g. total fat (1 g. saturated fat), 13 g. carbohydrate, 1 g. protein, <1 g. dietary fiber, 42 mg. sodium.

Environmental Influences on Breast CancerKaren Collins, MS, RD, CDNAmerican Institute for Cancer ResearchWhen more cancer cases occur in a particular area than would be considered normal, we may wonder whether something in the environment is responsible. Now studies sponsored by the National Cancer Institute (NCI) conclude that, although some chemicals from pesticides appear to pose little or no breast cancer risk, one class of pollutants is associated with a modest increase in risk. This points the way for future research, and also suggests the advisability of a lifestyle designed to counteract negative environmental influences.The Long Island Breast Cancer Study Project was designed to look at the regions somewhat higher risk of breast cancer. Two reports that emerged from this project, published in Cancer Epidemiology, Biomarkers and Prevention, compared questionnaires and blood and urine samples from women with and without newly-diagnosed breast cancer. Dust, water and soil samples were tested from some of their homes as well.Chemicals known as organochlorines, compounds with estrogen-like properties that are found in some pesticides, were not related to any significant increase in breast cancer risk in the population as a whole, or even in sub-groups that are statistically at higher risk. But the researchers noted that some individuals might face a greater risk from organochlorine exposure, due to differences in peoples ability to repair DNA damage.PAHs (polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons), another category of environmental chemicals, are powerful carcinogens in rodents, but their impact in women has been unclear. In the Long Island study, women with the highest levels of a marker of PAH damage to DNA had a modest increase in risk compared to those with the lowest levels. While significant, this risk appears to be small  between one quarter to one half of the risk that is associated with a family history of breast cancer. (Note: A family history of breast cancer accounts for only about 5 to 10 percent of overall breast cancer risk.) PAHs are pollutants formed during the burning of gasoline, coal, wood and oil, so people in urban areas with heavy traffic exhaust face higher PAH levels. PAHs are also found in tobacco smoke and in meat and seafood that is grilled. Smoking increases a persons PAH exposure 30-fold. Cancer risk from environmental chemicals can result from an interaction with various genetic and lifestyle influences. For example, many chemicals have to be activated by body enzymes in order to become carcinogenic. Genetic differences in enzyme levels and diet may influence whether activation reactions are pushed forward or slowed down. Natural phytochemicals in vegetables and fruits affect these enzyme levels, lowering the risk that a variety of carcinogens might otherwise pose.Based on the results of studies so far, women are advised to take the following steps. First, to reduce exposure to PAHs, dont smoke; try to avoid secondhand (environmental) smoke; curb consumption of grilled and smoked meat, poultry and seafood; and avoid black char on these foods. Second, adopt the mostly plant-based diet recommended by the American Institute for Cancer Research. Generous servings of fruit and vegetables will supply a variety of the phytochemicals that stimulate protective enzymes. Third, keep your eye on the big picture: maintaining a healthy weight, keeping physically active and carefully limiting alcohol could conceivably prevent up to 20 percent of breast cancer cases. And, to be on the safe side, when using insecticides or other environmental chemicals, follow package directions carefully and wear protective gear.

TIME TO DINE ALLA PRIMAVERAfrom theAmerican Institute for Cancer ResearchAfter a long winter of the same cold-weather vegetables, spring is a time to celebrate the seasons new crops. Palates yearn for fresh asparagus, peas and beans that begin to appear in grocery stores and farmers markets. And you can have it all at once. Any variety of fresh vegetables are great to mix together and serve alla primavera, which in Italian simply means spring style, and refers to the use of vegetables in various dishes. One of the most popular dishes prepared this way is Pasta Primavera, pasta tossed or topped with raw and blanched vegetables. Pasta can be a staple of a healthful diet, and pasta primavera does not have to be smothered in cream sauce or laden with oil to enhance flavor. In the following recipe, the inherent, or natural, flavors of spring vegetables shine through a light tomato sauce. This dish is a nice way to showcase the seasons harvest of new vegetables.The American Institute of Cancer Research recommends an approach called The New American Plate to help people rethink their eating habits so that their diet is richer in cancer-protective foods. Nutritionists agree that vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans should cover two-thirds (or more) of the plate. Animal-based foods should cover one-third (or less). Studies show a strong connection between prevention of cancer as well as other chronic diseases and plant-based foods like vegetables and whole grains. In addition to adding color and crunch to the following spring dish, the vegetables add nutrients and fiber. Asparagus are high in vitamins A, B and C, and a source of iron and potassium. Green beans have a fair amount of vitamins A and C. Translucent, bright green snow peas are entirely edible legumes, including the pod. Although snow peas are available year round, they are at their peak in spring. Frozen snow peas can also be used.

The American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) says the widespread all or nothing approach to carbohydrates, chiefly inspired by misreadings of popular diets, is simply too simplistic and potentially dangerous.

Thats why the most recent issue of the quarterly AICR Newsletter, arriving this week in some 1.5 million American homes, features a front-page story that clarifies this timely issue in a concrete, easy-to-understand style.

Polk points out that even the most restrictive low-carb diets qualify their position with regard to healthy foods that contain carbohydrates. Acknowledging that vegetables, fruits and whole grains provide health benefits and protection from chronic disease, most high-protein diets manage to make some room for these important foods.

The cancer experts are concerned that this is just the kind of misinformation that plays into Americans desire for simple solutions. In fact, an AICR survey conducted two weeks ago shows that 78% percent of Americans believe that the kind of food they eat is more important for managing their weight than the amount of food they eat.

The AICR Newsletter, which has a simple, traditional design and content, contains information about the latest research results on the diet-cancer front, as well as practical ideas and recipes for putting this research into practice. It is intended to speak to the public in a clear, friendly way, free of scientific jargon and dietary admonitions.

In fact, several aspects of the AICR/WCRF report were used in drafting the WHO document. Both reports stress the need to examine the role of diet using a global strategy. Both documents begin with a positive message by highlighting the tremendous preventive potential of diet and activity.

By contrast, the new WHO report utilized a method called narrative review, in which experts select and comment upon studies using their personal best judgment; this is a simpler method but lacks precision and objectivity. AICR experts maintain that, if WHO had evaluated the current research using a more thorough and consistent methodology, their report would have placed an even stronger emphasis on the importance of vegetables and fruits.

To date, literally thousands of studies consistently show correlations between fruit and vegetable consumption and lower cancer risk. The cancer experts at AICR also note that these studies used different methods to investigate different aspects of the diet-cancer link and yet reached similar conclusions. Taken together, this evidence amounts to proof of a causal relationship beyond any reasonable doubt. Thats why AICR, and also the National Cancer Institute (NCI), continue to recommend daily consumption of 5 to 9 servings of vegetables and fruits.

Laboratory results, for example, continue to illustrate how components in these foods actively fight the cancer process. Studies that track the diets of individuals over many years consistently reveal lower cancer rates among those who consume more than five servings of vegetables and fruits per day.

Results from randomized clinical trials involving diet and cancer are less consistent than results from other kinds of studies. But clinical trials were not designed to study the complex role of multiple dietary influences on cancer risk over long periods of time, and are ill suited to the task. Because of their highly focused, short-term nature, such trials are more useful for studying the effects of specific cancer drugs upon cancer patients, not the ability of overall diet to prevent cancer in healthy individuals.

AICR and its umbrella organization WCRF International are currently at work on a comprehensive update and expansion of Food, Nutrition and the Prevention of Cancer: a global perspective. This massive project will require an unprecedented amount of data nearly 20,000 individual studies to be compiled and rigorously analyzed using an objective and replicable systematic methodology. Once completed, the expanded AICR/WCRF International report will represent the most comprehensive and definitive appraisal of the diet-cancer link possible.

Cook rice according to package directions. Turn rice into mixing bowl and let sit 15 minutes to cool slightly. Preheat oven to 350 degrees. Slice tops off peppers and tomatoes and set tops aside. Remove seeds and membranes from peppers. Using a melon baller or small spoon, scoop out tomato flesh and reserve. Discard seeds from tomato flesh and chop the meat into 1/4-inch pieces.Add tomato, onion, dill, parsley and cheese to rice. Use a fork to mix together, taking care not to mush rice or cheese. Mix lemon juice into rice, and season to taste with salt and pepper. Stuff peppers and tomato shells loosely with rice mixture, using about 1/2 cup each. Arrange stuffed vegetables in a baking dish just large enough to hold them (9x13-inch or bigger). Replace tops on stuffed tomatoes and peppers. Pour chicken broth into pan. Bake about 1 1/4 hours, until vegetables are soft but still hold their shape. Serve lukewarm or at room temperature. Vegetables are best when made the day they are served, as rice turns hard when refrigerated.Makes 6 main-course or 12 side-dish servings.Per serving: 152 calories, 2 g. total fat (1 g. saturated fat), 30 g. carbohydrate, 5 g. protein, 4 g. dietary fiber, 178 mg. sodium.

In an unheated saucepan large enough to hold the pasta, combine the oil, onion, garlic, anchovies and red pepper. Stir over low-medium heat until golden but not brown, about 3 to 5 minutes. Add tomatoes, olives, capers, oregano and basil. Stir to blend and simmer, uncovered, until the sauce begins to thicken, about 15 minutes.Cook the pasta according to package directions. Drain thoroughly in a colander and add to the sauce. Blend with the sauce, cover and let sit off the heat for a few minutes. Add the parsley, mix in thoroughly and serve.Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 317 calories, 5 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 63 g. carbohydrate, 12 g. protein, 10 g. dietary fiber, 847 mg. sodium.

TRY SPRING ONIONS AT THEIR PEAKfrom theAmerican Institute for Cancer ResearchOne of the best places to look for the first signs of spring is in the vegetable section of your supermarket. One of the first new vegetables youll find is green onions tied in small bundles. While scallions also called spring onions or green onions are available year round, they are at their peak in the spring and summer. They have small white bulbs and long, green leaves, and both parts are edible. At this stage, the scallions relationship to its cousin, the lily, is more obvious than when it is a mature onion.Onions of all ages have been the subject of new research linking them to lower incidence of certain cancers. They also provide vitamins A and C, calcium and iron.When choosing scallions, look for those with fresh, crisp-looking green tops and dark leaves. The necks should be white for two to three inches from the root and have a firm white base. Wrap loosely in a plastic bag and store in the vegetable compartment of the refrigerator for up to a week. They may get moldy if sealed too tightly.Green onions are typically eaten raw in salads or as toppings for other foods, but their flavor both brightens and mellows when cooked in many dishes. A soup of green onions and tomatoes is a winning combination, especially when flavored with the smoky richness of roasted sweet red peppers. Each bowl of this easy-to-make soup provides more than a days worth of vitamins C and A, a good way to welcome the first day of spring.

A CLASSIC SALAD GETS A MAKEOVERfrom theAmerican Institute for Cancer ResearchIts the time of year when a lot of fresh fruit isnt yet available. But that doesnt mean you cant satisfy your craving for a little crunchy sweetness after months of strictly veggie salads.The last of the winter apples, pears and citrus fruit can be added to salad with nuts and dried fruits. This weeks updated Waldorf Salad scales back the fat without sacrificing flavor. This slimmed-down combination will tide you over until warm weather fruits get to the market.Waldorf Salad was created by Oscar of the Waldorf maitre d Oscar Tschirky for the 1896 opening of New Yorks glamorous Waldorf Astoria Hotel. A man of many talents, the famous impresario also introduced Thousand Island Dressing and Eggs Benedict. The original salad was made only with apples, celery and mayonnaise. Its popularity increased with the addition of chopped walnuts that eventually became integral to the dish. News reports tout the health benefits of eating nuts too long avoided because of their high fat content. But research has found that nuts are an important part of a healthful diet. In one study, four weeks on a low-fat diet supplemented with three ounces of walnuts a day resulted in a drop in LDL (bad) cholesterol and triglycerides. Some studies have shown that certain phytochemicals and antioxidants present in nuts and seeds have anti-cancer properties.Low-fat mayonnaise and non-fat yogurt are a healthful way of updating this classic dish. The addition of grapefruit, pear, grapes and dates enhances both the flavor and the nutritional value of the salad.

In a medium bowl, combine cumin, cinnamon, allspice and turmeric. Sprinkle chicken lightly with salt and pepper, then stir into spice mixture until surfaces are evenly covered with spices. Refrigerate for 30 minutes. Spray a large, deep skillet or a Dutch oven with vegetable cooking spray and heat over medium-high heat. Add chicken and garlic. Cook, turning until browned. Transfer chicken to a plate. In the same skillet, saut? onion and mushrooms until tender, about 10 minutes. Return chicken to the skillet. Add broth, rice, orange juice, apricots and orange peel. Cover and simmer until rice and chicken are tender and broth is absorbed, about 45 minutes. (Add more broth if mixture becomes too dry.) Add peas and cook 5 minutes more. Stir in mint and cilantro.Makes 6 servings.Per serving: 271 calories, 2 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 43 g. carbohydrate, 21 g. protein, 5 g. dietary fiber, 218 mg. sodium.

Heavily coat medium skillet with cooking spray. Heat over medium-high heat until hot. Add scallions, red pepper and garlic, reduce heat to medium-low and saut? until soft, about 5 minutes. Do not let vegetables color. Remove from heat and mix in beans and rice. Transfer to blender or food processor and process until mixture is coarsely chopped. Be careful not to over-process. Transfer mixture to medium bowl. Season to taste with hot pepper sauce, cumin, salt and pepper. Add egg and mix in lightly with fork until just blended. Mix in breadcrumbs with fork until lightly blended. Form mixture into eight patties. (Patties will hold their shape better if refrigerated, covered, at least 30 minutes.)When ready to saut? patties, lightly coat skillet with cooking oil spray and heat over medium-high heat until hot. Add patties and saut? on both sides until nicely browned about 4 minutes per side.Serve plain or with green leafy lettuce and tomato on whole-grain buns.

A Good Health Quizby the American Institute for Cancer Research Cancer cases could drop by 20 percent if people ate at least five servings of vegetables and fruits each day. Why? Research shows that the vitamins, minerals, phytochemicals and dietary fiber in produce help prevent cancer. See how well you know the benefits of fruits and vegetables by matching one of the words below to each clue.

In a small bowl, mix together oil, chives, basil and half the dill. Rub mixture into both sides of fish, then sprinkle with salt and pepper. Set aside.Mix remaining dill with yogurt and set sauce aside. In a large, deep-rimmed serving dish large enough to hold the fish and broth, arrange bell peppers and scallions evenly along bottom. Place fish on top. Arrange lemon slices on top of fish. Add broth. Place in microwave and cook at medium power, checking every few minutes, until fish flakes with a fork. Remove from microwave and garnish with remaining dill. Serve with yogurt-dill sauce.Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 305 calories, 11 g. total fat (2 g. saturated fat), 12 g. carbohydrate, 38 g. protein, 2 g. dietary fiber, 184 mg. sodium.

TRANSPORT YOUR KITCHEN TO THE SOUTHWESTfrom theAmerican Institute for Cancer ResearchYou dont have to leave the state or the country to get away from the winter doldrums. You can take a break in your own kitchen by preparing dishes from the sunny southwest. In the southwest, Native Americans lived for centuries off the land on corn, wild greens, squash, berries, fish and game. Spanish missionaries came in the 16th century with chiles from Mexico and foods from Europe. Then the cowboys came in the 1800s with cattle and campfire chilis and stews.The result is earthy, intensely flavored food. Its a simple cuisine that lends itself well to many cooking techniques and colorful presentations.Many of the fresh ingredients of the southwest are now available year round, so you can bring some of the regions warmth into your winter cooking.Most southwestern meals feature familiar favorites such as tomatoes, corn, corn meal, beans and citrus fruits (especially limes). Popular seasonings include cumin, fiery dried and ground red chilies, fresh cilantro, thyme and garlic. Chilies also are often used in cooking, such as the tiny, dark green Serrano chile; the larger jalapeno; the long, narrow bright green Anaheim; and the fat, dark brown-green poblano. This fajitas uses turkey, but brings the flavors of Santa Fe to your table.

Cancer survival rates have improved greatly over the past three decades. Speakers at the international research conference, however, stressed theneed for more research. Studies so far hint at the potential that diet and lifestyle changes have to augment treatment and recovery one time, a diagnosis of cancer was regarded as a death warrant. Today, due to advances in detection and treatment, more than nine million cancer survivors exist in the U.S. Sixty-two percent of American adults diagnosed with cancer are alive after five years. Because the number ofsurvivors is expected to grow, there is a pressing need for research about preventing cancer's recurrence and overcoming the toxic effects of treatment.

Although little research exists on survivorship, dietary changes, weight management and physical activity show tremendous potential in improving the length and quality of survival, Dr. Aziz said. These changes impact many body systems and may positively affect adverse conditions, like fatigue andosteoporosis.

Children and adolescents diagnosed with cancer may especially benefit from research on diet and a healthy lifestyle. The need for information is growing because survival rates for all cancers in this group have improved enormously. More than 70 percent now outlive the five-year mark. It is estimated that one out of every 900 young adults in the U.S. is a childhood cancer survivor.

Unfortunately, the long-term consequences of cancer treatment are serious for them. According to Charles Sklar, M.D., from the Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center, another speaker at this session,"Approximately two-thirds of childhood cancer survivors will develop some type of medical complication or disability as a direct result of their cancer therapy." These include second cancers, obesity, osteoporosis and premature cardiovascular disease.

Changes in nutrition appear able to lessen the adverse results of cancer treatment in survivors, Dr. Sklar said. For example, animal studies have demonstrated that omega-3 fatty acids can increase the effectiveness of chemotherapy, while reducing side effects. Additional research may show the best diet and lifestyle changes for childhood cancer survivors, as well as others.

In addition to the annual research conference, which is open to the public, AICR offers several science-based tools directly to cancer survivors and those who care for them. One is the recently launched online Cancer Survivor's Guide at www.aicr.org/survivor. Also available for purchase are three new books, which cover diet, nutrition and exercise advice in greater depth: A Dietitian's Cancer Story, Nutrition After Cancer and Dietary Options for Cancer Survivors (see page 4). Visit www.aicr.org for more information.

Place cranberry-raspberry juice, cranberries, zest and spices in a deep saucepan. Bring to boil over medium-high heat. Reduce heat to medium and cook until mixture is reduced to about 2 cups, about 10 to 12 minutes.

In large nonstick skillet over low heat, toast granola for 2-3 minutes. In small bowl, combine apple juice and cornstarch. In medium bowl, combine cornstarch mixture with apples, sugar, cinnamon and lemon juice. Wipe skillet clean, add oil and heat over medium heat. Add apple mixture, spreading evenly over bottom of pan, and cook, stirring constantly, until browned but not mushy, 4 minutes. Add cranberries and heat through. Stir in granola. Reduce heat to low. Flatten mixture with wooden spoon, cover with lid and cook another1-2 minutes. Serve topped with spoonful of yogurt, if desired.

In a medium bowl, mix together the flour, salt, baking powder and sugar. Use a pastry blender or a fork to cut the butter and oil into the flour mixture until it resembles coarse meal. Add the milk all at once. Stir until it is just incorporated and there are no lumps.

Use a serrated knife to gently slice off the top third of each biscuit. Top with some berries and juice. Lay the top third of the biscuit on berries. Top with more berries and juice. Place remaining berries around each biscuit. Garnish with frozen yogurt, if using, and serve.

In small Dutch oven, heat oil over medium-high heat. Add onion and saute until translucent, 2 minutes. Add broth, carrot and squash. Lower heat and simmer until tender, about 4 minutes. Add tomatoes. Cover and cook over medium-low heat 10 minutes. Add turkey, beans, cilantro, cumin, chili powder and cinnamon. Simmer on low heat until squash is tender and turkey is heated through, 15-20 minutes. Season with salt and pepper, to taste. Add hot sauce or salsa, if desired. Serve over brown rice or whole wheat pasta.

Instructions:Preheat oven to 375 degrees. Spray 9 x 13-inch baking dish. Place fish in baking dish, in one layer. Sprinkle with salt and pepper, to taste. In small bowl, mix lemon juice and oil; drizzle over fish. Using back of spoon, spread oil mixture to cover fish completely. Sprinkle with parsley and top with cherry tomatoes. Place one lemon slice on top of each piece of fish. Season with paprika or lemon pepper, to taste. Bake 10 minutes.

Instructions:In large skillet, heat oil and sugar over medium-high heat. Add onions and oregano and saut? until onions are golden brown, about 10 minutes. Add green beans and baby carrots and saut? 5 minutes or until vegetables are crisp-tender. Season to taste with salt and pepper.Makes 8 servings.

Instructions:Place chicken in medium bowl. Sprinkle with 1 1/2 tsp. sesame oil, tossing to blend. Set aside.Place bean thread noodles and 1 tsp. sesame oil in large pan. Pour in enough boiling water to cover noodles. Cover and let sit 5-8 minutes or until noodles are tender. Immediately drain and set aside.Meanwhile, make dressing by placing soy sauce, vinegar, Chinese oyster sauce, chili garlic sauce, sugar and remaining oil in a blender and mixing at high speed until well blended. Transfer to serving pitcher.Arrange lettuce leaves on large plate or serving platter to cover surface. Place drained noodles in center. Arrange chicken, cucumbers, tomatoes, corn and hearts of palm around noodles, alternating light and dark items. Lightly drizzle a small amount of dressing over salad ingredients. Serve salad with remaining dressing.Makes 1 1/8 cups dressing and 16 cups salad.

Instructions:Make a bed of arugula on each of 4 salad plates. Arrange one-fourth of theorange slices over arugula on each plate.Cut away feathery tops of fennel atbase of round stalks and discard. Slice off bottom of bulb, remove tough outerlayer of bulb and discard both. Cut bulb in half vertically. Using a very sharpknife, cut each half crosswise into very thin slices. Arrange over orange slices. Separate onion slices into rings and arrange over fennel. Add olives. Sprinklewith salt and pepper to taste. In a small bowl, whisk oil with orange juice and zest. Drizzle dressingover each salad. Serve immediately. Makes 4 servings.

Instructions:Using a blender or food processor, blend oil with garlic, lemon juice and capers. Transfer to a non-metal container. Add fish and marinate 20 to 30 minutes, turning fish once in the process.Meanwhile, prepare the grill or preheat the broiler. Remove fish from marinade and pat dry with paper towelling. Season with salt and pepper. (If using an indoor grill, spray fish lightly with olive oil or canola oil spray.)Grill the fish about 4 to 5 minutes per side, depending on thickness of fish, or until fish is opaque in the center. (Fish usually takes about 10 minutes per inch of thickness to cook through.) Dont overcook or fish will be dry. Serve with wedges of fresh lemon, either hot or at room temperature.Makes 4 servings.

Combine mayonnaise and mustard. Lay out both wraps. Spread the edges of each with the mayonnaise mixture. Leaving a margin free on the side closest to you, arrange a layer of greens on top of wraps. Top each layer with half the turkey. Evenly divide apple slices and lay lengthwise across turkey. Fold over the end of the wrap closest to you, then the two sides. Roll the wrap as tightly as possible toward the opposite side. Cover each wrap tightly in plastic wrap and refrigerate, seam side down, up to 4 hours before serving. When ready to serve, remove plastic wrap and cut each wrap in half, at an angle.Makes two wraps, or 2 servings. Per serving: 234 calories, 7 g. total fat (1 g. saturated fat), 27 g. carbohydrate, 20 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 294 mg. sodium.

Add tomatoes and okra. Cover and cook over low heat 10-15 minutes, until okra is soft. Add oregano, thyme, salt and black pepper, to taste, and cayenne pepper, if using. Cook uncovered about 1 minute.

Instructions:In skillet or wok, heat oil. Add vegetables and stir-fry until tender crisp. Add sauce and heat through. Serve over rice. Sprinkle with nuts, if desired.Note: Chinese stir-fry sauces like soy and hoisin are available in supermarkets and specialty stores.

Instructions:In small bowl, combine 1/4 cup soy sauce, lemon juice, mustard and spice powder. Place salmon in shallow dish. Brush soy mixture over both sides of fish. Cover with plastic and refrigerate 1 hour. Preheat broiler. Spray medium skillet with cooking spray. Heat skillet over medium heat. Add sesame seeds. Saut? until golden, 1-2 minutes. Transfer sesame seeds to plate. Spray skillet again. Saut? carrot and leek until crisp, but tender, about 5 minutes. Add broth, remaining soy sauce and sesame oil. Simmer until most of liquid evaporates, about 10-15 minutes. Meanwhile, place salmon on broiler pan. Broil, 4 inches from heat, until fish is cooked through, about 5 minutes. Spoon leek mixture evenly onto 4 serving plates. Arrange salmon strips evenly on top. Sprinkle with sesame seeds. Serve immediately.

If you want the pancakes crispier, just pop them under the broiler for a minute after baking. You can serve with a dollop of sour cream, or applesauce, which is easy to make and always a treat when its freshly homemade.

Preheat oven to 450 degrees. Spray large non-stick baking sheet with oil spray. Coarsely grate potatoes and carrots. Place them in large sieve. Set sieve into a large bowl so it nestles securely. Squeeze vegetables to wring out as much liquid as possible. If vegetables still feel wet, pat dry with paper towels, then transfer them to a mixing bowl. Stir in flour, parsley, onion, eggs, oil, salt and pepper, making sure ingredients are well combined.Spoon small mounds of the mixture on the baking sheet to form 2 1/2-inch pancakes, leaving 1 inch between each. Bake latkes until golden brown, 6 to 8 minutes per side, turning once with spatula. Pancakes can also be made in a pan, preferably non-stick, with a light coating of canola oil spray on the bottom. Heat pan to high, then reduce to medium or medium-high heat. Transfer cooked pancakes to warm plates or a serving platter and serve at once. If desired, serve with low-fat sour cream or applesauce.

Using the dark green outer leaves from sweet Savoy cabbage, as Judy Rogers does at Zuni, will enhance the flavor, too. So would making a supply large enough to serve it several times, which concentrates the flavors of this country soup every time you reheat it.

Instructions:Cut chicken into 1/2-inch by 2-inch strips.Heat oil in a medium, non-stick skillet over medium-high heat. Cook chicken until white on the outside. Transfer to a plate.Add onion, red pepper and fennel to the pan. Stir to coat with oil and juices from the chicken. Saut? 2 minutes. Mix in garlic. Cook until onions and fennel are golden, about 5 minutes, stirring occasionally.Return chicken to the pan. Stir in cumin, beans, parsley, 1/4 cup broth, vinegar and salt. Simmer until chicken is white in the center and vegetables are still al dente, 5 to 6 minutes.With a slotted spoon, transfer food to a bowl and keep warm on the side. Mix cornstarch into the remaining broth until well blended. Stir into the liquid in the pan. Heat to a simmer, stirring constantly, until mixture thickens. Return chicken mixture to the pan. Stir until mixture is coated with the sauce and heated through. Season to taste with salt and pepper.Serve with cooked brown rice or roasted potatoes.

The keys to a successful stir-fry are noted in the instructions below: Use a very high heat, avoid crowding the pan by cooking ingredients in batches, if necessary, and start with the vegetables that take the longest to cook.

Instructions:In a wide, shallow bowl, combine 2 tablespoons soy sauce, water or broth, half of the sugar and Mirin with the scallion and ginger. Mix in chicken (or other meat) and marinate during other preparations (10-30 minutes). Drain and pat dry of excess liquid with paper towels. (Discard used marinade, which should never be reused as a sauce; it may contain potentially harmful bacteria that could lead to food-borne illness.)For the sauce, mix together the remaining soy sauce, Mirin and sugar with the cornstarch until well blended. Set aside.Heat pan until very hot. Add 1 tablespoon oil, or enough to stir-fry meat, and heat until very hot. Add meat and stir-fry until it turns color. Remove with slotted spoon and set aside.Use remaining oil, as needed, to stir-fry vegetables in batches, starting with those that take the longest to become tender-crisp, like carrots, string beans and broccoli. Dont overcrowd the pan. If necessary, cook vegetables in batches and transfer cooked vegetables to an oven preheated to 200 degrees. When all the vegetables are tender-crisp, mix in everything that was removed from the pan in the earlier stages. Stir sauce and add to the pan, stirring until sauce thickens.Remove from heat and serve immediately with steamed rice.

The challenges in making good-tasting and nutritionally sensible hash requires the right combination of chopped meat and other ingredients, usually including potatoes and a creamy binder, and frying it to create a crisp outer crust using a modest amount of a healthful fat.

Heat 1 tbsp. butter or oil in a medium/large non-stick skillet. Add onion, bell peppers, celery and garlic. Saut? until lightly browned, 5 minutes. Push vegetables to one side of pan. Add remaining butter or oil. Add potatoes and mix with oil to coat them.Mix and combine well with the vegetables. Cook 3 minutes. If potatoes stick, scrape pan vigorously and move contents around pan to spray the bottom with cooking spray.

Brush the caps with a bit of oil (or lightly coat with oil spray) before grilling to prevent sticking and keep the mushrooms from shriveling and turning tough. Grilled portobellos are good in sandwiches, salads and as side dishes, hot or at room temperature.

Instructions:Preheat oven to 350 degrees.In deep, heavy pot, combine oil and polenta. Cook over medium-high heat, stirring, until polenta smells toasty, about 2 minutes. Remove pot from heat. Add boiling water carefully to avoid spatters. Stir until polenta is smooth. Mix in garlic, parsley, thyme, rosemary, salt and pepper.Bake polenta, uncovered 20 minutes. Stir well. Bake additional 20 minutes, or until polenta is creamy. Divide among 4 dinner plates. Sprinkle each with a quarter of the cheese.While polenta cooks, lightly coat mushroom caps with canola oil spray, sprinkle with salt and grill, underside (gills) down, on very hot grill or in heavy cast iron pan, about 4 minutes. Turn and cook until tender all the way through, about 4 minutes. Top each serving of polenta with a mushroom and serve immediately.

Instructions:Place dried fruit in a small bowl. Add warm water to cover. Let soak for 5 to 10 minutes, or until soft. Drain well.In a large saucepan, boil water as called for in directions on rice package. When water comes to a boil, add rice, fruit, parsley, zest, bouillon, salt and pepper. When water comes to boil again, reduce heat, cover and simmer about 10 minutes or until water is absorbed and rice is tender.Remove from heat. Fluff gently with a fork, gradually mixing in mint, and serve.

Instructions:In a small bowl, mix together oil, chives, basil and half the dill. Rub mixture into both sides of fish, then sprinkle with salt and pepper. Set aside.Mix remaining dill with yogurt and set sauce aside.In a large, deep-rimmed serving dish large enough to hold the fish and broth, arrange bell peppers and scallions evenly along bottom. Place fish on top. Arrange lemon slices on top of fish. Add broth. Place in microwave and cook at medium power, checking every few minutes, until fish flakes with a fork.Remove from microwave and garnish with remaining dill. Serve with yogurt-dill sauce.

Cornmeal, the foundation of Indian Pudding, supplies important nutrients like vitamin A, potassium, folate and phosphorus. Blackstrap molasses, another staple of this traditional dessert, is rich in potassium, calcium and iron.

When cornmeal mixture is nearly cooled down to lukewarm, preheat oven to 350 degrees. Using canola oil spray, coat insides of 6 single-serving baking cups or ramekins, or an 8-inch baking dish and set aside.

Pour mixture into prepared cups, ramekins, or baking dish. Bake until almost set (Pudding continues to set after it is taken out of the oven.) If cups or ramekins are used, check every 10 minutes or so to monitor how quickly the pudding sets. If a baking dish is used, baking time is about 1 hour.

Instructions:Preheat oven to 400 degrees. Cut off 1/2-inch slice from top of head of garlic. Place on sheet of foil. Drizzle 1/2 tsp. oil on top of garlic. Roast 45-55 minutes, or until cloves are soft. Let cool 5 minutes. Squeeze garlic from skin directly into small bowl. Mash with fork and set aside. In large nonstick saucepan, heat 2 tsp. oil over medium heat. Add leeks, thyme, salt and white pepper. Cook, stirring, 6-8 minutes, or until leeks are translucent, but not browned. Stir in roasted garlic. Cook 30 seconds. Add cauliflower, broth and milk. Over medium-high heat, bring to gentle boil. Reduce heat to medium-low and cook 8-10 minutes, or until cauliflower is tender. Let cool 5-10 minutes.Using blender or food processor, puree half of cauliflower and 1 cup cooking liquid until smooth. Pour into medium bowl. Repeat process with remaining cauliflower and 1 cup liquid. Stir puree back into saucepan. Reheat, if necessary. Ladle soup into bowls and sprinkle each serving with 1 Tbsp. Parmesan cheese.

In large saucepan, heat juice, water, sugar and cinnamon over medium heat until sugar dissolves, about 5 minutes. Add pears. Cook, turning pears frequently, until tender, about 15 minutes. Using slotted spoon, transfer pears to cutting board. Reserve poaching liquid. Using sharp paring knife, slice each pear into fan shape while still keeping pear and stem intact. Place pears on 4 individual serving plates. Press down gently to fan the pear out. Cook poaching liquid over medium-high heat until slightly thickened and syrupy, about 5 minutes. Remove cinnamon stick. Spoon syrup over pears. Sprinkle with almonds.

Preheat oven to 375 degrees. In medium shallow baking dish, place apples and cranberries. In medium bowl, combine brown sugar, oats, flour, nuts and butter. Sprinkle brown sugar mixture on top of fruit. Bake until apples and cranberries are bubbly and tender, about 50 minutes. Transfer dish to wire rack to cool slightly. Serve warm with frozen yogurt, if desired.

Instructions:If using dried mushrooms, soak in hot water to cover about 15 minutes. Drain, remove stems and slice. In large saucepan, bring broth to boil. Reduce heat to simmer and add ginger, scallions, cabbage and bamboo shoots. Cook for 3 minutes. Add pepper oil, vinegar, soy sauce, tofu and mushrooms. Simmer 3 minutes more. If thicker consistency is desired, strain soup into another saucepan to separate broth and set solid contents aside. Set broth over medium heat and slowly pour in cornstarch mixture while stirring, until soup thickens. If desired, add egg white while stirring to form long strands, then add reserved ingredients. Serve immediately.

Remove any yellow leaves from sprouts. Trim bottoms and, with tip of knife, make an X in stem end to help cook evenly.Place steamer basket inside pot. Add about 2 inches of water. Place sprouts on steamer. Cover and steam on high heat about 10 minutes, until crisp-tender. (Sprouts can also be steamed in microwave oven, in microwave-safe cookware.)Meanwhile, in medium skillet, heat oil. Add shallots and saut? about 2 minutes.When sprouts are done, add to shallots. Add broth. Cover and cook over medium heat 2 minutes. Remove cover and cook 1-2 minutes, until broth is absorbed. Season with nutmeg and salt, to taste.

In a mixing bowl, vigorously whisk together the dry milk powder, sugar, cocoa, egg white powder, cinnamon, allspice, clove, ginger, and black pepper, making sure all the tiny clumps are broken up. Spoon the mixture into a jar, and seal tightly.This mix is intended to be used with 1 percent milk to make hot chocolate, or a tea bag for making chai. If giving this mix as a gift, include instructions for using 1 to 2 teaspoons, according to taste, per serving.Makes 2 1/2 cups mix.For chai, brew one tea bag in a cup or mug of hot milk. Remove the tea bag and stir in the mix. Add a cinnamon stick as a stirrer, if desired.For hot chocolate, place the mix in a mug and gradually stir in hot milk. Add a cinnamon stick as a stirrer, if desired, or 2-3 drops of vanilla extract, or 1 drop of almond extract. For Hot Mocha, mix 1/4 teaspoon instant espresso into the Hot Chocolate.

Pour into a tall tumbler filled with ice cubes. Garnish, if desired, with a small wedge of lime and a cherry tomato, speared on a short skewer and added to the glass like a swizzle stick. Serve immediately.

Instructions:Preheat oven to 375 degrees. Spray 12-cup muffin tin with cooking spray or line with paper cups. In large bowl, blend first seven ingredients together; set aside. In separate bowl, mix together eggs, oil, applesauce, buttermilk and raisins. Add to dry ingredients, mixing until combined. Scoop batter into muffin cups. Bake 30-35 minutes or until a toothpick inserted in center comes out clean. Cool muffins in tin for 5 minutes, then transfer to wire rack to finish cooling.

Preheat oven to 400 degrees. Spray 12-cup muffin pan with canola oil. In large bowl, combine dry ingredients through spices. Stir well to combine. In medium bowl, combine pumpkin, oil, buttermilk, eggs, and vanilla; mix well. Pour liquid mixture into dry ingredients and stir. Divide among 12 muffin cups. Bake about 20 minutes or until muffins bounce back when pressed lightly.

Lightly coat standard loaf pan (8x4- or 9x5-inch) with cooking spray and set aside. Set oven rack in middle and preheat oven to 350 degrees. In medium bowl, whisk eggs, sugar, oil, sweet potatoes and extracts until well combined.In large bowl, sift together flour, spices and baking soda. Make well in center of mixture and add sweet potato mixture. Mix until just moistened. (Do not over-mix or beat batter until smooth.) Lightly stir in cranberries. Transfer batter to prepared pan. For a more decorative presentation, dust top of batter with light coating of Turbinado or Demerara sugar. Bake 50-60 minutes, or until tester comes out clean. If sugar has been added to top of bread, begin checking bread after 30 minutes. If sugar darkens, lightly lay a sheet of aluminum foil on top of pan to prevent burning. Remove bread from oven and cool 10 minutes on rack. Remove bread from pan and set back on rack to completely cool. Seal bread tightly in plastic wrap, then foil. Tightly wrapped in foil, bread can be stored frozen for up to 1 month.

Preheat oven to 400 degrees. Lightly spray muffin tin with cooking spay. In large bowl, combine flours, brown sugar, baking powder, cinnamon and allspice. In another bowl, whisk together buttermilk, oil, applesauce and egg. Make well in center of dry ingredients. Pour in buttermilk mixture, stirring until just combined (do not overmix). Stir in blueberries. Spoon batter evenly into prepared muffin cups. Bake until tops are golden, 20-25 minutes. Transfer pan to wire rack to cool slightly. Transfer muffins to cooling rack. Serve warm.

Preheat oven to 350 degrees. Place nuts in small bowl .Spray lightly with oil and toss to coat. Add spices and toss to blend thoroughly. Spread nuts on baking sheet. Roast until fragrant, about 15 minutes. Serve warm or at room temperature. Store in airtight container. Makes 5 servings.

Instructions:Trim all visible fat from meat. Cut into 1-inch cubes. Toss with flour to coat.Generously coat deep, medium skillet with cooking spray. Set over medium-high heat.Brown meat, turning it so it colors on all sides, about 5 minutes. Transfer meat to a plate.Heat oil in the pan until hot. Add onion, green pepper, garlic and chili pepper and saut? until onion is translucent, about 4 minutes. Return meat to the pan. Add 1 cup water, Worcestershire sauce, ginger, salt and pepper. Drain liquid from the can of pineapple into the pan. Cover, reduce heat and simmer 30 minutes.Meanwhile, drain pineapple chunks, reserving juice for another use, if desired. Add the fruit, tomato and cucumber to the stew. Simmer, uncovered, until the meat and vegetables are tender and the liquid has thickened slightly. Serve the stew over the rice. If desired, the stew can be made ahead and stored 2 to 3 days, covered, in the refrigerator.

Preheat oven to 350 degrees. Spray 9 X 9-inch baking pan with cooking spray. In large bowl, mix together oats, flour, sugar, cinnamon, salt and baking soda until well combined. In small bowl, whisk oil and 3 tablespoons juice together and pour over oat mixture, blending well until moist and crumbly. Reserve 3/4 cup for topping. Press the remainder evenly into prepared pan. In small bowl, blend jam with remaining 2 tablespoons apple juice. Stir in dried apricots. Spread evenly over crust. Sprinkle reserved crumb mixture over apricots, lightly pressing down with fingers. Bake 35 min. or until golden. Cool in pan on wire rack. Cut into bars.

In small bowl, combine jam, soy sauce, water and cornstarch. Set aside. In large non-stick skillet, heat sesame oil over medium high heat. Add pork and ginger and stir-fry until pork is browned and just cooked through, about 3-5 minutes. Transfer pork and ginger to bowl with slotted spoon. Add canola oil to skillet. Stir-fry peppers, water chestnuts, and apples until peppers are crisp tender, about 3 minutes. Add pork back to skillet along with scallions. Stir-fry 30 seconds. Add jam mixture. Continue to stir-fry 30 seconds to one minute, or until sauce thickens. Season to taste with black pepper. Serve over brown rice or whole wheat pasta.

Instructions:Bring water to a boil. Add brown rice, bring to boil again, then cover and reduce heat to low simmer. Cook rice for 45 minutes or until all water is absorbed. While rice is cooking, saute red pepper and shiitake mushrooms in canola oil for 3 minutes. Add green onion and pineapple. Continue to saute for 1 more minute. Using fork, add rice to vegetables in pan. Cook, breaking up rice and stirring, until well combined and hot. Serve immediately.If desired, enhance the flavor of the pineapple by "caramelizing." In a nonstick pan over high heat, stir well-drained pineapple until slightly golden (about 5-10 minutes). Makes 4 servings.

You can roast monkfish, poach or braise it in whole filets, or cut the pearly white flesh into inch-thick medallions, as in this dish. Its mild flavor requires an interesting accompaniment, like these colorful roasted tomatoes stuffed with vegetables, and drizzled with warm sherry vinegar.

Instructions:Preheat the oven to 375 degrees. In a bowl, coat the tomato halves, red pepper, onion, and garlic clove with the oil. Arrange them in one layer on a baking sheet with tomatoes cut-side up. Lightly sprinkle with salt. Roast the vegetables 15 minutes. Transfer the tomatoes to a plate, cut-side down and cover with foil to keep warm. Roast the remaining vegetables 15 minutes longer, until tender but still firm. Set aside, leaving the oven on.Coat an oven-proof skillet with cooking spray. Spray the fish with the oil and season with salt and pepper. Place it in the pan and set over high heat for 1 minute. Transfer the skillet to the oven. Bake the fish 6 to 8 minutes, or until opaque in the center. The fish will curl up into nuggets resembling lobster meat.Meanwhile, scoop out and discard the center of the tomato halves, leaving any juices. Chop the vegetables to resemble chunky salsa. Spoon them into the tomato halves. Boil the vinegar and sugar in a small pan over high heat until syrupy, like a sauce, about 2-3 minutes.Place two tomato halves on each of four dinner plates. Add 3 nuggets of fish to each plate. Drizzle the vinegar sauce over the food. Serve immediately.

Cover cranberries in warm water in a small bowl and soak to plump them, about 20 minutes. Drain, gently squeeze out excess moisture and pat them dry with a paper towel.Set a rack in the center of the oven, and preheat to 350 degrees. Line a baking sheet with parchment paper (or foil lightly coated with canola oil spray). Set aside.Grind the almonds with 2 Tbsp. of the sugar, pulsing in 5-second bursts until most of the almonds are a powder, about 30 seconds. Place the nuts in a large mixing bowl.Add the remaining sugar, both flours, baking powder, baking soda, cinnamon and salt to the nuts. Toss the cranberries and raisins with a tablespoon of this mixture, then stir them into the dry ingredients, mixing well. Mix in the eggs, vanilla, almond extract and 2 tablespoons water. With a wooden spoon, mix until a sticky, dense dough forms, working in all the flour.Halve the dough. Moistening your hands lightly with cold water, shape the dough into two flattened 13x2 1/2-inch logs, spaced 4 inches apart on the lined baking sheet.Bake until golden and firm to the touch, about 25 minutes. Cool logs on the baking sheet for 15 minutes.Transfer logs to a cutting board. With a serrated knife, cut each log diagonally into 1/2-inch thick slices. Arrange them cut-side down in one layer on the baking sheet, with slices touching each other. Bake 10 minutes, turn, and bake 10 more minutes, or until biscotti are a honey color and dry to the touch. Turn the oven off and leave biscotti there for 10 more minutes. Remove them from the oven and let them cool on the baking sheet. Store sealed in an air-tight container for up to 3 weeks.

Instructions:In small Dutch oven, heat oil over medium-high heat. Add onion and saute until translucent, 2 minutes. Add broth, carrot and squash. Lower heat and simmer until tender, about 4 minutes. Add tomatoes. Cover and cook over medium-low heat 10 minutes. Add turkey, beans, cilantro, cumin, chili powder and cinnamon. Simmer on low heat until squash is tender and turkey is heated through, 15-20 minutes. Season with salt and pepper, to taste. Add hot sauce or salsa, if desired. Serve over brown rice or whole wheat pasta.

Instructions:In large nonstick skillet over low heat, toast granola for 2-3 minutes. In small bowl, combine apple juice and cornstarch. In medium bowl, combine cornstarch mixture with apples, sugar, cinnamon and lemon juice. Wipe skillet clean, add oil and heat over medium heat. Add apple mixture, spreading evenly over bottom of pan, and cook, stirring constantly, until browned but not mushy, 4 minutes. Add cranberries and heat through. Stir in granola. Reduce heat to low. Flatten mixture with wooden spoon, cover with lid and cook another1-2 minutes. Serve topped with spoonful of yogurt, if desired.

Barleys nutty flavor goes well with onions, mushrooms, or peas. Butternut squash also is a good complement. This large, pear-shaped winter squash has sweet, orange flesh. With onion, green pepper and sage, youll be glad you had turkey leftovers.

Preheat oven to 350 degrees. Coat a 4-quart baking dish with cooking spray.In a large pot of rapidly boiling water, boil squash halves 5 minutes or until not quite tender. Drain. When cool enough to handle, scoop flesh from each half and dice. Set aside.In a large saucepan, heat oil over medium heat. Add green pepper, onion and diced squash. Saut? 3 minutes. Add sage and pepper and stir to coat. Add broth and bring to a boil. Add barley and return to boil.Reduce heat to low, cover and cook 10 minutes, until barley is tender and liquid is absorbed. Mix in diced turkey. Transfer mixture to prepared baking dish and top with feta cheese. Bake, uncovered, 30 minutes, or until cheese is golden.*Most supermarkets and health food stores carry quick-cooking barley.

Instructions:Bring a pot of salted water to a boil. Add green beans and cook at a simmer until crisp-tender, about 4 minutes. Drain and transfer beans to a bowl of ice water. When beans are cool, drain well.Return pot of water to a boil and add edamame. Cook 4 minutes, drain and rinse under cold water. If edamame are in pods, shell them. (To speed preparation time, use two pots to cook green beans and edamame at the same time.)In a 4-quart saucepan, heat olive oil. Add onion, garlic, bay leaf and rosemary. Cook over low heat, stirring, until onion is soft, 3 to 4 minutes.Add white beans, carrots, celery and stock. Bring to a simmer and cook, covered, about 10 minutes, stirring occasionally. Add green beans and edamame and simmer, uncovered, until just heated through. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Stir in parsley. Discard bay leaf and rosemary sprigs and serve.

To broaden fishcakes appeal and maximize their nutritious health protection, I have created an unusual combination with Salmon and Sweet Potato Fishcakes. What could be more stylish, and delicious, than plump patties of cooked fresh salmon and mashed yams, dredged in cornmeal.

Instructions:Steam yams until very soft, about 20 minutes stovetop or 2 to 4 minutes in a microwave oven. (If using a microwave oven, drape a damp paper towel over the top of the yams.) Cool yams until easily handled by hand. Using your fingers, peel skin from the slices. In a medium bowl, coarsely mash yams with a fork.Mix in salmon, scallions, mustard, the zest and juice of 1/2 lime, plus salt and pepper to taste. Blend until well combined. Shape mixture into 8 cakes, using about one-third cup for each. Arrange fishcakes on a plate, cover and refrigerate 1 to 4 hours.Spread cornmeal over a small plate. Coat a large non-stick skillet generously with cooking spray and heat until hot on medium-high heat. Meanwhile, dredge fishcakes in cornmeal, coating them all over. Cook until golden brown, 3 to 5 minutes on each side.Make the sauce by mixing together in a small bowl the mayonnaise, mustard, rosemary and lime juice. Serve the sauce with the salmon cakes. If desired, serve fishcakes in hamburger buns, preferably whole wheat, along with a lettuce leaf and a dollop of the sauce.

Instructions:Heat oil in large nonstick skillet over high heat until hot. Add all mushrooms and saut? until brown and almost tender, stirring constantly, about 10 minutes.Add bell pepper, ginger and garlic and saut? 1 minute. Add spinach and green onions and stir until spinach wilts, about 2 minutes. Stir in soy sauce. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Transfer to a serving bowl and serve immediately.

Its easy to boost vegetable consumption. Slightly increase the amount of cooked vegetables at lunch and dinner, from one-half cup to three-quarter cup portions, and you'll have the equivalent of three servings.

Instructions:In large saut? pan with a lid, heat olive oil over medium heat until hot. Add garlic and saut? until golden. Add green beans, reduce heat to medium, sprinkle with salt and pepper to taste and cover with lid. Cook, stirring occasionally, until green beans are almost tender but firm. Remove lid, add tomatoes and basil, turn up heat and cook for 5 to 6 minutes, stirring frequently.Transfer bean mixture to a serving bowl. Sprinkle with feta cheese and serve.

Add half of the oil to a medium, nonstick skillet over medium high heat. Stir in the onion, green and jalapeno peppers. Saut? until onions are lightly browned, about 10 minutes. Transfer vegetables to a plate and set aside. Do not clean the pan.

Mustard offers so many ways to zest up low-sodium and low-fat dishes that its no wonder it is a popular seasoning. In addition to using it with fish, poultry, cooked vegetables and raw salads, it perks up grains and legumes, too. (Add a dollop of Dijon-style mustard to warm lentils and see for yourself.) Mustard is also key to making velvety, sharp sauces and dressings like the one below, for Green Beans with Citrus Mustard.

Instructions:Steam beans 5 minutes or until tender but still crisp.While beans cook, in a large mixing bowl, use a fork to combine mustard, lime juice and salt, mixing until creamy. Mix in mint, lemon zest and shallots.Drain cooked beans and add to the mustard mixture, stirring to coat them. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Serve at room temperature. This dish can be refrigerated for 24 hours. Bring to room temperature before serving. *Frozen whole green beans may be used, although they will be less crisp than fresh ones. For frozen beans, reduce cooking time to 3 minutes.

Two dishes easily made at home include a meze, an appetizer or first course, and a Greek salad. The simple mezze below combines yellow split peas that are cooked down to a velvety, polenta-like texture, seasoned with oregano, then topped with a cinnamon-touched tomato and onion sauce.

Instructions:Place split peas in a deep saucepan. Add cold water to cover peas by at least 2 inches. Bring to a boil over medium-high heat. Reduce heat to a simmer and cook gently 45-50 minutes, stirring occasionally with a wooden spoon, until peas are soft and almost dry. (Add 1/4 cup water, if needed, to keep peas from sticking.) When peas are soft, stir in oregano and 1 tsp. oil. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Transfer to a wide, shallow dish.While split peas are cooking, make the sauce. Heat remaining oil in a medium non-stick skillet over medium-high heat. Saut? onion until golden, about 6 minutes. Stir in tomatoes, tomato paste, cinnamon, bay leaf and 1/4 cup water. Simmer until tomatoes break down, about 10 minutes. Remove bay leaf. Mix in vinegar and capers. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Spread sauce evenly over cooked peas. Set aside to cool to room temperature. Serve, or cover and refrigerate for up to 24 hours. Bring to room temperature before serving.

Heat the oil in a medium, non-stick skillet over high heat. Stir-fry onion and red pepper 1 minute. Add mushrooms and stir-fry until they look moist, about 1 minute. Add snow peas, scallions, ginger, and stir-fry 15 seconds.

This spiced, though not necessarily spicy, blend includes mustard seed, clove, allspice and bay leaf. It compliments the sweet flavor of shrimp and crabs. Adding rice makes it more of a pilaf-style stew.

Instructions:Place water and crab boil in a large pot. Cover and bring to a boil over high heat. Add corn and cook uncovered for 3 minutes at a moderate boil. Add shrimp and cook 3 minutes more (liquid may not return to a boil). Remove corn and set aside. Remove and shell shrimp, cover and set aside. Cut cooled corn from cobs and set aside. Strain liquid, reserving 6 cups.Heat oil in a large pot over medium heat. Saut? onion and celery until onion is translucent, 4 minutes. Add chile pepper, rice, tomatoes, Worcestershire sauce, lemon juice, 1 teaspoon salt, and 4 cups reserved liquid. Bring it to a boil, reduce heat and simmer until the rice is tender but still soupy, about 35 minutes. (Add more reserved liquid if needed.) Stir corn and shrimp into the stew. Heat at a low simmer until warm. Serve with parsley as garnish.

Instructions:Rinse quinoa in a fine sieve under cold running water until water runs clear. Put quinoa in a pot with 2 1/4 cups water. Bring to a boil, then cover and simmer 20 minutes or until water is absorbed and quinoa is tender. Fluff quinoa with a fork and transfer to a large bowl and allow to cool.While quinoa is cooking, in a small bowl toss beans with vinegar and salt and pepper to taste.Add beans, corn, bell pepper, scallions, garlic, cayenne and coriander to the quinoa. Toss well.In a small bowl whisk together lime juice, salt, cumin and add oil in a stream while whisking. Drizzle over salad and toss well with salt and pepper. Salad may be made a day ahead and refrigerated, covered. Bring to room temperature before serving.

Coloful bell peppers not only add to the appearance and nutrition of the cole slaw, but they are a good source of vitamin C and contain fair amounts of vitamin A and small amounts of calcium, phosphorus, iron, thiamine, riboflavin and niacin.

Instructions:In small Dutch oven or deep pot, heat oil over medium-high heat. Saute onion and garlic until translucent, about 4 minutes. Add clam juice. When liquid boils, add potatoes and tomatoes. Reduce heat to simmer, cover and cook 15 minutes. Add cod, scallops or other fish, tarragon and parsley. Simmer until fish is opaque in center and flakes easily, about 4-5 minutes. Season with salt and pepper, stir and serve.

Instructions:In small bowl, combine cornstarch, curry and sugar. Mix in soy sauce, vinegar and chicken broth. Set aside. In wok or heavy skillet, heat 1 tsp. oil over high heat. Add carrots, pepper, peas, ginger and garlic. Stir-fry until vegetables are brightly colored, about 1 minute. Transfer onto plate with slotted spoon. Place remaining oil in pan and set over high heat. Add shrimp and stir-fry until pink, about 1 minute. Return vegetables to pan. Stir sauce mixture and pour into pan. Simmer gently until shrimp are white in center, 2-3 minutes. Serve immediately over rice.

Instructions:In large skillet over medium-high heat, place oil and swirl to coat bottom of pan. When hot, add onion, reduce heat to medium and saute, stirring often, about 10 minutes until onion is golden. Add vinegar, raise heat to medium-high, and stir another minute. Turn heat back to medium, add garlic, green salsa, jalapeno, green pepper, cilantro, chile powder, cumin, and oregano. Saute, stirring until vegetables are tender, 10 minutes. Add tomatoes and hote pepper sauce or salsa. Stir well, add beans and simmer over low heat until sauce thickens, about 20 minutes. Turn off heat and let stand at least 1 hour before reheating and serving(but refrigerate if longer than 2 hours). Sprinkle with cheese and serve.

Instructions:Preheat oven to 400 degrees. In medium bowl, mix together artichoke hearts, red onion and celery. Set aside. Place salmon filets on 4 individual sheets of aluminum foil. Sprinkle each filet with salt and pepper. In small bowl, mix sour cream with mustard. Spread equal amounts on top of each filet. Top with equal amounts on top of each filet. Sprinkle each filet with equal amounts of parsley. Fold edges and crimp to seal. Place fish packets on cookie sheet. Bake for 12-15 minutes, or until cooked through.

Preheat oven to 375 degrees. In medium bowl, mix together dry crust ingredients. Cut in butter and canola oil until mixture is completely combined. Press crust mixture into bottom of 8x8- or 9x9-inch square baking pan. Bake 15 minutes. Remove from oven and set aside to cool. Lower oven temperature to 325 degrees. Prepare filling: In saucepan over medium heat, cook apples in 1 cup apple juice for 5 minutes or until tender. Mix cornstarch with remaining 1/2 cup apple juice in small bowl. Add to cooking apples, stirring constantly until mixture thickens and cornstarch is completely cooked. Stir in cinnamon, nutmeg, sugar and salt. Set aside. Using back of spoon or spatula, spread prepared crust with apple butter. Top with cooked apple mixture. Sprinkle with granola. Bake 20-30 minutes or until hot and bubbly.

Heat curry powder, stirring constantly, in a small skillet over medium-low heat until fragrant, about 2 minutes. Transfer curry powder to small bowl. Stir in mayonnaise and lemon juice. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Chill, covered, until ready to use.When ready to serve, place one-half tortilla on a work surface. Spread with about 1 tablespoon curried mayonnaise. Place one-fourth of the turkey in the center. Top with 1/2 cup lettuce, 1/4 cup cucumber and 2 tablespoons mango or chutney. Top with an avocado slice. Roll up like a burrito. Repeat process for remaining wraps. Serve or make up to 4 hours ahead and refrigerate wrapped tightly with plastic wrap. Bring back to room temperature before serving.

Instructions:Mix lemon juice, olive oil, garlic, lemon peel and sun-dried tomatoes in blender or food processor. Stir in 2 Tbsp. fresh basil and the capers. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Pour half of vinaigrette over fish and marinate 15-30 minutes. When ready to grill fish, remove from marinade. Discard that marinade.Prepare the grill and spray with oil to keep fish from sticking. Grill fish until just cooked through 2 to 4 minutes per side.Divide fish among 4 plates. Stir remaining vinaigrette and drizzle over fish.

Instructions:Preheat oven to 425 degrees. Spray a nonstick cookie sheet with oil spray. Set aside.Hull strawberries and slice into a bowl. Add fresh blueberries, if using. Mix in orange juice and sugar to taste. Set aside 30 to 60 minutes. (If using frozen blueberries that are defrosted, stir in just before assembling shortcakes.)In a medium bowl, mix together the flour, salt, baking powder and sugar. Use a pastry blender or a fork to cut the butter and oil into the flour mixture until it resembles coarse meal. Add the milk all at once. Stir until it is just incorporated and there are no lumps. Form 8 biscuits by dropping well-rounded quarter cups onto the cookie sheet. Bake 15 to 20 minutes or until biscuits are done. (Use a toothpick to test centers). Cool on a wire rack.Use a serrated knife to gently slice off the top third of each biscuit. Top with some berries and juice. Lay the top third of the biscuit on berries. Top with more berries and juice. Place remaining berries around each biscuit. Garnish with frozen yogurt, if using, and serve.

Add the chestnuts, potato and broth. Add the thyme and cook for about 40 minutes, partially covered, until the potatoes and chestnuts are very soft. Transfer soup to a blender and puree. Return to the saucepan and add the milk. Heat through over medium heat. Season to taste with salt and pepper.

Instructions:In large skillet, heat oil over medium-high heat. Add red pepper, onion, jalapeno and black beans and saute 5 minutes, being careful not to mash beans. Remove skillet from heat and set aside. In bowl, beat eggs and egg whites. Set aside. Return skillet with vegetables to heat. With wooden spoon, stir vegetables and beans until evenly distributed. Pour eggs over top and spread with spoon to evenly distribute across vegetables and beans. Sprinkle with salt and pepper. Cover and cook over medium heat until eggs are just set, about 2-3 minutes. Remove pan from heat and sprinkle with cheese. Cover and allow cheese to melt for just a minute. Gently slide the fritatta onto plate or platter. Top with avocado slices and salsa. If desired, garnish with fresh cilantro. Makes 4 servings.

In medium bowl, beat eggs with egg whites. Set aside. Heat olive oil in nonstick skillet over medium heat. When oil is hot, add tomato, peppers, squash and onion. Cook 3 minutes, stirring constantly. Add eggs and scramble with a fork or spoon. Add salt, pepper and cayenne, if using. When eggs are cooked, stir in soy bacon bits. Divide eggs evenly onto tortillas. Roll up tightly, burrito style, and serve immediately.

Preheat oven to 300 degrees. Lightly coat baking sheet with nonstick cooking spray. In large bowl, combine oats, flour, cinnamon and salt. In separate bowl, whisk together syrup, oil and vanilla extract. Add to oat mixture, stirring well to coat. Spread mixture across baking sheet. Bake 30 minutes. Remove tray from oven. Sprinkle granola with raisins. Using large spoon or spatula, mix raisins and granola well, breaking up any lumps. Return to oven and continue baking an additional 20 minutes. Allow granola to cool completely. Store in airtight container in refrigerator.

Coat frying pan or griddle with nonstick cooking spray. Whisk together flours and cornmeal. Add sugar, baking powder, baking soda and salt. Set aside. In another bowl, lightly beat egg. Add buttermilk and canola oil. Combine liquid ingredients with the dry. Whisk to blend. Batter may contain small lumps. Heat frying pan or griddle over medium-high heat. Working in batches and using measuring cup, pour scant 1/4 -cup batter onto hot griddle per pancake. When bubbles form on top, flip pancakes over. Cook until golden on second side, using more cooking spray for additional batches if necessary. (Keep finished pancakes warm on heatproof platter in oven at 200 degrees). While pancakes are cooking, place strawberry preserves and apple juice in a saucepan on low heat. Add sliced strawberries, stir, and heat for 1 minute. Keep strawberry sauce warm while finishing pancakes. Place finished pancakes on platter. Spoon warm strawberry sauce over top. Top with fresh strawberries.

Instructions:Preheat oven to 400 degrees. Spray 12-cup muffin tin with nonstick cooking spray and set aside. In large bowl, whisk together mashed bananas, orange juice concentrate, egg and oil. Stir in bran flakes. Let sit about 15 minutes to soften cereal. In separate bowl, combine flour with baking powder, baking soda, cinnamon and salt. Add to cereal mixture and stir just until combined. Gently fold in raisins and pecans. Spoon batter evenly into muffin tins. Bake 20 to 25 minutes or until done. Cool 5 minutes in tin.

Instructions:In vegetable steamer set over boiling water, steam broccoli, covered, until tender, about 4 minutes. Rinse with cold water; drain well. In large bowl, whisk vinegar, olive oil, garlic, salt and black pepper. Add broccoli, tomatoes and watercress. Toss to blend. Serve immediately.

Instructions:In medium saucepan, heat water to boiling. Add peas and cook 1 minute; drain. Set aside.In small bowl, whisk egg and set aside. In separate bowl, combine soy sauce, vinegar, and sesame oil; set aside. Heat large nonstick skillet with sloping sides, or a wok, over high heat until hot enough to sizzle and evaporate drop of water. Add oil, ginger and garlic all at once. Stir-fry 10 seconds. Add shrimp and quickly stir-fry to coat with oil, about 30 seconds. Add brown rice; stir-fry, breaking up any clumps with spatula, until heated through, about 1 minute. Add soy mixture, snow peas and scallions. Stir-fry 10 seconds just to blend. Push rice to one side of pan. Add egg and cook, without stirring, until it begins to set, about 10 seconds. Using a spatula, stir egg into rice, breaking egg into small pieces and mixing all ingredients together, about 1 minute. Sprinkle with almonds and serve immediately.

Instructions:In large Dutch oven or other large wide saucepan, heat olive oil. Add pork chops and cook over medium heat 5 minutes on each side. Transfer to side dish. In same pan, place cabbage, onion, carrot, celery and garlic; cook, stirring, until heated through, about 3 minutes. Add apples, potatoes, thyme, salt and pepper, to taste. Stir to blend. Cover and cook, over medium-low heat, stirring occasionally until vegetables are tender, about 20 minutes. Uncover and tuck pork chops into vegetables and add any pork juices. Sprinkle with cider vinegar. Cover and cook until pork chops are reheated and cooked through, about 5 minutes. Serve each person a dish of vegetables with a piece of pork on top.

In large broad saucepan or deep skillet, cook onion, chickpeas and olive oil over medium heat, stirring until browned, about 5 minutes. Add garlic; cook 1 minute. Add tomatoes and water; heat to boil, stirring to break up tomatoes with spoon. Add sweet potato, raisins, cinnamon and cloves and heat to boil. Cover and cook over medium low heat until potatoes are tender, about 15 minutes. Add salt and pepper, to taste. Stir in bulgur; cover and cook over low heat until tender and liquid is absorbed, about 10 minutes. Let stand covered 10 minutes before serving.

Instructions:Preheat oven to 450 degrees. Cut four pieces of foil each about 12 inches long. Position a portion of fish in center of each piece of foil. Rub minced garlic onto fish. Sprinkle lemon juice over fish. Divide zucchini, red onion, orange zest and basil evenly on top of fish. Sprinkle with salt and pepper and drizzle with olive oil. Wrap packets double, folding long sides; crimp ends to seal. Place on baking sheet. Bake fish for 15 minutes. Slide off baking sheet and cut through packets. Slide fish onto bed of rice and top with vegetables and juices.

Arrange bread slices on oven rack and leave in oven until very dry but not brown, about 30 minutes. Shut off oven and allow bread to cool until easily handled. Transfer bread to large bowl. Turn oven back on and preheat to 325 degrees.

Tossing gently so stuffing does not get compacted, and constantly so liquid is evenly distributed, add enough hot broth until mixture is moist but not wet. (Depending on type of bread used, additional broth may be needed.) Taste and adjust seasoning if necessary, adding salt, pepper and thyme, if desired. If mixture seems dry, add additional hot broth, as desired.To bake stuffing, lightly coat a shallow baking pan with canola oil spray and transfer stuffing to 9x13" pan. Using canola oil spray, lightly coat the dull side of a sheet of foil large enough to seal pan. Cover and seal baking pan with foil (shiny side out) and bake about 1 hour. If less moist stuffing with a slightly crisp top is desired, remove foil halfway through baking time.

In medium bowl, mix next 7 ingredients and set aside. Using electric mixer or food processor, combine eggs with oil and apple butter for 10 seconds. Add sugar and blend for 30 more seconds. Add half of dry mixture and process until smooth. Add remaining dry mixture and process until a soft and sticky dough forms. Transfer dough to a large bowl; fold in dried fruit. Divide dough in half and place on either end of cookie sheet. With damp hands, form each piece of dough into a log 3 inches wide and about 3/4-inch high. Bake 25-30 minutes, or until firm to the touch. Logs will spread durig baking. Remove from oven and cool 10 minutes. With serrated knife, slice each log into 1/2-ich cookies, cutting on a diagonal. Bake 10 minutes. Turn each cookie over and bake 10 more minutes. Turn oven off and leave biscotti in oven for 10 minutes. Remove from oven and cool on wire rack. Store at room temperature.

Divide the filling into four portions, packing each pepper with the mixture, mounding any extra at the top. Place stuffed peppers in a baking dish just large enough to hold them. Pour in 1 cup of water. Cover the dish with foil and bake it in the center of the oven for 40 minutes. In the meantime, combine cheese with the breadcrumbs in a small bowl.

Instructions:Coarsely chop garlic. Add salt. Continue chopping until garlic is minced and moist, 2 to 3 minutes. Place in a small bowl. Mix in cumin, paprika, pepper, and 2 tsp. oil. Mix in vinegar and broth. Set aside.Rub fish on both sides with remaining oil. Heat a non-stick skillet over medium-high heat. (If not non-stick, first spray pan lightly with oil.) Sear fish for 1 minute. Turn and sear fish on second side for 1 minute. Transfer tuna to plate. Pour the marinade into the pan and bring just to a boil. Add fish. Reduce heat to a simmer, so liquid barely bubbles. Cook until fish is no longer red in center, about 8 to 10 minutes. Transfer fish to a container. Add marinade and let cool to room temperature. Refrigerate at least 6 hours (or up to 4 days) before using.Shortly before serving the salad, cook potatoes in water until tender. Meanwhile, cut fish diagonally into bite-size pieces. Drain and cool potatoes. Divide lettuce among four plates. Cut potatoes into quarters. Arrange one-fourth of the potatoes and fish on each plate. Spoon some marinade over the top of each serving. Add tomato garnish, if using. Serve.

Instructions:Fill a wide, shallow container with cantaloupe and place in microwave. Cook at 50 percent power for 2 minutes, or just until melon softens slightly. Transfer cantaloupe to a blender or food processor. Add honey, lime juice and cardamon, and blend until smooth. Refrigerate until cold. Before serving, taste and adjust seasoning if necessary with more honey, cardamon and/or lime juice. Garnish with strawberry slices and mint leaves.

Instructions:Preheat grill or broiler. In a glass or other non-reactive bowl, combine the lime juice, soy sauce, garlic, basil, pepper flakes, pepper and oil. Add the tuna chunks to the marinade, turning to coat them. Set aside to marinate 15 minutes at room temperature. Assemble the kebabs using four 10-inch metal or (well-soaked) bamboo skewers. Slip a cucumber piece almost to the bottom of a skewer. Add a tuna chunk, followed by an onion crescent, followed by a tomato. Repeat with more cucumber, fish, onion and tomato. Finish the kabob with a cucumber crescent turned toward the onion. Make 3 more skewers in the same way.Broil the kebabs 3 minutes. Turn and cook until the fish is firm to the touch and the vegetables browned, another 2 to 3 minutes. Do not overcook or the tuna will be dry. Serve either hot or at room temperature with hot steamed rice.

In a large bowl, place turkey, corn, beans, bell peppers and jicama. Gently toss until well mixed and set aside. In a medium bowl, whisk together olive oil and lime juice. Mix in salsa. Add red pepper sauce if desired. Add enough water to thin consistency so dressing can be thinly drizzled over salad. Transfer to serving pitcher.Drizzle dressing over turkey mixture, tossing to coat salad ingredients evenly.Cover and chill 1 to 3 hours so flavors can meld. Bring to room temperature and check seasoning before serving. Add salt and pepper to taste, if desired. Drain off any excess dressing. Place in serving bowl. Sprinkle top of salad with cheese (if using) and cilantro. Serve with baked tortilla chips, if desired.

In large stock pot, heat oil over medium-high heat. Add onion, celery,garlic, ginger and sugar and cook4 minutes, until tender. Add nutmeg and cinnamon. Season with salt andpepper, to taste; stir to coat. Add pumpkin, potato and broth. Bring toboil. Reduce heat to medium-low, partially cover and simmer 20 minutes,until pumpkin and potato are tender. Ladle soup into bowls and top eachserving with sour cream and green onions.

Here in America, food shops featuring Mediterranean cooking offer these colorful, stuffed vegetables. Or you can make them at home, ahead of time, so they are waiting to be reheated for dinner, as delicious as if they were delivered from the Greek taverna you wish was around the corner.

Slice tops off peppers and tomatoes and set tops aside. Remove seeds and membranes from peppers. Using a melon baller or small spoon, scoop out tomato flesh and reserve. Discard seeds from tomato flesh and chop the meat into 1/4-inch pieces.

Stuff peppers and tomato shells loosely with rice mixture, using about 1/2 cup each. Arrange stuffed vegetables in a baking dish just large enough to hold them (9x13-inch or bigger). Replace tops on stuffed tomatoes and peppers. Pour chicken broth into pan. Bake about 1 1/4 hours, until vegetables are soft but still hold their shape.

Kasha, another name for roasted buckwheat, has a nutty taste that complements the flavors of many vegetables. In the following casserole, jicama is used to provide a pleasant contrast to the soft texture of the kasha and vegetables. Jicama, a large Mexican vegetable with a mild, slightly sweet taste, retains its crunch despite cooking and also works well in most salads.

This Egg Foo Yong is made with shrimp and broccoli, plus a combination of eggs and flour that holds everything together. It is made in a non-stick skillet rather than a wok, without using oil, and topped with a savory, thick, brown sauce, just as it is at my favorite Chinese restaurant.

Instructions:Combine broccoli, scallions, onion, bean sprouts, shrimp, sesame oil and pepper in a bowl. Whisk eggs and flour in another bowl until lumps are almost gone, about 2 minutes. Pour over the vegetable mixture, mixing well with a fork. Set aside. Preheat broiler. In a small bowl, mix cornstarch into water to dissolve and place near the stove. In a small pan, bring soy sauce, vinegar, garlic, ginger, sugar and broth to a boil over medium heat. Re-stir cornstarch mixture and whisk in until mixture is thick and clear, about 1 minute. Remove from heat. Set aside. Coat a large, oven-proof, non-stick skillet with cooking spray. Heat pan over medium-high heat. Re-stir egg-vegetable mixture and pour in, smoothing it into an even layer. When eggs are set and the bottom is browned, about 4 minutes, place the pan under the broiler until the top is browned and the center almost dry, about 2 minutes. Loosen the frittata with a metal spatula. Slide it onto a serving plate. Cut into wedges and serve with warm sauce.

Wrap tortillas in foil and place in oven until warm, about 10 minutes. Meanwhile, heat a large non-stick skillet over high heat until very hot. Add oil and tilt pan to coat evenly. Add turkey and stir-fry, stirring constantly, until cooked through and lightly browned. Transfer to a medium bowl and sprinkle with salt and pepper.

Healthy eating is another virtue of this dish. Spaghetti Chicken provides lean protein for two meals, plus one to two servings of vegetables, along with a grain, the first time around. If you like, increase the amount of vegetables the second time around.

Instructions:Coat a large, non-stick skillet with cooking spray. Set pan over medium-high heat. Brown chicken lightly, about 8 minutes, turning pieces occasionally, so it colors on all sides. Transfer chicken to a plate. Heat oil in the pan. Saut? onions and garlic until translucent, about 4 minutes. Add mushrooms. Saut? until they release liquid, about 4 minutes. Add tomatoes with their liquid, oregano, basil, and pepper flakes, if using. Season with salt and pepper. Return chicken to skillet. Simmer until chicken is white at the bone, about 40 minutes, turning it after 25 minutes. Transfer chicken pieces to plate. When they are cool enough to handle, pull all the meat from the bones. There will be about 8 ounces of white meat and 6 of dark meat. Set aside the dark meat for Chicken Spaghetti. Cover the rest, and refrigerate, to use another time. Cook pasta according to package directions. Divide it among 4 bowls. If necessary, reheat sauce in the skillet. When hot, add reserved shredded chicken. Spoon sauce over pasta. Sprinkle with cheese and serve.

Instructions:Heat oil in a medium Dutch oven or large saucepan. Saut? onion and pepper over medium-high heat until onion is translucent, about 4 minutes. With a wooden spoon, stir in tomatoes and greens, mixing until greens collapse and are bright green, about 3 minutes. Pour in broth. Bring to boil, reduce heat and simmer until greens are tender, about 15 to 20 minutes. Mix in beans and chicken. Cook until they are heated through, about 5 minutes. Divide soup among four bowls. Sprinkle a teaspoon of the cheese over each, and serve.

In a blender on medium speed, mix egg white, butter and sugar until smooth. Blend in banana and vanilla until mixture is smooth. Pour banana mixture into bowl with dry ingredients, mixing with spatula until well combined. Batter will be fairly stiff.

Drop batter by walnut-size spoonfuls onto prepared baking sheets, spacing cookies at least 2 inches apart. Flatten them slightly with the back of a wet spoon, wetting spoon frequently between cookies, to make 2-inch cookies.

Bake 10 minutes. Switch position of pans in oven. Bake an additional 5 to 8 minutes or until cookies are golden brown and almost firm in the center when pressed with a finger. Transfer cookies to a baking rack and cool. Stored in airtight container, these cookies keep up to 1 week.

Preheat oven to 350 degrees. Coat inside of a 10-inch sponge-cake type deep pan (12-cup capacity) with canola oil spray. Sift together flour, sugar, spices, baking soda and salt into a medium bowl. In a separate, large bowl, whisk together molasses, applesauce, oil and egg until well blended. Add dry ingredients and stir until well blended. Whisk in boiling water. Pour batter into baking pan. Bake until cake begins to pull away from pan and tester inserted near center comes out clean, about 35 minutes. Transfer to a baking rack and cool in pan 30 minutes. Invert cake onto a platter and cool to lukewarm warm, about 15 minutes.Cut into squares and serve warm or at room temperature, with cider sauce, if desired, or whipped cream or vanilla ice cream.

Instructions:In large skillet, heat oil over medium heat. Add garlic and saute 1 minute. Add mushrooms and saute 3 minutes, until mushrooms release juice. Add broccoli and rosemary and cook 3 to 5 minutes or until broccoli is crisp-tender. Season to taste with salt and pepper.

Meanwhile, heat milk until hot and tiny bubbles form along the sides. (Do not let it come to a boil.) Stir milk into cornmeal, blending well. Cook over hot water for 20 minutes, stirring occasionally. Add molasses, salt, ginger, nutmeg and cinnamon.

Meanwhile, prepare fruit, depending on what version you use. Drain canned fruit. Defrost frozen berries, or wash and hull fresh berries, and lightly sweeten with sugar. Cranberries, frozen or fresh, can also be used after cooking in water and sugar, according to package instructions.

Divide pudding among 6 wide and shallow bowls. Place two or more varieties of fruit along the edge of the pudding, in concentric circles, placing lighter-colored fruit on the inside (like peaches and strawberries) and darker-colored fruit (like cranberries and blueberries) on the outside.

Note: Scalding milk helps blend cornmeal more easily and speeds the cooking process. Scald milk by heating it to the point just before it would begin to boil, or when tiny bubbles form along the sides. At that point, immediately remove from heat and promptly add to cornmeal.

Over a large sheet of waxed paper, carefully grate oranges so just the zest, or thin, top orange layer of the peel, is removed. Take care that the bitter-tasting pith (white part) underneath is not included. This step can be done in advance if grated zest is tightly wrapped in plastic wrap or foil and refrigerated until ready to use. After grating, wrap oranges tightly in plastic wrap and reserve for another use, such as juicing.

In a large bowl, stir together flours, sugar, baking soda, baking powder and salt. In a separate bowl, combine yogurt, egg whites, oil, vanilla and ginger. Add yogurt mixture to dry ingredients and stir just until combined. (Do not over-mix or beat batter until smooth.) Stir in zest, mango and pineapple until just blended.

Bake until cake tester inserted in center comes out clean, about 50 minutes. If pecans have been added to top of bread, begin checking bread after about 40 minutes. If nuts begin to darken, lightly lay a sheet of foil on top of pan to prevent nuts from burning.Remove bread from oven and allow to cool on wire rack 10 minutes. Remove bread from pan and let cool on rack to room temperature.

Meanwhile, over a large sheet of waxed paper, carefully grate oranges so just the zest, or thin, top orange layer of the peel, is removed. Take care that the bitter-tasting pith (white part) underneath is not included. This step can be done in advance if grated zest is tightly wrapped in plastic wrap or foil and refrigerated until ready to use. After grating, wrap oranges tightly in plastic wrap and reserve for another use, such as juicing.

Bake bread 60 minutes or until a tester comes out clean. If pecans have been added to top of bread, begin checking bread after about 40 minutes. If nuts begin to darken, lightly lay a sheet of foil on top of pan to prevent nuts from burning.

Remove bread from oven, set on rack and allow to cool 10 minutes. Remove bread from pan, set back on rack and allow to completely cool. Seal bread tightly in plastic wrap, then foil. Tightly wrapped in foil, bread can be stored frozen for up to 1 month.

Remove mushrooms stems from "broth" and squeeze out their juices into a bowl. Discard stems. Add juices and "broth" to the skillet. Bring to a simmer. Cook, stirring, until gravy is slightly thickened and cinnamon brown, about 2 minutes. Add pepper to taste and keep gravy warm. Wipe out pan.

Place a patty on each of 4 plates. Top each patty with one-fourth of the turkey. Ladle some hot gravy on top. Garnish with leftover cranberry sauce. Serve accompanied by green beans or other leftover vegetables.

Cook sweet potatoes in a large pot of boiling salted water until halfway cooked, (a knife inserted into center will encounter resistance), about 5 minutes. Drain and cool. (This step can be done 1 day ahead if sweet potatoes are covered and refrigerated.)Combine cider, sugar, butter, nutmeg and allspice in a large non-stick skillet over medium-high heat. Bring to a boil, stirring often. Add potatoes and reduce heat so liquid is simmering. Cook 5 minutes, stirring occasionally. Add cranberries and continue cooking until liquid is reduced to a syrupy glaze and potatoes are tender, about 10 minutes. (If the glaze becomes very thick before potatoes become tender, thin it with a small amount of cider. When potatoes are tender, transfer to a serving bowl with a slotted spoon. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Pour remaining glaze over sweet potatoes and serve.

Preheat oven to 400 degrees.In large, shallow bowl, combine thyme, salt, pepper and oil. Set aside.Place nuts in medium bowl. While tossing with fork, lightly spray with canola oil so all surfaces are coated. Lightly coat baking sheet with canola oil spray. Turn nuts onto sheet and spread evenly across surface. Place baking sheet in center of the oven. Toast until nuts are lightly browned and fragrant - about 8 minutes. Occasionally, shake pan to shift nuts and prevent scorching. (Be careful not to let nuts get too dark or they'll taste burned.)Remove from oven and immediately add hot nuts to spice mixture. Stir for a few minutes to coat the nuts thoroughly. Taste and adjust the seasonings. Serve warm or at room temperature. Nuts can be sealed and stored for up to two weeks. Reheat in a hot oven.

Place two non-stick baking sheets in the oven and turn on heat to 450 degrees.Peel potatoes and onion. Coarsely grate potatoes and onion separately, using either a hand grater or a food processor. Place grated potatoes in a large bowl of cold water to soak 10 minutes, then drain well in a colander. (Soaking slows down the rate at which potatoes will turn brown.) Squeeze out by hand, using double sheets of paper to remove excess water. Potatoes should be as dry as possible.Put the potatoes and onions in a mixing bowl. Stir in egg whites, flour, salt and pepper.Remove the hot baking sheets from the oven and spray with oil. Working carefully to avoid burns, spoon pancake mixture onto the hot sheets to make 3-inch pancakes. Bake until golden brown (about 15 to 20 minutes per side), turning once with a sharp-edged spatula. When flipping the pancakes, put them down in the areas still covered with oil.Serve with low-fat sour cream at room temperature or warm applesauce.

In medium bowl, place cheese and allow to soften at room temperature. Mash and work with fork until texture is light enough to combine easily with other ingredients. Gradually add milk until cheese becomes soft and spreadable. Mix in remaining ingredients. Cover and refrigerate up to 2 days ahead or let stand at room temperature 1 hour before serving to allow flavors to blend. Makes about 1 1/2 cups.

Spray large skillet with cooking oil spray. Heat skillet over medium heat. Saut? onion until golden, about 5 minutes. Add rice and curry; saut? 3 minutes. Stir in sweet potato and kale. Saut? 2 minutes. Add water and broth.

Mix in carrots and apple. Tightly cover pot, reduce heat and cook gently until vegetables give up most of their juices, 8 to 10 minutes. Add broth. Cover and cook until carrots are very soft, about 30 minutes.

In a deep pan or skillet, heat the oil over medium-high heat. Saut? the onion until it softens, about 4 minutes. Add the carrot, celery, parsnip (if using) and sweet potato. Lower heat to medium and, stirring frequently, saut? until the vegetables become lightly browned. Add the bay leaf, thyme and 1 cup of stock. Lower heat to a simmer and cook until the vegetables are almost tender, about 10 minutes or less.

Stir in the apple and cranberries, if using the frozen kind. If the mixture seems dry, add enough additional stock to cook the fruit. Gently simmer until the apple has softened and the cranberries are tender, about 5 minutes. If using canned cranberries, add them after the apple has softened, along with the turkey. Heat through for a few more minutes, until the turkey is hot. Season to taste with salt and pepper.

Below is our updated, healthier version of the traditional apple pie. Slice for slice you will save 200 calories, 16 grams of fat and 5 grams of saturated fat, as compared to a traditional "Joy of Cooking" recipe for apple pie.

To Prepare Crust:In food processor, place flour, sugar and salt. Pulse a few seconds to combine. Add butter and oil. Pulse until well combined and flour resembles crumbs. With food processor running, add ice water, beginning with one tablespoon, then gradually adding more until dough begins to gather into uniform ball. If too crumbly, add a bit more water. Gather dough into ball andlet rest for few minutes. On sheet of wax paper, press dough into flattened disk. Cover with another sheet of waxed paper, and, using rolling pin, roll dough into 12-inch circle. Remove top sheet of wax paper and invert dough over 9-inch pie plate. Remove paper and gently press dough down against sides and bottom of plate, pressing out any air bubbles. Crimp edges.Refrigerate. Prepare filling.To Prepare Filling:Preheat oven to 350 degrees. In large bowl, place apples. In another bowl, mix together remaining ingredients. Toss into apples, coating well. Gently spoon apple mixture into prepared crust. Prepare topping.To Prepare Topping:Mix first six ingredients in bowl until well combined. Using pastry blender or fork, cut in melted butter and canola oil until mixture resembles crumbs (it is helpful to use clean fingers). Sprinkle evenly over apples, pressing down gently. Bake 45-60 minutes, or until apples are tender and bubbly. Makes 10 slices. Per slice: 236 calories, 9 g total fat (2 g saturated fat), 39 g carbohydrates, 3 g protein, 3 g fiber, 89 mg sodium.

To make the vinaigrette, place in a blender the vinegar, broth, oil, honey, mint and 10 blueberries. Blend at low speed just until emulsified. Transfer to a jar with a tight lid and refrigerate until needed. Store chilled, vinaigrette will keep up to 2 to 3 days.

In another bowl, toss pears with next 6 ingredients. Spoon pears into prepared cake pan. Cover with oat mixture, pressing down gently. Bake 45-50 minutes, until topping is brown and pears are bubbling. Serve hot, topped with nonfat frozen yogurt or lowfat ice cream, if desired.

Defined in Webster's Dictionary as a mixture of chopped meat and vegetables, hash today can be the traditional trio of corned beef, potatoes and onion or a creative combination like the seafood hash below.

Lamb dishes of all kinds are prepared in Mediterranean countries. The following recipe recalls Mediterranean lamb preparations using the strongly-flavored seasonings that go so well with lamb. And a stew is a good way to make a little lamb go a long way.

Add oil to pan and heat until hot. Saut? onion and carrots until onion softens, 4 to 5 minutes, stirring frequently to avoid burning. Return meat to pan. Add broth, lemon juice, salt and pepper. Cover, reduce heat and simmer 10 minutes.

Quinoa is good served hot or at room temperature, so it works well for pilafs, stews, soups, salads and as a morning cereal drizzled with maple syrup. Cooked quinoa holds well, so dishes made with it will keep for several days.

Instructions:Preheat broiler or grill. Wipe mushrooms with damp cloth. Remove stems. With paring knife, make slits in tops of caps. Stuff slivers of garlic and herbs (if using) into slits.In small bowl, whisk together oil and vinegar with salt and pepper to taste. Brush mushrooms with oil mixture.Place mushrooms, cap-side down, on pan and broil or grill until soft and brown, about 3 to 5 minutes per side. Serve in place of a steak or with lettuce and tomato on toasted whole-grain buns.

Heavily coat medium skillet with cooking oil spray. Heat over medium-high heat until hot. Add scallions, red pepper and garlic. Reduce heat to medium-low and saut? until very soft, about 5 minutes. Do not let vegetables brown.Remove vegetables from heat and mix in beans and rice. Transfer to food processor or blender and process until mixture is coarsely chopped. Be careful not to over-process.

In a pot large enough to hold whole cauliflower head, set steamer basket in about 2 inches of very lightly salted boiling water. Set head firmly upright in basket and cover pot. (If head protrudes, cover pot with foil instead of lid.) On high heat, steam cauliflower for 11-15 minutes, until tender, checking water level and adding more if necessary.

In a microwave-proof bowl, mix together the canola oil and honey. Place in a microwave and warm for 10 seconds. Mix in balsamic vinegar. Pour onto vegetables and apples. Toss to coat well. Transfer to casserole dish, cover and bake until tender, about 1 hour.

Sharp spices and seasonings provide an interesting and complementary contrast to the natural sugars in carrots. In addition to fresh ginger, a pinch of curry powder or cardamom can be added for an extra piquant taste.

In large non-stick pan, heat oil over medium-high heat until hot. Add scallion, onion and ginger and cook over medium-low heat until onion is soft and translucent. Stir in curry powder. Add broth and carrots and bring mixture to a boil. Reduce heat to simmer and cook, covered, about 20 minutes or until carrots are very soft.

Taste and add salt and pepper to taste, as desired. Add more lime juice, coconut extract or curry powder, if desired. (If adding more extract, use only 1/8 teaspoon at a time, as the extract is very intense in flavor.

Preheat oven to 325 degrees.Heat a large, non-stick pan over medium-high heat until very hot. Place oil in pan and heat until very hot. Add onion and celery and saut? until onion is transparent and mixture is golden. Add kale and stir until wilted (if using fresh) or until hot (if using frozen). Stir in parsley, thyme, cilantro and Liquid Smoke (if using). Cook mixture until kale is bright green. Remove from heat.Place crumbled stale cornbread (or cornbread stuffing mix) in large bowl. Stir in vegetable mixture, chiles and nuts until well combined. Add salt and pepper to taste.Tossing gently (so stuffing does not get compacted) and constantly (so liquid is evenly distributed), add enough hot broth until mixture is moist but not wet. (Depending on type of stuffing mix used, additional broth may be needed.) Taste and adjust seasonings, if needed. If stuffing seems dry, add more hot broth, if desired.To bake stuffing, lightly coat a shallow, 9 x 13" baking pan with canola oil spray; transfer stuffing to pan. Using canola oil spray, lightly coat the dull side of a sheet of foil large enough to seal pan. Cover and seal baking pan with foil (shiny side out) and bake about 1 hour. If a less moist stuffing with a slightly crisp top is desired, remove foil halfway through baking time.Serve immediately or store, tightly covered, in refrigerator for up to 2 days. Reheat chilled stuffing before serving. When ready to serve, remove stems from whole kale leaves and arrange along sides of serving dish. Spoon stuffing in center of dish so it is slightly mounded.* Two 8-oz. boxes of a commercial cornbread mix may be needed to produce enough cornbread.

Crumble baked cornbread and allow crumbs to dry completely before measuring. If using fresh kale, wash well and discard stems before chopping. If using frozen kale, defrost and squeeze out excess moisture before chopping.

A blend of meaty portobello mushrooms and tomatoes perfumed with cinnamon, cumin and a zing of cayenne pepper, this dish takes barely 30 minutes to make. Serve it as a side dish, or over aromatic basmati rice for a complete meal. It would also make a great main course at a buffet.

Instructions:Remove stems from mushrooms and discard. Trim away any crumbling edges from caps. Cut each cap in half, then each half crosswise into 3/4-inch slices. Set sliced mushrooms aside.In a small Dutch oven or heavy, large saucepan, heat oil over medium-high heat. Saut? onion and tomato until onions is translucent, about 4 minutes. Stir in cumin, cinnamon and cayenne and cook briefly, until spices are fragrant, about 1 minute. Add tomato sauce and bay leaf. Bring just to a boil and add mushrooms.Cook, stirring occasionally, until sauce is dark brown and slightly thickened, and mushrooms are cooked but not soft, about 12-15 minutes. Remove bay leaf and discard. Add salt to taste. Garnish with cilantro.Serve with cooked brown rice or whole-wheat linguine.

Bake 15 minutes, until set. Cool in pan. Release spring-lock and carefully remove sides of pan. Cut into 8 slices. With wide metal spatula, transfer slices to serving plate, aranging them in a circular pattern, pointed ends facing inward.

Serve warm or at room temperature. If desired, pie can be stored up to 24 hours by covering with foil or plastic wrap and refrigerating. Bring to room temperature before serving, or reheat in oven or microwave.

Preheat oven to 375 degrees. Coat 8-inch square baking dish with cooking spray.Combine apples, raisins and apple juice in bowl, toss well and set aside. In another bowl, combine flour, rolled oats, brown sugar, cinnamon and nutmeg. With pastry blender or knife and fork, cut in butter until mixture resembles coarse meal.Transfer apple mixture to baking dish. Sprinkle flour mixture evenly over surface. Lightly coat top with cooking spray.Cover and bake 30 minutes. Uncover and bake for 20 minutes more or until apples are tender. Remove from oven and let stand on wire rack at least 20 minutes. Cut into squares and serve warm or at room temperature.

This artful fruit compote is colorful and versatile. It can be served "as is" for family meals; as a topping on angel food, sponge, or pound cake for company; or for those favorite winter comfort foods, rice and tapioca pudding.

In large saucepan, combine sugar, water and ginger. Bring to a boil over high heat. Add dried fruit mix. Bring back to a boil and immediately reduce heat to low simmer. Cook, uncovered, until fruit is not quite tender, about 5 minutes.

In clean, dry bowl, beat egg white with salt and cream of tartar until soft peaks form. Add rum extract. While beating, gradually sprinkle in granulated sugar. Beat in dark brown sugar 1 tablespoon at a time. Fold in dates, raisins and almonds.

Stagger pans on separate racks so lower pan is not directly below top pan. Bake cookies 10 minutes. Switch pans to opposite racks. Bake 10 minutes more or until cookies are light brown, firm and feel dry to the touch.

In medium saucepan, combine quinoa with water. Bring to a boil over medium-high heat. Reduce heat; cover and simmer 20 minutes. Remove from heat. Let stand, covered, 5 minutes.In medium bowl, combine quinoa, corn, chicken, tomato, onion, jalapeno, if desired, and cilantro. Add orange juice, cumin and olive oil. Toss to coat. Season with salt and pepper, if desired.

Place bulgur in large bowl. Add water. Let stand until bulgur is al dente, about 20 minutes. Drain well in strainer, pressing gently on bulgur to remove most of the moisture. Transfer bulgur to dry serving bowl.Add celery, bell pepper, chickpeas or cheese if desired, apple, parsley and raisins. Stir to combine. Add lemon juice and oil. Toss with fork to coat well. Season with salt and pepper, if desired. Just before serving, toss with pumpkin seeds.

In a deep saucepan with a tight-fitting lid, combine the cranberries, apples, raisins, ginger, brown sugar, cinnamon, cloves and 1/4 cup of the cider. Bring to a boil over medium heat. Reduce heat to low and cook uncovered about 5 minutes or until some of the cranberries pop and the mixture is moist and bubbling. Stir well, cover, and cook 4 to 5 minutes or until the cranberries are soft. Mix in the walnuts. In a small bowl, combine the cornstarch with the remaining cider and mix it into the cranberry mixture. Cook about 2 minutes, stirring constantly, until thickened.

Preheat the oven to 425 degrees. On a sheet of waxed paper, press the dough into a flat square. Cover with another sheet of waxed paper. Using a rolling pin, roll the dough out into a 6"x10" rectangle. Remove the top sheet of waxed paper. Cut the dough into twelve 1/2"-wide strips. Lay 6 strips, evenly spaced, on the pie. (Lightly flour hands, if sticky.) Weave the remaining 6 strips through the first 6 strips to make a lattice. Trim away extra crust from the edges of the pie. With the remaining crust, make a border along the edge of the pie plate. Crimp the edges between your thumb and forefinger. Brush the crust with the beaten egg. Sprinkle the granulated sugar over the top of the pie. Set the pie on a baking sheet.

Bake for 10 minutes. Reduce heat to 350 degrees and bake for 25 to 30 minutes or until the crust is golden. If the rim of the crust starts to brown too quickly, cover it loosely with strips of foil. Cool the pie on a wire rack for at least 20 minutes before serving.

Preheat oven to 350 degrees. Lightly spray baking sheet with nonstick spray. In medium bowl, cream sugars with butter or margarine. Stir in vanilla, egg and water. Sift together flours, toasted wheat germ, baking soda and salt; stir into creamed mixture. Stir in mini chocolate chips. Drop dough by heaping teaspoonfuls onto baking sheet and flatten slightly with fork. Bake 10-12 minutes. Allow cookies to cool for a few minutes on baking sheet before removing to cool completely on wire racks.

Instructions:Preheat oven to 375 degrees. Spray 8-inchsquare baking dish with cooking spray.In a bowl, whisk together eggs, egg whites and milk. Add spinach, dill, pepper and salt. Stir to combine well and pour into baking dish.Arrange cheese to cover spinach mixture. Lay roasted pepper over cheese in one layer, pressing down gently so some of egg mixture flows up over cheese.Bake until quiche is lightly puffed and browned on bottom, about 30 minutes. Run a sharp knife around edges. Let stand 15 minutes before cutting into squares and serving.

Instructions:In small bowl, combine broth, oyster sauce, curry powder and sugar. Set aside.In wok or large nonstick skillet, heat 1 teaspoon oil over high heat. Stir-fry shrimp until pink. Transfer to plate.Heat remaining oil in wok. Stir-fry garlic and ginger just until fragrant, 10 seconds. Add peas, onion, bell pepper and scallions.Stir-fry until vegetables are bright and crisp-tender, 2 minutes. Stir in curry sauce. Add noodles and shrimp. Stir-fry untilshrimp are cooked through and dish is moist but not soupy, about 3 minutes. Serve immediately.Note: Good choices include Madras curry powder sold in the spice section of many supermarkets, or Oriental curry powder sold in Asian food markets.

Sicilians are blessed with great swordfish, intensely flavored sun-ripened tomatoes, superb olives and the best capers in the world. Siracusans, in eastern Sicily, combine all these ingredients in this outstanding pasta dish.

Instructions:Bring to boil a large pot of water.Heat oil in large, non-stick skillet over medium-high heat. Saut? onions and garlic until onions soften, about 5 minutes.Add tomatoes and cook until they start to soften, 3 to 4 minutes, stirring occasionally.Add fish, herbs, olives, capers, red pepper flakes, salt and freshly ground pepper to taste. Simmer gently until fish is cooked through, about 8 minutes.Meanwhile, cook spaghetti according to package directions. Drain and place in warm serving bowl.Pour sauce over pasta. Sprinkle with lemon juice and garnish with parsley. Serve immediately.

Instructions:Preheat oven to 400 degrees. Spray 11-inch pizza pan or cookie sheet with cooking spray. In medium skillet, heat oil over medium high heat. Add onions, bell pepper and garlic. Saut? until soft, about 4 minutes. Add tomatoes. Cook, stirringoccasionally, until liquid from tomatoes has evaporated, about 12 minutes. Stir in 1 Tbsp. basil and 1 tsp. thyme. Season with 1/8 tsp. salt and pepper, if desired.Combine rice with egg and remaining basil and thyme. Season with remaining salt and pepper, if desired. Mound rice in center of prepared pan. Cover rice with plastic wrap. Using your fingers,pat and shape rice into 10 1/2-inch circle about 1/2-inch thick, makinga rim around edge. Lift away plastic wrap.Sprinkle half of the mozzarella over rice. Cover cheese with cooked tomato mixture. Top with remaining mozzarella. Sprinkle Romano cheese over top.Bake until cheese is bubbly and edge of rice crust is crisp, 15 to 18 minutes. Serve hot.

In large Dutch oven, layer vegetables and seasonings in the following order: onion, garlic, white potato, sweet potato, cabbage, mushrooms, bay leaf, carrots, celery, bell pepper, cauliflower, eggplant, lima beans, parsley, green beans andtomatoes.

Add meat and cook, breaking it up with wooden spoon until it no longer looks red, about 3 minutes. Stir in chili powder, cocoa, cumin and oregano. When seasonings are fragrant, in about 30 seconds, addbeans, tomatoes and salsa. Simmer chili until liquid is reduced by half, about 10 minutes. Season to taste with salt and pepper.

Dr. Fowke will conduct a randomized, placebo-controlled, double-blinded, pilot trial comparing the effects of Brassica consumption and indole-3-carbinol supplements on PSA among prostate cancer patients with PSA recurrence following prostectomy.

Dr. Smith is investigating the molecular mechanisms involved in the protection by selenium of normal bone marrow and gut epithelium cells from chemotherapeutic toxicity during treatment of colon and squamous cell carcinomas by the chemotherapeutic drug irinotecan.

Dr. Pratts investigations will focus on the mechanisms by which the vitamin A derivative, retinoic acid, inhibits the expression of two anti-apoptotic proteins in human estrogen-dependent breast cancer cell lines and thereby promotes apoptosis of the cells. She will also determine if down-regulation of expression of the respective genes by retinoic acid improves the cytotoxicity of several chemotherapeutic agents.

In this postdoctoral proposal, Dr. Liu will investigate the effects of the green tea catechin, (-)-epigallocatechin-3-gallate (EGCG), on telomerase gene expression in MCF-7 breast cancer cells and human teratocarcinoma cells to determine if the down regulation of this gene is the mechanism by which EGCG induces apoptosis of cancer cells.

Using a mouse model of acute lymphoblastic leukemia, Dr. Anthony is investigating whether the provision of a dietary supply of the amino acid glutamine can reduce the toxic side effects and increase the efficacy of tumor killing during asparaginase therapy.

Dr. Wei will firstly test whether the carotenoid, lycopene, can prevent the development of UVB-induced skin cancer in a mouse model. Secondly, he will evaluate the subsequent therapeutic efficacy of lycopene on established skin tumors in this system.

Dr. Cheungs studies are determining if dietary barley beta-glucan enhances the anti-tumor effect of specific IgM antibodies against small cell lung cancer as well as the effects of anti-tumor vaccines that induce IgM antibodies on lymphoma and melanoma.

Dr. Steck Scotts studies are examining whether human subjects with both high intake of well-done meat containing carcinogens and less active forms of DNA repair genes are at increased risk for breast cancer.

Dr. Birts studies are designed to develop strategies for improving the colon cancer prevention potential of resveratrol. Studies are conducted in laboratory animals using free resveratrol and by resveratrol in the form that accumulates in transgenic alfalfa (resveratrol glucoside).

Dr. Djurics studies will develop and test a dietary exchange list that will help women consuming a typical American diet to change to a more Greek-Mediterranean diet high in monounsaturated fats and rich in fruits and vegetables that may lower breast cancer risk.

In this postdoctoral proposal Dr. Thimmulappa is investigating how the chemopreventive agent sulforaphane, from broccoli, can prevent dietary carcinogens derived from cooked red meat from inducing colon cancer.

Dr. Nakshatri's investigations are determining whether a component of the herb feverfew, CXCR4, can synergize with docetataxel and apigenin to inhibit breast cancer metastasis in mice and also increase the survival of these mice.

Dr. Jatoi is studying the effects of the drug inflixamib on lung cancer patients to determine if the treatments improve weight, appetite, quality of life, and survival by preventing the anorexia/cachexia syndrome.

Dr. Ferguson's aims are designed to identify components of cranberry that are responsible for its observed anticancer activity and to determine the mechanisms underlying the ability of cranberry constituents to inhibit the proliferation of prostate tumor cells and induce cell death.

Dr. Clarke's studies are determining whether the response of breast cancer cells to antiestrogens such as tamoxifen are mediated in part by induction of oxidative stress and whether dietary antioxidants including vitamin E can compromise the efficacy of antiestrogen therapy of women with breast cancer.

Dr. Sytkowski is studying the human selenium binding protein (hsp 56) that is expressed in prostate cancer cell lines to determine its cellular and molecular properties and its biological action, its effect on growth of tumor cells in mice, and its distribution in both prostate tumors and normal cells.

Dr. Edwards is determining whether changes in the fat composition of low density lipoproteins due to feeding rats diets of different polyunsaturated fats can lead to metabolic changes that may affect metastasis of breast cancer cells.

Dr. Kang is investigating whether introducing a gene encoding an n-3 fatty acid desaturase into human tumor cells in culture will decrease the levels of more undesirable n-6 polyunsaturated fatty acids and increase n-3 fatty acids, thus providing an anticancer effect.

Dr. Gewirtz is studying the mechanism by which vitamin D analogs and radiation caused some human breast cancer cells in culture to die out, either through the action of the cell signaling molecule ceramide, or through mutations in the p53 gene.

Dr. Resh is investigating how different types of fatty acids perform in the N- and S- acylation of kinases of the Src family, which are involved in cell transformation. Acylation leads to binding to cell membranes, thus facilitating the capability of the Src kinases to lead to cancer.

Dr. Thompson continues to examine the role of dietary amino acids, especially arginine, in regulating the genes involved in human liver cancer development and progression and to identify other genes in this category.

Dr. Soliman is examining the relationship between a genetic alteration in an enzyme system, dietary factors, and age in a unique population of colon cancer patients who do not eat a typical Western style diet.

Dr. O'Keefe is doing a comparative study of colonic bacteria versus diet in groups of African-Americans, Caucasian Americans, and Native Africans to determine whether changes in bacterial populations might contribute to the dietary risk factors for colon cancer.

Dr. Maskarinec is using serum samples and data from several dietary surveys to determine whether insulin-like growth factor is associated with diet, soy intake, increased density in mammograms and other risk factors for breast cancer.

Dr. Kajdacsy-Balla is investigating whether increased cellular iron levels are involved in the invasive growth of prostate and breast cancer cells and what factors can modulate the invasive potential of the cancer cells.

Dr. Vucenik is examining the action of inositol hexaphosphate or phytic acid from cereal products, as an inhibitor of the growth of new blood vessels in tumor cells, presumably through reduction of growth enhancing factors, such as vascular endothelial growth factor and fibroblast growth factor.

Dr. Hilakivi-Clarke is examining the inhibitory effect of either prepubertal dietary soy or of prepubertal estradiol injection on carcinogen-induced mammary cancer in rats and mice, based on the hypothesis that up regulation of estrogen receptor beta and of the tumor suppressor gene BRCA1 are involved in the effect.

Dr. Walle is using a compound derived from plants to determine whether it can prevent or inhibit the actions of enzymes that activate or deactivate carcinogens, using human bronchial cells as the model system.

Dr. Diamond is using methylated and unmethylated transfer RNA isoacceptors to study formation of selenium-containing proteins in cells and how the process relates to the cancer chemopreventive effects of selenium.

Dr. Zhu's studies focus on the ability of chemopreventive dietary constituents to modulate estrogen metabolism through alteration of Phase I and Phase II enzymes leading to 2-OH and 4-OH derivatives of estrogen.

Dr. Wargovich is using certain constituents of herbal dietary supplements as models for modulating COX1 and COX2 expression in rat colon, as well as their effects on cellular receptors and induction of apoptosis.

Dr. Jing is studying further the relationship between cathepsin B induction by trans-retinoic acid and the cleavage of certain retinoic acid receptors, leading to differentiation of acute promyelocytic leukemia cells.

Dr. Erdman is investigating whether tomatoes or broccoli have a chemopreventive action against prostate cancer in a rat model, with emphasis on transplanted tumors, mediators of antioxidant activity, androgen receptors and vascular endothelial growth factor.

During his postdoctoral study, Dr. Thuillier is investigating whether transcription factors known as PPARs (peroxisome proliferator-activated receptors) and certain fatty acids can inhibit carcinogen-induced skin tumors in mice.

Dr. Seyfried is using both mouse and human brain tumor cells, implanted intracerebrally in mice, to evaluate the effects of 20 or 40% caloric restriction on tumor growth and associated factors such as angiogenesis and apoptosis.

Dr. Redner is investigating, through study of fusion protein formed from retinoic acid receptor gene and the amino terminus of the nucleophosmin gene, how retinoic acid reverses the differentiation defect in acute promyelocytic leukemia.

Dr. Narayanan is using normal and prostate cancer cells to identify the genes responsive to the dietary antioxidants resveratrol and ellagic acid, in order to pinpoint the hormonal, regulatory and mechanistic aspects of the cellular response.

Dr. Meadows is studying the mechanisms by which restriction of two dietary amino acids blocked the growth of melanoma cells, affected other cellular functions, and eventually led to death of the melanoma cells.

Dr. Kelly is doing a controlled trial with silymarin, the active ingredientof milk thistle, to determine whether it decreases liver toxicity in children receiving chemotherapy for acute lymphoblastic leukemia.

Using mice implanted with human colon cancer cells, Dr. Hardman is continuing to investigate the ability of an antioxidant-free fish oil concentrate to increase the efficacy of cancer chemotherapy drugs and decrease the intestinal damage from the drugs.

Dr. Ferguson is examining different types of cranberry extracts to determine which are most active against the growth of cell lines representative of human lung, colon, breast and prostate tumors as well as melanoma.

Dr. Talalay will be conducting clinical studies on the pharmacokinetics and metabolism of glucosinolates and isothiocyanates, derived from young sprouts of crucifers, to elucidate their mechanisms of action in the human body.

Dr. Gupta is using an analog of vitamin D, namely EB 1089, to determine whether exposure of human breast cancer cells to EB 1089 along with fractionated radiation will bypass resistance to treatment and lead to death of the tumor cells.

In a dietary intervention trial, Dr. Babaian will determine whether men who are asymptomatic for prostate cancer can follow a reduced fat diet containing soy protein every day and attend various clinical support group sessions.

Dr. Clinton is investigating the effects of soy products on growth of transplantable bladder carcinomas in mice, under the premise that soy products reduce the levels of some cell growth factors and lead to death of tumor cells.

Dr. Buckley is examining some novel genes found in hormone responsive rat and human tumor cells and investigating whether expression of these genes can be altered by dietary differentiating agents as butyrate, retinoic acid and vitamin D.

Using athymic nude mice implanted with androgen sensitive or androgen insensitive human prostate tumor xenografts as a model, Dr. Mukhtar will determine whether (-)-epigallocatechin-3-gallate from green tea can inhibit tumor cell growth, induce apoptosis and arrest the tumor cell cycle in the G0-G1 phase of growth.

Dr. Tighe is examining the response of mouse embryonic stem cells to retinoic acid, especially with regard to signaling pathways that are involved in cell differentiation and in regulation of tumor cell growth.

Dr. Sauer is exploring whether certain human cancer cell lines will show a decreased response to linoleic acid in the presence of n-3 fatty acids, with levels of various physiologic factors as a measure of response.

Dr. Resh is studying whether certain oncoproteins, the SRC-related kinases, can be acylated by fatty acids besides palmitate, and whether dietary intake of specific fatty acids modifies the pattern of acylation and of possible malignant transformation.

Dr. Chinni is investigating the molecular mechanisms by which indole-3-carbinol from cruciferous vegetables can suppress the growth of prostate cancer cells in culture and eventually eliminate the tumor cells.

Dr. Gautam is attempting to use resveratrol, a dietary constituent, to selectively purge leukemia cells from bone marrow autografts without damaging the normal hematopoietic progenitor cells in the bone marrow.

Dr. Nakshratri is investigating whether daily intake of parthenolide, the active constituent of the herb feverfew, can suppress breast cancer metastasis in a nude mouse breast cancer model and increase the response to taxol, used in treatment of breast cancer.

Dr. Rice is testing whether increasing the level of zinc in the culture fluid and adding prolactin will affect the growth and vitality of human prostate cancer cells, and possibly lead to death of the cancer cells.

Dr. Grad is investigating the ability of vitamin C to deplete glutathionine and act as a chemosensitizing agent in multiple myeloma, using both invitro and in vivo tests to explore the sensitivity of multiple myeloma toantineoplastic agents.

Dr. Martin's goals in this study are to determine whether the metallic dietary constituents, cadmium and arsenic, have an estrogenic effect in animals and whether they enhance mammary tumors, either alone or together.

In this postdoctoral fellowship, Dr. Cai is investigating whether butyrate, from fermentation of dietary fiber, is involved in the induction of heat shock proteins and apoptosis, using human colon carcinoma cells as a model system.

Dr. Agarwal is assessing the effect of grape seed extract on cell signaling in human prostate cancer lines in culture and the action of the extract on growth and regression of human prostate cancer cells implanted in mice.

Dr. Schedin is feeding rats diets of natural foods with different levels of vitamin A precursors to study whether the vitamin influences breast tissue development and has a possible response to a mammary carcinogen.

Dr. Feldman is exploring the role of insulin-like growth factor binding protein in the anticancer effect of calcitrol (1, 25-dihydroxyvitamin D), and the intermediates involved, in order to develop vitamin D therapy for prostate cancer.

Using a transgenic mouse model of prostate cancer, Dr. Elgavish is exploring whether genistein from soy stimulates apoptosis, or whether it inhibits expression of proteins involved in metastatic spread of prostate tumor cells to bone.

Dr. Sytkowski is investigating the mechanism by which dietary selenium suppresses prostate cancer, presumably through a selenium binding protein that may be a growth-regulating protein, which is deficient in prostate cancer cells.

Dr. Whelan is using a mouse model of intestinal carcinogenesis to delineate the role of the polyunsaturated fatty acid arachidonate and related entities, such as prostaglandin, in the process of tumor formation.

Dr. Thompson is determining the urine and blood levels of markers of oxidative stress in groups of women on diets with up to 10 servings/day of certain vegetables and fruits, in comparison with levels in women on diets with 3 servings/day of fruits and vegetables.

Dr. Shiverick is investigating whether dietary isoflavonoids from soy have any inhibitory effect on androgen-sensitive and androgen-independent prostatic carcinoma cells, both in culture and in nude mouse xenografts, in addition to studying the mechanism of growth inhibition by the isoflavones.

Dr. Schwartz is attempting to determine the relationship between calorie restriction and the role of the adrenal gland in cancer prevention, specifically through inhibition of enzymes involved in metabolism of sugars.

Dr. Sacks is investigating the effects of the spice curcumin on specific growth factors in human oral cavity cells to determine whether curcumin causes atypical cells to die rather that continue growing.

Dr. Pratt is investigating how retinoic acid (RA) inhibits the growth of hormone-dependent breast cancer cells (MCF-7), based on the hypothesis that RA decreases the levels of certain cell kinases and leads to hypophosphorylation of the kinase complexes.

Dr. McEntee is using the Min/+ mouse colon tumor model to determine whether resveratrol, an antioxidant from grapes, can cause regression or prevention of the intestinal adenomas in the Min mouse and whether it acts synergistically with sulindac to eliminate the intestinal tumors.

Dr. Gewirtz is investigating how vitamin D, or analogs which are less hypercalcemic, can induce apoptosis in breast cancer cells, what cell signaling or regulatory factors are involved, and whether vitamin D compounds can sensitize radioresistant breast cancer cells to radiation treatment.

Dr. Dong is studying whether resveratrol, a cancer chemopreventive agent present in grapes and peanuts, induces apoptosis in tumor cells through a p53-dependent pathway or through a route dependent on activation of certain protein kinases.

Dr. Dodd has developed a transgenic mouse model of prostatic cancer which mimics the human situation of progression from dysplasia to carcinoma and is using the model to determine how dietary genistein inhibits the progression of prostatic cancer.

Dr. Dannenberg is trying to delineate the means by which dietary rosemary and its major components, carnosol and ursolic acid, inhibit the expression of the gene for COX 2, an enzyme involved in the oxidative activation of some carcinogenesis.

Dr. Begleiter is investigating how increased levels of the DT-Diaphorase enzyme (DTD) enhance the antitumor activity of chemotherapeutic agents such as mitomycin C, in addition to searching for diet-based enzyme inducers, which increase the activity of DTD.

Dr. Albright is examining the opposing roles of dietary antioxidants, such as beta-carotene and tocopherols, versus reactive oxygen species in tumor apoptosis, using a transgenic mouse model that readily develops mammary tumors.

The objective of Dr. Blumenthal's research is to delineate which combinations of vitamins  especially A, E and C, will afford the most protection to liver, kidney, intestines and bone marrow against radiation from radioactive antibody therapy for cancer.

Dr. Robbins is studying whether the ability of dietary polyunsaturated fatty acids (PUFA) to cause the death of brain tumor cells, specifically from gliomas, might be due to an increase in free radical formation, causing lower cell survival and greater radiosensitivity of the PUFA treated cells.

Dr. Crowell is examining the hypothesis that dietary isoprenoids such as geraniol or farnesol may exert antitumor effects in pancreatic tumor models through modulation of the mevalonate pathway in tumor cells, and thus depress the proteins that increase tumor cell growth.

Dr. Kumar is exploring whether supplementation of the diets of prostate cancer patients with the soy isoflavone, genistein, will lead to a decrease in the levels of biomarkers which are indicative of risk for prostate cancer.

Dr. Rockwell is investigating the role of vitamin A tissue stores in lung toxicity and tumor metastases after chemotherapy or radiotherapy, with the aim of decreasing the toxicity of these therapies in lung cancer patients.

Dr. Chen is investigating whether an extract of edible mushrooms can inhibit aromatase activity in different cellular systems, and thus suppress biosynthesis of excess estrogen, which is implicated as a factor in breast cancer.

Dr. Martinez is investigating whether eating cruciferous vegetables, which naturally contain isothiocyanates, will decrease the risk from recurrence of new adenomas in patients who recently had colonic adenomas removed.

Dr. Boyd is attempting to correlate th levels of serum and urine levels of markers for cell damage in women on a low-fat breast cancer intervention diet with breast density as determined by mammography.

Dr. Clark is evaluating the antileukemic action of perillyl alcohol a hydroxylated monoterpene found in plants in inducing growth arrest and apoptosis in transformed cells carryng the Philadelphia chromosome and determining the effects of other monoterpenes on leukemias with the Philadelphia chromosome.

The objective of Dr. Meadow's research is to elucidate the mechanism by which restricting certain dietary amino acid supresses the growth and metastasis of melanoma and other tumors in an animal model.

Dr. Turner is using this postdoctoral fellowship to study whether phytate a component of high fiber diets decreases colon cancer in animal models by enhancing programmed cell death through inhibition of certain enzymes involved in the process of carcinogenesis.

Dr. Sharp is investigating the chemopreventive effect of diet restriction and feeding of the phytoalexin resveratrol from grapes either alone or in combination on tumo formation in mice which develop pituitary and/or thyroid tumors spontaneously.

Dr. Markaverich is determinin the effect of two dietary bioflavonoids on the establishment progression and metastatic potential of prostate cancer in a mouse model which mimics prostate cancer in humans.

Dr. Black is examining the roles of immune function and epidermal cycloxygenase activity andgene expression in relation to dietary lipid levels and how they affect the carcinogenic effects of ultraviolet irradiation as a means to suppress skin cancer.

Dr. Sawey is working on determining the relationship between cell-cell interactions as mediated by gap junctions and the suppression of mammary tumorigenesis in a rodent model by the Bowman-Birk protease inhibitor from soybeans.

Dr. Redner continues to pursue the hypothesis that a nucleolar nucleophosmin-retinoid acid receptor gene blocks differentiaton in acute promyelocytic leukemia through competition for retinoic acid receptors.

In this project Dr. Gimble is studying whether natural or synthetic peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor ligands will protect against mammary carcinogenesis in rats given a carcinogen and fed a diet high n either fish or corn oil.

Inthis project Dr. Kelly is examining whether children with acute lympoblastic leukemia have low serum antioxidant levels as well as increase markers of oxidative stress even if the dietary intake is sufficient; in addition the influence of chemotherapy n the markers of stress will be studied.

Dr. Huang is developing and validating a food frequency questionnaire for China, leading to better knowledge of nutrient data and associations between dietary factors, lifestyle and chronic disease, especially cancer.

Dr. Gudas is determining the molecular mechanisms leading to loss of retinoid acid receptor gene expression in mammary carcinoma that results in the inensitivity of the cancer to the growth-inhibitory effects of retinoids.

Dr. Yan is testing the hypothesis that high-selenium soybeans have a greater inhibitory effect than low-selenium soybeans on cancer metasasis in mice and on the development of primary tumors in a rat mammary tumor model.

Dr. Lawson is exploring the dietary habits and levels of certain detoxifying enzymes in pancreatic cancer patients and comparing these parameters with those in control to determine the relative influence of each factor in the disease.

Dr. Vucenik is performing detailed phamacokinetic studies of orally and intravenously administered inositol hexaphosphate (IP6) in both normal and tumor bearing mice, in order to introduce this chemopreventive agent from dietary fiber into clinical trials.

Dr. Roman is studying the extent to which cellular retinoic acid binding proteins act as regulatory proteins in cancerous states by monitoring cellular retinoic acid levels and controlling the synthesis or degradation of retinoic acid through interaction with specific cellular proteins.

Dr. Hwang is studying whether fatty acids from fish oils have a protective effect against cancer by inhibiting a key enzyme which may be involved in the oxidative processes associated with carcinogenesis.

Dr. Welsh is testing the hypothesis that activation of cell death (apoptosis) by vitamin D and/or its analogs causes regression of breast cancer, inhibits local invasion and retards the metastic spread of estrogen-independent breast cancer in a mouse model.

Dr. Bertramis investigating why beta-carotene has a protective action against cancer in laboratory animal models, but no such effect in clinical trials in humans, perhaps because metabolic products of carotene may be the actual protective agents.

Dr. Burnstein is investigating the mechanism by which a metabolite of vitamin D, vitamin D3, inhibits growth of prostate cancer cells  possibly by increasing levels of two proteins that act as inhibitors of cell growth.

Dr. Hilakivi-Clarkeis investigating whether a high fat diet during pregnancy, which leads to elevated serum estradiol levels, can increase breast cancer risk in the female offspring, presumably through changes in estrogen receptor levels and/or function and eicosand metabolism in the mammary gland.

Dr. Goldkorn is determining the effects of fumonisms, toxic compounds produced by molds sometimes found in foods, on the processes of cell growth and death in animal cells, and studying enzyme systems whih may mediate the effects of the toxins.

Dr. Bikle is investigaing the mechanism underlying the differential responses of normal human keratinocytes and squamous carcinoma cells to treatment with vitamin D3 and retinoic acid, based on the concept that transcriptional intermediary factors are involved in the different responses.

Dr. Nelson aims to study the chemopreventive effects of selenomethionine on the molecular processes involved in colon carcinogenesis in rats, especially with regards to intracellular polyamine levels and their effects on cell characteristics such as proliferation and apoptosis.

Dr. Thompson is measuring various markers for DNA damage in women on diets with either 3 or 10 daily servings of fruits and vegetables, based on the hypothesis that fruits and vegetables help decrease DNA damage.

In this project Dr. Hursting is examining the effect of glucocorticoids such as corticosterone on the decrease in bladder tumors in mice given a bladder carcinogen while on a moderately restricted diet.

Dr. Heydari is investigating whether dietary restriction reduces the incidence of cancer in mice treated with a carcinogen by decreasing the accumulation o DNA damage presumably because of an increase in DNA repair during dietary restriction.

Dr. Chapkin is comparing the effects of various polyunsaturated fatty acids in the activation of a gene product which is implicated as part of the system tht modulates the early stages of colon cancer development.

Dr. Koury is testing whether the hypothesis that folate deficiency can lead to malignant transformation by using mouse models which proide means to study the phase of the cell affected and the time frame involved.

Dr. Kagan is examining whether it is possible to reduce development of secondary cancer (acute myeloid leukemia) after treatment with the anticancer drug eoposide through vitamin C and E supplementation.

Dr. Jamison is studying the effect of combinations of vitamins C and K3 along with vincristine treatment in suppressing tumor growth and causing cell death in androgen independent prostate cancer cells as carried in nude mice.

In this project Dr. Wolff is evaluating whether the generally lower breast cancer rate in Hispanic women is due to higher intake of flavonoid-containing foods based on comparisons of food intake in ifferent racial and ethnic groups.

Dr. Talmage is studying the involvement of cellular proteins which bind to the vitamin A derivatives in this case retinol in the suppression of and death of breast cancer cells using human breast cancer cells as the model.

Dr. Geliebter is investigating whether rats maintained on a diet high in animl fats for two successive generations and thus putatively exposed to estrogen will have a higher and earlier incidence of prostatic hyperplasia both benign and malignant than in similarly treated rats on corn oil diets.

Using a unique rat model, Dr. Shull is investigating whether a diet with 40% fewer calories than usual will inhibit estrogen induction of mammary cancer and affect various parameters of cell proliferation and death.

Dr. Wong is investigating whether retinoic acid suppresses human oral cancer cell growth because it induced expression of an oral tumor suppresser gene (doc-1) and will characterize the specific regions of doc-1 involved in the retinoic acid effect.

Dr. Hohl is examining the role of perillyl alcohol, a metabolite of limonene, in decreasing the expression of Ras protein in patients in a clinical trial, presumably through inhibition of farnesyl- and geranylgeranyl protein transferases.

Dr. Smoot is determining whether the number of bacteria in the stomach, as measured by an antibody test, is related to dietary polyunsaturated fat levels, or whether the fats affect bacterial growth in culture.

Dr. Aneskievich is determining whether various fatty acids might act as peroxisome proliferators and interfere with the beneficial effects of retinoids in regulating the growth and differentiation of malignant skin cells.

Dr. Lu intends to study the effect of the naturally occurring selenium compound, methylselenocysteine, on both cell cycle control in rats given a carcinogen, as well as examining the expression of 6 genes involved in regulation of cell cycles and programmed cell death.

Dr. Grizzle is exploring the effects of dietary corn oil linseed oil or butter on the growth of three human prostatic cancer lines which have been xenotransplanted into mice, based on the hypothesis that dietary fat levels influence risk of prostatic cancer.

Dr. Lopez-Carillo is completing her hospital case control study of a possible relationship between high consumption of ht chili peppers and gastric cancer by analyzing the serum specimens obtained during the previous grant period for H. pylori and analyzing the collected data.

In this intervention study Dr. Thompson and Dr. Goss are investigating the effet of dietary flaxseed (baked in a muffin) in postmenopausal women with breast cancer evaluating levels of plasma sex hormones urinary lignan excretion and tumor growth as markers of any influence flaxseed may have to inhibit breast cancer.

The role of estrogen and of the estrogen recetor on regulation of the Bcl-2 gene implicated as necessary for survival of the MCF-7 line of breast cancer cells is being investigated by Dr. Pratt. Further the function of progestins and various growth factors in regulating Bcl-2 and other members o this gene family will be determined.

Dr. Boyd is conducting a dietary intervention study in which breast cancer risk will be followed as part of a ten-yea study of women on a low-fat high-carbohydrate diet with concurrent measurement of various serum hormones.

Dr. Sylvester is examining the basis for theprotective effect of palm oil against induction of mammary tumors in female rats and whether this effect is due to specific fatty acids or antioxidant constituents which are present in high concentrations in palm oil.

Dr. Sellin is studying the role that cell adhesion molecules have in colon cell diffrentiation and transformation as well as the role of dietary calcium short chain fatty acids and genetic factors in influencing tumor formation in the colon.

Dr. Kuratko is studying the effect of various types and levels of lipids on expression of a tumor suppressing gene (the manganese superoxide dismutaseenzyme) both in a normal rat intestinal cell line and in chemically-induced colon tumors in rats.

During this postdoctoral fellowship Dr. Jiang will study the molecular mechanism of dietary n-3 polyunsaturated fatty acids (PUFA's) for their protctive effect against experimental colon carcinogenesis.

Dr. Black is continuing his investigations on the role of various types and levels of dietary lipids on the immune system of mice with ultraviolet (UV)-induced skin cancer in an attempt to deveop immunopreventive therapies against these cancers.

Dr. Whelan will investigate whether increased biosynthesis of certain fatty acid derivatives (prostaglandins and leukotrienes) will alter the tumor incidence in mice that already have a propensity to devlop intestinal tumors.

Dr. Steinman is investigating whether the protective action of butyrate found in dietary fiber against colon cancer involves activaton of a tumor suppressor gene named p21(WAF1) by following the presence of this gene in colon biopsy samples from patients on high or low fiber diets.

Based on preliminary results that show that the specific fusion protein (NPM-RAR) inhibits differentiation of yeloid cells Dr. Redner is continuing his investigations into the mechanism whereby NPM-RAR might alter vitamin A signaling and may compete with retinoic acid receptors for binding to a family of proteins which are essential to retinoic acid receptor funtion.

The goal of Dr. Kumar's research is to explore the cellular basis for the protective action of butyrate (produced by fermentation of dietary fiber) against colorectalcancer as well as the involvement of apoptosis or programmed cell death in the protective effect.

In order to provide nutritional guidelines for people with a geneti predisposition to colon cancer Dr. Sedwick is investigating the effects of folate deficiency on cell cytotoxicity in colon tumor cell lines.

Dr. Mukhtar will investigate the major anticarcinogenic compounds found in green tea (catechins) for their ability to inhibit carcinogenesis through inhibition of ornithine decarboxylase (ODC) and polyamine levels in a rat prostate model.

Dr. Sacks is examining the effects of various dietary compounds such as curcumin and retinoic acid on the expression of an activaing enzyme cyclooxygenase in both normal and premalignant human oral cells in culture.

Dr. Peacocke is continuing her studies on the role of various domains of the RAR-beta2 receptor in mediating the cell growth inibitory effects of retinoids. The research will examine if the DNA binding domain of RAR-beta2 and the ligand binding domain of RAR-beta2 are required to inhibit cell proliferation and anchorage-dependent growth.

Dr. Christman is exploring the relationship between a restricted diet (60% of control) and a high fat diet (40% of calories from fat) on the conversion of benign breast lesions to a cancerous state in mice, as well as the hormonal status of the host mice, the balance between cell proliferation and apoptosis, and the influence of estrogen and estrogen receptors on the interaction between the different regimens.

Dr. Mason is investigating the genes in rats affected by low levels of dietary folate to determine the molecular events that may lead to colon cancer and then is applying the technique to study molecular changes in colonic polyps from patients on dietary trials of folate.

Dr. Crowell is using a hamster model of pancreatic cancer to determine whether some commonly found dietary constituents, specifically monoterpenes, can help prevent this type of cancer and to study the mechanisms of action of these monoterpenes on pancreatic cells in culture.

Dr. Belury is examining the mechanism by which conjugated linoleic acid (CLA), present in certain dietary components, particularly cooked meats and cheeses, can have a preventive action against chemical carcinogenesis.

Dr. Wang continues to investigate the mechanism of the inhibitory action of retinoic acid on the synthesis of a platelet-derived growth factor, which serves as a mitogen for a wide range of cell types during differentiation.

The levels of vitamin D receptors in colon cancer tissues will be determined by Dr. Evans and correlated with prognostic features. In addition, the effect of the active metabolite of vtamin D (1,25-dihydroxyvitamin D3) and its analogs on the growth of human colon cancer xenografts will be followed.

Dr. Costa is investigating the association between the potentially protective role of calcium and olive oil (a source of monounsaturated fatty acids) consumption against chemically-induced colon cancer and the genetic background of the cells.

Based on preliminary data, Dr. Liang has observed that citrate, a major constituent of citrus fruits, induces apoptosis in glioma cells. He now wishes to elucidate the mechanism of citrate dependent apoptosis in glioma cells by identifying and cloning genes whose transcription is induced or repressed in response to citrate.

Dr. Bikle is testing whether retinoic acid (RA), selective RA receptor agonists and retinoid X receptor agonists alter proliferation and differentiation, as regulated by 1,25-dihydroxyvitamin D in normal and transformed keratinocytes from epidermis, and the interactions of these components in regulating gene expression.

Dr. James will utilize caloric restriction in combination with low doses of etoposide(chemotherapeutic drug) followed by feeding as an experimental anticancer strategy to increase the sensitivity of mammary tumors to apoptosis and thus provide nutritional/chemotherapeutic regimen to achieve higher levels of cancer cell killing in a rat model of chemically induced mammary cancer.

Dr. Pretlow will investigate whether components of the Chinese diet, genistein present in soy and green tea, and phytate present in rice, prevent the promotion and progression of the initiated prostate cells. These studies aim to clarify the role of dietary components in the prevention of latent, early prostate cancer from developing into a clinically significant disease.

The study by Dr. Limtrakul will determine whether dietary curcumin a food seasoning will inhibit skin carcinogenesis in animal models. To investigate the mechanism of action by which curcumin affects genetic changes in carcinogeninduced responsive genes she will study the expression of v-ras and v-fos oncogenes and protein kinase C gene families in the mouse epidermis after treatment with different diets.

In Russia and other countries of Eastern Europe there is a very high incidence of gastric cancer. Dr. Zaridze and his colleagues are conducting an epidemiological study in ten distrits of Moscow to examine the relationship of dietary practices smoking and alcohol consumption to gastric cancer.

Dr. Bird is investigating whether high or low fat diets and caloric restriction alter the response in an animal model to determine whether aberrant crypt foci (ACF) can predict carcinogenicity. Using theACF system Dr. Bird will determine if colon cancer development can be prevented in high risk individuals by dietary means.

Based on his earlier work Dr. Westin is studying how derivatives f vitamins A and D can modulate the growth of normal white blood and human leukemic cells in culture and lead to ordered differentiation mediated by changes in the c-myb gene.

Dr. Wargovich is investigating how dietary fat and fiber cn interact with the genetic background of an animal in the activation or deactivation of a dietary carcinogen formed at very low levels by high temperature cooking of protein-rich foods.

Dr. Lu is assessing the effect of a soy milk dietary supplement given to premenopausal women on levels of ovarian hormones and other parameters of hormonal function to furnish information on diets that may protect against reast cancer.

Dr. Aukema's post doctoral study will investigate the diverse actions of butyrate a major by-product of dietary fiber breakdown by bacteria in the colon on cell proliferation. Using a unique colonic cell culture system Dr. Aukema will determine the effect of butyrate under conditions seen with tumor cell cultures and under normal cnditions to elucidate the potential anti-cancer properties of dietary fiber.

Drs. Creek and Pirisi are examining the mechanism underying the effects of retinoids in chemoprevention of human papillomavirus(HPV)-induced cancer. They will test the hypothesis that the retinoid induced growth inhibition of HPV is mediated by the Growth Factor Beta. These studies will also help to clarifythe mechanism by which the DNA of cancer-causing HPV types insert themselves into the genome of the host cell an important first step in the development of cervical cancer.

Dr. Milnr aims to elucidate the mechanism of action of an oil-soluble garlic constituent on human lung cancer cells. His studies will expand the understanding of the importance of minor dietary sulfur compounds found in garlic as modifiers of tumor growth.

Dr. Lazo will study the biochemical pathway of the inhibitory effct of zinc an essential micronutrient in carcinogenesis. Since the metallothionein protein acts as a carrier for metal ions the presence and inducibility of this protein in various cells and the response to toxicants after exposure to zinc will be detrmined.

During the previous funding period Dr. Fong obtained data to demonstrate that esophageal tumor incidence was 100% in he zinc deficient versus 23% and 7% in the zinc sufficient and ad libitum pair fed rats. She found that prolonged cell proliferation induced by zinc deficiency can lead to esophageal tumorigenesis. Dr. Fong will continue her biochemical analysis of tissus collected to further clarify the relationship of zinc to carcinogenesis.

Dr. Eckert will examine the regulation of cervical cells by retinoids and aims to elucidate the mechanisms by which retinoids regulate insulin growth factor binding proteins (IGFBPs). Dr. Eckert hypothesizes that retinoids may ct as chemopreventive agents by increasing IGFBP-3 levels which in turn mediate the inhibitory effects of retinoids on cervical cancer cell proliferation.

Dr. Buckley is using cell culture models to study the molecular processes involved in eversal of tumor progression by butyrate produced from dietary fiber. Special emphasis is on the examination of whether sodium butyrate alters the H-ras protooncogene signaling pathway.

Dr. Welsh is continuing her sudies on characterizing the effects of the active form of vitamin D and of antiestrogens on various growth factors and in the induction of apoptosis in human breast cancer cell lines and in tumors of mice.

Dr. Talmage is examining the cellular events involved in retinoic acid inhibition of cell proliferation in estrogen dependent tumor cell lines and how treatment with interferons leads to inhibitory action in otherwise estrogen independent cell lines.

Dr. Santella will conduct a vitamin intervention study in smokers who would take ether vitamin C vitamin E and beta-carotene or a placebo. Polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbon (PAH)-DNA adducts an intermediate end point for smoking-induced genotoxic damage will be measured in mononuclear cells and correlated to plasma vitamin levels inorder to determine the possible protective effects of these antioxidant vitamins.

Dr. Navarez will examine the role of protein kinae C isozymes in vitamin D induced apoptosis in breast cancer cells. This post doctoral study will provide insight into the mechanisms of vitamin D in breast cancer and may lead to novel combination therapies with increased efficacy for breast cancer treament.

Dr. Meguid will test his hypothesis based on clinical and experimental data that cancer anorexia is mediated by increased serotonin synthesis in the hypothalms. He will examine if cancer anorexia can be reversed by depleting the hypothalmus of the serotonin precursor tryptophan leading to physiological ways to improve the feeding behavior of cancer patients.

Dr. Guttenplan is using a special mouse mode to determine whether antioxidant vitamins and other chemoprotective substances (phytochemicals) found in foods can affect the beginning or the later course of carcinogenesis from environmental carcinogens found in tobacco smoke and other products of combstion.

Dr. Box is examining how damage, caused by oxidized dietary fatty acids, to the genetic material of the cell plays a role in the processes leading to cancer, and how tocopherol (vitamin E) can prevent this damage.

Dr. Augenlicht is using mice with genes that predispose them to colon cancer to study the molecular mechanism of the protective effects of short chain fatty acids, produced by fermentation of fiber in the intestinal tract. Based on his previous work Dr. Augenlicht will test if short chain fatty acids (SCFAs) correct defects in normal differentiation, mitochondrial gene expression and apoptosis.

Dr. Auborn will investigate the role of indole-3-carbinol present in cruciferous vegetables (cabbage, broccoli, cauliflower and Brussel sprouts) in preventing human papillomavirus tumors (HPV) and their progression. It is hypothesized that indoles, modulators of estrogen metabolism, will prevent growth of HPV-induced tumors and prevent their malignant conversion.

Dr. Birt is examining the possible role of cell hormones and their receptor molecules, corticosterone and glucocorticoid receptor (GR), in mice skin to learn how dietary restriction lowers the resonse to chemical carcinogens.

Dr. VanVeldhuizen is determining whether treatment with vitamin D and analogs can moderate the pain associated with advanced prostatic cancer, either by correcting vitamin deficiency by having an antiproliferative effect on the cancer, or by alleviating the effects of oncogenic osteomalacia.

Dr. Bernholr is using a sensitive assay he has developed to study how metabolites of dietary polyunsaturated fatty acids bind to cellular receptors and how in combination with vitamin A derivatives, they regulate genes needed to control cell growth.

Dr. Braunhut will expand her studies on the influence of vitamin A on the growth and tumorigenicity of abnormal endothelial cells. The results of these investigations will suggest ways vitamin A contributes to the occurrence of endothelial cell tumors in infants and may lead to a possible treatment of the childhood hemangiomas.

Dr. Primiano's post doctoral study will investigate the induction of iron related enzymes and storage proteins, heme oxygenase and ferritin, by 1,2-dithiole-3-thione (D3T) in a hepatic cell line and determine whether D3T alters iron homeostasis and reduces susceptibility to oxidative stress.

Dr. Belury is studying the mechanisms by which an unsaturated fatty acid derivative or conjugated dienoic linoleate (CLA) formed by combination of several fat components in some meats and cheeses, can afford protection against skin cancer in several animal models.

Based on the observation that withdrawal of the micronutrient copper suppressed intracerebral tumor growth in animal models, Dr. Brem is studying the molecular process by which dietary copper is needed for angiogenesis.

Dr. Malkinson will investigate the potential of retinoids to block the lung tumor promoting ability of butylated hydroxytoluene (BHT) metabolite BHTOH and the effects of BHTOH on gap junction intercellular communication (GJIC) apoptosis and proliferation. In this study retinoid effects will be studied in a model of human adenocarcinoma.

Dr. Reynolds is examining the biology underlying the initial sensitivity and resultant resistance of neuroblastoma cells to retinoic acid. His investigations on the role of retinoic acid receptors and oncogene expression, transcription factors and protein phosphorylation will provide new insights into improving the response of tumors to retinoid treament.

Dr. Hardy is further examining the inhibitory action of dietary long chain saturated fatty acids, specifically stearic acid, on breast cell proliferation and tumorigenesis since this fatty acid disrupts cell proliferation initiated by epidermal growth factor (EGF).

The goals of Dr. Falany's investigations are to determine the ability of a newly identified form of human cytosolic- and other sulfotransferases (STs) to sulfate several synthetic, natural and dietary estrogenic compounds (i.e. estrogen, estradiol, genistein, daidzein, naringenin). The action of these STs may provide possible protection against the development of hormone responsive cancers.

Dr. Truscott is investigating the efficiency by which various carotenoids quench oxygen radicals and whether the efficiencyis dependent on the molecular environment. The major role of carotenoids in cancer prevention is that of quenching oxygen radicals (superoxide and peroxyl radicals). Dr. Truscott aims to identify the most effective and useful forms of carotenoids for cancr prevention.

Dr. Meckling-Gill will extend her previous studies to include an in vivo tumor model with omega-3 fatty acid supplementation as adjuvant to chemotherapeutic drug treatment to establish whether or not in vitro differences in drug toxicity are replicate in the animal model.

Dr. Niles epanding his work on retinoic acid is studying its role in prevention and treatment of certain types of cancer and the way these effects are mediated by nuclear retinoic acid receptors. He has discovered that an important regulatory molecule cyclic AMP an decrease the amount of these receptors and potentially interfere with the action of retinoic acid.

As a continuation of her previous studies Dr. Pence is focusing on the cooking practices for red meat to determine if it is the mthod of cooking meat and not the meat itself which contributes to colon cancer risk indicated by epidemiological studies. Specifically she is determining the production of heterocyclic aryl amines (HCAs) due to cooking and their role in the initiation nd/or promotion of colon carcinogenesis.

Based on observations that rapidly growing tumor cells use glutamine as a major energy source Dr. Byerley is investigating what effect this phenomenon has on glutamine metabolism in he whole body. Since glutamine utilization increases the skeletal muscle breakdown Dr. Byerley will investigate whether this may be prevented by a diet high in three branched-chain amino acids: valine leucine and isoleucine.

Based on the evidence tat suggests that folate-deficient individuals have an increased chance for developing cancer Dr. Koury will investigate whether damage to the genes of the blood-forming cells during folate deficiency leads to the later development of malignant blood-formng cells i.e. leukemia.

Dr. Barnard is investigating the mechanism by which butyrate exerts rapid and potent effects on growth and maturation of colon epithelial cells. This effect appears to be mediated through a key growth-rgulating gene c-myc. Dr. Barnard's studies will increase our understanding of the molecular mechanisms by which butyrate affects c-myc as well as the degree of maturation of the colon epithelial cells.

Based on the observation that Acute Promyelocytic Leukemia (APL) can be reversed by treatment with retinoic acid a natural derivative o vitamin A Dr. Redner is investigating the molecular mechanism underlying the success of this therapy in APL. The proposed studies will determine whether a specific abnormal fusion protein (NPM-RAR) interferes with the function of the normal retinoic aci receptor protein.

Dr. Liu will investigate the synergistic effect of allyl compounds within garlic and dietary selenium in the ihibition of experimentally DMBA-induced breast cancer. He will also study the mechanism of action by which the various garlic compounds influence the ability of selenite to depress DMBA-DNA binding and determine the optimal combination of these substancesto maximize the reduction of this binding.

Curcumin the major active yellow pigment of the spice turmeric has been shown to have anti-proliferative properties in human tumor cell cultures. Dr. Kumar will investigate the inhbitory effects of curcumin on carcinogen stimulation or activation of cellular and molecular pathways in MH3T3 cells. He will also examine whether there is inhibition of mitogen-induced activation of epidermal growth factor receptors.

Dr. Benbrook is investigating the mechanism by which dietary carotenoids after being converted into retinoic acid in the body inhibit the growth and development of tumors. Specifically hr studies aim to discover how carotenoids and vitamin A change the balance of proteins that make up a cell. Using a cervical cancer cell system she will determine how these nutrients inhibit cervical tumor growth.

Dr. Schut is studying the effect of the dietary constituent d-Limonene on the mutagenic potential of charred protein-rich foods. One of the most abunant mutagenic compounds in cooked hamburger meat is PhIP which has been shown to induce mammary tumors in the rat. Dr. Schut will investigate the potential of d-Limonene to inhibit the PhIP formation in the mammary gland. These novel studies aim to identfy a naturally-occurring dietary chemopreventive agent against breast cancer.

Dr. Golubic has demonstrated that some nutritionally relevant fatty acids might activate the cellular p21 ras (c-ras) proteins and pomote cancer development. He will now investigate the possibility that the tumor-enhancing effects of omega-6 polyunsaturated fatty acids and the tumor inhibitory effects of omega-3 polyunsaturated fatty acids may be a consequence of the differential reguation of two important proteins (GAP and neurofibromin) which regulate c-ras.

The hypothesis to be investigated is that aberrations in lipid metabolism may constitute a substantial portion of the energy drain associated with cancer cachexia. Dr. Chance wll study the effect of supplementation of dietary carnitine and nicotinic acid on tumor bearing animals and the reduction of cachexia by stimulating mitochondrial oxidation of lipids. A combination of these two nutrients with clenbuterol a drug will potntially further reduce muscle wasting and cachexia.

Dr. Zeisel is continuing his investigations of the mechanism of hepatocarcinogenesis by dietary choline deficiency. He will determine if cholne-deficient animals will undergo early sensitizing events and later gene damaging events leading to cancer. He will also identify other nutrients and drugs which block this process.

Dr. Tiwari has demonstrated that indole-3-carbinol a chemopreventive agent present in cruciferous vegetables reduces the incidence and multiplicit of spontaneous mammary tumors in mice. Dr. Tiwari is extending his studies using estrogen responsive and non-responsive human breast cancer cells to characterize the novel mechanism of action of indole-3-carbinol in conjunction with estrogen receptors restradiol responsive factors.

Dr. Rose is investigating the effects of high fat diets using n-3 and n-6 polyunsaturated fatty acids on tumor growth and metastasis in two hman prostate cancer cell lines. He will also investigate whether dietary soy a source of the antiangiogenic agent genistein inhibits the establishment of PC-M solid tumors and their metastasis in nude mice.

Dr. Lumey is investigatng the effect of energy and/or fat restriction during adolescence and puberty and the subsequent breast cancer rates in women who experienced these restrictions compared to women who had not. The project provides an opportunity to compare the long-term efects of energy restriction in humans and its effects on cancer risk and longevity.

Dr Liu is developing combinations of dietary and chemo-suppressive therapies for the prevention of micrometastasis in breast cancer patients. The compounds to be tested include genistein from soy curcumin omega-3 fatty acids and a drug minocyclin. It is xpected that the combination therapies will result in having maximum antitumor effects with little or no toxic side-effects.

Dr. Ip is investigating the mechanisms by which retinoids exet their beneficial effects in cancer prevention and treatment. She will determine what effects retinoids have on various nuclear receptors in mammary epithelial cells (MEC). These studies will result in a better understanding of chemopreventive actions ofretinoids and result in optimizing the use of dietary retinoids for prevention of breast cancer.

Dr. Campbell is using a collection of data gathered over a ten year period in China covering 85 survey counties to analyze past and present dietary pactices biochemical indices and socioeconomic status and their relationship to chronic diseases and particularly to cancer.

Dr. Augenlicht is continuing his investigations on the molecular mechanisms by which dietary fibers reduce the risk for development of colon cancer. He has observed that short chain fatty acids (SCFAs) produced by bacteria from dietary fiber in the colon alter the expression of several mitochondrial genes in colonic epithelial cells. Dr. Augenlicht will determine how two of the major genetic alterations occurring in colonic carcinomas (APC gene and DCC gene) respond to the natural inducrs of differentiation, SCFAs and in particular, butyrate.

Dr. Mirvish will elucidate whether nitrosation of free amino acids in the stomach results in products that are capable of binding DNA. Potentially these adducts initiate carcinogenesis and may result in gastric cancer. Animal and human studies will be carried out to determine if nitroso compounds in the gastric juice are a result of feeding nitrates. Selected foods, incuding hot dogs and salted dried fish, will be analyzed for compounds that could yield carcinogenic nitroso compounds.

Dr. Lawson has shown that heterocyclic amines formed by pyrolysis of foods high in protein and fat as well as by smoking tobacco, are mutagenic and carcinogenic in several animal systems. Mutagenicity was particularly significant in pancreatic cell studies. He will further investigate these heterocyclic amines to determine their potential to induce pancreatic cancer.

Dr. Christman is continuing her investigations of dietary lipotropes (vitamin B12, folic acid, choline and methionine) in cancer. She has shown that a deficiency of these compounds interferes with the normal transfer of methyl groups to the genetic material (DNA) of cells. By studying this phenomena in genes that are important regulators of growth nd cell differentiation, she will provide insight into mechanisms by which dietary factors can enhance their susceptibility or resistance to carcinogenic stimuli, e.g. environmental carcinogens.

Dr. Cramer has demonstrated that postmenopausal women with a history of ovarian cancer exhibit a two-fold increase in the likelihood of expressing a variant galactose transferase (GALT), galactose metabolizing enzyme. Since both breast and ovarian cancers may have a common endocrinologic etiology, Dr. Cramer aims to identify why breast and ovarian cancer share common risk factors and determine the potential of a screening program for women with GALT abnormalities or abnormal hormonal profiles.

Dr. Talalay will investigate the effects of common cooking methods on potent detoxification enzyme inducers, such as sulforaphane, in various cruciferous vegetables. These enzymes in turn play an important role in detoxifying chemical carcinogens and blocking tumor formation. Dr. Talalay will determine the potencies of vegetable extracts for their induction capabilities and the effect of various methods of heating on their potency.

Dr. Kuhajda will explore the role of endogenous fatty acid synthesis in malignant and non-malignant cells, as well as the relationship of dietary fatty acids in the regulation of cell proliferation. He will also test the differential ability of dietary fatty acids to inhibit cell proliferation in normal and cancer cells.

Dr. Visek is investigating how dietary fat and calories alter the expression of genes to enhance the development of breast cancer. By identifying individual diet-regulated genes, particularly those which respond to caloric restriction, Dr. Visek will study their expression during tumor formation under various dietary conditions. These studies will further our understanding on the role of calories in cancer development.

Dr. Wang is investigating the basic mechanisms by which retinoic acid can regulate gene expression, in particular the expression of the PDGF-A chain. PDGF is a major growth regulator for connective tissues and glial cells. Dr. Wang has shown that PDGF is over-expressed in malignant brain tumors and that retinoic acid blocks PDGF-A protein expression during cell differentiation. She is expanding her studies on this activity of retinoic acid and its role as an anti-cancer agent.

Dr. Barch has shown that part of the anticarcinogenic activity of ellagic acid, found in a variety of fruits and nuts, comes from the ability of ellagic acid to increase the production of glutathione S-transferase Ya and quinone reductase, two detoxification proteins that destroy cancer-causing chemicals. He will now look at the signals ellagic acid uses to tell the body to make detoxification enzymes.

Dr. Kulkarni has shown that ascorbyl stearate, vitamin C, is a potent inhibitor of glutathione S-transferase and lipoxygenase, important enzymes for growth and proliferation of glioma (tumor) cells in culture. Screening ascorbyl derivatives as inhibitors of these enzymes in glioma cells in vitro, he will identify the most effective compounds for in vivo studies. Dr. Kulkarni's long-term goal is to identify effective non-toxic thrapeutic agents that can minimize drug resistance in tumor cells or act as antiglioma agents.

Dr. De Fabo is investigating the role of the dietary amino acid histidine in skin cancer development. Levels of a unique substance, urocanic acid, in the skin appear to be influenced by histidine levels in the diet. Increased urocanic acd levels in turn are associated with increased immune suppression resulting in skin tumors. The study will determine whether controlling the dietary intake of histidine will help prevent against skin cancer.

Dr. Basson is studying the effct of butyrate and other short chain fatty acids that are produced by bacteria from dietary fiber on the growth and differentiation of human colon cancer cells. Dr. Basson will demonstrate whether butyrate alone will interfere with malignant transformation and whether it is selectively more potent than other short chain fatty acids in protecting against colon cancer.

Dr. Frank is investigating the potential of maternal dietary ellagic acid, a naturally occurring plant phenolic, to provide chemoprevention in utero against chemical carcinogens and subsequently reduce early childhood cancers.

Dr. Feldman hypothesizes, based on his previous work, that vitamin D deficiency status may promote the development and/or progression of prostate cancer. The effects of vitamin D deficiency, supplementation and use of vitamin D in combination with retinoids will be studied in mice grafted with human prostate cancer cell lines.

In the body, G-proteins translate signals within the cell membrane and are part of normal cell function. Dr. Hardy will study whether palmitate, a saturated fally acid that regulates G-proteins, plays a role in the development or prevention of cancer.

Dr. Emery will look at the effect of 3-mercatopicolinic acid (3-MDA) as an inhibitor of gluconeogenesis. He will attempt to normalize the rate of glycogenesis in the liver in hopes of avoiding cancer cachexia and allowing for more aggressive tretments for cancer patients.

Dr.Romieu is studying the association between increased consumption of alcohol and fat through meat and dairy products with the increased risk for breast cancer in Mexican women. She will also be examining the effects of a high consumption of vitamins A C and E decreasing breast cancer risk. Dr. Romieu is hoping to identify avoidable risk factors and determine protective effects of various foods and nutrients.

People in Mexico who eat hot chili peppers have five times higher rates of gastric cancer than non-chili eating people. Capsaicin the ingredient tha makes peppers taste hot is thought to be the culprit. Moreover the gastric infection by Helicobacter pylori is also thought to play a role in gastric cancer. Dr. Lopez-Carrillo will study this issue using a food questionnaire and blood samples from vlunteers in various regions of Mexico. Resolution of this question could result in possibly recommending eliminating hot chili peppers from the Mexican diet and potentially decreasing gastric cancer incidence by nearly 70%.

Dr. Welsh has shown that vitamin D can stop growth of cells not killed by anti-estrogens such as tamoxifen. Her study will investigate whether combining anti-estroge and vitamin D might cause more complete and faster tumor regression in breast cancer patients.

Dr. Trizn is studying the ability of the body to metabolize carcinogens both ingested and inhaled and their effects on the tumors and surrounding tissues of the head and neck. He will be investigating the effects of dietary intake of antioxidants on metabolism i the head and neck by examining various markers including the relative activity rates of several detoxifying enzymes and levels of blood lymphocytes in this area of the body.

Dr. Locniskar will continue to study linoleic acid an omega-6 polyunsaturated fatty acid and the role it seems to play in protein kinase C activation and distribution that is essential for normal cell communication. She has shown that diets high in linoleic acid have decreased chemically-induced skin carcinogenesis when fed in the promotion stage.

Dr. Hardman has demonstrated that polyunsaturated fatty acids (PUFA) in fish oil increase lipid peroxidation in the cellular membrane of a tumor appearing to cause the malignant tumor cells to die. Dr. Hardman will try to validate this hypothess by enhancing lipid peroxidation by the pro-oxidant ferric citrate making cancer cells more sensitive to a chemotherapy drug.

Various protooncogenes precursor cancer genes play an important role in the normal growth of cells. Activation of these cells o oncogenes is thought to be modulated through nutritional factors such as protein deprivation. Dr. Hann will look at the interrelationship between two proteins the c-myc 1 and c-myc 2 and how nutritional factors play a role in their transformation.

Dr. Ruggeri will study the ability of oltipraz a sulfur containing antioxidant similar to the anti-cancer agents found in cruciferous vegetables to inhibit the development of abnormal and cancer lesions in the pancreas.

A water soluble sulfur compound in garlic s-allylcysteine inhibits binding of a carcinogen known as DMBA to DNA and decreases the incidence of mammary tumors in an animal model. Dr. Milner will continue his investigation in this area studying the mecanisms of interaction between lipids and garlic and the role it plays in breast cancer development.

In many areas of the world the high rates of esophageal cancer are associated with vitamin and mineral deficiencies rather than tobacco and alcohol uses as in the United States. Dr.Fong will study the role of dietary zinc deficiency in esophageal cancer in hopes of answering two questions: 1) is zinc deficiency reversible; and 2) does zinc prevent development of esophageal tumors in a carcinogen-induced (N-methylbenzylnitrosamine) model.

Dr. Golubic will study the intracellular mechanisms by whch dietary fat plays a role in regulating cell division. Dietary fat may interrupt a major regulating protein in cells (c-ras oncogene) allowing the cell to continue to divide uncontrollably and increasing the possibility for cancer to develop.

Nnety percent of cervical cancers are associated with human papillomavirus (HPV). Vitamin A is known to regulate the function of the epithelial cells of the cervix and HPV cells are sensitive to vitamin A. In his renewal grant Dr. Eckert will attempt to ientify the gene responsible for retinoid sensitivity in the cells of the cervix in hopes of coming up with better and more effective treatment for this cancer.

In preliminary studies Dr. DiSilvestro found that rats with low coper intake had increased carcinogenesis over rats fed normal amounts of copper. He will examine the hypothesis that varying levels of copper specifically deficient versus normal amounts act as a possible promoter for cancer. Dr. DiSilvestro will test a vriety of carcinogens and look at the effects in a breast cancer model.

The p21 ras-oncogene is thought to transfom normal cells to cancerous cells. Dr. Agarwal will examine the mechanisms involved and if or how retinoic acid affects the inhibition of a protein which in turn inhibits the p21 ras-oncogene.

This renewal grant is a continuation of Dr. Yen's work on how retinoic acid (vitamin A) induces a chage in tumor expression in leukemic cells. Overall the goal of this grant is to design a chemotherapeutic regime using retinoic acid as a prototype to help treat individuals with leukemia.

In her first grant Dr. Etkind has shwn that a high fat diet causes increased gene expression and affects the dormancy period of tumor expression in mice. Dr. Etkind will observe the mechanism by which this occurs and attempt to answer new questions: 1) at what percentage fat intake does gen expression begin; and 2) is there a specific time in life when fat consumption accelerates breast cancer risk.

Dr. Campbell's hypothesis is that chronic infection with the Hepatitis B virus coupled with nutritional factors especially those associated with an increase in plasma holesterol stimulates liver cell proliferation and results in liver cancer. He will test whether dietary protein specifically casein that is a strong modulator of cholesterol will modify the development of tumor formation in the liver.

Dr. Sherman will study the effects of iron deficiency or abundance on mammary tumor development and the mammary cell cycle. She will attempt to answer the following questions: 1) is tumorigenesis altered by either; 2) does modification after carcinogen exosure influence tumor development; and 3) does deficiency impair mammary cell cycle and decrease tumorigenesis?

TNF-alpha and IL-1-beta play an active role in the cancer pocess by suppressing appetite, inducing sleepiness, fever, pain, and breaking down fat and muscle tissue in cancer patients. Curcumin, a component of curry and an antioxidant, reduces the production of TNF-alpha and IL-1-beta in a leukemia cell line. Dr. Chan will study a variety of spices and herbs to see if they will inhibit TNF-alpha and IL-1-beta and study the mechanisms by which this occurs in a mouse model.

Fat and excess calories have been associated with increased risks for breast cancer while caloric restriction, in animal studies, has been shown to be a potent inhibitor of breast cancer. Dr. Tagliaferro is continuing his study on whether or not "yo-yo" dieting increases the risk for breast cancer.

Dr. Djuric will examine the effects of caloric restriction and fat intake on the DNA of cells. Animals will be fed differing levels of fat calories and their DNA damage to both the tissue and the blood will be analyzed to correlate changes in the mammary gland and future risk of breast cancer. This is a collaborative study supported by AICR and the Food and Drug Administration's National Center for Toxicological Research.

On the basis of new evidence that genes have receptors for retinoic acid (vitamin A) and that these receptors appear to regulate translation of various cell growth codes, Dr. Peacocke has demonstrated that retinoic acid receptor beta (RAR-beta), a specific receptor, plays a role in suppressing tumor growth. She aims to confirm her hypothesis that vitamin A, and specifically RAR-beta may prevent and treat certain cancers by suppressing tumor genes.

Dr. Goldin has found that if lactobacillus GG, a non-pathogenic bacterium used in the production of dairy products, is fed before and during introduction to a carcinogen in an animal system, it inhibits colon tumor induction. The inhibitory effects were most pronounced when the animals were fed high-fat diets. He will study the mechanisms involved, how lactobacillus changes in composition, and the changes the bacteria cause in the intestine. This may lead to a more effective use of microorganisms in the prevention of colon cancer.

Dr. Broitan will be looking at how limonene and a drug mevacor (mevinolin), which inhibits production of cholesterol in the liver, alter the functioning of a specific oncogene, ras-oncogene, and affects colon cancer development.

Dr. Braunhut will study the effects of circulating levels of vitamin A in the blood and how they contribute to the growth of normal cells versus hemangioma cells. Hemangioma is a tumor or malformation of blood vessels that may occur in any part of the body. Her goal is to determine whether or not vitamin A can prevent the tumor cells from dividing and spreading to adjacent connective tissue.

A previous First Award recipient, Dr. Hohl is building on his past observation that limonene, a natural component of citrus fruits, might prevent growth of leukemic cells by blocking necessary components of tumor cell growth. In this grant, Dr. Hohl will look at the effects of limonene and certain polyunsaturated fatty acids on tumor cell growth. The results of this study may form the basis of future clinical chemopreventive and chemotherapeutic trials in people.

Dr. Jenski and Dr. Stillwell propose that omega-3 fatty acids found in fish oil will affect the structure of cancer cell membranes and by doing so, will alter the interaction between cancer cells and the immune system. In their current project, they will investigate how diet changes tumor cell composition. If it can be altered, one could purposefully affect and possibly eradicate the tumor through enhanced immunologic attack.

Dr. Merrill will look at how a fungus, Fumonisin B1, found on agriculture products affects the immune system in cancer development. This fungus prevents the formation of specific complex lipids that are involved in the regulation of cell growth and differentiation.

Neural cell adhesion molecul (NCAM) expression may be regulated by retinoic acid causing increased intercellular adhesion and a decreased ability for tumors to infiltrate the brain thereby decreasing potential metastatic tumors. Dr. Kruse will examine the potential role of NCAMs in immunotherapy for astrocytomas and glioblastomas, two types of brain tumors.

Project Description: c-Jun is a necessary protein for normal cell division. When cells go through normal cell division they can produce oncoproteins that promote mutations of the protein possibly leading to cancer. Applying excess zinc to normal cells in culture caused more cells than normal to transform to oncoproteins. Dr. Mercola will look at the effect excess zinc has on the transformation of the protein c-Jun.

Dr. Hammond will study the effects of both a folate-deficient diet and folate-excessive diet on the four stages of development of bronchogenic carcinoma: carcinogen-induced transformation, progression, development and manifestation of metastasis.

Protein Kinase C (PKC), which plays a role with enzymes to reguate cell growth, is affected by antioxidants. This grant will look at how dietary antioxidants - specifically carotenoids, vitamins C and E, and selenium - affect the activation or inactivation of PKC. The main goal of this study is to understand the nutrient interactions that are effective in counteracting tumor promoters.

Dr. Sani has discovered a new retinoid binding protein (Ret BP) that binds to Vitamin A and that may play a key role in cancer prevention and treatment. Dr. Sani will utilize current technology to learn more about Ret BP's function, chemicl composition and the mechanism by which this protein works in both cell cultures and animals.

Dr. Augenlicht is studying how degradation products of fiber might modify the pattern of mitochondrial gene expression and thereby protect against colorectal cancer especially when it is linked to familial adenomatous polyposis and hereditary nonpolyposis colon cancer.

Dr. Reynolds is investigating whether retinoids might turn off N-myc oncogene expression and thereby inhibit neuroblastoma cell growth in children. He is also exploring whether iron or vitamin E might enhance or otherwise modify the retinoid effect.

Dr. Feldman is studying how a vitamin D deficiency promotes the growth and development of prostate cancer and how vitamin D supplementation might inhibit prostate cancer development and/or progression. Particular attention is on the modification of the vitamin D receptors and the endocrine response.

Dr. Meckling-Gill is determining whether omega-3 or omega-6 polyunsaturated fatty acids PUFAs) in animal diets or cultured cells affect the uptake of chemotherapeutic nucleoside drugs such as araC and AZT.

Dr. Boyd is determining if a change to a low-fat high-carbohydrate diet can reduce human mammary epithelial cell proliferation in benign breast disease and lower breast cancer risk. A quantitative image analysis system is used to evaluate needle biopsies of breast epithelial cells.

Dr. Baracos is continuing to investigate how ornithine alpha-ketoglutarate (OKG) might improve host protein metabolism and thereby control cachexia an limit the wasting away of muscle tissue in the tumor-bearing host.

Dr. Niles is determining the mechanism by which vitamin A works to regulate and retard the growth of cancer cells. Hi previous research indicated that regulation is linked to three different retinoid receptors which he is now characterizing.

Dr. Wargovich is continuing to investigate how sulfur-containing compounds (s-allylcysteine and diallyl sulfide) from garlic onions and related allium vegetables might inhibit the initiation stag of chemically-induced cancer of the esophagus.

Dr. Walaszek is comparing the ability of potassium and alcium salts of D-glucarate in preventing the chemical induction of mammary gland cancer in rats and will determine the effect of the glucarate on beta-glucuronidase and proliferative activity in the mammary tumors.

Dr. Goeger is evaluating whether coumarin from edible plants might be a useful chemopreventive agent in humans by studying its anticrcinogenic properties and metabolism in chick embryo preparations which metabolize it similarly to human liver preparations.

Dr.Black is continuing his investigation of different types of dietary fat from corn oil and fish oil and their ability to modify UV-carcinogenesis by regulating chemicals that control the natural immune response.

Dr. Chung is investigating whether the reduction in genotoxicity of polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons by caloric restriction might be due to a decrease in DNA adduct formation an increase in adduct removal from the liver of carcinogen-treated mice. This is a collaborative study supported by AICR and the Food and Drug Administration's National Center for Toxicological Research.

Dr. Kritchevsky is evaluating whether the inhibition of spontaneous and induced carcinogenesis by caloric restriction may be related to chages in the phospholipid profile that occurs in the transformation of normal cells to cancer cells. This is a collaborative study supported by AICR and the Food and Drug Administration's National Center for Toxicological Research.

Dr. Blank is investigating if caloric restriction may delay the expression of a retrovirus that is associated with lymphomas and if the delay in viral exprssion also delays the development of lymphoma in mice. This is a collaborative study supported by AICR and the Food and Drug Administration's National Center for Toxicological Research.

Dr. Sakamoto is evaluating whether polyphenols in green and black tea which are from the same plant but produced by different processes might be effective inhibitrs of breast cancer in rats. She is determining at which stage(s) in carcinogenesis this protection occurs.

Dr. McGlynn is examining people in China to determine if high stores of body iron are associated with increased cancer risk. Shewill look at iron levels in hair nails and blood trying to determine the best judge of cancer risk and whether iron storage is under genetic control.

Dr. Ruch is investigating how limonene and carvone compnents of citrus fruits and caraway seeds might revert cancerous liver cells back to normal cells. One of the mechanisms that will be studied is ras-oncogene activity.

Dr. Pretlow is studying the inhibition of azoxymethane-induced colon carcinogenesis by phytic acid examining the effects of inhibition of aberrant crypt foci in animals during and after carcinogen administration.

Dr. Zeisel is elucidatin the role of protein kinase C in carcinogenesis in rats fed diets deficient in choline a source of methyl groups. This causes accumulation of diacylglycerol in the liver and increased susceptibility to liver cancer.

Dr. Blaner is investigating whether all-trans retinoic acid, an active form of vitamin A, might be increased in circulation, bone marrow, and tissues by increasing the amounts of dietary retinol or beta-carotene and other forms of vitamin A during the treatment of acute promyelocytic leukemia (APL).

Dr. Christman is investigating how diets that are deficient in lipotropes, folic acid, vitamin B12, choline, and methionine, might increase the susceptibility to cancer-causing agents and enhance liver cancer. Her studies focus on hypomethylation of selected oncogenes.

Drs. Wan and Istfan are investigating how dietary fat in the form of omega-3 fatty acids from fish oil might alter the immune response and prostaglandin metabolism, influence the rate of tissue protein synthesis, and inhibit the growth of breast cancer cells.

Dr. Newberne is evaluating whether fusel alcohols, contaminants found in inexpensive wines and apple-based spirits, might enhance or promote cancer of the esophagus that is induced by methylbenzylnitrosamine in rats.

Dr. Vucenik is studying the dose-response inhibition of DMBA-induced mammary carcinogenesis in vivo by dietary inositol hexaphosphate (phytic acid), a component of cereals, and the effect of phytic acid on the growth and metastasis of human breast carcinoma in vitro. This study is supported by a Matching Grant from AICR and Kellogg Company.

Dr. Shamsuddin is evaluating whether dietary inositol hexaphosphate (phytic acid), a component of grains, might modulate the secretion of a pre-cancerous marker for colon cancer and thus be useful in the prevention of this cancer. This study is supported by a Matching Grant from AICR and Kellogg Company.

Dr. Vucenik is evaluating the absorption and inhibitory effect of dietary inositol hexaphosphate (phytic acid), a component of cereals, on tumor cell proliferation in a DMBA-induced mammary cancer model.

Dr. Talalay, using a novel technique of harnessing endogenous cellular mechanisms, is identifying minor chemicals that are potent inducers of Phase 2 protective enzymes. After isolating one such potent inducer (sulforaphane) from broccoli, he is expanding his studies to identify others and explain their mechanisms of action.

Dr. Hohl will determine whether limonene, a natural component of citrus fruits, might prevent the growth of leukemia cells by blocking ras-oncogene expression and preventing isoprenylation to form active growth promoting proteins necessary for tumor cell growth.

Dr. Souba is examining if consumption of dietary glutamine by rats with either methylcholanthrene-induced fibrosarcoma or metastasizing mammary carcinoma, replenishes glutamine stores to muscle tissue and helps maintain body weight.

Dr. Redlich is investigating whether chemopreventive therapy with vitamin A might reduce both bronchial metaplasia and lung inflammation and prevent lung cancer in high risk populations. Mechanistic studies include investigating the effect of retinol and betacarotene on cytokine biomarkers.

Dr. Tayek is determining whether the increase in growth hormone levels observed in head and neck cancer patients might be responsible for their increased glucose levels increased insulin resstance and altered glucose metabolism in an effort to improve the nutritional status of these patients.

Dr. Rubin is investigating whether glutamine, a calorie-supplying amino acid, might suppress or reverse the spontaneous transformation of NIH 3T3 cells and whether glutamine restriction might elicit an adaptation and inheritable suppression of transformation in these cells.

Dr. Bikle is evaluating how calcium and vitamin D (1,25-dihydroxyvitamin D) regulate the expression of genes important for differentiation of squamous cell carcinoma cell lines. He is attempting to ascertain if abnormal gene regulation might be due to missing mediators of calcium and vitamin D.

Dr. Gandy is investigating whether the reduction in spontaneous testicular tumors in rats by caloric restriction may be associated with changes in activation and detoxification of enzymes or steroid hormones. This is a collaborative study supported by AICR and the Food and Drug Administration's National Center for Toxicological Research.

Dr. Barnes is evaluating the effectiveness of genistein, an isoflavone in soybeans, in preventing breast cancer and if the cancer preventive properties of genistein might be enhanced by other natural ingedients in soybeans. This project is supported by a matching grant from AICR and Protein Technologies International.

Dr. Baracos s studying how the drug ornithine alpha-ketoglutarate (OKG) might improve the absorption and use of nutrients and thereby protect against malnutrition and weight loss in animals with liver cancer.

Dr. Funk is investigating whether soy protein diets might protect he intestinal tract against the toxicity of methotrexate a chemotherapeutic drug thereby allowing more effective treatment with this drug.

Drs. Creek and Pirisi are investigating whether retinoic acid inhibits the transformation growth and differentiation of skin cells infected with human papillomavirus by inhibiting the expression of cancer-causing genes called oncogenes.

Dr. Eckert is investigating the mechanisms by which retinoids might inhibi the human papillomavirus activity associated with cell transformation and thereby prevent the development and growth of tumors of the cervix.

Dr. Chance is investigating whether injections of neuropeptide Y (NPY) might incease the appetite of patients that experience cancer anorexia loss of appetite. NPY is a unique protein that stimulates appetite and that is at low levels in the blood and brain of animals with tumors.

Dr. Hulka is invetigating whether an inherited defect in the transferase enzyme that lowers the ability of the body to properly metabolize galactose a sugar might be associated with an increased risk for cancer of the ovaries.

Dr. Frenkel is investigating whether glutathione, a natural compound composed of amino acids, might increase the ability of dietary selenium to inhibit tumor cell growth. Cancer cells from the lung, breast, and colon will be studied.

Dr. Mirvish is investigating in human volunteers and in rats how vitamin C from dietary fruits and vegetables inhibits the formation of nitrosamines. He will measure 3-methyladenine in the urine as a possible indicator of increased risk for cancers of the stomach and esophagus. This substance is formed when nitrosamines attack DNA.

Dr. Djuric is studying how fat can be converted in the body to products that can damage DNA and how this damage to DNA might be used to diagnose breast cancer or detect people at increased risk for developing breast cancer.

Dr. Thompson is investigating how iron in the diet might influence different stages of the cancer process giving rise to either increased or decreased incidences of breast cancer. His studies seek to determine whether there is an optimal level of iron that protects against cancer.

Dr. Jenski will examine how omega-3 PUFAs (polyunsaturated fatty acids) from the diet become incorporated into the cell membrane, alter the membrane structure, and change the immune response or ability to kill cancer cells.

Dr. Reynolds will investigate the possible prevention of the recurrence of neuroblatoma, a common childhood tumor, by treatments with retinoids. He will determine the largest dose of retinoids that can be given to children to keep the tumor from growing back and he will investigate how the retinoic acid works to prevent tumor growth.

Dr. Romieu is identifying in patients the components of their diets that appear to be responsible for the occurrence of their breast cancer. She will specifically look for possible correlations between the dietary intake of high fat and hig alcohol and increased risk for breast cancer as well as the dietary intake of high vitamin A C or E and reduced risk for breast cancer.

Dr. Black is feeding anmals diets with fats from corn oil beef tallow or menhaden fish oil in different amounts to determine which diets result in the fewest tumors that might be induced by UV-radiation or tumor transplants. Differences in saturation in the dietary fats migh enhance the immune response and increase a person's natural ability to fight cancer.

Dr. Stoecker will determine whether selenium and vitamin E might enhance the conversion of beta-carotne to vitamin A. Independently selenium vitamin E and beta-carotene have been associated with reduced cancer risks. The combination in our diets might further reduce cancer risks.

Dr. Mukhtar will determine whether extracts from green tea might prevent chemicals from causing tumors of the skin lung and forestomach of mice. While he is feedingthe mice the tea extracts for potential protection he will expose the mice to polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs). These are chemicals in the environment that are known to cause cancer.

Dr. Foley-Nelson will determine combinations that will stop tumors from growing and at the same time will prevent the loss of body weght and the wasting away of muscle tissue. The treatments she will study include clenbuterol which prevents loss of muscle weight acivicin which stops tumor growth but also causes muscle weight loss and insulin which increases the metabolism of glucoe to possibly counter the muscle weight loss.

Dr. DiSilvestro will determine whether a deficiency in copper in the diet might be responsible for an increased risk for colon cancer. He will assess whether changes in the activities of special enzymes that requre copper to function might be linked to changes in colon cancer incidences.

Dr. DeWille will evaluate how dietry fat might influence the inherited tendency to develop breast cancer. He will investigate whether fat might activate the specific gene that is responsible for inherited breast cancer.

Dr. Park will study the interaction of lipotropes (e.g. choline, methionine and folic acid) and fat in an attempt to explain how the amounts of each might influence mammary tumor growth. The proper balance of ipotropes and fat in our diets might further reduce cancer risk.

Drs. Campbell and Youngman are determining whether antioxidants in foods can protect against damage to DNA the genetic material and thus lower cancer risk. Their studies are carried out n people living in the People's Republic of China. Antioxidants in foods they eat will be measured as well as markers for DNA damage in blood and urine. They will correlate the antioxidant and marker levels with the cancer rates in the Chinese.

Dr. Ley will determine whether different amounts of fat in the diet might influence our risk for getting melanoma, a form of skin cancer. The skin cancer will be induced in a South American opossum by exposure to UV rays from sunlight.

Dr. Yang will continue his studies to determine how diallyl sulfide (DAS) and other sulfur compounds from alliums (garlic, onions, and related vegetables) might influence specific enzymes and thereby prevent their activation of carcinogens that cause colon cancer.

Dr. Lawson will investigate the mechanisms by which high dietary fat might be involved with the initiation of tumors. He will study how low- and high-fat diets alter enzymes that convert nitrosamines to agents that cause cancer in the pancreas.

Dr. Welsch is determining whether the varied effects on tumor growth caused by different amounts and types of fats (from corn oil beef tallow or fish oil) in the diet are due to changes in the rate of cell division or the rate of cell death.

Dr. Cramer will investigate the possible link between an increased risk for developing ovarian cancer in the mothers and sisters of women with ovarian cancer and a deficiency of a key enzyme (a transferase) needed to metabolize galactose (a sugar) in milk.

Dr. Tangney will determine how a dietary supplement of vitamin E might be involved with regulation of the immune system's ability to fight cancer. Dr. Tangney will give vitamin E capsules to lung cancer patients and see if this changes the levels of lymphokines, which are natural substances in the body that regulate the immune system.

Dr. Morin and Dr. Johnson will determine how bile acids control and possibly prevent the growth of tumors in the large intestine. Fats in our diets are digested to form bile acids. Some bile acids apparently are involved with the conversion of tumor cells back to noncancerous cells. They will explore this conversion and the role of the enzyme protein kinase C in the regulation of tumor cell growth.

Dr. Chen will evaluate whether consumption of broccoli and cabbage might increase the level of glutathione in colon tissue. She will further test whether glutathione might enhance colon tumor cell killings by 5-FU (5-fluorouracil) and thereby possibly improve the effectiveness of 5-FU treatment of colon cancer.

Dr. Clarke will determine how low-fat, high-fat, and high-cholesterol diets influence the activities of two enzymes, aromatase and sulfatase, whic are needed to convert dietary cholesterol to estrogen. His research may lead to guidelines to help reduce the growth of some types of breast tumors.

Dr. Hine will determine whether deficiencies in folic acid and vitamin B12 might increase the susceptibility to cancer causing agents. She will determine whether low levels of the vitamins are associated with increased damage to DNA, the genetic material, a condition that precedes tumor development. The studies will be done in smokers to see if the vitamin deficiencies predispose them to mouth and lung cancer.

Dr. McCathy is exploring the possibility that the loss of appetite and drop in body weight frequently experienced by cancer patients may be caused by a group of substances called prostaglandins in the body.

Dr. Wargovich is investigating how sulfur-containing compounds (dialyl sulfide and s-allylcysteine) found in garlic onions and related vegetables inhibit different stages in the development of cancer of the esophagus.

Dr. Lupton is studying how soluble dietary fiber the kind found in oat bran and beans seems to both increase the risk of developing colon cancer as well as reduce the chances of developing coronary heart disease.

Dr. Goeger is xploring the possibility that chick embryos can be used to study how certain substances in our food help to prevent cancer a technique which could lead to their substitution for laboratory rats and mice in certain experiments which benefit humans.

Dr. Kritchevsky is examining how phospholipids an important group of substances found throughout the body are affected by either the presence of breast cancer or by a diet which influences the chances of developing breast cancer.

Dr. Pretlow is determining whether early changes in colon tissue such as ezyme-altered foci and aberrant crypts can be used to predict increased risk for colon cancer and whether selenium or phytate in fiber-rich foods can prevent the transition to colon cancer.

Dr. Fine is determining how a restriction in dietary sodium intake restricts the growth of solid tumors. The effects of dietary sodium deprivation on tumor cell volume, membrane transport, DNA synthesis and other cellular events are being studied.

Dr. Mirvish is evaluating whether a test for nitrosoproline in urine might reliably identify people at increased risk for cancer of the esophagus and stomach. He will also determine whether increased ascorbic acid and vegetables in the diet might protect against this risk.

Dr. Adrian is determining if a high-fat diet inceases the risk of developing pancreatic cancer because it stimulates the release of cholecystokinin, an intestinal hormone which may facilitate the development of cancer.

Dr. Zeisel is investigating how choline deficiency enhances liver cancer. He will determine if the excess 1,2-sn-diacylglycerol (1,2-DAG) that accumulates in the liver during choline deficiency might activate protein kinase C (PKC) and in this way lead to tumor initiation and promotion.

Dr. Wong is determining whether the large freshwater paddlefish contains certain fats which can slow down or prevent the growth of tumors and whether certain substances in its cartilage can deprive tumors of their blood supply.

Dr. Bertram is studying how retinoic acid, a form of vitamin A, acts to prevent skin cancer. He will examine vitamin A-treated human skin to determine if increased communication between cells might inhibit conversion of normal to malignant cells.

Dr. Thompson is studying chnges in the colonic transport of the mineral potassium that may be associated with development of colon cancer, and how these changes as well as the development of colon cancer, are affected by potassium in the diet.

Dr. Tayek is investigating how glucose metabolism andinsulin response are changed in patients with head and neck cancer so that diets can be designed to improve the nutritional state and prevent excessive weight loss in these cancer patients.

Dr. Westin is examining how vitamin A and vitamin D affect the genes that help to determine whether white blood cells develop into normal cells or hether they develop into the cancer cells of leukemia.

Dr. Von Hoff is exploring the possbility that vitamin D halts the growth of cancer by eliminating a tumor's episomes which are extra genes that either trigger the development of cancer or provide resistance to chemotherapeutic drugs.

Dr. Klein is studying whether the excessive loss of weight experienced by manycancer patients may be due to an abnormality in metabolism which wastes the energy from food instead of using it to build and repair body tissues.

Dr. Knapp is exploring the possibility that the consumption of fish oil supplements may change the bacterial environmet of the colon and the subsequent metabolism of compounds thought to be involved in the development of colon cancer.

Dr. Creek is investigating whether vitamin A or its precursor beta-carotene can control the development of cancer by examining their effect on the growth and differentiation of human skin cells which have been altred by a virus involved in cervical cancer.

Dr. Singletary is studying whether the long-term consumption of alcohol increases the risk of developing breast cancer and if it does this by altering the normal development of breast cells or by interfering with the metabolism and disposal of carcinogens in breast tissue.

Dr. Fucs is studying how vitamin A can prevent the development of cancer by determining how, at the genetic level, vitamin A affects the differentiation and proliferation of normal and pre-cancerous human epithelial cells.

Dr. DiGirolamo is exploring metabolic derangements underlying cancer cachexia in lung cancer patients. The possible mechanisms by which hormones, and other substances released by the tumor or the host, might induce the metabolic changes and lead to excessive weight loss are being studied.

Dr. Clark is determining whether the risk of developing skin cancer is related to the level of selenium in the blood and if selenium supplementation can prevent the development of skin cancer in patients who have a increased risk of developing non-melanoma skin cancer.

Dr. Yielding is determining whether the consumption of antioxidants such as the vitamins C and E the mineral selenium or the food additive BHT can prevent the development of cancer during the long dlay between exposure to a carcinogen and the actual appearance of the tumor.

Drs. Kline and Sanders are determining whether vitamin E and the mineral selenium can prevent the development of cancer caused by a retrovirus and if these nutrients bolster the immne system modulate retrovirus-induced immunosuppression or inhibit the process of carcinogenesis.

Dr. Grossie is exploring the possibility that total parenteral nutrition feeding can be used to simultaneously nourish a cachectic cancer patient and starve his tumor by excluding certain substances from the liquid needed for the synthesis of polymines which are essential for the growth of a tumor.

Dr. Taylor is investigating whether vitamin A-like compounds can prevent the development of cachexia and the weakening of the immune system in cancer patients a condition which appears to be caused by their tumors releasing cerain metabolic inhibitors into general circulation which are then distributed to healthy tissues. These studies have indicated that retinoic acid prevents alterations in fat and protein metabolism decreases immune functions and cancer as well as diminishs the growth of tumors and formation of metastases.

Dr. Yen is determining how vitamin A or vitamin D can be used to reduce the dosage of certain chemotherapeutic drugs used to treat leukemiaand what happens at the level of the cells' genes to make this possible.

Dr. Weinstein is studying how dietary fatty acids can affect the transformation of healthy cells into cancerous ones by examining the biochemical and molecular changes that follow the introduction of these fatty acidsinto cells which have been isolated from rats and altered with cancer-causing genes called oncogenes.

Dr. Romney is determining if a nutrient supplement of beta-carotene vitamin C and folic acid administered for six months in amounts exceeding normal requirements can slow down or reverse the growth of pre-cancerous cells in women diagnosed with moderate cervical dysplasia.

Dr. Stuzinski is studying how derivatives of vitamin D can prevent the development of leukemia by promoting the transformation of immature, cancer-like cells into normally functioning white blood cells.

Dr. Smith is exploring the possibility that some of the intestinal side effects caused by chemotherapy can be prevented by supplying patients with extra amounts of the amino acid glutamine, which the gastrointestinal tract appears to use more rapidly during severe stress.

Dr. Rogers is studying how a deficiency of choline, methionine, or folic acid, which are nutrients central to one-carbon metabolism and cellular reproduction, can increase the risk of developing a second primary cancer in patients given chemotherapy, and how this might be prevented by dietary supplementation with choline.

Dr. Magin is studying how a dietary supplement of the mineral selenium may be able to reduce the toxic side effects of the anti-cancer drug cis-diamminedichloroplatinum and improve this drug's effectiveness.

Dr. Patel is studying how the normal composition and functioning of cell membranes in the lungs can be damaged by an anti-cancer drug or by highly unstable metabolites of oxygen, and whether this might be prevented by vitamin E in the diet.

Drs. Lane and Keith are investigating whether the reduction in occurrence of breast cancer following a low-calorie or low-fat diet is a result of the diet itself or a result of changes this diet causes on the composition of the body's tissue.

Dr. Barnes is exploring the possibility that breast cancer is much less common in the Orient because a substance found in soybeans my inhibit the development of breast cancer by interfering with the effect of estrogen on the growth of certain tumors.

Dr. Walaszek is identifying plant sources rich in a potent beta-glucuronidase inhibitor called glucarolactone or its precursors glucaric acid and glucarate to determine f these compounds inhibit the development of breast cancer.

Diets deficient in methyl groups have been shown to be carcinogenic.The questions to be studied are if the activity of an enzyme in the liver is altered when the animals are fed methyl-deficient diets and if so is it related to the process of liver cancer.

Drs. Betschart and Virji are studying how hormones and other hormone-like substances may be involved in regulating the growth of tumors by attemptig to determine how the liver cells respond to these substances and how this causes cells to become cancerous.

Dr. Chance is studying combination cancer therapy using a drug called acivicin and insulin. He has found that this therapy appears to prevent tumor growth and reduc the amount of weight loss in rats receiving parenteral nutrition.

Dr. Wainfan is exploring the effect some carcinogens have on the body's supply f methyl groups a chemical necessary for the orderly reproduction and functioning of cells and whether this effect can be counteracted by the diet.

Dr. Kiremidjian-Schumacher is studying whether modulation of the selenium contnt of the diet can affect the function of immunocompetent cells and therefore significantly modify the relationship between tumor and host.

Dr. Yang is studying if certain substances found in corn, wheat, and other foods bind with the minerals calcium, zinc, or magnesium in the cells of the esophagus, and thus make cancer more likely to develop.

Dr. DiGirolamo is exploring the possibility that cancer cachexia may result from the excessive breakdown of fat stores throughout the body, caused by hormones or other substances released by the tumor.

Dr. Malkinson is studying why BHT, an antioxidant used as a food additive, stimulates lung cancer in one strain of mice but inhibits lung cancer in another strain. The strain of mice in which BHT protects against lung cancer also appears to be the only strain in which a low activity of an enzyme (called Protein Kinase C) is found.

Dr. Vyas is studying how liver cells infected with the hepatitis B virus may interact with aflatoxin B-1, a mold-generated toxin which sometimes contaminates grain and peanuts, to initiate liver cancer.

Dr. Abraham is studying how polyunsaturted fat in the diet affects the transformation of normal breast cells into pre-cancerous cells and the subsequent transformation of these cells into breast tumors.

Dr. Meadows following up his previous research results that restricting the amont of two amino acids in the diet can reduce the spread of cancer cells throughout the body is determining whether it is a deficiency of those amino acids or a loss in body weight that is affecting the cancer and if the effect persists throughout the tretment.

Dr. Hosick is exploring the possibility that certain dietary fats increase the risk of developing breast cancer because their consumption leads to changes in a body's adipos tissue that stimulates nearby pre-cancerous cells to become cancerous.

Dr. Lea is studying if a compound found in milk, called orotic acid, can in high concentrations, promote the development of kidney cancer by interfering with the normal synthesis of DNA. In addition, the possibility that a diet deficient in arginine, an essential amino acid, might act in a similar fashion is being investigated.

Dr. Fraker is continuing to investigate the possibility that a poor diet during pregnancy may increase the risk of a child later developing cancer, by examining in mice whether a maternal zinc deficiency results in offspring whose immune systems have a reduced capability of resisting cancer.

Dr. Broitman is studying, in mice, the relationships between the transplant locations of colonic tumors and their response to dietary factors and the specific effects of cholesterol on the growth and spread of colon cancer.

With the use of a new, rapid assay developed with earlier support from AICR, Dr. Talalay is continuing his systematic identification of the substances found naturally in vegetables which are capable of stimulating the deactivation of carcinogens.

Dr. Hoffman is continuing to develop a dietary and chemotherapeutic treatment for certain cancers that cease to grow and become more vulnerable to drugs when they are deprived of the amino acid methionine.

Dr. Hoffman is studying how narcotic-like hormones called opioids, found naturally in the human body and also in milk, can influence and possibly regulate the growth of tumors. They are now inestigating which tumors make opioids and how this synthesis is controlled.

Dr. Faris is studying how selenium affects a group of pre-cancerous liver cells. Preliminary data suggests that selenium may be a tumor promoter and it may depend on when the selenium is administered in these liver cells to etermine if it acts as a promoter or inhibitor of cancer.

Dr. Silverman is studying whether changing to a low-fat diet before or during puberty can cause a greater reduction in the development of breast cancer rather than switching to a low-fat diet later in life.

Drs. Smith and Clark are trying to prevent skin cancer in patients at high risk of reoccurrence. The project wil test the hypothesis that a dietary supplement of selenium will help prevent recurrent skin cancer.

Dr. Mendecki is examining whether supplemental vitamin A in the diet can prevent the development of cancer improve the success of cancer treatment and help to avoid some of the sideeffects of radiation therapy.

Dr. Clark is investigating the feasibility of using salt fortified with selenium to improve the selenium status of a population at high risk of cancer in the People's Republic of China. He and his Chinese colleagues ae conducting a pilot study to demonstrate the safety and feasibility of using a high-selenium brewers yeast in a population of Hepatitis B carriers who are at an extremely high risk of primary liver cancer.

Dr. Chung is testing whether acompound found in cruciferous vegetables sinigrin can prevent the development of liver lung and nasal tumors caused by exposure to a powerful carcinogen present in tobacco.

Dr. Bernofsky is testing his hypothesis that cachexia, the slow wasting away of the body tissues that often accompanies cancer, is caused in part by the tumor destroying certain vitamins needed by the entire body to extract energy from food.

Dr. Ham is developing a system for growing human breast cells in the laboratory, so that researchers studying breast cancer can experiment with normal human breast epithelial cells maintained under precisely controlled conditions.

Dr. Day is examining health records in celand some dating back to 1910 to determine how changes in body weight body fat and other physical and biochemical characteristics are related to the risk of developing breast cancer.

Dr. Slaga is exploring which cominations of anti-cancer substances including vitamins C E and the mineral selenium are most effective in interfering with the different stages in the development of skin cancer.

Dr. Carubelli is studying how the presence of different and varying levels of fat in the diet together with the antioxidant food additive BHT can alter the functionig of certain enzymes which surround the nucleus of liver cells and which may be important for the inactivation of carcinogens.

Dr. Rose is investigating if lowering the amount of fat in the diet o 20% of calories can lead to a reduction in the levels of the hormones estrogen and biologically-active prolactin circulating in the blood of women who are suffering from severe cystic breast disease and who may be at special risk of developing breast cacer.

A survey of possible causes of cancer and other diseases was undertaken in 64 mostly rural counties of the People's Republic of China with particular focus on dietary habits. Approximately 330 items of informtion were documented for 6500 adults derived from 1) a 3-day dietary survey 2) analyses of blood urine and food samples environment.

Dr. Wattenberg is identifying the anti-cancer compounds in cocoa beans which can prevent the development of breast, lung, and stomach cancer in rodents, and the anti-cancer compound in standard laboratory rat chow which can prevent gastrointestinal cancer in mice.

Studies of the relationships between cancer and diet depend in part on the accuracy of food composition data in order to adequately describe the dietary components. Dr. Young and associates are critically examining food composition tables to enable researchers to more accurately report human intake of nutrients.

Dr. Wilmore is studyig, in young breast cancer patients undergoing intensive chemotherapy and bone marrow infusions, how intravenous nutritional feeding affects the functioning of the kidneys, lungs, heart, blood system, liver, and gastrointestinal tract, in the hope that specific nutritional benefits could be identified and pursued.

Dr. Lokich is examining how the metabolism of fat in patients with colon cancer dffers from the metabolism of fat in those without cancer, in order to help explain why so many cancer patients lose weight during their illness.

Dr. Krontiris is studying whether certain forms of a particular gene are found more often in people who develop cancer, making it possible to identify early those individuals who inherit a high risk of developing cancer.

Dr. Bistrian is attempting to find out if feeding a special mixture of amino acids can stimulate cachectic cancer patients to synthesize proteins normally after consuming a conventional mixture of amino acids.

Dr. Alam is testing whether the addition of beta-carotene to the diet can prevent the growth of salivary gland tumors and whether this beta-carotene affects the composition or the functioning of the membranes in the normal gland and in tumors.

Dr. Wade is studying how different types and different amounts of fat in the diet affect the metabolic activation of certain chemicals into carcinogens. Certain fats, like fish oils, seem to have a cancer-inhibiting effect, but it depends on what stage in the cancer process the fish oils are administered.

Dr. Brada is following up his observtion that adding the amino acid methionine to the diet slows down the development of a certain type of liver cancer, by testing if this effect is also true for other types of cancer.

Dr. Byrne is studying the role of vitamin E in persistent breast pain in women who suffer from various forms of fibrocystic breast disease, a condition which, in some cases, causes an increased risk for breast cancer.

Dr. Alfin-Slater, with her students and associates, are studying whether the addition of vitamin E to the diet could protect the lung against the cellular damage caused by ozone, a major component of smog and a possible cause of lung cancer.

Dr. Goldin will investigate whether lactobacillus, strains of bacteria used to produce yogurt, might lower colon cancer risk. He will determine whether these bacteria might prevent chemicals in the colon from being converted to cancer-causing agents.

A: No. If you work out for 30 minutes or more and dont drink any water, your weight will probably be down immediately afterward. But this lower weight is only a reflection of water loss from dehydration and the weight loss is only temporary. It is exercising a little longer and harder that will help you lose more body fat. Studies clearly show that people who drink fluid before exercise (and during exercise, if it is longer than 20 to 30 minutes) can perform faster, harder and longer than exercisers who do not drink fluid. Fuel yourself with a snack or meal two to three hours before exercise and drink plenty of fluid. In most cases water is the preferred beverage choice if you are trying to lose weight, unless you are exercising for an extended period of time. For intense exercise lasting over an hour or intense stop-start sports (like hockey), sports drinks that provide small amounts of carbohydrate can improve performance.

A: You can use these foods to make a balanced meal. The basic idea of balanced, plant-based meals like those recommended by the American Institute for Cancer Research is to include protein, starchy complex carbohydrates, and fruits and/or vegetables in every meal. The largest parts of the meal should be the grains, fruits and vegetables. In pizza, whole wheat crust is now increasingly available for a healthful source of complex carbohydrate grain, and cheese supplies the protein. Vegetable toppings like peppers, onions, mushrooms, tomatoes and spinach provide good nutrition and taste. Realistically though, youd have to eat a lot of pizza to get a substantial serving of vegetables. Try serving the pizza with salad or raw vegetables on the side or offer fruit for dessert. If you dont overdo the amount of pizza available, people will be more likely to add in these other choices. Burritos also make it easy to get the grain (tortilla) and protein (beans, cheese, a little chicken or meat if you want). The problem, once again, is that its hard to load enough lettuce, tomatoes and other veggies into just one or two burritos. So cut back on the meat, chicken and cheese to make room for fresh vegetables and enjoy some fruit for dessert.

A: Grapefruit juice is very nutritious, but no solid research shows it has any impact on how fast we burn calories. Each six-ounce glass of grapefruit juice provides lots of potassium and about three-fourths of the recommended daily amount of vitamin C. It also contains natural compounds that help protect our DNA from damage that can lead to cancer all for only 70 to 75 calories. However, no evidence shows that grapefruit juice can make weight loss easier. Drinking large amounts of any juice is usually not a good weight-loss strategy because juice calories add up quickly and juices typically do not satisfy hunger for very long. A better strategy is to boost solid fruit and vegetable consumption to 5 to 10 servings a day. These foods are generally low in calories and their bulk helps satisfy hunger.

A: We really dont know. Although studies show that soup helps people feel full and limit their eating, scientists arent really sure how this works. Some research suggests that the effect is a physical response to the volume and perhaps composition of the soup. In that case, drinking soup on the run could help hold off hunger and control eating, at least if the portion was large enough. Portion does seem to be key; a small volume of soup concentrated in calories does not have the same effect as getting the same calories in a larger, less-concentrated soup. Other research suggests that the sensory stimulation of soup in the mouth, and even the psychological impact of feeling that youve had food, may also play a role in soups filling effects. If so, then gulping soup on the run without paying attention to it or thinking of it as a beverage may limit its effects. See how soup works for you. But if you eat a cup of soup as a meal make sure it is a healthful soup that includes the needed vegetables, whole grains and protein. Studies show that when we slight ourselves of nutrients at meals we tend to more than make up for any calories saved by overeating later. Besides, the object of eating is not just to feel full. If your soup does not contain nutrients that your body needs, you wont really come out ahead.

A: Studies show that general strength training resistance exercises using free weights, Nautilus-type resistance equipment or elastic bands done with light or moderate effort generally burns about 50 to 150 calories in 20 minutes. Athletes engaged in power lifting or vigorous strength training usually burn twice that amount. But strength training has a double impact on weight control. Over time, strength training builds more muscle, which increases the calories you burn all day. Research at Tufts University found that 56 to 80-year-old men and women who strength trained at a moderate level three times a week for 12 weeks increased their resting metabolic rate by about 6.8 percent. This agrees with other studies showing an increase of 80 to 130 calories burned each day in addition to what is lost during the exercise itself. Regardless of whether someone is trying to lose weight or simply stay healthy, strength training two or three times a week is highly recommended in addition to daily aerobic activity like walking or swimming.

A: Caffeine can circulate throughout the body for five to seven hours. People sensitive to its stimulant power should avoid it past late afternoon to more easily fall asleep at night. Both green and black (regular) teas are available in decaffeinated versions. Most herbal teas are caffeine-free, but not all. Check the list of ingredients; herbal teas may contain caffeine-like stimulants, such as guarana and yerba mate. Beverages labeled as energy and dieters teas are especially likely to contain stimulants, but check the ingredients of all your herbal teas if you are having trouble sleeping.

A: Seafood is only a good source of calcium if you eat the bones. Canned salmon is available both with and without bones. It sounds like the product you checked was the type labeled skinless and boneless. This contains so little calcium from 6 to 25 milligrams (mg) in two ounces that it is listed as 0 percent of Daily Value. Other canned salmon is packed with bones, which are soft and edible. Two ounces of this salmon usually contain about 10 percent of Daily Value, or 100 mg, which is equal to about one-third cup of milk.

A: For generations, meals have traditionally included mixtures of meat, fish or poultry served with starchy foods such as bread, pasta or potatoes, plus vegetables or fruit. It doesnt make sense that such combinations would suddenly increase childhood obesity now. Studies clearly show that childhood obesity is linked to less physical activity, larger portions, and increases in sugar-loaded beverages and high-calorie foods. Regardless of what certain books say, mixing foods does not leave the body unable to digest them. (Also, undigested food passes out of the body as waste; it cannot possibly turn into body fat, as some writers have suggested.) When you are reading material written by a physician or other health professional, its wise to consider both the authors credentials and message. Even if authors credentials sound impressive, if the recommendations go against the advice of most respected experts, reconsider the reliability of the information.

A: While the idea of getting something extra in foods seems attractive at first, these products pose several disadvantages. Some products may list an herb or supplement in the ingredients with no indication on the label of the amount in each serving. Even when a product lists the amounts, it may be at lower levels than studies have shown to be effective. The amount found to be effective is usually not stated on the label. You may be paying extra money for something that contains too little of the added ingredient to offer any benefit. Also, its important to keep a list of all supplements that you take and keep your doctor informed on supplement use. But when supplements are mixed into foods, its easy to lose track. Even though they are natural, supplements can interact with medications or cause problems for people with medical conditions. If you want to use herbs or supplements, its generally better to buy them separately than to pay extra for products that contain them. For that matter, to get the whole gamut of vitamins, minerals and natural plant compounds, choose a plant-based diet. Theres just no substitute for the benefits of boosting the amount of vegetables, fruits, beans and whole grains we eat.

A: The allium family onions, garlic, leeks and chives all contain sulfur compounds. Laboratory studies show these sulfur compounds play a role in rendering carcinogens harmless before they can lead to cancer. There are quite a few sulfur compounds and the amounts and types vary among members of this food family. Studies suggest that at least some sulfur compounds can stimulate the self-destruction of cancer cells, so these foods are a valuable part of our arsenal for preventing cancer. Some research shows that different types of onions have varying levels of antioxidant compounds called phenols. Laboratory estimates of anti-cancer effects among the different onions also vary. In one study, milder sweet onions (such as Vidalia, Empire Sweet and even several white onions) ranked lower in phenols and anti-cancer effects than some sharper-flavored yellow onions. As researchers learn more, we may make more effort to choose or breed onion varieties high in protective compounds. For now, simply incorporating all the members of the allium family into your diet is a smart move both for health and making food taste delicious.

A: The plant-based New American Plate model recommended by the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) is a healthful way for everyone to eat, regardless of weight status. On the New American Plate at least two-thirds of the meal revolves around vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans; meat, fish and poultry are kept to no more than one-third of a meal. The AICR model supports weight-loss goals because you can fill up on vegetables, which are usually the lowest in calories and most filling parts of a meal. People concerned about losing weight can maintain the healthy ratio of plant to animal foods but decrease their portion size. Serve your family the recommended portions and then eat about one-quarter less of everything except those veggies. Your body should become accustomed to eating less food over time. You might not need to snack but if you do, try eating fruit or a small handful of nuts. You might also try small portions of whole-grain cereal with fat-free milk. For family members not concerned with weight, they can also enjoy the same snacks in substantial portions.

In laboratory studies, certain natural compounds in onions and garlic have demonstrated cancer protection. Now population studies published in recent months provide further evidence of the link between onions and garlic and a lower risk of cancer.

In one study, about 25,000 people from Italy and Switzerland were grouped according to how much onion and garlic they routinely ate. Some of these people had recently been diagnosed with cancer, and some formed a healthy comparison group. Researchers controlled for known cancer risks, including BMI and calorie intake. People who used the most onion or garlic about a half-cup of chopped onion daily and a self-assessed high garlic consumption  were from 10 to 88 percent less likely to have various types of cancer than those who said they used little or none. Cancers compared included cancers of the esophagus, mouth and throat, colon, breast, ovary, prostate and kidney. High onion intake, for example, was associated with a 56 percent lower risk of colon cancer and a 25 percent lower risk of breast cancer compared to no onion intake.

Colon cancer is one cancer research has associated with protection from onion and garlic consumption, but how much protection is unclear. In a study among more than 35,000 women in Iowa, participants who ate one clove of garlic a week had a 32 percent lower colon cancer risk than those who ate garlic once a month or less. An analysis of several studies worldwide linked a 31 percent lower risk of colon cancer with consumption of about four to five cloves of garlic weekly.

Stomach cancer is another of the cancers that research suggests may be reduced by onions and garlic, although the evidence for this association is less clear. In a study of more than 521,000 Europeans, about one tablespoon of chopped onion or three cloves of garlic eaten daily was linked six-and-a-half years later with a 30 percent lower chance of cancer developing in the lowest part of the stomach. Due to the relatively few cases of stomach cancer the participants developed, researchers couldnt determine whether the link is due to onion and garlic or might have occurred by chance. A wide variation in protection seen may reflect differences between onion and garlic, in how they were prepared, or in individuals sensitivity to their compounds. Other studies, often from China where stomach cancer is relatively common, show that people averaging five cloves of garlic a week have about half the stomach cancer as non-garlic eaters.

Like many vegetables, onions and garlic contain antioxidants that can block highly reactive free radicals from damaging cell DNA and starting the cancer process. Laboratory studies have shown that onion and garlic compounds can increase enzymes that deactivate carcinogens in the body, enhancing our ability to eliminate carcinogens before they do any damage. Furthermore, in the laboratory onion and garlic compounds slow the growth and stimulate the self-destruction of cancer cells that form. Given this protective potential, the challenge now is to identify amounts that will provide optimal effects.

Some research hints garlic and onions protective compounds may work more effectively when combined with other compounds that work through different pathways. For example, animal studies show even greater reduction in cancer development from garlic and tomato than from either alone.

The protective effects of onion and garlic seem related to wherever cancer cells grow in the body and not to any specific tissue, such as breast or thyroid. That leads many scientists to say that although research offers more proof of onion and garlics impact on some cancers than others, they are likely to offer protection against a wide range of cancers.

New findings are adding to the research suggesting that more than ever before what and how much we drink may increase calorie intake and weight without our noticing. The problem of overweight and obesity in the United States has escalated in the last 30 years. During this time calorie consumption increased an average of 150 to 300 calories per day, with about half that increase from beverages. The variety of calorie-dense beverages and number of soft drink servings per day both grew. Average soft drink portion size increased over 50 percent from about 13 ounces to almost 20 ounces.

Several studies peg calories from beverages as one of the causes of increased overweight and obesity in the United States. Studies suggest that when people consume more calories from beverages, they dont compensate by eating or drinking less.

One new study, for example, served 33 men and women the same lunch once a week for six weeks with only the beverage type or amount changing each week. Regardless of the type of beverage, people drank more when served 18 ounces than when served 12 ounces. When the amount of calorie-containing cola increased, womens beverage calories increased by 10 percent and the mens by 26 percent. Participants ate the same amount of food independent of the higher amount of calories they drank, leading to an increase in the meals total calories. Yet after a higher-calorie meal containing sweetened soft drinks, participants reported no difference in hunger or satisfaction.

Short-term studies generally 1 to 3 days  in which people decrease high-calorie soft drink consumption usually show a decreased total daily calorie consumption. Longer term studies ranging from 6 months to 4 years have found an association between drinking less calorie-containing soft drinks and weight loss.

Scientists offer several explanations as to why we may not notice calories from some beverages. A drinks rapid passage through the mouth provides less time for signals to trigger the brain you are eating. Compared to beverages, solid food seems to provide more of a feeling of fullness, which signals the brain to stop eating. Thick liquids (like smoothies and shakes) provide considerably more fullness signals than thin liquids, such as soft drinks, fruit drinks, and sweetened tea and coffee. As portion sizes of calorie-dense beverages increase, it is easier to gulp down larger amounts than to eat larger portions of solid foods. Finally, some researchers suggest that there may be a psychological component, too. Many of us consider beverages a separate category that does not count in the same way as solid food.

For people who either have trouble getting enough or limiting calories, this research suggests that beverage choice and portion are important considerations. Calorie-rich drinks offer an opportunity to boost calories without reducing appetite. However, for those who look at drinks as a way to work in meals on the run, it suggests that this approach may lead to a higher calorie intake than chewing a meal. For weight control, limiting calorie-containing beverages to a few modest daily servings of nutrient-containing drinks, and drinking water, unsweetened tea or coffee, and other zero-calorie drinks is a smart strategy.

For many people soup brings an image of a cozy comfort food that just has to be good for you. Indeed, soup can be a boost as you try to stay fit and healthy. But look before you eat, because the details of whats in the soup make a difference.

The long-held connection of soup to good health may stem from grandmas advice that you should have chicken soup when ill. Some research has shown that one or more compounds in chicken soup provide mild anti-inflammatory benefits that reduce mucus production and thus, lessen a stuffy nose or cough. We still have relatively little research to confirm the link, but theres no harm in trying.

Soup could be an ally for weight control, too. Americans portions have grown markedly in the last 20 years, apparently contributing to our boom in obesity. Some research suggests that starting a meal with soup may help reduce portion size. For relatively few calories, soup brings a feeling of fullness and makes it easier to eat less of other foods in a meal. The key for success with this strategy may depend upon serving smaller portions of the other foods. Studies have clearly established that for many of us, eating super-size portions is not necessarily due to hunger; it is a response to seeing more food. If thats true, then the fact that soup satisfies our hunger wont necessarily lead us to eat less if we still see large amounts of food.

Soup can also benefit long-term health by serving as a vehicle to work more vegetables into meals. Tomato soup provides a serving of vegetables in the liquid itself, and then you can add a variety of vegetables. Pureed winter squash is also an excellent base for soup that is packed with nutrients. (Simply puree steamed, microwaved or baked squash, and thin to the consistency you prefer with chicken or vegetable broth or fat-free milk.) Broth-based soups can be packed with one to two standard servings of vegetables per bowl, too. If you start with commercial soup thats light on vegetables, you can add frozen, canned or leftover fresh veggies of your own.

The key to making soup a healthy food option is to make sure it is concentrated in the plant foods that we need to increase in our diet and not loaded with what we need to reduce sodium and saturated fat. Conventional commercial soup often contains from 750 to 1,000 milligrams of sodium per 1-cup serving a hefty portion of the suggested maximum of 2,300 mg a day. (If you start with condensed soup, a serving is less than half of a 10-ounce can). Reduced-sodium soups often contain 400 to 850 mg per cup. This is better but definitely not truly low-sodium. Some people dilute reduced-sodium soup with sodium-free bouillon to produce a soup with even lower sodium than commercial soups. You can add onion, garlic and herbs for plenty of flavor.

As for fat content, cheesy or creamy soups tend to deliver 5 to 9 grams of saturated fat per cup; a substantial portion of many peoples cap of 15 to 20 grams a day, particularly if your portion sneaks above the one-cup mark. Vegetable and broth-based soups make limiting fat easier.

Soup can play a role in creating meals that reduce cancer risk and promote overall health. By adding soup loaded with vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans, you can instantly switch the balance of a meal in a healthy direction. Soup can even be the complete meal following this approach. A soup chock-full of vegetables that includes a small amount of meat or poultry can provide a satisfying and healthful meal. For healthful soup recipes visit the American Institute for Cancer Research Web site at www.aicr.org.

As evidence has built connecting exercise to lower breast cancer risk, researchers have suggested the link is related to weight loss. Previous research found a connection between obesity and breast cancer risk, and exercise generally leads to lower weight. Now, intriguing evidence is emerging that some of exercises effect on lower breast cancer risk may be independent of weight.

The link between weight and breast cancer risk relates to estrogen. Body fat increases estrogen production and a high level of estrogen is linked with some types of breast cancer. After menopause, when fat becomes a significant source of the bodys estrogen, excess weight is strongly linked with greater risk of breast cancer.

The latest major study on exercise comes from the Iowa Womens Health Study, which followed more than 36,000 women aged 55 to 69. After 18 years of follow up, researchers analyzed the activity level, weight and breast cancer status of the women. When researchers adjusted for weight, they found high activity levels reduced the risk of breast cancer by 9 percent. Researchers also found that women who were most active were 14 percent less likely to develop breast cancer than those least active. The study reaffirmed research that exercise benefits lean as well as overweight women.

In a 2006 study sponsored by the National Cancer Institute, vigorous exercise reduced breast cancer risk 12 percent independent of participants maintaining a healthy weight. In these and other studies the benefit of exercise is seen after controlling for most of the traditional breast cancer risk factors, including age, family history, pregnancy and hormone replacement therapy.

AICRs Nutrition Hotline is a free service that allows you to ask a registered dietitian questions about diet, nutrition and cancer. Access it on-line at www.aicr.org/hotline or by phone (1-800-843-8114) 9 a.m. to 5 p.m. ET Monday-Friday. AICR is the only major cancer charity focused exclusively on the link between diet, nutrition and cancer. It provides education programs that help Americans learn to make changes for lower cancer risk. AICR also supports innovative research in cancer prevention and treatment at universities, hospitals and research centers. It has provided more than $78 million for research in diet, nutrition and cancer. AICRs Web address is www.aicr.org.

There are several foods that historically represent positive aspects of a Chinese New Year celebration. Lotus seeds imply the promise of male offspring; gingko nuts, silver ingots; and black moss seaweed, wealth. These foods can be difficult to find in American markets, so the stir-fry below includes other ingredients that are nonetheless popular in Chinese cooking. One warning, however: bean curd, or tofu, is never included in a Chinese New Year menu because white represents death and misfortune.

Pork tenderloin is an extremely lean cut of meat, and this recipe mirrors the proportions of the traditional Chinese diet, with lots of vegetables and just a little animal protein, around three ounces per serving. Ginger, so popular in Chinese cooking, contains health-protective phytochemicals and is also believed to help relieve nausea, motion sickness and certain digestive ailments.There was a time not so long ago when bell pepper automatically meant green ones. The popularity and availability today of different colored bell peppers has boosted the eye appeal of dishes like this one. While this stir-fry is delicious with rice or pasta, if you serve it with noodles, youll be including one of the traditional Chinese New Year ingredients that symbolize a long life.

Heat oil in medium skillet over medium-high heat until hot. Add chicken and brown on both sides. Transfer chicken to a plate. Add onions and garlic to the pan and saut? until onions are lightly browned, about 5 minutes, taking care that garlic doesnt turn dark brown. Add tomatoes, chicken and any of its juices to pan. Add broth and lime juice. Sprinkle with salt and pepper, according to taste. Cover pan and simmer 20 minutes. Add quinoa, green beans and thyme. Cover and cook until quinoa is cooked and beans are crisp-tender, about 20 minutes.Remove pan from heat and let sit, covered, 10 minutes, until quinoa is fluffy and soft. Add salt and pepper to taste, if desired, and serve.Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 231 calories, 7 g. total fat (1 g. saturated fat), 24 g. carbohydrate, 18 g. protein, 4 g. dietary fiber, 214 mg. sodium.

Preheat oven to 400 degrees. Spray bottom of a baking pan with canola oil spray. Add beets and lightly coat with the spray. Add 1/4 cup water and 1/2 cup pomegranate concentrate. Cover pan with foil; roast beets until knife easily pierces center, about 50 minutes. Remove beets from pan and cool. Peel beets wearing rubber or plastic gloves to protect hands. Slice beets thinly. (Beets can be cooked and peeled in advance and stored, refrigerated, until ready to serve.)At serving time, soak cherries in hot water to cover. Drain when soft and set aside. Meanwhile, divide mixed greens among four salad plates so pieces of red cabbage are visible on top. Sprinkle onions on top. Sprinkle with salt and pepper. On top of the greens, place grapefruit alternately with beets in a pinwheel or daisy design. Sprinkle beets with salt and pepper. Sprinkle cherries over salad.In a cup, mix together the tangerine juice, remaining fruit concentrate, oil and vinegar. Add sugar if mixture is too tart. Drizzle dressing over each salad and serve.Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 351 calories, 8 g. total fat (2 g. saturated fat), 54 g. carbohydrate, 17 g. protein, 10 g. dietary fiber, 349 mg. sodium.

Heat the oil over medium-high heat in a deep skillet with tight-fitting cover. Add the meat in one layer and cook until browned and crusty on all sides, turning often. If necessary, do this in two batches to avoid crowding and evenly brown. Transfer the meat to a bowl and set aside. Pour all fat from the pan and return it to the heat.Pour in the broth and scrape up all the browned bits clinging to the pan. Add the sugar and cook until dissolved, 1 minute. Add the sherry, soy sauce, scallions, ginger, peppercorns, star anise and cinnamon stick. Return the meat to the pan, reduce the heat, cover and simmer gently 15 minutes. Using tongs, turn the meat. Add the radish after 30 minutes. Cook the meat about 45 to 60 minutes, turning it every 15 minutes, until it shreds when pulled apart with a fork. If needed, add water, 1/4 cup at a time, to keep the liquid half-way up the side of the meat.Transfer the meat mixture to an oven-proof dish. Remove the cinnamon stick. Pour the cooking liquid through a sieve placed over the stew. Cool to room temperature, then cover and refrigerate for 1 to 2 days. To serve, skim off any fat on top and bake in a 350 degree oven until heated through. Serve over the hot rice.

I cant give you the name of the best Turkish restaurant in New York City, where I live, because the chef, who is key to that reputation, is a notoriously passionate, prickly character who resigns and changes employers anytime an owner disagrees with him. As a result, the restaurant where Orhan happens to be cooking at any given moment is the one serving the best Turkish food, I think, in Manhattan.

By now, Orhan knows me and aids my attempts at Turkish cooking. His first rule is, Always buy the best ingredients. That includes selecting leeks no fatter than your thumb, eggplants that feel hefty for their size, with skin as smooth and shiny as a polished table, and dried beans that look plump, never wrinkled, discolored, or split.

With Orhan's guidance, this is how I make the leeks, a perfect dish in February, when so few fresh vegetables are at their best. The sweetness of fresh lemon juice is important. For the carrots, Orhan has taught me that the bigger and fatter, the sweeter they are. Turks cook white rice with the vegetables, but I prefer using brown rice. Since it cooks more slowly, I add it to the dish already cooked. Serve these meltingly soft leeks at room temperature as a side dish, or to start with, in place of a salad.

Heat the oil over medium-high heat in a skillet or Dutch oven large enough to hold the vegetables in one layer. (A tight-fitting cover is also needed.) Saut? the onions until translucent, 3 to 4 minutes. Add the leeks and carrots and cook until the onions are soft, 2 minutes longer, taking care not to let the vegetables color.

Add the broth, rice, lemon zest, juice and sugar. Bring to a boil, reduce the heat, cover and simmer until the leeks are al dente, about 15 minutes. Uncover and cook until the leeks are very tender and the liquid is reduced and soupy, 10 to 15 minutes.

Transfer mixture to a serving dish and cool to room temperature. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Before serving, sprinkle with the dill. Or cover and refrigerate for up to 2 days; let sit at room temperature for 20 minutes and add the dill before serving.

Wild rice makes me think of airplanes, particularly a flight I once took to Chicago. No in-flight meals would be served, and I needed to put together a carry-on meal in a matter of minutes. Whatever I found in my fridge would have to make do.

Grabbing madly, I threw leftover cooked wild rice, some frozen corn (still frozen), into a container. Fortunately, both are two of those neutral foods to which you can add a wide assortment of flavors and seasonings. I tossed in chopped scallions, dill and a handful each of pine nuts and currants from the pantry. Finally, I dumped in some seaweed salad from a recent take-out order of sushi, figuring the dressing would complete this pre-fusion era concoction.

This salad later inspired me to be more experimental. Interestingly, when I bring up this idea in cooking classes, students seem more afraid of it than they are of trying recipes using unfamiliar ingredients or making a dish they have never tried. Having a recipe in hand gives them needed confidence, but combining familiar foods seems too intimidating. To overcome this, we play the food game in many classes, in which teams get three ingredients and must make a dish using them. Try it yourself and youll see that its fun and usually produces tasty results.

Whether its pasta, rice, or another neutral grain-based foundation, almost any type of crunchy vegetables, nuts and dried fruits can be added, according to personal whim or whatever is handy in the kitchen. And, of course, diced cooked poultry or other meat turns this side-dish into a main course.

Wild rice is especially useful for creating a quick but tasty dish, whether for a picnic, a potluck social, or a meal to be eaten in transit. Unlike pastas or white and brown rice, the grains of wild rice will not turn into a soggy mush with the addition of salad dressing or juicy fruits like apples and oranges. And the slightly nutty yet neutral flavor of wild rice complements almost any type of seasonings or spices you might want to add. Like the basic Little Black Dress, wild rice is ready for any occasion, and appropriate to all.

In a medium saucepan, combine the wild rice with 2 1/2 cups cold water. Cover, bring to a boil, reduce the heat and simmer until the rice is almost tender. Drain, and place the rice in a mixing bowl. There will be about 3 cups cooked rice.

Add the celery, cherries, nuts, onion, orange juice, and oil. Mix with a fork until the ingredients are well combined. Season the salad to taste with salt and pepper. This salad keeps, covered in the refrigerator, for up to three days.

In a medium bowl, place pumpkin, applesauce, oil, buttermilk, eggs and vanilla. Whisk until well combined. Add the dry ingredients and stir until combined. Divide batter evenly among muffin cups. Bake about 20 minutes or until a toothpick comes out clean when inserted in the center of a muffin in the middle of the pan.

Detox diets, fasts and even pills promising to rid the body of toxins and speed up metabolism are becoming more popular thanks in part to media coverage of celebrity diet trends. For example, singer Beyonce Knowles reportedly lost weight by adhering to the master cleanse dietmaple syrup mixed with water, lemon juice and cayenne pepper. Nutrition experts warn that people looking for a quick weight-loss fix from these plans are flushing time, effort and money down the drain.

No credible evidence has yet been presented to support the claim that you can detoxify your liver by eating specific foods, and stepping up your metabolism in the ways recommended by these plans will give you the jitters, but not much more. Any weight loss from detoxifying diets probably derives from calorie restriction.

The Fat Flush Plan would appear to be just another low-calorie diet with some useless but provocative prescriptions added. Most dieters would lose weight on 1,200 calories per day, but hunger would lead them to abandon the plan and regain the weight in short order.

Keep Diet Goals AfloatInstead of trying to flush fat away, the American Institute for Cancer Research recommends following a predominantly plant-based diet, reducing portion sizes and increasing physical activity to achieve a healthy weight.AICRs New American Plate offers nutritional guidelines and recipes based on filling your plate with two-thirds (or more) plant foods like vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans, and one-third (or less) with animal proteins like meat and low fat dairy products. According to the AICR, eating high-fiber plant foods helps to fill you up so you consume less. In addition, the phytochemicals, minerals and vitamins in plant foods have been found to boost the immune system and help ward off cancer, heart disease and stroke. To learn more about the New American Plate, log on to www.aicr.org.

A: When nutrition labeling laws were created in the 1990s, food label serving sizes were established to provide a uniform basis for comparing the nutrients in different products. The serving sizes you see on labels were created based on amounts commonly consumed at one time, as established in major national food surveys in 1987-88 and 1977-78. These serving sizes do not always match the serving sizes used in educational materials, such as the Food Guide Pyramid. For current recommended serving size and nutritional information, use the serving sizes in the Pyramid and Dietary Guidelines for Americans. The Pyramid, for example, recommends eating at least three servings of whole grains every day, in which a serving is defined as one slice whole wheat bread or one-half cup of brown rice. Food labels generally consider a whole grain serving size two slices of bread or one cup of brown rice. If you find your portions substantially larger than label servings, however, you might consider whether label sizes are too small or your own portions too large. You may want to particularly think about this if you find weight control difficult. People who dont eat enough vegetables and fruits also may be prone to taking extra-large servings of other foods to satisfy their hunger. Balanced eating might make it a little easier to avoid portion distortion in your diet.

Q: Does sugar increase cancer risk? A: Too much sugar in your diet may indirectly increase your risk of cancer, but that doesnt mean that you need to avoid it completely. Large amounts of sugar raise blood sugar and thus, insulin levels. Sugar can come in many forms, such as table sugar and high fructose corn syrup, which is used in commercial drinks and sweets. Routinely elevated levels of insulin seem to promote development of colon cancer and perhaps other types, too. The people who may be most affected are those who are overweight, sedentary or those who have insulin resistance and diabetes in the family. Another way that high sugar consumption could increase cancer risk is by leading to weight gain. Excess weight is linked to greater risk of several types of cancer. Overeating sugar that is either refined (table sugar) or unrefined (molasses, honey or brown sugar) has the same effect on weight and insulin levels. Limiting cake, cookies, candy, sweetened cereals and sugar-sweetened soft drinks reduces sugar consumption, cuts excess calories and leaves more room for foods that promote good health.

A: No. Studies have found that adding milk, honey, lemon or sugar does not interfere with the bodys ability to absorb teas healthful compounds, such as flavonoids. These flavonoids are antioxidants that seem to protect against cancer and heart disease. But remember that while tea can be a positive addition to a healthful diet, it cannot compare to the major health-promoting impact of a mostly plant-based diet with a wide variety of vegetables, fruits and whole grains.

A: Unlike red meat, chicken and other types of poultry dont overall seem linked to cancer risk. (Red meat is higher than poultry in a form of iron called heme iron and may lead to more N-nitroso compounds in the colon. Both of these compounds may pose colon cancer risk.) However, poultry that is grilled or fried at high temperatures forms carcinogenic heterocylic amines (HCAs), just as red meat does. For this reason, its a good idea to cook poultry at lower temperatures and perhaps marinate it first. Some research suggests that marinades may decrease HCA formation. Although studies have not linked poultry consumption with increased cancer risk, limiting portions to about three ounces of cooked poultry (four ounces boneless when raw) allows you to leave room for vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans. These foods offer a wide range of vitamins and phytochemicals that actively reduce cancer risk. The American Institute for Cancer Research urges us to follow the New American Plate, which means no more than a third of our plate includes meat, poultry or fish, and at least two-thirds provides health-promoting plant foods.

If you look only at lists of fruits highest in vitamin C or read about the super health-promoting powers of the latest popular fruit, you might wonder if Grandmas advice, An apple a day keeps the doctor away, still merits consideration. Yet as research moves further into the study of the thousands of natural compounds we get from fruits, vegetables, whole grains and other plant foods, apples do shine.Antioxidants are well-established as an important part of how healthful eating can lower our risk of heart disease and cancer, and possibly other conditions that can develop as we age. Antioxidants are frequently discussed in relation to vitamins C and E, and perhaps other plant compounds such as beta-carotene. However, fruits and vegetables also provide flavonoids, a large group of compounds that are all antioxidants.The antioxidant power of flavonoids is one reason that apples are again in the spotlight. Apples contain only modest amounts of vitamin C. A medium apple averages about 6 milligrams of vitamin C, not much compared to the recommended daily intake for adults of 75 to 90 milligrams. But scientists have now calculated the antioxidant power of that apple is equal to more than 1,500 milligrams of vitamin C. The vast majority of its antioxidants come from flavonoids.Antioxidants are key elements in preventing cancer, because they stabilize highly reactive free radicals that can otherwise damage our DNA and begin the process of cancer development. Antioxidants are also considered a key step in heart health because they protect blood vessels. They also keep LDL cholesterol in a less damaging form. Along with antioxidant protection, apples contain pectin, a soluble fiber that helps lower blood cholesterol. Higher blood cholesterol is associated with a greater incidence of heart disease. In the Womens Health Study of about 40,000 U.S. women, researchers analyzed apple consumption and heart health. After controlling for other fruits along with vegetables, fiber and other nutrients, the study found that women who ate at least one apple a day developed 22 percent less heart disease than women who ate no apples.Cancer prevention benefits appear to stem from more than antioxidants, too. Laboratory studies show that apple extracts concentrated apple compounds can reduce growth and reproduction of colon and lung cancer cells. Among more than 77,000 women in the Nurses Health Study, daily apple consumption was linked to 37 percent lower risk of lung cancer, after controlling for smoking and other risk factors. Results of a study from Finland showed that highest flavonoid consumption, of which apples were an important part, was linked with a 20 percent lower risk of cancer overall and a 46 percent lower risk of lung cancer.Many studies have found that increased fruit consumption is linked with lower weight. Studies show that people are most successful at limiting calories when they include foods that contain relatively few calories in relation to their portions. Apples are high in a type of fiber that creates a full sensation. The calories from one medium apple are about equal to one-and-a-half Oreo cookies and are far more filling. (Its important to remember that for overall health, a variety of fruit is a smarter move than sticking with multiple daily servings of apples or any fruit.) Apples go out of season in the Northern Hemisphere by early winter and are often stored so they can be sold throughout the winter. Prolonged storage of fruits and vegetables often means loss of nutritional value, but apples retain virtually all of their flavonoid content for five to six months in cold storage. Processing, however, does lower the amount of flavonoid, so apples themselves contain more antioxidants than apple juice or applesauce. Besides snacking on apples out of hand, try them in green and fruit salads and cooked with vegetables such as carrots, winter squash and sweet potatoes.

The Nielsen Media Research report from Fall 2006 shows that the average American spends 4 hours and 35 minutes watching television per day. Per week, television viewing adds up to more than 30 hours well beyond a part-time job. Other reports show that national and local commercials now total an average of eight minutes of every half-hour show. So the average viewer is watching 40 minutes of commercials a day or more than four-and-a-half hours weekly.Television is not necessarily wasted time as people use it to relax and learn. However, lack of time is one of the most commonly reported reasons that people dont exercise or plan and prepare healthier meals. Perhaps it is worth considering the benefits that the time you spend watching television could bring. If lack of time keeps you from adopting some healthful habits but you arent ready to reduce your television-watching time, you might reconsider the way you spend commercials. There are several different approaches you could take to make use of this gold mine of time.First, you could use commercial times to accomplish those health-supporting tasks you never seem to get done. Many people find that one of the secrets to healthier eating is to plan meals ahead. This allows you to grocery shop more efficiently and avoids the stress that comes when you havent given dinner a thought until a few minutes before you hope to eat. Within an hour of television programming, you could plan close to a weeks worth of meals and perhaps even write the grocery list for a weekly shopping trip.People often say that they would like to save money and eat better by bringing their lunch to work, but that they have no time to make it. Others say they find no time to prepare the fruit theyd like to have with their breakfast. Commercials offer plenty of time to do these tasks. You could also assemble foods for the next days breakfast.What about fitness goals that are never met? In a single commercial break you could do several sets of crunches to tone those ab muscles, other strength-training exercises or stretches to improve your flexibility. Stashing weights or exercise bands near the television allows you to readily start an activity when the commercials start.A second approach is to use commercials to take care of small general tasks that eat up the time youd like to spend going for a walk or attending a fitness class. By using commercials to pay bills, do laundry and sort through mail and e-mails, the average American can accumulate more than four hours of time saved in the course of a week, enough to make a substantial boost in exercise time.Technology offers a third option. If you have a recording technology you can record television shows and fast-forward through the commercials. You can finish four-and-a-half hours of television shows in less than four hours. The trick, however, is to use the extra time to work for you, instead of to watch yet another show.

Boosting vegetable consumption is an important step to lowering cancer risk and promoting overall health, but preparing them in a way that maximizes their nutritional value is important, too. Scientific analysis shows that too much heat and water can cause the loss of some vitamins, minerals and other healthful plant compounds called phytochemicals. The key to retaining vegetables nutrients is to cook them quickly and with little water. Boiling vegetables in a pan of water was long the traditional cooking method. Studies have found that this leads to loss of water-soluble vitamins like vitamin C and folate, an important B vitamin. Now studies show that certain antioxidant cancer-fighting phytochemicals are also lost in cooking water. Broccoli and other cruciferous vegetables, for example, contain antioxidants called glucosinolates. When comparing boiled to steamed broccoli, analysis found that steamed broccoli lost little of the vitamin C it contained when raw and contained more glucosinolates than boiled broccoli.This advantage of steaming rather than boiling vegetables was confirmed in another study with spinach and broccoli. Steaming produced no significant loss of folate, even after 4.5 minutes of steaming spinach and 15 minutes steaming broccoli. Yet when these vegetables were cooked by boiling in water, each lost more than half its folate. Another study showed that zucchini, beans and carrots cooked in a small amount of water were significantly higher in phytochemicals called flavonoids than those cooked in larger amounts of water. In yet another study, cruciferous vegetables, including broccoli, Brussels sprouts and cabbage, lost about 90 percent of their glucosinolates when boiled, but showed no significant loss when steamed, microwaved or stir-fried.The impact of cooking vegetables in a microwave depends upon how it is done. Microwaves offer the advantage of cooking vegetables quickly, often even more quickly than steaming. A quick cooking time minimizes the loss of heat-sensitive vitamins, such as vitamins C and B (including folate). The key is to use the least amount of water required. Broccoli immersed in water while cooking in a microwave lost 74 to 97 percent of its antioxidants in one study. But as long as there is just the minimal amount of water required, studies show no significant loss of vitamins or healthful phytochemicals.Stir-frying is another method of cooking that studies show retains nutrients and protective phytochemicals. Its important to control the amount of oil you use, since many vegetables absorb all the oil, which is a concentrated source of calories. Although stir-frying uses high temperatures, vegetables are chopped into relatively small pieces. This causes them to cook quickly and to minimize the breakdown of heat-sensitive nutrients. Oven roasting is another way to cook vegetables without immersing them in water. Because this involves higher temperatures for longer periods of time often 30 to 40 minutes at 400 degrees vegetables may lose a small amount of some nutrients when compared to other water-free cooking methods. But there is no loss of vitamins or phytochemicals in cooking water. And for many vegetables, including onions, parsnips, winter squash, eggplant, sweet potatoes and onions, the flavor is so enhanced by this cooking method that it makes eating substantial portions a treat.There are plenty of ways you can use minimal cooking water and cooking time, while still retaining vegetables flavor and nutrients. When steaming vegetables, for example, try adding to the water subtle flavors, such as soy sauce or citrus. You can toss steamed orange vegetables with a small amount of honey or maple syrup. For vegetable recipes ideas, visit the American Institute for Cancer Research Web site at www.aicr.org.

Studies keep linking diets high in red meat with increased cancer risk. Could part of the risk from large amounts of meat reflect an unhealthful balance between vegetables and meat? The Mediterranean and Asian eating patterns have a well-established link with lower cancer risk. These diets both limit meat and strongly emphasize an abundance of vegetables. One reason the vegetable-to-meat balance might be so important are compounds in vegetables that act on potentially harmful substances produced by meat. When meat is processed, smoked, grilled, fried or cooked well done, it can lead to the formation of carcinogens that can damage DNA and begin the process of cancer development. Several types of compounds in vegetables (and fruits) stimulate enzymes that convert such carcinogens to inactive forms, which are then excreted from the body. Cruciferous vegetables such as broccoli, cauliflower and cabbage are especially known for compounds called isothiocyanates. These compounds take aim at meat-formed carcinogens. Studies suggest that meat is one of the major causes of colon cancer. Research shows that people who eat about four, half-cup servings of cruciferous vegetables weekly may reduce their risk of colon cancer by 20 to 50 percent. Garlic and onions contain sulfide compounds that can also inactivate meat-formed carcinogens. In a large analysis of several studies, people who ate four to five cloves of garlic a week were 31 percent less likely to develop colon cancer compared to people who ate from zero to one clove per week.Vegetables also provide dietary fiber, which can bind to heterocyclic amines (HCAs), one class of carcinogens produced when meat is cooked at high temperatures. When fiber binds to HCAs, it may prevent HCAs from being absorbed out of the digestive tract. The HCAs are then excreted before they can travel through the body and damage cells.Diets high in meat and low in vegetables may promote inflammation throughout the body. Inflammation can cause an increase in free radicals, which can damage DNA. It can also lead to cells reproducing too quickly, leaving less time to repair possible DNA damage that can lead to cancer. Vegetables provide antioxidant vitamins and protective compounds that prevent and possibly repair DNA damage from free radicals. People who followed a Mediterranean-style diet for two years had blood levels that showed a 40 percent lower level of inflammation than that of a control group. The control group was asked to follow a low-fat diet without the emphasis on such healthful foods as fruits, vegetables and olive oil.Researchers now suggest that one reason red meat is linked to so much more cancer risk than poultry and fish may involve its higher content of a particular form of iron called heme iron. Studies indicate that heme iron may damage the lining of the colon. Some preliminary laboratory studies show that heme iron may interact with estrogen in promoting hormone-related cancers, such as breast and prostate cancers.A diet high in vegetables may help to balance the risks of heme iron. A recent study found that rats given food with added heme iron showed a 50 percent increase in colon cell growth. The amounts fed to the rats are equivalent to humans eating two-and-a-half cups of cooked spinach and five ounces of red meat daily. Follow-up studies showed that chlorophyll the substance in vegetables that makes them green kept heme iron from damaging colon cells and beginning the cancer process. If this comparison to humans is accurate, green vegetables have a reasonable chance to reduce risk from red meat kept to the recommended limit of three ounces or less a day.

Combine ingredients in blender and blend just until pureed. Transfer to a non-stick saucepan. Bring mixture to a boil, then immediately reduce heat to moderate. Cook, stirring frequently, until sauce is slightly syrupy. Check taste and if glaze seems too acidic, stir in slightly more honey. Add salt and pepper to taste, if desired.Drizzle over hot, cooked vegetables and serve immediately, or store, covered, in refrigerator up to 3 days. Reheat and chill glaze before using.Makes about 1 cup or 1 tablespoon serving. Per serving: 12 calories, less than 1 g. total fat (0 g. saturated fat), 2g. carbohydrate, 0 g. protein, 0 g. dietary fiber, 2 mg. sodium.

Whether its rum punch or a glass of wine, plenty of alcohol flows during the holidays, right through midnight on New Years Eve. But taking it easy with the alcohol isnt just a word to wise drivers. Its a good idea for anyone to limit alcohol for good health and lower cancer risk.

Start with a non-alcoholic drink. When you do drink alcohol, choose a wine spritzer (wine mixed with club soda), a low-alcohol beer or a drink that is diluted with fruit juice or soda and ice. Take small sips of any drink so a little lasts a long time.

If you are a host, set filled water glasses next to every plate on the dinner table. Use small glasses to serve wine and other alcohol. Always provide plenty of non-alcoholic choices for your guests. (See recipes, below).

Punches can be a chance to get creative. Mix up a warming drink, like hot apple cider diluted with an equal amount of ginger-flavored tea and spiced cinnamon for "wassail," a word derived from the Norse phrase, "Be in good health."

If making a cold punch, unsweetened frozen and thawed fruits, like strawberries, blueberries, raspberries and cherries are usually packaged with some juice and can be pureed in a blender to use as punch ingredients. Dilute them with other club soda and 100% juice.

Make sure all beverages are cold. Pour grape juice, sparkling apple grape juice, sparkling spring water, orange juice and lemon juice into large punch bowl. Add ice, if desired. Top with lemon slices, orange slices and grapes.

Of all the weight-loss siren songs, none sounds as sweet as the negative-calorie diet. Negative-calorie diets claim that certain foods burn more calories than they contribute, so eating in and of itself results in a smaller waistline. The quest for a food that will whisk away calories has prompted many people to consume large quantities of cabbage soup or grapefruits as they wait for the pounds to magically disappear.

Despite nutritionists assertions that there is no such thing as a negative-calorie diet and that the only path to sustained weight loss is eating healthy, well-balanced meals and exercising, beverage manufacturers are stoking couch potatoes hopes by introducing calorie-burning drinks. At the very least, the beverages should taste better than cabbage soup but can you really drink away the weight?

PepsiCo Inc. soon will be launching another competitor for this market called Tava. Pepsis new sparkling fruit drink contains vitamins and the mineral chromium, which has been tied to metabolic enhancement and weight loss. The company is positioning the zero-calorie, caffeine-free Tava as an adult soft drink. We want to give consumers the bubbles they love in a healthier way, Dawn Hudson, chief executive of Pepsi-Cola North America, said in a Marketwatch.com article.

Product for SuckersPart of the motivation behind the bevy of new beverages is the movement toward more healthful thirst quenchers and away from high-calorie, sugary sodasincluding in schools. A new school vending policy calls for beverage companies to sell only low-fat and nonfat milk, water, and unsweetened juice in elementary and middle schools by the 2009-2010 school year. The companies can sell fitness waters, diet and unsweetened teas, diet sodas, sports drinks, and light juice drinks in high schools.

Other nutritionists warn that people might think that eating so-called negative-calorie foods enables them to consume greater quantities of the products because such foods dont count. Instead of imbibing one of the new calorie-burning beverages, health professionals say you can get the antioxidant benefits of green tea byyou guessed itdrinking green tea. And you can cut the 100 or so calories the drinks claim to burn by simply skipping one cookie.

Not all sweets are created equal. If you are going to nibble on dessert or rich snacks this holiday season, concentrate on those that provide at least some health benefits. Many ingredients in sweets contain plant substances that are known to lower the risk of cancer, heart and other chronic diseases. Of course, the amount you would need to eat for true health benefits is generally outweighed by fats and sugars, but in moderation there are some treats you can feel good about.

Gingerbread cookies: Fresh ginger contains gingerol, a substance studies have shown has antioxidant properties. Laboratory studies have found gingerol may help destroy cancer cells and block the action of compounds that lead to inflammation, which might lead to higher cancer risk. Gingerol is also used for treating nausea and other digestive troubles.When ginger is dried, the gingerol breaks down and the compounds shogaols and zingerone form. Preliminary research suggests that these compounds may also have antioxidant properties. If you purchase prepared gingerbread or cookies, make sure the ingredients list ginger as opposed to ginger flavoring. To see some inspirational gingerbread houses, take a look at contest winners.Fruitcake: This holiday perennial has garnered a bad rap for use as a possible doorstop over the years. But, along with loads of sugar, fruitcake can also contain a wide assortment of fruits. The traditional fruitcake features the preserved rind of citron, a bumpy, yellow-colored fruit. With or without citron, if you make your own, you can combine a potpourri of colorful fruits - such as cranberries, cherries, figs, and pineapple - to make a fruitcake rich with antioxidants and fiber. Cranberries, for example, are packed with antioxidants. In the laboratory, extracts from cranberries were found to stop breast cancer cells from multiplying. Sugar plums: Originally these Christmas sweets may have featured bits of sugared plums, but modern recipes include a variety of fruits. Figs, for example, are a common main ingredient in many recipes. Figs are a rich source of fiber, along with potassium, iron and calcium. They contain the highest mineral content of any common fruit.

If you are a pie person, try some unique pie fillings, such as butternut, squash, rhubarb, or banana. (Look for a pie crust recipe that is low-fat, such as the New American Plate Pie Crust.)With dark melted chocolate at hand, you can dip any number of fruits, such as figs, dried peaches, bananas, and oranges.

Studies done in laboratories have long suggested a link between more vitamin D and less cancer risk. What's new is a series of observational studies (case control and cohort studies) that suggest this link in regard to colorectal, pancreatic and perhaps prostate cancers. And in April 2006 two studies were reported that suggest a similar link to breast cancer.

Most scientists consider agreement between laboratory studies and observational studies as strong evidence. So it's likely they will be taking a more serious look at the ability of vitamin D to prevent cancer. Until they draw their conclusion, it won't hurt to think about how much vitamin D you may be getting, especially since it is also believed to prevent a score of other problems ranging from rickets to hip fracture and Alzheimer's disease.

The Institute of Medicine has not set an RDA (Recommended Daily Allowance) for vitamin D, largely because it hasnt had sufficient evidence to do so. Instead it set "Adequate Intake" which varies by age. The new studies linking vitamin D to reduced cancer risk suggest 1000 IU per day as effective dosage.

Dining on Vitamin DThese people have to rely on their diet to supply Vitamin D. Fatty fish, eggs, and liver are some of the best sources. After that, you need to look for foods fortified with vitamin D. Milk, margarine and dry cereals are the most common.

For many, this chart is a little discouraging. We aren't going to eat enough of these particular foods to achieve daily intake of 1000 IU. That's why the Office of Dietary Supplements at the National Institutes of Health suggests some Americans may need a dietary supplement to meet their need for Vitamin D. If you go that route, remember to calculate how much vitamin D you are already getting from your diet and a multivitamin pill (probably 400 IU) and then find a vitamin pill that brings you up to the desired intake. Avoid overdosing by keeping your intake of vitamin D under 2000 IU.

Its not as if red wine needs more PR. It doesnt lack for admirers, after all: Americans sniff it, swirl it, sip it and savor it in greater volume than ever before. A decade ago, the US went through about 44 million cases of red wine per year. Last year, we drank about 103 million.

Here We Go AgainHeadlines have linked red wine and resveratrol with health benefits for years. In 1991 a 60 Minutes story on the French Paradox (noting the low rates of heart disease in a country known for its fondness for rich food and red wine) touched off a 44 percent increase in sales of vin rouge here in the U.S.

The study, which subsequently appeared in the November 15 issue of Nature, showed that supplementing mouse diets with resveratrol produced a variety of positive metabolic changes that helped the critters fend off the toll that obesity usually takes on the body. The mice were fat, but oddly healthy.

This was followed, two weeks later, with another Post report (this time on page 3) that resveratrol also protected mice against diabetes and boosted physical endurance. That study will be published on December 15 in the journal Cell.

But these are only the latest findings. In laboratories (and a few clinics) around the world, resveratrol has displayed potent anti-inflammatory and antioxidant effects against a variety of risk factors associated with heart disease, stroke and cancer.

Resveratrol Supplements: Open QuestionsOf course, those studies tend to examine isolated resveratrol, not red wine. The scientific results with these pills and powders are indeed promising, but dont really merit running to the health food store to stock up on supplements, much less installing a wine cellar.

Take this months Cell study. For humans to get the same amount of resveratrol that proved effective in that mouse study, theyd have to take hundreds of pills or drink thousands of glasses of wine every day.

When it comes to resveratrol supplements, we simply havent determined how much is safe for humans. Is there only a specific amount the body can absorb? Is there an upper limit after which resveratrol becomes toxic? These questions have yet to be answered.

Medicinal Merlot? Not So Fast. Dont kid yourself: red wine is no health food. Remember, the resveratrol in your Rioja shares that glass with something else. Every sip also brings a dose of alcohol, usually about 8 to 12 percent by volume. And thats where things get tricky. Well, trickier.Some population studies suggest that drinking a little red wine (thats just one or two glasses a day) offers protection against heart disease. The laboratory science would seem to suggest that resveratrol is one important reason. But many epidemiologists and heart researchers believe its the alcohol itself thats protective in small doses.

Whatever the reason, the association between low to moderate alcohol consumption and cardiovascular health does show up fairly consistently in the scientific literature. Moderate drinking seems to influence heart health by boosting HDL (good) cholesterol levels and lowering blood pressure.

Alcohol and Cancer: No LoopholesTheres no way around it: alcohol itself is a pro-inflammatory, pro-oxidant substance. Sensitive tissues that are repeatedly exposed to it, like those lining the mouth and throat, can get damaged in ways that spark the cancer process.

The breast cancer link is particularly troubling and consistent, although its precise nature remains unclear. We do know that a mans body has more muscle and less fat than a womans, so its easier for him to dilute and metabolize the alcohol he drinks.

Q: Is natural peanut butter a better choice than regular brands? A: In general, regular peanut butter contains hydrogenated oil to prevent the natural peanut oil from separating. Some people are concerned if they see hydrogenated oil listed among the ingredients, but only a trace amount is used. Check the trans fat content listed on the label; its usually zero. Although regular peanut butter also contains a small amount of sugar, the difference between 1 gram per serving in natural peanut butter and 3 grams in standard versions equals about a half-teaspoon of sugar. This difference is unlikely to be nutritionally significant. If the natural peanut butter contains no salt, the choice will save about 120 milligrams of sodium, but even that is not a huge cut. Natural peanut butter offers the chance to avoid salt and sugar we dont need, but other food choices you make have a much larger impact.

Does a daily weight check help or hurt weight control efforts? Studies show that people who successfully avoid weight gain (or regain) are more likely to weigh themselves regularly. Before you assume that this is your key to weight control, however, consider how you will use the information you get from weight checks. The bottom line seems to be that weight checks help some people, but not everyone.In one study of 1,800 adults trying to lose weight, those who weighed themselves daily lost more weight after two years than those who weighed themselves less frequently. In the National Weight Control Registry, which follows people who have successfully lost weight and maintained their loss for at least a year, most monitor their weight regularly. According to one report, 44 percent of those in the registry report weighing themselves at least once a day, and 31 percent report checking their weight at least once a week. As for those who are currently at a healthy weight and want to avoid midlife adult weight gain, a study of more than 1,200 adults showed that those who checked their weight more often gained less weight. None of these studies, however, prove whether people who check weight more often are already more vigilant about behaviors affecting their weight or whether these weight checks keep people more aware of their weight and lifestyle. Recent evidence does suggest frequent weight checks influence behaviors. Weight checks allow you to catch small gains before they become large ones. That can lead to cutting back on portions and high-calorie foods or adding an extra 15 minutes of daily exercise. Data from the National Weight Control Registry suggests that people are more likely to stop and reverse small weight gains than large ones. In a new study in the New England Journal of Medicine, people who lost weight maintained their loss better by checking weight daily and changing eating or exercise anytime weight changed by more than three pounds.A ten-year study from Finland suggests that daily weight checks can provide additional benefit for those who keep a long-term record of the figures. Seeing patterns of days, situations, or times of year when weight was likely to increase helped participants identify ways to prevent gains before they occurred.Problems arise when weight checks cause people to become so frustrated and upset that they give up or binge-eat. Behavioral change experts often recommend people keep records of specific behaviors they want to change instead of, or in addition to, monitoring weight. These behaviors can include walking for longer distances and eating smaller portions and more vegetables. In one study of a behavioral weight-loss program, those who kept track of physical activity exercised more and lost more weight.Daily or weekly weight checks are clearly not essential to weight control. Even in studies where weight checks were associated with weight loss, only 20 to 44 percent of successful weight loss maintainers weighed themselves daily; 25 percent did not weigh themselves weekly. If you think that watching your weight closely might help, reasonable expectations are importantdont expect weight loss every day. Make sure you use the weight figures not to scold yourself, but as a tool to develop action plans for developing a healthy lifestyle you can follow for life.

In large frying pan, cook the pumpkin over medium-high heat, stirring often so all pumpkin comes in contact with pan, and until pumpkin is reduced to 1 3/4 cups, about 5-10 minutes. Turn pumpkin into large bowl and let cool slightly.

Add milk, sugar, egg, egg white, cinnamon, salt, nutmeg and allspice. Mix well until sugar dissolves and the mixture is well blended. Sprinkle flour mixture evenly over bottom of pie shell. (This helps prevent the shell from becoming soggy and adds flavor as well.) Pour filling into pie crust and bake 15 minutes. Reduce heat to 325 degrees and bake 30 minutes more or until filling is set. If edges of pie crust brown too quickly, use strips of foil as loose cover. The pie filling is done when filling looks set and knife inserted comes out clean. Set on rack and cool completely before serving.

In a large mixing bowl, combine the mixed greens and endive. Place the beets in another bowl. In a small bowl, whisk together the lemon juice, vinegar and oil. Season to taste with salt and pepper.Toss the beets with just enough dressing to coat them, about 2 teaspoons. Add the remaining dressing to the greens, tossing gently just until coated. Divide greens among 6 salad plates. Top each with some of the beets and a sprinkling of blue cheese. Serve. Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 172 calories, 14 g. total fat (4 g. saturated fat), 7 g. carbohydrate, 5 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 241 mg. sodium.

Preheat oven to 450 degrees. Lightly coat large baking sheet with cooking spray. Prepare dressing in small bowl by whisking together oil, vinegar, orange juice, zest, salt and pepper. Arrange carrot, beets, leek, sweet potato and onion in single layer on baking sheet. Sprinkle with tarragon. Drizzle 112 tablespoons of dressing over vegetables. Bake 30-35 minutes, stirring occasionally. While vegetables are roasting, in fine mesh sieve, rinse quinoa well under cold running water; drain. In saucepan, place quinoa and 1 cup water; bring to boil. Reduce heat to low and cook, covered, 12-15 minutes or until water is absorbed and quinoa is translucent. Transfer to bowl and let cool. When vegetables are tender, remove from oven and let cool to room temperature. Add vegetables to quinoa. Toss with remaining dressing. If not serving right away, cover salad with plastic wrap and refrigerate. Serve warm or at room temperature.Makes 8 1/2-cup servings. Per serving: 101 calories, 3 g total fat (<1 g saturated fat), 16 g carbohydrates, 2 g protein, 2 g dietary fiber, 27 mg sodium.

Preheat the oven to 350 degrees. Coat an 8-inch x 8-inch square baking dish with cooking spray and set aside.Cut the onions so they are in bite-size, manageable lengths for eating with a fork. Place them in a mixing bowl. Add the oregano, allspice, salt, pepper and vinegar. Toss, using a fork or your fingers, until the onions are evenly coated. Add the oil and toss again. Arrange the onions in the prepared baking dish. Pour in the broth. Cover the pan with foil.Bake the onions 60 minutes. Uncover and sprinkle with the sugar. Bake 30 minutes longer, or until the onions are soft and browned, and most of the liquid has evaporated. Cool completely.Serve with roasted or grilled meats and poultry, or with fish. These onions keep, tightly covered in the refrigerator, for up to 5 days.Makes 3 cups or 6 servings. Per serving: 72 calories, 2 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 12 g. carbohydrate, 1 g. protein, 2 g. dietary fiber, 243 mg. sodium.

After many years of study, researchers now say that sodium may influence the blood pressure and heart health of some people more than others. Meanwhile, research has raised questions about how sodium consumption may affect two other serious health concerns: stomach cancer and osteoporosis.Increases in sodium consumption tend to raise blood pressure directly without an apparent threshold, according to a report of the 2005 Dietary Guidelines Advisory Committee. These experts recommended we limit dietary sodium to no more than 2,300 milligrams (mg) a day. However, they also noted that some people seem to be much more sensitive to sodiums effect on blood-pressure. People with hypertension, blacks, and middle-aged and older adults are encouraged to limit sodium to 1,500 mg or less per day. Many Americans need to make dietary changes in their sodium intake. Using data from 2001-2002, the National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey found that Americans on average consumed approximately 3,300 mg of sodium daily. Virtually everyone (97 percent of the population) consumed more than 1,500 mg daily. Cooking and table salt account for only 5 to 10 percent of the average Americans sodium consumption. In order to bring most of us to target levels, we need to reduce the sodium from processed foods, either choosing low-sodium versions or using less processed food.The questions of how much to reduce sodium to control or prevent high blood pressure relates to the level of potassium in our diets. In general, researchers agree that high potassium intake lowers the risk of high blood pressure. In studies of the DASH diet (Dietary Alternatives to Stop Hypertension), for example, when people raised potassium consumption (along with other healthful plant compounds) by including 7 to 10 servings of fruits and vegetables every day and a serving of nuts, seeds or legumes most days, blood pressure was much less affected by sodium intake. The potassium goals set in the DASH diet, 4,700 mg per day, is the current recommendations for adults. Only 10 percent of men and 1 percent of women meet this goal. Some researchers suggest that recommendations to limit sodium should focus on people that it affects most strongly, with the emphasis for most people on increasing potassium. Research also suggests that reaching and maintaining a healthy weight may be at least as important to blood pressure control as sodium intake.Will limiting sodium reduce risk of stomach cancer? Population studies around the world clearly link stomach cancer with high sodium consumption, usually associated with salt-preserved meats and fish. In recent years, studies have identified the bacteria Helicobacter pylori as a likely cause of many cases of stomach cancer. If limiting sodium does reduce stomach cancer risk, some suggest that moderate reduction might be enough. Researchers are also looking at sodiums possible association with osteoporosis, bone-thinning that dramatically raises risk of fractures. Studies have found that high sodium consumption increases calcium excretion in urine, which may cause blood levels of calcium to drop. Among other functions, calcium forms and maintains bone strength. If calcium levels become too low the body may pull the mineral from bones to maintain a safe calcium blood level. However, research suggests that urinary calcium loss could also be related to how little potassium we consume. When diets contain the recommended level of potassium, sodium reportedly has less impact on urinary calcium loss. The bottom line: a plant-based diet high in fruits and vegetables and low in high-sodium processed foods may reduce risk of high blood pressure, osteoporosis and stomach cancer, whether due to reduced sodium or other influences. Add weight control and youve got a picture of good nutrition.

Considering all the past concern about possible health risks from drinking coffee, newer reports of coffees possible protective effects may leave many people confused. Overall, recent studies suggest that coffee (regular and decaffeinated) may offer a variety of health benefits against diseases such as cancer and diabetes. However, coffee may not deserve a place in the same category with other healthful foods like vegetables, fruits and whole grains.Laboratory studies suggest that the anti-inflammatory, antioxidant compounds in coffee could help reduce risk of cancer. Coffee also has a tendency to speed the passage of waste through the digestive tract. Potentially, this may lessen the time that cancer-causing compounds spend in contact with the intestinal tract, which could reduce the risk of colon cancer. Population studies, however, tend to split between coffee intake having no effect on or reducing risk of breast and colon cancer.The case for coffees ability to protect against diabetes is strengthened by several recent studies. In the Iowa Womens Health Study, more than 28,000 women were followed for 11 years. The women who drank four or more cups of coffee daily were about 20 percent less likely to develop diabetes. That became a 30 to 40 percent drop among those who drank decaf coffee. A study in Finland linked consumption of three to six cups of coffee per day with a 25 percent lower risk of diabetes. In both studies, benefits were seen after adjusting for other diabetes risks, such as weight, diet, and activity level. Several studies now link moderate coffee consumption with lower risk of Type 2 diabetes. Researchers are working to understand the potential advantage of decaf versus regular coffee and how weight control is involved.Potential increased risk of high blood pressure and heart disease has been one of the long-standing concerns about coffee. Recent studies confirm that caffeine can raise blood pressure, but this effect is observed with soft drinks, not coffee. Laboratory studies suggest that perhaps coffees healthful compounds can counterbalance the blood-pressure raising effects of caffeine. In the Iowa Womens Health Study noted above, four to five cups of coffee a day were linked with a 19 percent lower risk of heart-related death. Other studies have found no effect of coffee consumption on heart disease risk. But people should follow their doctors advice.Coffee does warrant some cautions, however. Both regular and decaf coffee relax the muscle that keeps stomach acids from rising into the throat, so those with heartburn or reflux disease (GERD) are encouraged to avoid or strictly limit coffee. People with trouble sleeping should limit or avoid caffeinated coffee. Studies now suggest it is unnecessary for pregnant women to completely avoid caffeinated coffee. Until the impact of caffeine is more clearly understood, however, many experts suggest that pregnant women limit their daily caffeine from coffee, soft drinks and other sources to about 300 mg, the equivalent of three cups of regular coffee.Its exciting that something as simple as drinking coffee might help lower our risk of cancer, diabetes and heart disease. However, while brewed coffee (not instant) is a concentrated source of antioxidants, it cant be a substitute for berries, legumes, nuts, and other fruits and vegetables that provide antioxidants along with a wide range of vitamins, protective compounds and dietary fiber.

Preheat the oven to 400 degrees. Coat 4 cups in a muffin tin with 3-inch cavities with cooking spray, and set aside.Cut the crusts off the bread, making each slice square. With a rolling pin, press the bread gently to flatten it slightly. Press the bread into the muffin cups, with the points sticking up. One at a time, break the eggs into a small bowl, then slip them into the bread cups. Sprinkle tops lightly with salt and pepper. Cut four thin slices from the center of the tomato, reserving the rest for another use. Cover the yolk of each egg with a tomato slice. Sprinkle on the cheese.Set the muffin tin on the oven rack. Fill empty muffin cavities halfway with water, which will ensure even baking. Bake for about 15 minutes, then begin checking eggs every minute or so until yolk is cooked through or the desired level of doneness is achieved. Remove from the oven. Run a thin knife around the outside of each baked egg. Lift with forks or spoons and transfer to individual plates or small bowls. Serve immediately.

One of the bonuses of summer camp for children is making a variety of new friends which can later lead to some memorable invitations and experiences, especially during long holiday breaks from school. As a city girl, my most unusual holiday invitation took me to Wisconsin to stay with Betty, one of my junior counselors, on her familys dairy farm. It was below zero when we went out with her brothers, a gas-powered saw and a sled to cut down a Christmas tree and drag it home. The tree decorations included yards of cranberries and popcorn that we strung by hand, and whole walnuts that we jammed wire into and dipped in gold paint. While we worked, Bettys mother served us a special type of chocolate cake, which she called snacking cake because it is a perfect snack to eat out of hand anytime. Some of its unusual features are that it is easy to make, contains no butter, milk, or eggs and yet this cake has the rich, dense flavor of an old-fashioned chocolate cake. There is also a hidden health plus in this dessert. Some of the flour is whole-wheat rather than refined, which gives the cake some important health benefits. Only whole-grain wheat flour contains the bran and germ, which is where most of the fiber and protective cancer-fighting substances are found. Although it is difficult to create a cake that is both delectable and made only with whole-wheat flour, a small proportion can replace some of the refined flour called for in most recipes without adversely affecting a cakes taste or texture. This cake is moist and flavorful enough to go without frosting, although a dollop of frozen yogurt or a whipped topping wouldnt go amiss.

Because I live in New York City, I love escaping to the country or the shore at any time of year. Walking on a snowy beach is as much a treat as basking on a sun-baked one. If it is too cold to stay out for long, gazing at the snow-covered landscape while sitting indoors by a crackling fire is great, too. Mostly, I am blessed to be a house-guest, enjoying the fresh air and quiet without the responsibilities of owning or even renting a weekend place. But being a house-guest has downsides, too. One is having little control over what you get to eat. My friends typically prepare excellent food, since most of them are food lovers. But I have had to develop a clever ploy to make sure that every day I can get a good amount of vegetables, some whole grains and enough fiber. My secret is a repertoire of quick-to-cook soups. Most people are happy when a guest prepares one dish for a meal, and what host can complain if you want to use just one pot and hang out in the kitchen for an hour or less? I accompany them to their supermarket, which is enjoyable since it is almost always more enticing than the overcrowded, over-priced versions in the city. I grab a few packages of ready-to-use veggies like diced butternut squash, broccoli florets, and sliced mushrooms and a package or two of fresh herbs. (The dried ones found in most kitchens have lost their flavor, and fresh herbs are so packed with phytonutrients that they are worth the cost.) I also buy a can of beans and a loaf of crusty whole-grain bread. Back in the kitchen, I can make my soup in less time than most hosts spend fixing burgers on the grill and adding their embellishments. To be a model guest, I sometimes offer to make a salad and shoo them out of the kitchen entirely. Or we simply pick up a healthful pizza at the best joint in town, knowing that with my soup accompanying it, we will eat well in every sense.By adding this easy-to-make soup to a take-out dinner, you can also eat healthy, especially if you buy squash that has already been peeled and diced.

In a medium saucepan, combine the milk and water. Stir in the oat bran and salt. Set the pan over medium-high heat and cook, stirring occasionally, until the mixture comes to a boil. Reduce the heat to medium and cook, stirring often, until the porridge is thick and creamy and the bran is tender, 8-10 minutes. Mix in the blueberries and cinnamon. Divide the porridge between two bowls.

Pick over peas, place in a saucepan and cover with cold water by 2 inches. Bring water to a boil and boil peas 2 minutes. Remove pan from heat. Soak peas 1 hour and drain.In a heavy kettle, heat 1 tablespoon oil over moderate heat until hot Add onion and garlic and cook, stirring occasionally, until onion softens. Add mushrooms and thyme and cook, stirring, until mushrooms are tender and liquid evaporates. Transfer mixture to a bowl.Cut chicken into bite-sized pieces. Season with salt and pepper. Heat remaining tablespoon of oil in kettle and cook chicken, stirring, until browned. Sprinkle flour over chicken, stirring, to coat. Add broth and bring to boil. Stir in peas and mushroom mixture. Simmer, covered, about 20 minutes or until peas are tender.While mixture is cooking, cut spinach leaves into thin strips. When peas in simmering mixture are tender, stir spinach into the chicken mixture. Gradually blend in mustard to taste. Simmer gently, stirring, 2 minutes,or just until spinach is tender. (Be careful to not overcook.) Add salt and pepper to taste.Makes 8 servings. Per serving: 232 calories, 5 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 19 g. carbohydrate, 28 g. protein, 6 g. dietary fiber, 286 mg. sodium.

Whisk together lime juice, oil and mustard in a small bowl.Place arugula and pears in a salad bowl. Toss with just enough dressing to coat. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Sprinkle with feta and pecans (if using), and pomegranate seeds, and serve. For a festive presentation, line salad plates with lettuce leaves and mound a serving of the salad in the center of each.

Heat oil in a pan over medium heat until hot. Add onions, garlic and bell pepper and saut? until onion is translucent. Add wine and simmer until vegetables are softened and liquid has almost completely evaporated. Add salt and pepper to taste and remove from heat.In a large bowl, beat egg whites lightly with a fork. Add kasha and mix in to coat grains evenly. Transfer kasha to a deep, nonstick pot with a lid and cook over medium heat. Toast kasha, stirring frequently and breaking up lumps, until the grains are dry and light brown.Meanwhile, bring the broth to a boil. When kasha is toasted, slowly add the hot broth, reduce heat, cover and simmer 10 to 15 minutes or until liquid is absorbed. Stir in the vegetable mixture during the final few minutes of cooking.Adjust seasoning to taste and serve with yogurt if desired.Makes 10 servings. Per serving: 174 calories, 4 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 30 g. carbohydrate, 6 g. protein, 4 g. dietary fiber, 232 mg. sodium.

In large pot, place 2.5 cups water with oil and bring to boil. Add brown rice. Cover, reduce heat and cook according to package directions. In large bowl, use fork to lightly combine rice, dates, orange rind, nuts, pepper, scallion, salt, cinnamon, parsley and mint. Drizzle with juice squeezed from lime wedge. Mix lightly with fork. Serve with poultry or steamed vegetables.

Put dried fruits and raisins in small bowl. Add hot water to cover, and let soak for 5-10 minutes, then drain. In large saucepan, cook rice with fruits, parsley and zest in broth per package instructions. Remove pilaf from heat and gently toss with fork before serving.

In a large, nonstick skillet, heat the butter or oil over medium high heat. Stir in cabbage and onion until coated with butter. Cook, stirring often, until cabbage is wilted and onion is limp, about 15 minutes. Stir in apple, cumin, rosemary, allspice and salt. Add juice. Cover tightly and simmer over medium heat until cabbage is soft, 35-40 minutes, reducing heat, if necessary. Cool to room temperature. Reheat before serving.

In medium skillet, heat 1 tsp. of olive oil over medium-high heat. Add shallots and saute for 1 minute. Add garlic and saute for 30 seconds. Stir in greens, add broth and sprinkle with salt and pepper. Cover and reduce heat to low. Cook for 10 minutes, or until greens are bright in color and tender.

While greens cook, in small non-stick skillet over medium heat, cook turkey bacon in remaining 1 tsp. of olive oil until crisp and golden, about 3 minutes, stirring frequently. When greens are done, stir in turkey bacon and pan drippings. Adjust seasonings to taste and serve immediately.

In Dutch oven or large, heavy pan, combine grape juice, sugar, cinnamon cumin, cloves and bay leaf. Bring to boil over medium-high heat. Add apple, onion, orange, cranberries and currants. Return to boil; reduce heat and simmer uncovered, stirring occasionally, for about 30 minutes, until cranberries are soft. Remove bay leaf. Spoon chutney into sterilized glass jars. Cover immediately with 2-part canning tops, cool and refrigerate. Or store in plastic container in refrigerator and use within 1-2 weeks.

Heat large, non-stick pan over medium-high heat until very hot. Place 1 tbsp. oil in pan and heat until very hot. Add onion and garlic and saut? until onion is translucent and mixture is golden. Add 4 1/2 cups broth and bring mixture to boil. Add wild rice, reduce heat to simmer, cover pot, and simmer 25 minutes. Add brown rice and remaining 3 3/4 cups broth to pot. Bring mixture to boil and immediately reduce heat to simmer. Cover pot and continue cooking until both wild and brown rice are barely tender, about 35 to 40 minutes.

When rice is barely tender, mix in parsley, sage, green onion and nuts. Cover and cook on low heat about 5 minutes longer, or until green onion is soft and rice is tender. Remove pot from heat, uncover and allow rice to cool slightly. Add mushrooms and stir until well combined. Add salt and pepper to taste and more sage, if desired. Serve immediately or store, tightly covered, in refrigerator for up to 2 days.

Spray large skillet with canola oil cooking spray. Heat skillet over medium heat. Saute onion and celery until tender, about 5 minutes. Add brown rice, and saute for 5 minutes. Add water, broth, raisins and apricots; heat to boiling. Reduce heat to low, cover and simmer until rice is tender and liquid is absorbed, about 50 minutes. Stir in walnuts if desired, sage, salt and pepper. Transfer to serving dish. Garnish with fresh sage and serve immediately.

Cook Brussels sprouts according to package directions. Meanwhile, in small bowl, stir together oil, vinegar, pecans and cranberries. Transfer cooked sprouts to serving dish. Gently toss with dressing. Season with salt and pepper and serve immediately.

When cool enough to handle, stand the ear with its broad end down on a cutting board. Using a sharp knife, slice down the ear to cut off kernels. Rotate the ear and repeat until all the kernels are cut off. Gather up the cut kernels and set aside, or refrigerate in a closed container for up to 24 hours.

In large skillet, heat oil over low heat. Add onion, thyme, salt and pepper. Cook covered, stirring occasionally, until onion begins to brown, about 5 minutes. Remove lid and continue cooking, stirring occasionally, about 15 minutes more. Add vinegar and sugar to onions.

In large pot, place steamer filled with potatoes and turnips. Add 2 cups water, cover and bring to boil. Steam until tender, about 15 minutes. Meanwhile, in small skillet, saut? onion and parsley over medium heat in oil for 5 minutes. In large bowl, place tender potatoes and turnips and mash with large fork. Stir in onion, parsley and oil from pan. Season mixture to taste with salt and pepper. Lightly coat baking dish with oil spray and add potato mixture, pressing down evenly. Top with cheese and broil for 2-3 minutes or until cheese is bubbly and lightly browned.

Many adults have heard of antioxidants, but most are uncertain about whether they really reduce our risk of cancer and where to get them. Research still needs to answer many questions, but recent studies provide evidence that contradicts old theories. Antioxidants stabilize highly reactive molecules known as free radicals. The body produces free radicals as part of its normal activity. They also derive from exposure to environmental factors, including tobacco, radiation and pollution. Free radicals are unstable and can create damage to our cells DNA that may lead to cancer and other health disorders.Substantial laboratory evidence shows antioxidants may slow or possibly prevent the development of cancer. Studies of large populations usually show that people with diets high in foods that supply antioxidants develop less cancer than those whose diets focus on foods relatively low in antioxidants, such as meat, sweets and other refined carbohydrates. However, large-scale tests of individual antioxidant nutrients often show no effect on cancer risk or even increased risk among certain people.Antioxidants are available in the form of nutrientsvitamins and mineralsand natural plant compounds called phytochemicals. We used to focus on a few antioxidant nutrientsvitamins C and E, beta-carotene and selenium. Studies now show phytochemicals in a variety of plant foods supply most of the antioxidants we consume. Researchers say that this may help explain why adding just one or a few antioxidants in supplements does not produce the cancer protection seen in people eating a plant-based diet loaded with different phytochemicals.Also, individual antioxidant nutrients are usually supplied in supplements in a single chemical form, even though several slightly different forms are found in food. Alpha-tocopherol is the form of vitamin E researchers have studied most, and it is the form used in most supplements. New research from East Tennessee State University demonstrates potential cancer protection from the form of vitamin E called gamma-tocopherol that is more widely contained in foods and usually absent from supplements. Antioxidant nutrients and phytochemicals may provide more protection when they work together, according to several studies. In one study of about 250 men, genetic differences strongly influenced whether the antioxidant lycopene protected against prostate cancer. The researchers found that men who consumed greater amounts of foods high in lycopene showed a 41 to 79 percent reduced risk of prostate cancer. Yet men who increased lycopene consumption and also ate the most foods high in beta-carotene and vitamin E had an even greater risk reduction. It might seem more antioxidants will provide more protection, but research does not support this view. In a French study, low-dose antioxidant supplements showed the most benefit for those who began with the lowest antioxidant levels. Researchers are now trying to determine at what point adding antioxidants to a poor diet crosses the line between reducing cancer risk and being ineffective. Some studies show that in very high amounts, antioxidants can even have completely opposite effects. These studies focus on people who take extremely high amounts of supplements; there is no evidence eating any amount of fruits and vegetables provide an unhealthy level of antioxidants. As important as they seem to be, antioxidants are not a complete answer for cancer protection. Studies show a healthy weight, regular exercise, dietary fiber, omega-3 fat and numerous plant compounds can all lower cancer risk through paths that have nothing to do with free radicals.Foods that supply a wide range of antioxidants include vegetables, fruits, whole grains, beans, nuts and seeds. Since research now suggests many different antioxidants working together provide the most protection, aim for a diet that includes a variety of all these foods.

Whats round and orange with green on top? If it hasnt been smashed by the neighborhood hooligans, its that Halloween pumpkin that graced the doorstep a few weeks ago. Had you been living in a country with high starvation rates, someone probably would have stolen it for nourishment instead of smashing it. Thats because pumpkins and so many other kinds of winter squash are full of vitamin A.

The vitamin A that we get from orange-colored sweet potatoes, carrots, mangoes and apricots benefits more than our eyesight. Vitamin A may help prevent and repair damage to our bodys cells because it is an antioxidant.

The ox- in antioxidant is related to the word oxygen. Oxidation is caused by oxygen molecules called free radicals. Although they sometimes defend us against potentially harmful bacteria, free radicals are unstable little creatures because they possess unpaired electrons. To achieve stability, a free radical scavenges electrons from other molecules, and creates more instability, possibly setting the stage for cancer development.

Vitamin A becomes something called beta-carotene after youve eaten it. You can think of it as beta-carrot-ene, since the orange color of carrots and squash signal its presence (although perfectly green vegetables, like broccoli and cabbage, are also rich in beta-carotene.) Because it is a fat-soluble vitamin, beta-carotene is absorbed from foods best when it is eaten with a moderate amount of a healthful fat, such as olive oil. Although it is an essential vitamin, taking too much, especially in supplement pills, may cause toxic side-effects.

Pumpkins, squash, carrots and sweet potatoes are all delectable either in savory foods like soups or desserts like puddings and pies. Here is a wonderful, easy recipe that combines squash and apples (a concentrated source of cancer-fighting phytochemicals called flavonoids). Besides beta-carotene, the squash contains vitamin C, potassium, iron, riboflavin and dietary fiber. Cooked together, their rich flavors and compatible textures blend well in a terrific side dish for poultry.

Note: This puree may be adapted to a soup by omitting the bread crumbs; placing puree in large soup pot after blending, mixing in 2 cans (15 oz. each) fat-free, reduced sodium chicken broth, and heating through (skip the final baking step).

E. coli in spinach, botulism in carrot juice, tainted lettuce, salmonella scareswhats a health-conscious fruits and vegetable lover to do? If headlines of food-borne organisms have caused you to shy away from fresh fruits and vegetables, you need not give up on the many cancer-preventive nutrients in produce.

Look for locally grown produce for the greatest likelihood of freshness. A general rule of thumb is that the richer the color of the fruit or vegetable, the more nutrients and phytochemicals it contains. For example, beta-carotene is an antioxidant that provides carrots with its orange color. Thus, deep orange carrots will contain more beta-carotene than a pale ones.

The fresh veggies and fruit at your grocery store may have traveled for thousands of miles and for many a day before settling on your plate. In some cases, purchasing frozen could be as, or more nutritious than fresh.In the process of flash-freezing, foods are frozen within hourssometimes minutesafter harvest. This process prevents nutrients and phytochemicals from breaking down further. The foods water freezes so quickly it only forms small ice crystals, which prevent cell wall damage.

In the basic canning process, foods are placed into cans and then heated to a temperature that kills harmful organisms. Air is drawn out of the can and the jar is left with a vacuum-seal, preventing any airand microorganismsfrom entering.

The pancreas produces insulin, which unlocks the bodys cells and allows sugar (glucose) in the blood to enter cells and tissues to provide energy. Thats why insulin is so important; without insulin, cells go hungry. In Type I (childhood) diabetes and some cases of Type II (adult) diabetes, the pancreas simply doesnt produce enough insulin.

The study, which appeared in the Archives of Internal Medicine, suggests that liver, kidney and pancreatic cancers in particular are linked to diabetes. The researchers theorized that the excess insulin produced by diabetics may also encourage the growth and development of cancer cells in liver and pancreatic tissue.

These studies show an association between diabetes and cancer. They don't show that one causes the other.There is much more work to be done before scientists can determine once and for all if diabetes and cancer simply share the same risk factors (with obesity chief among them), or if theres something unique about diabetes that may predispose some individuals toward cancer.

But Thanksgiving is one holiday on which you can have your healthy foods and feast as well. Its a meal that should be marked by abundance, and what is most abundant in November is the fall harvest of roots, gourds and berries that have just been gathered for the winter.

Anthocyanin is the phytochemical that makes those berries red. In fact, they are loaded with a wide variety of phenols, which are believed to fight cancer. You can add chopped fresh cranberries to salads.

Finally, serve that turkey with a whole grain stuffing. (The Pilgrims didnt have a lot of refined grains lying around, and consequently their whole grain dressings and breads were full of lignans and other antioxidants, plus fiber.) Mix those whole grains with fruit and nuts to add crunch, flavor and more health benefits to your stuffing.

There are more reasons to avoid excess calories than controlling your weight. Making permanent, modest cuts in your calorie consumption may help prevent cancer and possibly improve your hearts health. The challenge in cutting calories, however, is to find the point where you can live both physically and psychologically in optimum health.Being overweight clearly increases the risk of colon, breast, prostate and uterine cancers. Changes in hormones and hormone-like growth factors seem to be partly responsible. To reduce overweight, experts at the American Institute for Cancer Research recommend limiting the calories you consume and keeping physically active. Besides influencing your weight, some studies suggest that avoiding excess calories may directly affect your cancer risk. Laboratory studies show that calorie restriction can lead to fewer and smaller breast cancers. It also appears to inhibit all cancers by slowing down the development of cancer cells, increasing their self-destruction and reducing DNA damage.Furthermore, one study shows that long-term calorie restriction by people with a healthy weight may also lower their blood cholesterol and blood pressure and significantly reduce heart-threatening build-up in blood vessels. If this small study is confirmed by others, people with a weight at the lower end of a healthy range a Body Mass Index (BMI) reading of 18 to 22 may be better off than people at the upper end of a healthy range (BMI of 23 to 25).However, some health professionals think that calorie restriction for people with a healthy weight does not improve their health and can risk malnutrition. It seems possible to defuse this criticism by cutting your calorie consumption about ten percent, while still meeting all of your nutrient needs. But a variety of studies show that it is extremely difficult to meet nutrient needs with less than 1,500 calories, so you must walk a fine line.Fully meeting your nutritional needs with a limited number of calories is not the only reason for caution. Studies of the after-effects of food restriction and famine in The Netherlands during World War II show that a sudden or severe restriction of food for a limited time may actually worsen a persons health and increase the risk of cancer. The immune system can be impaired. And excessive restriction may make it difficult or impossible to exercise vigorously, which is recommended for a variety of health benefits. Experts agree that severe calorie restriction is inappropriate for people under age 21, who are still developing physically and mentally.Its also critical that limiting calories for better health does not hide an eating disorder, like anorexia nervosa. Anorexia nervosa restricts calories without regard for nutritional needs, aims for physical perfection at lower and lower weights, and is based on low self-esteem. A rational desire to restrict calories, on the other hand, will meet all nutritional needs, avoid perfectionistic rules and always show self-respect. There is a danger in our weight-obsessed culture that some vulnerable people who begin calorie restriction for valid reasons could develop an eating disorder as they strive for harmfully low weights.For the majority of our overweight and sedentary population, cutting back on excess calories and exercising daily are obvious steps to better health. Adults with a healthy weight can also prevent the usual, small yearly weight gain with a slight reduction in calories and an increase in activity. For adults with a healthy weight who want to do more for their long-term well-being, sensible calorie restriction can be accomplished without rigid diets. Simply see if you can comfortably eliminate 50 to 200 calories a day of nutrient-poor foods, like pastries or sodas, from what you eat. If you feel you need more calories, try adding some of them back in your diet as plant-based foods that are nutritionally rich.

Headlines announcing a Journal of the American Medical Association study linked consumption of green tea with protection from stroke, but not cancer, caught many people by surprise. Tea provides a good example of why we need to consider both laboratory and population studies in choosing steps to lower cancer risk and promote overall health.Green tea contains relatively high amounts of a type of phytochemical called EGCG. Laboratory studies have shown EGCG is a powerful antioxidant. A variety of antioxidants from plant foods seem to stabilize free radicals, protecting DNA from damage that could allow cancer to develop, and protecting blood vessels from damage that could promote blockages. Laboratory studies show EGCG can also increase production of enzymes that protect us from cancer-causing substances, decrease levels of a substance key to promoting cancer development, and increase cancer cell self-destruction.In most studies checking signs of green teas effects in people, antioxidant levels in the blood increase, showing we can absorb antioxidant compounds in tea. For example, in a study of 133 heavy smokerswho are exposed to DNA damage from smokingfour months of drinking 4 cups (8 ounces each) of decaffeinated green tea daily reduced the signs of DNA damage by 31 percent.Large population-based studies of the impact of green tea show much less consistent results. Some population studies link higher green tea consumption with lower risk of colon, stomach, breast, prostate and other cancers. Other, similar-type studies, show no effect. In the recent study of more than 40,000 Japanese adults, those who drank at least one, three-ounce cup of green tea daily suffered 25 percent fewer deaths due to cardiovascular disease than those who did not drink it daily. However, deaths due to stomach, lung or colorectal cancer did not decrease, even with five or more three-ounce cups daily. Its possible we might see cancer protection if we look at those drinking the equivalent of three or four eight-ounce cups daily, which some researchers suggest may be needed for cancer protection.Benefits in the effects seen in tea drinkers may come from other healthy habits. Differences of study findings may also mean green tea offers more benefit for some people than others, depending on diet or exposure to risk-producing substances such as tobacco or pollution. One study, for example, suggests tea and soy may produce similar benefits, and consuming one may decrease the chances of benefit from the other. That might explain why cancer protection was not seen in the recent study of Japanese adults, almost all of whom ate soy foods daily.Genetics may explain part of why population studies tend to show large variation in how study participants are affected by tea. The antioxidant benefits of tea, which could help reduce blockages in blood vessels, may not be strongly affected by genetics. However, research has shown genetic differences will influence how people respond to phytochemicals in tea that can lead to stopping cancer-causing substances. This may mean green tea offers more cancer protection for some people than others.Simply drinking green tea cant save us from the damages caused by overeating, a poorly-balanced diet, or a sedentary lifestyle. Todays research identifies a plant-based diet, a healthy weight, physical activity, and avoiding tobacco as the most effective steps to lower cancer risk. For those who would like to do more to reduce their risk, replacing three or four cups of coffee or soda per day with green tea is still a reasonable step that may bring a variety of health benefits.

People eating at fast food restaurants often underestimate the calories in their meals by 12 to 41 percent, according to studies by Brian Wansink, professor of consumer behavior at Cornell University. Large portions seem to be one of the main culprits in this inaccuracy and may cause more problems as large portions start to seem normal.The bad news from one of Wansinks latest studies is the more you eat, the more likely you are to underestimate your meals calories. Researchers asked 105 customers at fast food restaurants to estimate the calorie content of the meals they had ordered, and then checked the actual total from restaurant nutrition information. Overall, people under-estimated the calories in their meals by 23 percent. But those who ordered relatively small meals that provided about 470 to 560 calories only slightly under-estimated their meals. The larger the calorie load of the meal, the more people misjudged it. People whose meals totaled 1,100 to 1,260 calories under-estimated their meals calories by 38 percent, guessing they totaled only 570 to 759 calories.Another study asked 40 college students to estimate the calories in 15 fast food meals that differed only in portion. The mealswhich consisted of various combinations of three different size portions of chicken nuggets, fries and colacontained a total of 445 to 1,780 calories. Students accurately estimated the calories in smaller meals. However, in the meals with large portions they underestimated calories by more than 22 percent.Some experts suggest that our frequent exposure to large portions may be blunting our ability to recognize how large our portions are. In one study, peoples estimates of food portions were often wrong by more than 20 percent. Those who were more confident in their estimates were not any more accurate than those less certain. In another study, people were asked to bring in a medium bagel, muffin, potato, apple or cookie. Items brought in varied by 200 to 600 percent within the same food type. Almost all exceeded the definition of medium in standard nutrition recommendations. Some people suggest that if fast food restaurants made information about nutrition content more obvious, customers would be able to better control their calorie consumption. However, in a study Wansink dubbed The McSubway Project more available nutrition information did not seem to help. Researchers compared 250 customers of Subway (where nutrition information was widely available on napkins, wrappers and signs) with 250 customers at McDonalds (where nutrition information was inconsistently available on small-print posters). Although McDonalds customers chose higher calorie meals that averaged about 710 calories, they more accurately estimated what they were getting, underestimating by only about 12 percent. In contrast, Subway customers meals averaged about 560 calories, but they underestimated content by about 41 percent, believing their meals contained only about 335 calories. Wansink suggests the McSubway discrepancy was due to what he calls the halo effect. When people are convinced food is healthy, they often assume that everything is low-calorie, and forget to account for calories from added cheese, mayonnaise, chips, drinks and other extras. To keep a closer tab on what youre eating, Wansink advises to estimate the calories of individual items separately rather than the meal as a whole, and to remember that a large meal probably has about twice the calories you think it does.

Researchers now agree breast cancer occurs in several distinct forms. Although researchers continue to unravel how each form develops, a variety of hormones are critical pieces of the puzzle. While we wait for studies to clarify the best strategies to lower risk, we can identify a few steps likely to promote healthy levels of the hormones involved.Its not only the female hormones estrogen and progesterone that influence breast cancer risk. According to several comprehensive studies, high levels of the male hormone testosterone raise risk of both premenopausal and postmenopausal breast cancer. Higher levels of sex hormone binding globulin (SHBG), which regulates the action and availability of these hormones, seem to protect against development of breast cancer, at least in women past menopause.High levels of the hormone insulin and insulin-related growth factors consistently increase breast cancer risk after menopause. Some scientists theorize insulin and insulin-related growth factors may stimulate the growth of breast cancer cells; others suggest insulin may raise testosterone or decrease SHBG levels.Regular exercise is one way to alter these hormones. Research consistently links physical activity with lower levels of insulin-related growth factors and testosterone. Weight control is another powerful step to keep these hormones at healthy levels. If youve been gaining weight, cutting even 100 calories a day from your eating habits and adding a 15- to 20-minute walk may be enough to stop weight gain. You may need to increase the time you are physically active to 45 to 60 minutes a day.Aside from help with weight control, total vegetable consumption may not significantly protect against breast cancer. However, eating cruciferous vegetables such as broccoli and cauliflower several times a week may offer protection. The compounds in these vegetables stimulate the production of enzymes that help protect against cancer-causing substances. Alcohol is one source of calories worth limiting. Studies have shown alcohol can increase a womens risk of breast cancer, depending upon many factors including genetics and overall diet. But the recommendation for women to limit daily alcohol to no more than one standard drink (5 ounces of wine, 12 ounces of beer, 1.5 ounces of distilled liquor) is a smart move. Vitamin D is classified as a hormone because the active form is produced within our bodieswe also take this form in from food and supplements. Low blood levels of vitamin D are linked with greater breast density, a characteristic repeatedly associated with greater risk of breast cancer. We dont know whether vitamin D and calcium, which seem to work together, can change breast density and protect against different forms of breast cancer.The best way to control weight and promote healthy hormone levels involves paying attention to both what and how much you eat. Check portion sizes, since too much of even healthful food means extra calories. Even if you dont reach your target weight, limiting calorie intake seems to help control levels of growth factors. A mostly plant-based diet makes sense for weight control and lower breast cancer risk. Choosing vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans while limiting sweets, sugar-loaded drinks, saturated fat and refined grains, helps you feel comfortably full on fewer calories, reduces levels of insulin and growth factors, and raises levels of protective SHBG.

Q: What are soy nuts? Are they healthful choices? A: Soy nuts are roasted whole soybeans. They may be dry-roasted or oil-roasted. Soy nuts are available plain, salted, or in a variety of other flavors. A quarter-cup serving contains about 194 calories, just a little less than the same portion of peanuts. Like many other soy foods, they are not low-fat, but the fat is almost all unsaturated; saturated fat content is very low. That quarter-cup provides 17 grams of soy protein, a major portion of the 25 grams that some studies have shown helps lower blood cholesterol. Unsalted soy nuts contain only a trace of sodium; salted versions remain reasonable as long as your portions are controlled, with about 70 to 120 milligrams of sodium in a quarter-cup.

But if weight loss is slow and steady, the body is readily able to adapt, and in some cases reverse, the changes that obesity brings about. More importantly, health benefits increase with every pound taken off. Meanwhile, the risks of cardiovascular disease, non-insulin dependent diabetes (NIDD), stroke and cancer decrease.

Theres another concern voiced by those who have been overweight all their lives, and it has to do with the fact that many of the carcinogens we are exposed to daily the kinds that occur in food, air and water are stored in fat cells. When diet and exercise cause fat deposits to shrink, its possible for some of these trapped carcinogens to get released back into the bloodstream.

Research suggests the hypothalamus is directly involved with setting our internal fat thermostat. Where that thermostat is set in other words, how efficiently our body burns calories determines how resistant our bodies are to change. To some extent, our genetics set the thermostat, but our diet and activity level can adjust the setting.

The researchers found that blood levels of ghrelin, which stimulates appetite, was increased only in the energy deficit group the group that actually lost weight. This suggests that ghrelin may be one method the body uses to reestablish the metabolic status quo following a period of increased activity and lowered intake.

This is one example of how hormones like ghrelin and leptin and insulin, which regulate appetite and the conversion of fat to energy, take their cues from the amount of fat stored on the body. When we cut back on calories, increase the amount of calories we burn (or ideally do a little of both), our metabolism tries to compensate. There is some evidence to suggest that, once obesity has settled in, there may be limitations to how much, and how long, we can overcome these hormonal influences.

But there is also increasing evidence that our bodies can learn to embrace a new, lowered set point weight. A study published in the journal BMC Public Health last year showed that obese women who were put on a closely monitored gradual weight-loss program for three months experienced significant changes in hedonic response i.e., the physiological reaction to pleasurable food stimuli. Throughout the trial, researchers tested hedonic response by periodically having the women sit at a table and eat or drink a small sample of something sweet (a caramel or a vanilla drink) every 3 minutes until they found it distasteful.

Last year, a study in the Journal of the American Medical Association concluded that being moderately overweight was not associated with the increase in death rates that was observed among the obese. In fact, that study found that the moderately overweight even had a lower death rate than individuals at normal weight.

Even so, Collins points out that studies that examine death rates alone are missing something. Advances in medical care are lessening some of the impact that moderate obesity plays on death rates, but moderately obese individuals are more likely to develop other conditions that lessen quality of life and require multiple medications that come with their own side effects.

A 2005 study in the Journal of Epidemiology and Community Health followed 6798 middle-aged British men and showed that, after 20 years, subjects who became moderately overweight had a 24% higher risk of cardiovascular disease, and twice the risk of diabetes, than subjects at normal weight. Men who became considerably overweight had 41 percent higher risk of cardiovascular disease and 4 times the risk of diabetes than normal-weight subjects. And those men who became obese over the course of the study increased their risk of cardiovascular disease by 78 percent, and were nearly 8 times as likely to develop diabetes.

In terms of measuring an individuals fitness or fatness, the BMI is a rule with many exceptions. It isnt useful for determining if pregnant women, children, the elderly, and (because it does not take muscle mass into account) even serious weekend athletes are overweight or obese.

Other methods for making this determination have been proposed, but have yet to be as widely accepted because they tend to be variable (skinfold thickness (SFT)), expensive (buoyancy testing), or some combination of the two.

Meanwhile, some scientists point to research suggesting that abdominal fat is more metabolically active, and thus more involved in health risks, than fat elsewhere on the body; they maintain that only methods that measure abdominal fat (such as waist circumference or waist-to-hip ratio (WHR)) are appropriate. Still other researchers believe that weight, fat, and other factors should be collectively considered; finding a single, simple, uniform way to measure physical fitness levels is really needed, they say.

Two things always give me a hard time when planning a Thanksgiving menu: what to serve while everyone gathers before sitting down for dinner, and which dishes make it possible to spread out the work, so the cooks can catch their breath and join the rest of the group for a while before serving the Thanksgiving dinner.This year, I plan to serve two dishes for people to munch on while everyone arrives and starts chatting to catch up. Part of my strategy is to sneak more vegetables into the day. One dish will be an old-fashioned relish tray, presented in one of my grandmothers pressed glass treasures. Shaped like a large leaf, it contains many compartments that I will fill with rose-cut radishes, celery and carrot sticks, cottage cheese and sweet corn relish the same selections offered when dinner was at grandmothers. The second hors doeuvres will be miniature corn muffins, small enough to eat in one neat bite. They will be topped with ricotta cheese and half a cherry tomato.The relish tray is a healthy alternative to dip and chips, since guests use the vegetables to scoop up the cheese and relish. It will also be a work-spreader, because a volunteer can prep the veggies the day before and bring them in containers of cold water, and the cottage cheese and corn relish come straight out of commercial containers. The muffins need to be made on the spot and served fresh. But the cheese, blended with chives and shallots, tastes better when refrigerated overnight. Because the muffins are small, a cup of the seasoned cheese will top enough to feed a mob. So will one pint of cherry tomatoes, which take five minutes to halve and lightly coat with oil so they glow. I save the rounded tops cut off the muffins, let them dry out, then crush them into golden crumbs that make a great corn meal-crusted fish later in the weekend.

Do you remember Howard Johnsons? Long before fast food at McDonalds and family dining at The Olive Garden, we all ate at HoJos. This national roadside restaurant chain with New England roots, famous for their mac & cheese and fried clams, also served my favorite dessert. It was not one of the 28 flavors of ice cream they were known for. It was their Indian pudding. To me, Indian pudding seemed like two desserts in one because this spicy and dark cornmeal concoction came topped with a small scoop of vanilla ice cream. At age six, I already loved the contrast of the cold ice cream against the warm pudding, and how the milky sauce made by the melting ice cream tasted just right with the puddings cinnamon and cloves. As an adult, I also enjoy the interplay between the light, mild flavor of the ice cream, the deep, rich undertones of the molasses and the slightly grainy texture of the pudding. Together, these elements create a true comfort food.For social studies class in seventh grade, I wrote a report on Indian pudding so I could learn to make it. I discovered this was one of the earliest dishes made by settlers in New England. Some cooks used a frugal trio of cornmeal, molasses and milk, others lavishly added eggs, butter, raisins and ground spices. It was so popular that Amelia Simmons gave three recipes for Indian pudding when she wrote the first American cookbook, in 1796. Traditional Indian pudding is a slow food to make, baked for up to seven hours. This version, suited to todays faster pace, is done in two hours. Its also much more healthful than traditional versions. You will be pleased because you can make Indian pudding ahead and, just before serving, pop it back into the oven to warm it up. An extra bonus: The aroma in the house while it bakes will make everyone happy.

In large nonstick skillet over low heat, toast granola for 2-3 minutes, then transfer to a small bowl. Wipe skillet clean and set aside.In a medium bowl, combine cornstarch with apple juice and lemon juice so cornstarch is completely incorporated. Stir in apples, sugar and cinnamon. Add oil to the skillet and heat over medium heat until hot. Add apple mixture, spreading evenly over bottom of pan, and cook, stirring constantly, until browned but not mushy, about 4 minutes. Mix in cranberries and heat through. Stir in granola. Reduce heat to low. Flatten mixture with a spatula, cover and cook 1 to 2 minutes. Turn mixture out of skillet onto individual serving dishes or bowls. Top each with a spoonful of yogurt, if desired.Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 265 calories, 4 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 58 g. carbohydrate, 2 g. protein, 5 g. dietary fiber, 79 mg. sodium.

Cut away feathery tops of fennel at base of round stalks and discard. Slice off bottom of bulb, remove the tough outer layer and discard both. Cut bulb in half vertically. Using a very sharp knife, cut each half crosswise into very thin slices. Make a bed of arugula on each of 4 salad plates. Arrange one-fourth of the orange slices over the arugula. Arrange slices of fennel over orange slices. Arrange onion slices over fennel. Add olives. Sprinkle with salt and pepper to taste. In a small bowl, whisk oil with orange juice and zest. Drizzle dressing over each salad. Serve immediately. Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 85 calories, 4 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 13 g. carbohydrate, 1 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 51 mg. sodium.

Waistlines arent the only things that have expanded in recent years  plates have been packing on weight as well. Several studies, including one by Lisa Young PhD and Marion Nestle PhD, found that since the mid-80s, the size of food portions sold as single servings have grown in convenience stores, fast-food establishments and chain restaurants. They have also grown considerably larger in our homes. Eating more inevitably means gaining weight.

According to Collins, a recent study found that this technique allowed women to reduce daily calories by about 10 percent  or about 250 calories per day  without feeling hungry or deprived. In theory, portions that are 25 percent smaller throughout the day could easily add up to cutting 500 calories a day, notes Collins.

The link between excess body fat and cancer risk is a bit of a latecomer to the party, but its making up for lost time. In laboratories and clinics around the world, researchers are adding cancer to the list of ailments made more likely when we pack on the pounds.

Scientists are investigating specific links to colorectal cancer, endometrial cancer, prostate cancer, pancreatic cancer and kidney cancer. Theres a growing consensus that overweight women, especially post-menopausal women, have a higher risk for breast cancer.

Why is a specific link to breast cancer turning up, and how is it that risk seems particularly high among older women who are overweight or obese? To understand that, you need to know a little bit about what fat really does.

Although the amount secreted by fat cells is comparatively minor compared to what various glands and organs pump out, more fat on your body means more of these hormones circulating through your system, particularly estrogen. Overweight women can have three times the level of circulating estrogen and other hormones that lean women have.

Lean women experience heightened levels of estrogen and other hormones during their reproductive years, but these drop off after menopause. In overweight or obese women, however, fat cells pick up some of the slack, and continue to produce low levels of estrogen and other growth factors. Its suspected that the resulting prolonged lifetime exposure to this hormonal state of affairs is whats behind the observed increase in breast cancer risk.

You can pile the vegetables and fruits high on your plate and feel great that you did yourself a big, healthy favor for lunch. But what about dinner? And the next days meals? What you need is a rule-of-thumb for every meal that can lower risk of breast cancer and other diseases while tasting good, too.

A little rethinking of your plate is all it takes. AICRs New American Plate is an easy model for healthy, delicious meals every day. Just fill 2/3 (or more) of your plate with plant foods such as vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans; and 1/3 (or less) of your plate with lean animal protein, such as meat, poultry, fish, or low-fat dairy products. Try to keep your portions reasonable, and youll be eating a diet that may help you prevent cancer, manage your weight and enjoy eating all at the same time.

On the New American Plate, you can still have a roast beef sandwich, only limit the meat to 3 ounces. (If you buy it from a deli, wrap the rest to use in a sandwich the next day.) Then put extra vegetables on the sandwich tomato slices, pepper-rings, or romaine lettuce. Use 100 percent whole-wheat bread. On the side, have some hearty three-bean salad and a crisp apple.

The New American Plate includes at least 2 servings of vegetables with every meal, with fruit for dessert. At the end of the day, it ensures youve gotten your 5-10 servings of vegetables and fruit for lower risk of cancer and other diseases.

Its a good idea to make the transition to the 2/3-1/3 proportions gradually. At first, limit the meat portion to 4-6 ounces and increase your vegetable servings and variety. Microwave some slices of sweet potato for a few minutes, then mash them with some cinnamon and apple juice while you are steaming some green beans drizzled with a few drops of lemon juice and olive oil, then sprinkled with thyme or parsley.

When youre used to these changes, take another step. Reduce the meat portion to 3 ounces. Dont worry about not getting enough protein. A 3-ounce serving supplies plenty of protein, and the larger servings that are so common provide far more than we need. Add a third vegetable perhaps cauliflower, yellow squash, snow peas, or carrots. Try a half-cup of whole grains, like brown rice, whole-wheat pasta or barley.

Take the New American Plate version of meatloaf. It contains ground turkey, beans, vegetables and even cranberries for a moist, filling and nutrition-packed treat. Plastic-wrap leftovers in individual serving sizes and refrigerate up to 4 days (or freeze them).

Preheat oven to 350. In large bowl, combine all meatloaf ingredients, except ketchup and parsley. Place mixture in 9x5-inch non-stick loaf pan. Bake 55 minutes hour, uncovered. If using ketchup, spread on loaf and return to oven for 5-10 more minutes. Let stand 10 minutes before serving. Cut into slices and serve.

Tomorrow, tomorrowyoull think about exercising tomorrow. Really. You know you should. Youve read about how exercise will help you lose and maintain weight. Most likely you know maintaining a healthy weight will, in turn, help you look and feel better as well as reduce the threat of serious health disorders, such as diabetes, heart disease, and cancer.

Perhaps you have heard that studies show physical activity can reduce the risk of developing colon cancer in men and breast cancer in women by up to 50 and 40 percent respectively. Research also suggests that among cancer survivors, exercise decreases pain and helps survivors participate more in daily activities.

Plan for the WeekIf you are just starting to exercise or have taken a break, begin on the slow side and build. While any fitness program should be individualized, below is one suggested routine. Remember, exercise and stretches should not cause pain; if you feel pain at any point, stop.

Warm-up & Stretch -- at least 5 minutes, before and after each activity. Try warming up with a low-intensity version of your favorite exercise. Hold stretches for 30 seconds and make sure to stretch each side of your body.

Starting Simple: Walk it OffIf setting up a fitness routine seems overwhelming, you can start by simply doing more of what you do every daywalking. Cheap, simple, and just outside your door, walking has grown into the most popular form of exercise and is a great way to jumpstart a fitness routine. Make sure to warm up and stretch before and after every walk.

Make it Routine -- Start at a pace and distance that feels comfortable. Gradually build up to a brisk walk, 30 minutes, 3-5 days a week. Increase the time and pace to your comfort. You should be walking at a pace where you can talk with ease. If you are short on time or find it too strenuous, break your walk into short daily bursts of 5 to 10 minutes.

Do it With a Buddy: Somewhere in your local area there is someone who is experiencing similar pangs of guilt and the desire to get fit. Find that person. Youll feel a lot worse backing out if you feel youll let down someone.

Try it with Tunes: Exercising to music may help you stick to your exercise routine. A small 2005 study found that a music-listening group stuck to their walking program more closely than did a non-music group98 percent compared to 68 percent. The music group lost an average of twice the pounds and body fat as the non-music group.

When it comes to spinach, the FDA says the danger has passed. The government has lifted its ban on most bagged spinach and notes that frozen and canned spinach never posed a threat in the first place.

The tainted fresh spinach has been traced to three counties in Californias Salinas Valley. The FDA continues to advise consumers not to purchase any brands of bagged fresh spinach (or salad mixes containing fresh spinach) produced by Natural Selection Foods that are marked with Best if Used by dates between August 17 and October 1. All of these bags, they note, should have been removed from shelves last month.

But if the calls to our AICR Nutrition Hotline are anything to go by, it might be a while before many US families once again dig in to a heaping bowl of spinach salad. After all, there is a long history of E. coli outbreaks in spinach and lettuce produced in central California. The FDA and California growers are in discussions to come up with a comprehensive plan to avoid another outbreak, but theres no question: the public remains leery.

If you love spinach but have been spooked by the outbreak, there are some steps you can take to get your salad mix fix. Until we learn more about the how and why of the outbreak, you might consider sticking to spinach grown outside of the Salinas Valley. Your local farmers market might be a great place to start. What about washing? Well, despite the outbreak, the produce industry stands by the process that growers use to wash spinach and other leafy greens before they are bagged. Earlier this year, a panel of food experts convened by the California growers affirmed that bags marked washed triple-washed or ready-to-eat shouldnt be re-washed at home, because consumers are less likely to match the sanitary conditions observed by produce packagers. The industry does a super job of washing, one of the panel members said.

If assurances like that dont exactly put all your concerns to rest, youre not alone. Another rinse (as long as youre careful to wash your hands and all utensils and surfaces beforehand) cant do any harm.

If youre still apprehensive, you might forgo uncooked spinach altogether, at least for a little while. Because no matter how its washed, or where its grown, cooking fresh spinach at 160 degrees Fahrenheit for 15 seconds will kill any E. coli present. You can also go with frozen or canned spinach, although canned spinach often comes packed with a hefty whallop of sodium. Look for low-salt or no-salt varieties, if you choose to go this route.

If youre so concerned about the outbreak that youve decided to avoid spinach altogether, at least for awhile, you should know that there are other leafy greens that boast a similar nutrient and phytochemical profile.

The vegetables collectively called greens (kale, collard greens, swiss chard, and mustard greens) belong to the family of cruciferous vegetables that also includes broccoli and cauliflower. Yes, thats why they have such a strong and distinctive flavor: they contain powerful anti-cancer phytochemicals like sulforaphane, which lend them a characteristic bite.

Kale: AICR experts consider this humble green, a dietary staple in colder climates, a nutritional powerhouse. Of all the leafy greens, kale is highest in carotenoids. Its also a one-stop shop for vitamin C, calcium, vitamin K and manganese, and a big supplier of sulforaphane, a phytochemical that seems to help usher carcinogens from the body before they can do any harm.

Swiss chard: Rich in potassium, and the best leafy green source for iron, Swiss chard is too often overlooked. It represents a great plant source of vitamin E, which protects cells from damage caused by free radicals. Its a a good source of vitamin C and high in carotenoids like lutein, which has been linked for lower risk of everything from cataracts to cancer.

Mustard greens: A better source of calcium than even kale. Like kale, they are excellent sources of the cancer-fighting phytochemical called sulforaphane. Mustard greens also boast potassium, carotenoids and folate.

Beginning 20 years ago, researchers discovered that people who eat nuts five or more times a week have a lower incidence of heart disease, even when factors such as smoking, age, weight, blood pressure and physical fitness are taken into account. Among people who have suffered heart attacks, nut eaters have better chances of survival. Since then, other studies have shown similar results, including a possible link between nuts and lower risk for some types of cancer.

The vitamins and minerals in nuts contribute to their heart-healthy and cancer-fighting powers. The potassium, magnesium and calcium in them help control blood pressure. And their high fiber content helps lower cholesterol and may protect against diseases like colon cancer.

While all fats carry the same number of calories (125 calories per tablespoon), all fats are not created equal. Saturated fats, which are linked to high blood cholesterol, are commonly found in animal products. Nuts, however, are rich in mono-and polysaturated fats. If you eat more of these healthy fats and fewer saturated and trans fats, you can lower your blood cholesterol, especially LDL, the unhealthy kind.

Almonds. Besides having more fiber than other nuts, one ounce of almonds (about 1/3 cup) has about half the recommended daily amount of vitamin E, a substance that laboratory studies suggests is a powerful cancer-fighting antioxidant.

Brazil nuts. Brazil nuts provide a rich source of selenium, an essential trace mineral that may help prevent prostate, lung, colorectal, gastric and skin cancers, as well as heart disease. One ounce of Brazil nuts (6 to 8 nuts) can have more than 500 micrograms (mcg.) of selenium. Thats enough to meet the Recommended Dietary Allowance of this nutrient for a week. Other nuts provide about 1 mcg. in an ounce.

Peanuts. Although technically a legume, these nutty favorites are high in folate, a B vitamin that lowers blood levels of possibly harmful homocysteine. An ounce of peanuts (about 40 pieces) contains about 10 percent of the recommended daily intake of folate. Peanuts also contain the antioxidant resveratrol.

Walnuts. Walnuts contain more antioxidants than any other nut and are high in a type of omega-3 fatty acid called alpha-linolenic acid. Omega-3 fatty acids may slow tumor growth and reduce cholesterol, triglycerides and blood pressure. Although they have less vitamin E than almonds, they make up the difference with a variety of other antioxidant phytochemicals. They are best stored in the refrigerator or freezer.

Since nuts provide protein and fat, snacking on a handful can help stave off hunger for a few hours. For the greatest benefit, eat a variety of nuts several times a week or even daily, but limit your portions to one ounce, or about 1/4 -1/3 cup, which is 150 to 200 calories. Nuts are delicious chopped and sprinkled on breakfast cereal, salads and casseroles.

The use of three B vitamin supplements folate, B-6 and B-12 as a strategy to promote heart health may be coming to an end. These three vitamins still seem to lower blood levels of an amino acid called homocysteine, but this reduction doesnt appear to affect heart disease or stroke risk.

Although relatively large amounts of B vitamins reduced blood levels of homocysteine in these two studies, the risk of heart attack or heart-related death was either unchanged or increased. In only one of the studies did the risk of stroke decrease.

Scientists now think that levels of the amino acid homocysteine might indicate heart-related risks not cause them. Even so, people should try to reduce their homocysteine levels by eating the recommended amounts of B vitamins to prevent health problems.

Normally, homocysteine combines with a part of the folate molecule to form the amino acid methionine. But if you lack folate or vitamin B-12, the conversion of homocysteine to methionine is impaired. Vitamin B-6 helps keep homocysteine levels under control.

When the conversion of homocysteine to methionine slows due to lack of B vitamins, cancer risk is increased. Low methionine levels seem to disturb DNA repair, allowing abnormal cells to form that could develop into cancer. Consequently, diets low in folate may increase the risk of breast, cervix, lung and esophogeal cancer, as well as colorectal adenomas cancer.

Although neither of these two new studies found any impact on cancer risk, most common cancers develop over at least 10 to 20 years. The impact of B vitamins on methionine levels may affect only very early stages of cancer development.

As long as you eat an abundance of vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans, you should get enough folate and vitamin B-6. Modest amounts of fish, poultry, lean meat, or dairy products supply plenty of B-12 for most of us. People over 50 (whose absorption of B-12 from food may diminish) and vegetarians, who avoid animal foods, should take a multivitamin or a food fortified with B-12 daily to get the RDA.

A: Broccoli is one of the most nutritious vegetables, providing vitamin C, folate, and special cancer-fighting phytochemicals called isothiocyanates. It also contains a group of phytochemicals called carotenoids, including beta-carotene and lutein, which seem especially good for our eyes, The florets and leaves are higher in carotenoids than the pale stalks, but the stalks are just as good at providing vitamin C and folate. The stalks are also great sources of fiber. Little information is available about the phytochemical content of different parts of the broccoli plant. Regardless, you can be confident that the whole broccolistalks and floretsprovides numerous nutrients for your health.

Q: What kind of nutritious snacks that dont need refrigeration could I keep in my desk? A: Since most of us have trouble meeting the goal of five to ten servings of fruits and vegetables each day, adding a fruit snack would be a great choice. Each day you can snack on a piece of fruit, or a container of grapes or chopped fruit. Some fruits, like oranges and bananas, can be kept in a desk or locker for several days. For longer storage, look for small packages of juice-packed fruit and unsweetened applesauce. Raisins and other dried fruit will also last for long periods of time; just pay attention to your portion size since their concentrated calories add up quickly. Nuts are another food that demands portion control, but they provide great fiber and nutrients. The protein in nuts will also help hold off hunger longer than many other snacks. Another snack idea is to pack small containers with a mixture of whole-grain cereals or low-fat whole-grain crackers.

As the numbers of obese continue to rise, researchers are exploring the possible connection between obesity and how too many of usboth adults and childrenare getting too little sleep. A recent report in the Journal of the American Medical Association observed that a decline in daily hours of sleep may play more of a role in promoting overeating and weight gain than previously thought. Researchers say that lack of sleep could increase tendencies to become overweight by affecting hormones, mental function, and behavior itself.Almost one-third of adults report sleeping six hours or less a night. In one study of more than 900 patients ranging in age from 18 to 91, those who were overweight or obese reported fewer hours of sleep per night than those at a healthy weight. A large population study of adults ages 32 to 49 associated sleep habits with obesity. Compared to those who slept at least seven hours a night, adults reporting 6 hours of sleep were 23 percent more likely to be obese; those averaging 5 hours were 50 percent more likely to be obese; and those sleeping four hours or less nightly were 73 percent more likely to be obese.Adults are not the only ones whose sleeping habits may be affecting their weight. A new study of children ages 5 to 10 in Quebec associated childrens sleep habits with the risk of overweight or obesity. When compared to children who sleep 12 to 13 hours a night, risk of overweight or obesity increased 42 percent in those sleeping 10.5 to 11.5 hours, and more than tripled in those sleeping 8 to 10 hours. For adults, studies show weight begins to increase beginning with those who average less than seven hours of sleep a night. Since 2000, 13 large population studies have linked less sleep with higher weight. Those who are most severely obese are one of the few exceptions. This is most likely because sleep apnea (breathing difficulty during sleep) and other sleep disorders caused by obesity may leave people so tired that they sleep more hours. Adults over 50 years old may be another exception. It is not clear whether older adults need less sleep, or if the effects of inadequate sleep are hidden among other health issues in this group. Several studies show that lack of sleep seems to change the levels of two appetite-related hormones. A hormone called ghrelin that stimulates appetite may increase, and the hormone leptin that tells our body we have had enough food may decrease. Together these changes would lead us to feel we need to eat more, even when we may have consumed all the calories we need. Some research suggests that other hormones, including those affecting blood sugar, may also be affected by lack of sleep.Inadequate sleep affects the way we make decisions, too. According to a report from the National Sleep Foundation, at least two-thirds of adults say sleepiness interferes with their concentration and ability to handle stress. That means that we may be more likely to eat in an effort to increase energy or cope with stress. When we are not well rested, we may not exercise at all or exercise at a lower intensity. A new study has begun to test whether obese adults who get too little sleep will lose weight if they sleep more. Meanwhile, if you feel that youve been fighting an uphill battle trying to manage your weight, test yourself. Find something that relaxes you before bed, and make seven to eight hours of sleep nightly a priority. Youve nothing to lose by increasing the amount you sleep as part of an overall healthy lifestyle.

Messages encouraging us to eat breakfast usually focus on benefits related to weight control, concentration and work performance, or overall health. Its important to distinguish, however, between the benefits of eating breakfast and those related to what we eat for breakfast. Eating breakfast shows up consistently among the habits of people who have lost weight and maintained their loss. In a study of members of the National Weight Control Registrya group who have all lost at least 30 pounds and maintained the loss at least a year78 percent say they eat breakfast daily and almost 90 percent say they do most days. Only 4 percent say they never eat breakfast, substantially less than the national average of 25 percent of adults who say they skip breakfast.Although it might seem that skipping breakfast would make weight control easier, studies suggest that eating breakfast may help reduce calorie intake later in the day. People who skip or eat an inadequate breakfast may find midmorning a time they are likely to eat high calorie foods. They may also get extremely hungry at lunch and overeat. Studies of binge eating consistently link it with a pattern of eating little in the morning and large amounts near the end of the day. Most research associating breakfast with mental acuity and emotional well-being has focused on youth. Studies have found that children and adolescents who eat breakfast show improved memory and test grades. The relatively few studies of adults show more mixed results. These studies suggest breakfast brings benefits in memory, energy level and mood.Specific food choices at breakfast probably change its effects, however. Reflecting the national average, most people in these studies most probably ate ready-to-eat cereal for breakfast. Chocolate donuts, or even a big plate of sausage and refined grain pancakes, may not necessarily bring the same benefits as found in these studies. Several studies suggest breakfasts that slowly release carbohydrate into the blood help memory and concentration more than those that rapidly release large amounts. Carbohydrates are released slowly by foods that contain whole grains and solid fruit rather than refined grains (whether bread, pastry or cereal) and fruit juice or soft drinks. One reason breakfast can benefit overall health is that it presents one of the main opportunities for people to take in nutrients often lacking in the American diet. Studies often link eating breakfast with higher daily intake of fiber, calcium, iron, folic acid, and vitamin C. Breakfast provides easy options to meet the goal of three or more servings of whole grains, for example, via whole grain cold cereal, oatmeal and whole grain toast. Breakfast is also a great time to get in at least one serving of fruit or vegetablesperhaps in an omelet or vegetable juice. It is far easier to reach the recommended daily total of five to ten servings of vegetables and fruits when they are a part of meals and snacks all day long.For a long-lasting, health-promoting breakfast, one formula is to combine a whole grain, a fruit or vegetable, and a healthful source of protein. For the latter, choose a food that is either low in fat, such as skim milk and low-fat yogurt, or contains healthful fat, such as peanut butter and walnuts.People who arent hungry in the morning often find that if they eat less at night, they begin waking up hungry. For others, a piece of fruit to start the day and a healthful early morning snack may work best or help transition them to a breakfast habit.

Set a rack in the center of the oven. Preheat the oven to 375 degrees F. Cut four 12-inch square pieces of foil. Arrange three apple quarters side by side in the center of each square of foil. Brush the cut surface of each quarter with butter. Sprinkle on cinnamon to coat each piece of apple lightly. Drizzle 1 tablespoon of the maple syrup over the apples in each packet. Seal the packets by bringing the top and bottom edges of the foil together above the apples and folding them together, then rolling in the sides. Set the packets on a baking sheet and bake for 30 minutes, or until the apples are tender. For optional garnishes, sprinkle some chopped candied ginger or chopped walnuts over the apples on top of the maple syrup before cooking them. Open the packets carefully; there will be steam. Let the apples sit for 10-20 minutes before serving, or serve lukewarm. Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 113 calories, 2 g. total fat (1 g. saturated fat), 26 g. carbohydrate, 0 g. protein, 2 g. dietary fiber, 4 mg. sodium.Something Different is written for the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) by Dana Jacobi, author of The Joy of Soy and recipe creator for AICRs Stopping Cancer Before It Starts.

I am a proud participant in whats come to be known as community-sponsored agriculture or CSA. The phrase refers to a special arrangement between a group of people and a specific farmer in which the group pays the farmer up front to cover his or her operating costs. In return, the group receives a share of the harvest, usually delivered each week from spring through fall. CSAs are increasingly popular because they help maintain family farms while providing people in cities and suburbs with fresh produce. But they can also present a daunting challenge to the cook, because its nature, not careful menu planning, that determines what and how much shows up on the doorstep. Monday might bring four tiny peaches or two pounds of parsnips, and you simply have to make do. My CSA participation is informal. My neighbor has a share in a farm just outside Manhattan; she bartered me a quarter of her share in exchange for helping her figure out how to use what she gets and to help her cook it. Recently, this meant dealing with the last of the seasons tomatoes and a truly absurd quantity of fresh leeks. The Jersey beefsteak tomatoes, weighing over a pound apiece and bearing a tough skin, were fit only for sauce or soup. Of the eight leeks, some were finger-thin and tender, but three were as fat as my wrist and as hard as a log. These clearly needed simmering with lots of liquid. Our decision was to cook the two together, making a tomato sauce pungent with leek. Its flavor pairs well with the stronger taste and heartier texture of whole-wheat pasta. It is also delicious combined with brown rice in casseroles. The recipe calls for the standard hot-water bath to peel the tomatoes, which can be tiresome. If you can find a device called a soft vegetable peeler, you wont be sorry. This gadget, which costs five to seven dollars, looks like the usual swivel-bladed peeler except that its cutting edge is serrated. It zips the skin off tomatoes and peaches, effortlessly saving mess and time. It will even peel a grape.

Plunge the tomatoes into a large pot of boiling water until their skin cracks, 2 to 3 minutes. With a slotted spoon, transfer them to a bowl of ice water. When the tomatoes are cool enough to handle, peel them. Seed the tomatoes and chop them into 3/4-inch pieces, including the meaty interior, if using beefsteaks. Scoop the tomatoes and their juice into a bowl, and set aside. Heat the oil in a medium skillet over medium-high heat. Saut? the leek until it is flexible, 3 minutes. Add the garlic, and cook until the leek slices are limp, 8 minutes, reducing the heat if necessary to keep the vegetables from coloring. Add the fresh tomatoes, canned tomatoes, oregano, salt and pepper. When the liquid in the pan boils, reduce the heat and simmer vigorously until most of the liquid has evaporated and the tomatoes are a chunky sauce, about thirty minutes. There should be about 2 cups of sauce.Cook the pasta according to package directions. Drain, and place it in a warmed serving bowl. Spoon the sauce over the pasta. Sprinkle the feta cheese over the sauce. If desired, sprinkle the olives over the cheese. Serve immediately.Makes 8 cups or 6 servings. Per serving: 316 calories, 6 g. total fat (2 g. saturated fat), 59 g. carbohydrate, 12 g. protein, 11 g. dietary fiber, 547 mg. sodium.Something Different is written for the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) by Dana Jacobi, author of The Joy of Soy and recipe creator for AICRs Stopping Cancer Before It Starts.

Halve the carrots lengthwise, leaving the thinnest ones whole.Heat the canola oil in a medium skillet over medium-high heat. Add the carrots, stirring until they are coated with the oil. Pour in the juice. Add the apricots, ginger and cinnamon. When the liquid boils, reduce the heat and simmer, stirring occasionally, until the carrots are tender and the juice is syrupy and puddles around the carrots, 8 to 10 minutes. Season the carrots to taste with salt and pepper. Off the heat, mix in the honey. Serve the carrots warm or at room temperature. Makes 2 1/2 cups, 4 servings. Per serving: 103 calories, 2 g. total fat (0 g. saturated fat), 19 g. carbohydrate, 1 g. protein, 2 g. dietary fiber, 32 mg. sodium.

Greens Mean More Than Spinach from the American Institute for Cancer Research Spinachs cousins are being invited to more dinner tables these days.In the not-too-distant past, greens other than spinach were practically unknown outside the southern U.S. As research has shown the benefits of eating greens, however, their profile has been raised.Cruciferous vegetables such as greens, broccoli, Brussels sprouts, cabbage, rutabagas and turnips are rich in antioxidants and phytochemicals, substances found in plants that may inhibit the growth of cancer. These vegetables also are high in fiber, vitamins and minerals.Spinach, kale, okra and collard and mustard greens contain phytochemicals that appear to help ward off macular degeneration and decrease the risk of lung cancer.Studies also have found that carotenoids in dark green leafy vegetables can inhibit the growth of certain types of breast cancer cells, skin cancer cells, lung cancer and stomach cancer. Other research indicates that the dietary folate found in leafy green vegetables is associated with lower risk of both colorectal adenomas (polyps that often progress into cancers) and colorectal cancer. Cruciferous vegetables also contain omega-3 fatty acids.Kale, especially, stands out among cruciferous vegetables. A member of the cabbage family, kale has a mild, cabbage-like flavor that works well in many dishes. And its frilly leaves are visually appealing.While it grows in warm climates, kale does best in colder places. Northern Europeans have enjoyed nutrition-packed kale for centuries.The frilly kale leaves are tinted blue and purple. There are also ornamental, non-edible varieties that come in deep purple and rich green.When choosing kale, look for small bunches with deep colors and no yellow or limp leaves. Kale can be refrigerated for two to three days, after which the taste gets a bit strong for most people. The center stalk is tough and should be removed before cooking.Kale can be substituted in any recipe for spinach. A little kale is good and looks pretty in a green salad. A stir-fry of kale and carrots is an attractive, colorful dish with a hearty nutritional punch.

AICRs recommends a New American Plate that is plant-based. Their rule of thumb is that plant foods such as vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans should cover two-thirds (or more) of the plate. Fish, poultry, meat or low-fat dairy should cover one-third (or less) of the plate.

Research suggests that such a diet will help with weight management and impede the process that leads to cancer. Natural plant substances, called phytochemicals, have been shown to have cancer-fighting properties.

When youve got a busy schedule, its easy to eat without thinking, even when you have the best of intentions to consume a healthy diet. To keep your healthy eating habits on track, step back and evaluate your eating habits every once in awhile. Here is a short quiz that may help.

But thats not the whole story. The real problem is that the diseases progression is variable and unpredictable. Many men with prostate cancer never develop symptoms and die of other causes. Prostate tumors can remain completely dormant, or grow very slowly, or progress so rapidly they spread to other parts of the body before the first symptom occurs.

Factors such as genetic makeup and hormonal status seem to influence how a prostate tumor progresses. Although diet and weight status indirectly influence hormone levels, we cant control the genes we inherit.

FatThe earliest research suggesting a link between diet and prostate cancer were ecological studies that compared different populations. Such studies showed, for example, that Japanese men who live in Hawaii (and who eat a Westernized diet) have higher rates of prostate cancer than Japanese men who live in Japan.

This one made a lot of news a few years back. Its unusual to see such close agreement between ecological and epidemiological studies (which show that countries or groups who eat more tomatoes and tomato sauces have lower prostate cancer risk) and laboratory studies (which show that the tomato component called lycopene is a potent antioxidant and is concentrated in the tissue of the prostate gland). When that kind of consistency occurs, scientists know theyre on to something.

But just in the last year, laboratory research has begun to suggest that combinations of tomatoes and broccoli, or tomatoes and soy, may have significantly greater anti-cancer potential than lycopene alone.

Why would this be so? Its thought that lycopene is only one of many substances found in plant foods that comprise an arsenal of cancer-fighters. Getting a variety of plant foods, then, allows the body to avail itself of a whole spectrum of anti-cancer substances, many of which seem to reinforce each other.

So the take-home message isnt Put ketchup on everything! The best advice is to fortify your defenses by increasing the amount and variety of fruits, vegetables, whole grains and beans in your diet.

Selenium is found in whole grains, soybeans, seafood and poultry. Note, however, that megadoses of selenium, such as those that might result from taking too much selenium in supplement form, are known to be toxic.

Those results are not what many prostate cancer researchers expected to find, but they havent given up. The laboratory work shows that physical activity has the potential to reset some of the bodys hormonal switches in ways that might keep prostate tumors in check.

Its also possible that physical activity may simply stand in for other factors that decrease risk. Physically active people tend to have less body mass, less fat and eat more vegetables, fruits and other plant foods.

The free AICR brochure Reducing Your Risk of Prostate Cancer can help get you started. Youll find answers to Frequently Asked Questions about prostate cancer symptoms, screening, and how to go about making the kind of small, everyday changes that can help keep you and your prostate healthy.

Americans love their processed meatfrom sizzling bacon in the mornings to hot dogs on the grill and deli meats in between. According to a 2005/2006 business trend report, sales of sliced bacon alone are projected to hit almost 1.8 billion pounds this year.

Yet a mounting body of recent evidence supports a longstanding concern that processed meats are associated with increased cancer risk. The studies point to a likely connection between eating high quantities of processed meats and certain cancers, including colon, stomach, gastric and rectal. A Preponderance of Processed Findings In general, studies have found that the more processed meats you eat, the higher the cancer risk. One of the largest studies has linked high consumption of processed meats with an increased risk of both colorectal and one type of stomach cancer. This European study began in 1992 to track the diets and diseases of 521,483 people throughout ten countries. The colorectal cancer study, for example, found that after an average of almost five years Europeans who ate the highest amounts of processed meat had a 42 percent increased colorectal cancer risk than those who ate the lowest amounts.

Nitrates can convert into nitrites, and when nitrites combine with certain compounds in the stomach they can form nitrosamines. These molecules were found to cause cancer in laboratory animal studies. To prevent the formation of nitrosamines, food manufacturers lowered the levels of the two preservatives in the 1970s and added a form of vitamin C, which helps prevent the formation of nitrosamines.

Genetics may cause some people to more readily form or be affected by nitrosamines. There are several other factors connected with processed meats association with increased cancer, including its high salt content.

And while the research continuesIn order to conclusively establish that processed meats are associated with certain cancers, scientists say more research is needed; several studies even found little or no association between the two. Yet the strength and relatively large number of studies that have found a link with high consumption and cancer has produced a turning point in the debate.

So for those who enjoy eating processed meatswhat to do? Limiting your consumption of these meats is a start. AICR recommends eating no more than 3 ounces a day of red meat in general and arranging your plate with two-thirds (or more) of dishes from plant-based foods and the remaining one-third (or less) from animal protein. The high and low amounts of processed meats expressed in studies means different amounts in different studies. In the U.S. study, for example, the researchers described a high consumption of processed meat as at least 1.2 ounces a day for men and slightly over half an ounce a day for women. In the European study of colon cancer, a high consumption was 2.8 ounces a day. An ounce of processed meat is about one slice of bologna or half a hot dog.

Check the ingredients to see if the meats contain nitrites or nitrates. Some manufacturers, restaurants, and organic meats do not add these preservatives. Also, white processed meats may not contain them because there is no need to preserve a red color.

Another healthy safeguard is to eat more vitamins C- and E-rich fruits and vegetables. Along with other health benefits, research suggest these nutrients can mitigate the formation of nitrosamines. Avocado, spinach and dark green leafy vegetables contain high amounts of Vitamin E; citrus fruits, tomatoes, and broccoli are a few good sources of Vitamin C.

Politics is a notorious source of hot debates, but political arguments pale in comparison to the debate over which is better: butter or margarine. And just like during an election year, there are smear campaigns in this contest as well.

When margarine was first introduced in the United States in the 1870s, some sources say that it was viewed as unnatural and demonic. For some people, that hasnt changed. A look at web sites debating the merits of butter versus margarine reveals that there are those who revile margarine and would like to drive it away from the worlds refrigerators, much like the torch-wielding townspeople chasing Frankenstein with their pitchforks.

But as it turns out, margarine is not demonic when it comes to more healthful eating and is a better choice overall than butter. In fact, functional margarineswhich ironically are often lumped into a class of nutritionally engineered products sometimes referred to as Frankenfoodscan actually boost your health.

When Collins talks about the right type of margarine, she is not talking about stick margarine. Shape matters when youre shopping in the dairy aisle. Regular stick margarine has the same calories as butter, much less saturated fat than butter, but so much trans fat that youve lost the advantage, she says. Although its not the best choice, she notes that it is cheaper than butter, but works in baking in a similar way.

As chefs around the country cry out in pain, Collins admits that butter lovers notice the difference. Butter does have the advantage of taste, texture and no trans fat, she says, so save butter for occasions or food where you most notice the difference. If you have one to two teaspoons of butter a week as part of an overall healthy diet, the impact will be little, Collins says.

Those anxiously cradling their melting sticks of butter might argue that despite butters caloric and saturated-fat content, laboratory studies have shown that the CLA (conjugated linoleic acid) in butter can actually inhibit cancer. Some unsubstantiated research suggests this fatty acid may help control weight. Unfortunately, CLA is less than 1 percent of the fat in butter. That amount is vastly less than the amounts consumed in supplement trials.

Enter functional margarines. These products were created to appeal to those seeking more bang from their butter, er, margarine. They contain stanols or sterols designed to lower blood cholesterol by interfering with the bodys absorption of cholesterol from the diet. Studies show that proper use of functional margarines can lower LDL (bad) cholesterol about 10 percent beyond the effects of following a heart-wise diet low in saturated fat and high in fiber.

For those still guarding their fridges with pitchforks and torches, Collins says they shouldnt fear the additives in margarine. Its important to know that some of the things that sound so foreign may be normal constituents of food just named in ways were not used to, explains Collins. For example, the diglycerides that serve as emulsifiers to keep margarine together are just incomplete fat molecules and beta-carotene for color is the same antixiodant phytochemical we eat in carrots.

If youre willing to banish both butter and margarine from your diet, a good oil is an excellent choice. Oils do not have added salt, so are lower in sodium than salted butter or margarine, says Collins. Olive, canola and nut oils are healthy alternatives for putting on vegetables or using as bread dips, she notes, but must still be used in moderate portions because of their calorie density. For toast, jam is another low-fat possibility, but Collins recommends using a reduced-sugar variety.

The curry powder Americans know comes from the era when the British ruled India. To suit their own tastes, the Brits developed a prepared blend of ground curry spices that was milder-tasting than the hotter mixes Indians used. For Americans who grew up before Indian immigrants brought more authentic Indian cuisine to our shores, the British type of curry powder was among the first Indian seasoning Americans tasted.

Actually, a curry can be any one of a great variety of distinctively spiced dishes found in Indian, Thai and other South Asian cuisines. Red and green curries abound, and feature blends of spices that often include cinnamon, ginger, cloves, cumin, chilis, cardamon and coriander. But the yellow curry that gets its color from the spice turmeric has come to be known in western countries as the quintessential curry.By itself, turmeric is a mild-tasting spice. It is sometimes added to make products like mustard more golden, and a half teaspoon can give a subtle boost in color and taste to a cup of brown rice or lentil soup. With other spices in a curry, however, turmeric lays a smooth foundation for more piquant spices to blend.A Hot Research TopicScientists are finding that turmerics active ingredient, called curcumin, may have the ability to slow the growth of colon, prostate and other cancers. Curcumin is an antioxidant that could help prevent cell damage in the body by molecules called free radicals. Turmeric is a member of gingers botanical family, Zingieraceae. Ginger root is used frequently in curries and many other Asian specialties. Its naturally occurring phytochemical, gingerol, is being studied for potential cancer-fighting and anti-inflammatory properties.In addition to fighting colon cancer, one recent laboratory study by researchers at the University of Michigan found that ginger can kill ovarian cancer cells. Meanwhile, University of Pittsburgh School of Medicine scientists have observed that hot peppers  another frequent curry ingredient have a compound called capsaicin that appear to shrink pancreatic tumors.At Rutgers University, researchers combined turmeric and phenethyl isothiocyanate, a compound found naturally in cruciferous vegetables like broccoli and cauliflower. They found that when fed to mice implanted with human prostate cancer cells, the cancer grew more slowly than in mice only one of the compounds. In Britain, other research is underway to determine curcumins effects on esophageal cancer.

For centuries, people in hot-weather countries like India traditionally relied on spicy dishes to provide a form of internal air conditioning by making the body perspire. Indian dishes use fiery ingredients liberally, whether its a vindaloo heavy with cayenne pepper or a curry with fresh chile peppers.

The versatility of curry sauces can range from tomato-based to yogurt-based, and contain a dozen or more spices. It is possible that the combined health protection provided by many spices and the wide variety of vegetables that Indian cooking also emphasizes is greater than any one of these healthy ingredients could be alone.

A: Each tablespoon of grated Parmesan cheese adds only 22 calories and just less than one gram of saturated fat. With a flavorful cheese like Parmesan or Romano, one tablespoon or less is plenty. If adding grated Parmesan leads you to eat the abundant portions of salads or vegetables that are linked to health benefits, including lower risk of cancer, heart disease and more, then go for it! Note that foods sprinkled with Parmesan cheese are much lower in fat and calorie content than baked dishes that include the Parmesan name (like Eggplant Parmesan). These dishes are generally smothered in mozzarella and Parmesan cheese. Standard recipes for these kinds of dishes are not at all low-fat.

A: Like all nuts, pistachios are a great snack, as long as you limit your portion size. If you stick with a one-third cup servinga small handfulyoull get about 230 calories. Thats a good snack size for most adults. These nuts include protein and carbohydrate that are released slowly into your blood, providing the kind of energy that should hold you for several hours. Pistachios are low in saturated fat, so they are heart-healthy. They contain mostly monounsaturated fat, a good choice to include in a diet to lower cancer risk. The unsalted kind is preferable, since sodium content is almost nil. Even if you eat the salted variety, sodium is still only a third of what youd get in a one-ounce serving of pretzels. Serve the portion you want to eat and put the rest away, however, or you could keep snacking on the pistachios and calories could add up quickly.

Studies show that strategies to save money, such as buying store-brand products and buying in quantity, are often not possible where rural, low-income families shop. Families with limited income are also more likely to choose fatty cuts of meat and poultry, which are usually cheaper than leaner cuts, and smaller amounts of fruits and vegetables. Childrens dietary staples are often nonperishables, such as salty snacks, candy and soft drinks.Simply increasing the availability of healthy food may increase its consumption. In a study that gave vouchers for fruits and vegetables to young mothers in a Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants and Children (WIC) in Los Angeles, 90 percent of the vouchers were redeemed.Communities are working to improve the availability of healthy foods in a variety of ways, including community gardens, farmers markets and vans that distribute fresh produce. Food recovery or gleaning programs can also improve access to nutritional foods. These programs collect and redistribute foods that would have potentially gone to waste. Recovery programs include collecting leftover crops from fields, perishable produce from retail sources and prepared foods from restaurants. Several organizations, such as Americas Second Harvest and Foodchain, coordinate delivering the recovered food to local distribution sources. Businesses can participate by donating excess prepared foodsfrom the cafeteria or special eventsto recovery programs. Companies or individuals can donate transportation, maintenance work, and computer services that these programs need. Those who want to become involved in food gleaning programs can call 1-800-GLEAN-IT or visit the Food Recovery web site at www.usda.gov/news/pubs/gleaning/content.htm.

An estimated 148,000 Americans will be diagnosed with colon cancer in 2006. Having a close relative with colon cancer or an adenoma (noncancerous growth) clearly marks you as someone who needs to be extra watchful. Lack of family history, however, is no reprieve. Seventy-five percent of colon cancer patients seem to have no inherited risk. Fortunately, many of the factors that increase colon cancer risk are habits you can change. Studies show that change of habit does change risk.Consider first processed meats, such as bacon, sausage and hot dogs. In one large study, those who ate even 4 to 8 ounces of processed meat per week showed a 13 percent increase in colorectal cancer compared to those who ate no processed meat. In another study, eating nearly three ounces a day raised colorectal cancer risk 42 percent. In these same studies, people who ate more than three to four ounces per day of red meat  beef, pork and lamb  had at least 15 percent more colorectal cancer than those who ate less than 7 ounces a week. Laboratory studies have suggested several mechanisms by which these meats may raise cancer risk. Nitrites that some processed meats contain may form cancer-causing compounds. Higher cancer risk could come from red meat's higher heme irona form of iron especially high in red meats. This iron is associated with damage to the colon lining and stimulating inappropriate cell growth. Meat is also associated with forming cancer-causing compounds in the gut. Another influence on colon cancer risk is the fat you eat. Studies suggest that more saturated fat, from fatty meat, ice cream, high-fat cheese and milk, may trigger increased production of insulin and growth factors that seem to promote colon tumor growth. In contrast, diets high in omega-3 fats found particularly in fish such as salmon, albacore tuna and rainbow trout may decrease inflammation that may lead to colon cancer, and may increase the self-destruction of cancer cells.Monounsaturated fats like olive oil do not seem to affect colon cancer risk unless you use so much that calorie intake becomes too high to maintain a healthy weight. Excess weight is strongly linked to colon cancer, especially for men, premenopausal women and those with excess fat centered at the waist. If your weight is too high, look for a few simple changes you can adopt for the long-term, such as 25 percent smaller portions, shifting to a plant-based diet with lots of vegetables, cutting back on sweetened drinks and high-calorie snacks, and adding daily physical activity.If youre not getting 5 to 10 servings of vegetables and fruits and at least 3 servings of whole grains each dayall sources of fiberconsider that a risk. Not all population studies show an effect of fiber on colon cancer risk. However, laboratory studies show a variety of ways that fiber may protect the cells of our colon from cancer-causing substances. Also, recent population studies have shown an approximate 25 percent decrease in colon cancer and precancerous growths in those who meet current fiber recommendations. Many researchers have found that eating foods high in fiber, which also supply a wide array of protective vitamins and phytochemicals, provide benefits that adding fiber supplements do not. Regular moderate activity such as brisk walking for 30 to 60 minutes a day doesnt just help weight control. Regular exercise brings changes in various hormones and growth factors that lower risk of colon cancer 40 to 50 percent.Overall lifestyle matters. A study, published in 2003, examined nutritional data collected from more than 76,000 nurses every few years from 1984 to 1994. After following the women through 1996, the study found that the women who most fit the Western diet that emphasizes red and processed meats, sweets, and refined grains were 46 percent more likely to develop colon cancer than those who ate this way the least.

Preheat the oven to 375 degrees F.In a large mixing bowl, toss the pears with the cranberries, maple syrup, nutmeg and lemon juice until the fruit is coated evenly. Transfer the pears to a 7 x 11-inch baking dish.In another bowl, whisk together the two flours, the sugar, cinnamon and salt to combine them. Work in the butter, using a pastry cutter or a fork. When the mixture resembles wet sand, mix in the oats. Sprinkle the topping over the pears and using your fingers, pat it firmly into an even layer.Bake the crumble for 40-45 minutes, until the topping is brown at the edges and golden beige in the center of the pan. (This crumble does not brown on top, but a light browning can be achieved if the top is lightly coated with canola oil spray about halfway through the baking process.) Cool the crumble on a rack. Serve it warm or at room temperature. The crumble should be served the day it is made. Makes 10 servings. Per serving: 234 calories, 5 g. total fat (less than 3 g. saturated fat), 46 g. carbohydrate, 3 g. protein, 4 g. dietary fiber, 63 mg. sodium Something Different is written for the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) by Dana Jacobi, author of The Joy of Soy and recipe creator for AICRs Stopping Cancer Before It Starts.

Sweeten the Pot with Honey from the American Institute for Cancer Research Add a little sweetness to this autumns harvest vegetables. After all, September is the peak of the honey harvest, too, and honey goes very nicely with many end-of-season vegetables. Honey is simply the sweet liquid made by bees from flower nectar. Liquid honey is taken from the honeycomb and is often pasteurized to keep it from crystallizing. Whipped or creamed honey, on the other hand, is deliberately crystallized in a controlled way that keeps it spreadable at room temperature. If liquid honey crystallizes, it can be reliquefied by placing the opened jar either in a microwave on high for about 30 seconds or in a pan of hot water over low heat for 10 to 15 minutes.There are more than 300 different honeys available in the United States, each one from a different floral source. They are usually named for the flower they come from. Colors range from nearly colorless to dark brown and flavors from mild to strong. Generally, the lighter the honey, the milder the flavor. Honey is often used as a spread for bread and as a sweetener and flavoring agent for liquids and for both sweet and savory foods. You can even get honey in its natural packaging the edible comb.Many vegetables contain natural sugars that are heightened by browning them on the stove, by oven-roasting or by broiling or grilling. A little honey makes them even sweeter. Throw in some apple and you have a side dish with a rich, intense, sweet taste.Each type of fruit or vegetable contains its own profile of nutrients and health-protective phytochemicals that fight chronic disease such as cancer, diabetes, stroke and heart disease. The varied textures and flavors of a variety of fruits and vegetables can complement each other and create a dish that is complex, healthful and delicious. Honey adds a little extra sweetness to the mix, along with small amounts of vitamins, minerals and antioxidants. In the following recipe, parsnips, sweet potatoes and apples are roasted in a honey-based sauce for a sweet and satisfying fall side dish.

Rice Makes the World Go Round from the American Institute for Cancer Research Throughout the world, rice is one of civilizations most important foods and helps sustain two-thirds of the earths people. Current dietary guidelines emphasize eating whole grains every day. Rice is a good place to start.A whole grain means all three parts of the grain kernel (germ, bran and endosperm) are intact. So brown rice is a whole grain while white rice is not. Refined grains have their inner and outer layers, the germ and bran, removed, leaving only the starchy endosperm.Research shows that people who eat at least three servings of whole grains a day have a lower risk of heart disease, diabetes and cancer and seem to maintain a healthy weight more easily.Whole grains contain substances linked to reduced cancer risk. These include fiber and hundreds of health-protective phytochemicals, natural substances found in plants. Whole grains are higher in fiber and can have ten times the amount of vitamin E; four times the potassium, magnesium and zinc; three times the vitamin B-6, and twice the selenium of refined grains.The American Institute for Cancer Research urges Americans to fill at least two-thirds of their plate with the plant-based foods that actively fight chronic disease while reserving one-third or less of the plate for meat, poultry or fish. Grains are an important part of the equation.A grain-based dish can be as full of flavor as it is of health-protective substances. Whole grains can provide the foundation of a one-dish meal featuring the textures and colors of other plant-based ingredients, as in the following recipe.

Cook the beans in boiling water for 3 minutes. Drain the beans in a colander. Immediately plunge the beans into a bowl of ice water to set their color and crisp them. Drain the beans, pat dry and place them in a medium bowl. Add the tomatoes, onion and chives.In a small bowl, whisk together the vinegar, salt and pepper until the salt dissolves. Whisk in the oil. Pour the dressing over the salad, and toss until evenly coated. Let the salad sit for 15 minutes to allow the flavors to blend. Divide the salad among 4 salad plates. Sprinkle one-fourth of the basil over each salad, and serve immediately.Makes 4 servings (about 4 cups). Per serving: 59 calories, 3 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 9 g. carbohydrate, 2 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 301 mg. sodiumNote: Save any dressing that collects in the bottom of the bowl as the salad sits. It is good the next day, with a little olive oil added, as dressing on a leafy green salad.

Flax seeds may be small but they are big players in the nutrition world. An ancient crop dating back to 3000 B.C., the seeds of the flax plant are packed with three substances that research studies show may lower cholesterol and reduce the risk of heart disease and cancer.

These reddish brown seeds contain fiber, which regulates colon function, reduces cholesterol and may protect against several types of cancer. They also provide alpha-linolenic acid, an omega-3 fatty acid linked to lower risk of heart disease and cancer.

Flaxseed is available in four user-friendly forms: ground seeds, oil, flour, or meal. Whole seeds do not provide as much nutrition as other forms because they are difficult to crack when eating and can pass through the body undigested. You can grind your own after buying them whole, or buy a package of already ground flaxseed. All flaxseed should be stored in the refrigerator and used within 3-4 weeks.

Top a salad with some ground flaxseed or sprinkle it on top of low-fat yogurt, fruit smoothies, or cereal. Stir a teaspoon into your soup. It also can be a substitute for a tablespoon or two of the flour when youre making breads, cookies, or muffins (recipe follows).

The oil from flaxseed does not naturally contain lignans, although some manufacturers add them; it also does not contain fiber. But the oil does have healthful omega-3 fats. Flaxseed oil works best in cold foods like salad dressings and should not be used for frying because it burns easily. Flaxseed flour and meal have a nutty flavor and a coarse texture. Its a good idea to refrigerate flaxseed oil, flour and meal as well as ground seeds.

Some critics say that portion size remains a problem in the fast-food sector  even when it comes to salads. They encourage diners to ask for the smallest size possible and check the menus nutritional information to select the most healthful items.

Collins also warns against the temptation to reward yourself for eating just a salad. We play mind games with ourselves. People will use having a salad to justify getting a large order of fries, she says. Or, after being so good at the salad meal, they feel justified in eating excessively later on in the day.

Kernels of TruthAll grains, from the familiar (wheat, oats, rye, corn) to the less well-known (barley, bulgur, millet, quinoa) start out as kernels. The bran is the outermost layer of the kernel and its where most of the fiber is found. The germ is at the kernels center, and its where a lot of the good stuff resides vitamins, minerals, fatty acids. In between is the endosperm, which contains a few vitamins and minerals and most of the starch.

And starch is really what youre getting when you eat white bread, or white rice, or anything made from refined flour. Sure, it makes things light and fluffy. Thats why it became so popular in the first place, and a symbol of wealth and prestige.

In fact, nobles throughout history enjoyed their soft and airy (if nutritionally lacking) breads and cakes, while the working classes traditionally ate breads made from unrefined flour that were heartier . .. not to mention heart-healthier.

Whole grain products are darker, chewier and more flavorful, because all three layers of the kernel are ground together to make the flour. They provide the kernels full complement of protein, antioxidants, fatty acids and a host of phytochemicals. Most importantly, perhaps, the fiber content of whole grains can be as much as four times that of refined grains.

The evidence for whole grains specifically lowering cancer risk is less strong, although a large 2003 European study with over half a million participants found that high consumption of fiber (from fruits, vegetables and whole grains) reduced risk for colon cancer by 25 percent.

Recently, a Cornell University researcher discovered that whole grains are packed with more antioxidants than was previously expected. These potent health-promoting substances bind directly to the two layers (the germ and the bran) that are discarded in the refining process.

The results of such population studies sent researchers to the laboratory to see exactly what it is in fish that reduces cancer risk. Research conducted in test tubes or with laboratory animals showed that the omega-3 fatty acids, so plentiful in cold-water fish, impede the development of cancer in several ways.

Once paired with certain enzymes, omega-3 fatty acids break down into molecules that reduce the production of compounds that promote cancer. They also promote apoptosis (cancer cell suicide) and impede the growth of the blood vessels tumors need to survive.

Omega-3s also thwart the cancer-promoting activity of omega-6 fatty acids. These fatty acids have almost identical structures and pair with the same enzymes. When omega-6s do so, they break down into molecules that promote inflammation, stimulate cells to multiply and suppress apoptosis. By competing for those same enzymes, omega-3s limit the effect of omega-6s and reduce the likelihood of cancer developing.

All of this molecular activity has been demonstrated in the laboratory. But the experts want to see evidence that these same processes occur in the human body. To test this, researchers conduct observational studies (such as cohort studies) and intervention studies (such as clinical trials). They follow or manage the dietary intake of fish among a large number of individuals and relate that to their cancer incidence.

Perhaps the best reason to eat these and other fish on a regular basis is that they are good sources of protein without the heavy dose of saturated fat and calories that usually come with it. AICR recommends that people concerned with reducing cancer risk and managing their weight cover 2/3 (or more) of their plate with vegetables, fruit, whole grains and beans and 1/3 (or less) animal protein. One of the best possible choices for that 1/3 or less is fish.

Put the bell peppers, zucchini and carrot in a medium bowl. Add the basil, garlic, orange zest, vinegar, oil, salt and cayenne. Toss the ingredients well to combine. Set the mixture aside to marinate.Cook the pasta according to the package instructions. Meanwhile, prepare the mushrooms. Cut the edges off each mushroom to make squares. Discard edges or save for later use. Halve each square. Slice away the brown undersides, including the gills, and discard. Then slice the mushrooms into long, thin strips and add them to the bowl with the marinated vegetables. Toss well, until the mushrooms are moist and start to soften.Drain the pasta and divide it among 6 shallow bowls or plates. Top each serving with an equal share of the vegetables. Spoon the marinating liquid over the vegetables. Garnish with the parsley and serve.Makes 6 servings. Per serving: 252 calories, 4 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 47 g. carbohydrate, 10 g. protein, 9 g. dietary fiber, 208 mg. sodium.

A Saucy Way to Eat from the American Institute for Cancer Research There are many easy ways to meet your daily fruit and vegetable requirements.You can add fruit to dinner salads and breakfast cereals. You can snack on a variety of vegetables. And you can eat salsa.Salsa is the Mexican word for sauce. It is traditionally made with tomatoes, chiles and cilantro. It can, however, be made from just about anything. Fresh salsas are a great way to use summer fruits and vegetables and can be kept refrigerated for up to a week. Try these or invent your own.

Mix together all ingredients in a bowl. Refrigerate 1 to 3 hours to allow flavors to fully develop and meld before serving. Makes 5 servings. Per serving: 60 calories, 3 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 9 g. carbohydrate, less than 1 g. protein, 1 g. dietary fiber, 3 mg. sodium.

Color is the Healthy Way to Healthful Eating from the American Institute for Cancer Research Summer is the season to eat in color.The seasons fruits and vegetables are at their peak. Markets display ripe nectarines, plums, tomatoes and peppers. So the summer plate should be colorful too.Eating in color is a healthier, as well as prettier, way to eat. The deeper the color of vegetables and fruits, the more likely they are to be high in nutrients and health-protective phytochemicals.Nutritionists have encouraged people to sample the spectrum of color available this season. Doing so makes it more likely you will eat the five to nine daily servings of vegetables and fruit that AICRs health experts recommend. Colorful vegetables and fruit have been found to contain the essential vitamins, minerals, fiber and the phytochemicals that are found only in plant foods all of which your body needs to stay healthy. The more colors on the plate, the healthier the meal.Deep orange and bright yellow signal the presence of the phytochemical carotenoids, including beta carotene, powerful antioxidants thought to reduce the risk of cancer and heart disease. Those colors can also indicate a rich source of vitamin C. Bright pinks and deep reds add lycopene, a powerful antioxidant also believed to fight some cancers and heart disease. Green vegetables are rich in other phytochemicals. The carotenoids lutein and zeaxanthin are found in spinach, collards, kale and broccoli. The antioxidants found in these healthful greens and other cruciferous vegetables may fight cancer. Even some white food is good for you. Allilum vegetables such as onions, garlic, chives, scallions and leeks contain phytochemicals that have health-protective qualities.This spinach and shrimp salad displays a mini-rainbow of colors: green, orange, gold, red and white, a feast for the eye and the body.

Place shrimp in a large saucepan filled with cold water. Bring to a boil over medium-high heat. When shrimp have turned pink and curled, drain and peel them. Remove their veins. Halve each shrimp lengthwise and set aside. Arrange a quarter of the spinach in a bed on each of 4 dinner plates. (If using flat-leaf spinach, first tear it into bite-size pieces.) Arrange 4 nectarine slices on each bed of spinach. Cut pepper halves into strips. Cut strips into thirds. Arrange one-fourth on top of nectarine slices. Arrange one-fourth of the shrimp over the peppers. Separate onions into rings and arrange over shrimp.For the dressing, whisk orange and lime juices in a small bowl with turmeric and oregano. Whisk in oil. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Spoon 2 tablespoons dressing over each salad. Sprinkle oregano on top and serve. (Salad can be assembled and dressing made up to 4 hours ahead. Cover with plastic wrap and refrigerate. Dress and garnish just before serving.)Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 160 calories, 3 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 17 g. carbohydrate, 16 g. protein, 4 g. dietary fiber, 184 mg. sodium.

These days, many cookbooks recommend eating a variety of fruits and vegetables in a rainbow of colors. Some actually present their recipes grouped by color, based on a main ingredient, such as yellow for corn chowder.Looking at these books, I think of what my grandmother would have said and I smile. Strongly opinionated, she followed some heath-food gurus who held extreme views. Trying to reason with her led to years of heated but friendly arguments about what is good for you.White foods were strictly taboo. Grandma knew that for artists, color theory defined white as the absence of color. She insisted that in food, white also meant a lack of nutritional value. Overlooking the goodness of chicken breast, halibut and other white fish, she fastened on the nutrition deficiencies in white bread and white rice, which do, admittedly, provide many fewer health benefits than whole-grain bread and rice. She also scorned mashed potatoes. Before pasta became popular, some Americans ate mashed potatoes every day, preferably prepared with a lavish amount of butter and sometimes cream as well. To Grandma, this meant eating three foods she considered killers. I wish she was still around so I could serve her healthy, smashed potatoes made with the skin on and using low-fat milk or heart-healthy olive oil.To heat up our debate, I loved to bring up cauliflower in our talks. I even made mashed cauliflower for her, seasoning it with garlic and olive oil, two foods she ate all the time. (I used roasted garlic.) Of course, she refused to eat it even though I pointed out that it provides many of the same nutrients as cabbage, which she loved, and was much better for us than mashed potatoes.I often use cauliflower to replace potatoes in other dishes as well. For a chunky no-potato salad with Scandinavian flavor, I combine blanched florets of cauliflower, cooled to room temperature, with diced apple, dill and a zesty mustard dressing.

My mother served steamed kale drizzled with melted butter. Kale can taste bitter, but the sweetness of the butter she used effectively offset it, so I grew up enjoying this incredibly healthy vegetable. These days, using butter so lavishly is out, so I have experimented to find other ways to make eating kale enjoyable. Serving tender, sweet kale, I find, depends on both what kind of kale you get and how you prepare it.There are many kinds of kale, and some start out more tender and milder-tasting than others. Curley kale, which has broad, dark green tough leaves with a lavishly ruffled edge, is most common. Many supermarkets also carry dinosaur or dino kale, which has a black-green color and long, straight leaves. Its name comes from the wrinkly, reptile-skin surface of its leaves. Lacinato is another common name for this kale, which is also called black kale, Tuscan kale and cavolo nero. Farmers markets often have feathery, soft-leafed Russian kale, which comes in green and red varieties. Because it is the most tender and has the mildest taste, Russian kale is the perfect choice for introducing this dark leafy green to your family. Heat wilts kale, so pick perky bunches with good color. Avoid leaves that are yellow, limp, or dull in color.

All kale has a tough central rib that tastes bitter, so removing most of it is important. One way is to lay each leaf on a cutting board and, holding a sharp knife at a low angle, run it along each side of the stem, which you can then lift away. Cooking kale until tender also makes it sweet. I usually steam or boil it, then saut? or braise it in broth until it is meltingly tender. Kale and sweet corn are a delicious combination. Try it in this recipe, taken from The New American Plate Cookbook.

Fitness waters are trying to muscle their way into the lives of consumers searching for healthful drink alternatives. These bulked-up beverages, also known as vitamin waters, are purportedly so packed with vitamins and minerals you might imagine youd have to chew them rather than drink them.

One of the Glaceau vitamin waters, Endurance, contains something called bioenergy ribose, which the company describes as the primary source of cellular energy and says it helps improve physical performance.

Gatorades Propel Fitness Water contains B vitamins, including B6, B12, niacin and pantothenic acid (which the company says aids in energy metabolism), as well as the antioxidant vitamins C and E. According to Gatorade, their research shows that people drink more and hydrate better when [the] beverage is lightly flavored. And when the crack research team and Gatorade, Inc. tells you something .

In fact, many people and organizations have already bought into this notion. Fitness waters will be among the beverages available to high school students under the new school vending policy that restricts drink selection to more healthful options and bans outright the sale of regular soft drinks.

A national agreement calls for beverage companies to sell only low-fat and nonfat milk, water, and unsweetened juice in elementary and middle schools by the 2009-2010 school year. The companies can sell fitness waters, diet and unsweetened teas, diet sodas, sports drinks, and light juice drinks in high schools.

Producers of fitness waters are luring consumers with claims that their beverages are an improvement on plain water and can boost everything from energy level to muscle mass. Fitness waters are even being used as mixers in bars. But are fitness waters a nutritious choice even if theyre not mixed with vodka?

In fact, consuming fitness waters may give consumers a false sense of nutritional confidence because they dont provide a full days supply of vitamins and minerals. These drinks cant substitute for a healthy diet or even a multivitamin pill, says Collins.

And when it comes vitamins, the more is better marketing campaign by fitness-water producers does not pan out in practice. We need to eat more fruits and vegetables anyway to get the protective phytochemicals and other vitamins. So the amount of vitamin C and other vitamins in these waters would bring us beyond the level where any additional benefit is seen, explains Collins.

Many are flavored and colored to make them more appealing, but these additives often mean additional calories. Fitness waters might be half the calories of regular soda pop, as they say, but its still a load of calories that doesnt satisfy hunger. Thats the last thing Americans need right now, notes Collins.

Such drinks may condition children to the idea that beverages should have a color and a flavor, she says. And despite the health claims of fitness-water producers, the best beverage choice for both kids and adults remains plain water.

Some say coffee killed the French novelist, Honore de Balzac. Of course, he consumed his coffee beans dry, pulverized and on an empty stomach in order to jolt his creative imagination. He died in 1850 of an ulcerated stomach. Had he consumed a moderate amount of coffee (3 cups or less a day) brewed in the usual fashion, he might have lived another 25 years.

Or would he? The debate over the health benefits and hazards of coffee seems to be both heated and endless. On a regular basis, research results suggesting a link between coffee or caffeine and some chronic disease are published and quoted on the evening news. Then more studies with contradictory results appear. In regard to cancer, coffee drinking has been accused of raising the risk of bladder, colorectal and pancreatic cancers.

Now Dr. Michael Mandola, a graduate fellow at the Cancer Institute of New Jersey, is investigating another possible tie between coffee and cancer. He is trying to determine to what degree caffeine interferes with chemotherapy the most common treatment prescribed for most cancers.

An unexpected result in the laboratory led Dr. Mandola to this field of study. He was working with a gene called MDR1, which is present in all cells, including cancer cells, and protects them against harmful agents. While studying how ultra-violet rays activate (up-regulate) MDR1, he treated cancer cells with caffeine, expecting the caffeine to block any activation. Instead, MDR1 was activated at four times the rate caused by UV radiation alone.

With funding from AICR, Dr. Mandola is determining just how caffeine activates MDR1. Then, in the second part of his study, he will trace the effect of caffeine on chemotherapy. This is where coffee again stands accused. After all, chemotherapy is an attempt to kill cancer cells. If the caffeine in coffee turns on MDR1, which protects cancer cells against harmful agents, it may reduce the effectiveness of the treatment.

Dr. Mandola will treat cancer cells with various levels of caffeine for different durations of time and expose them to chemotherapy drugs. He will then measure how much MDR1 is up-regulated at each treatment and how the up regulation correlates with the effectiveness of the chemotherapy drugs.

Because the effect of caffeine on cells is short-lived, Dr. Mandola is also investigating the long-term effects. He has treated cells with a low dose in a way that mimics moderate consumption of caffeine. After 24 hours, there was a two-fold increase in MDR1 activation. But after a period of months, there was an eight-fold increase.

If Dr. Mendolas research proves these concerns are real, people undergoing chemotherapy may be warned against consuming coffee and other caffeinated foods. But cheer up, you coffee lovers. It is caffeines health benefit its capacity to boost our cells innate defenses against harmful substancesthat is causing the problem here. Even if Dr. Mendolas hypothesis is proven correct, there would still be no reason for healthy people to throw away their coffee pots.

Another class of carcinogens is the polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs). PAHs dont occur within meat, but are instead formed when fat drips onto coals or stones. They are deposited back onto food by smoke and flare-ups.

Determining the Real RisksThe reason for that possibly lies in the gap between laboratory evidence and human evidence. Because the issue isnt if these substances can cause cancer  we know they can.

Cellular studies clearly reveal the molecular damage that HCAs and PAHs inflict on DNA. Animal studies allow researchers to pinpoint the relationship between differing amounts of these carcinogens in the diet and cancer risk.

But figuring out if theres such a thing as a safe dose of these carcinogens in the human diet is trickier. Animal studies can strongly suggest safe ranges of intake, and the data from large human populations are also helpful.

So-called incidence and mortality studies also come into play. These track cancer incidences and deaths among humans who were exposed to high levels of substances, either accidentally or because they worked around them all their lives.

But even with all this information, the gap between what we learn in the laboratory and what we learn from human research still persists. Cancer experts try to fill that gap with estimates of risk, but they are just that: estimates.

In labs and clinics across the country, many AICR researchers like Hillman are investigating how specific changes such as adding soy, garlic, fish oil or other foods to the diet may make it easier for conventional cancer therapies to target cancer cells, rendering treatment more safe and effective.

The process of making tumors more susceptible to the effects of therapy is called sensitization. It appears that specific foods or food components have the potential to make cancer cells more radiosensitive (susceptible to radiation) or chemosensitive (susceptible to chemotherapeutic agents).

Dr. Hillman has developed several cellular and animal models to study the interaction of soy and cancer therapy at the Karmanos Cancer Institute at the Wayne State University School of Medicine in Detroit, Michigan.

Dr. Hillmans work revealed that a combination of soy and radiation therapy is more effective against prostate cancer cells in laboratory experiments than radiation therapy alone. Dr. Hillman began looking at the issue of cancer treatment by studying the radiosensitization effects of genistein, a single soy component.

But when her experiments revealed that under specific conditions, isolated genistein showed a troubling potential to stimulate the spread of tumor cells (metastasis) from prostate tumors to lymph nodes, Dr. Hillman switched to a dried powder of whole soy. She found that whole soy produced the same positive effects of genistein (radiosensitization) without the negative effect on tumor spread.

In fact, Hillman and her colleagues determined the optimal dose and timing to maximize this anti-cancer effect in vitro. Cancer cells exposed to genistein before and after radiation therapy show the strongest likelihood to have their growth arrested during a phase of the life cycle just prior to cell division during which cells are known to be most susceptible to radiation.

In another paper appearing in the July issue of the journal Radiation Research, Hillman and her colleagues have found that this combination of genistein and radiation therapy is effective against different models of prostate cancer in mice. Treating established prostate tumors with genistein first, followed by radiation, and finishing up with continuous treatment with genistein, effectively controlled tumor growth. The combination inhibited the growth of prostate tumors and kept cancer from spreading to lymph nodes.

Importantly, feeding whole soy was not associated with the increased metastasis of cancer into the lymph nodes that was observed with genistein, even when whole soy was administered by itself, without radiation treatment. These findings were published earlier this year in the journal Radiotherapy and Oncology and in the Proceedings of the American Association for Cancer Research.

Because many different but interconnected factors influence cancer risk, and these factors take place over a lifetime, its more difficult for scientists who study cancer prevention to isolate the effects of specific dietary factors. In order to arrive at scientific consensus about the prevention of cancer, researchers instead pool many different studies of varying design to find commonalities among population, laboratory, and clinical data.

Promising Research, but Still PreliminaryDr. Hillman cautioned individuals who are currently undergoing prostate cancer therapy against loading up on soy foods or soy supplements without alerting their oncologists. More clinical data in human subjects are needed before advice about soy and supplements during treatment can be made, she said.

Until these ongoing clinical trials are completed, Dr. Hillman said, prostate cancer patients should always keep their doctors fully informed about their diet. Its clear that dietary factors can play a very important role perhaps never more important than during cancer treatment, Hillman said.

WASHINGTON, DC The one thing on which all nutritionists seem to agree is that consumption of vegetables and fruit helps fight many chronic diseases. Researchers trying to discover just how these plant foods bolster our immune systems have focused for some time on phytochemicals.

That is why AICR has just released a new brochure which explains phytochemical theory in laymens terms. Part of its Concepts in Cancer series, the new brochure explains an idea that many have heard of but few fully understand.

Phytochemicals are chemical compounds whose primary function is to provide protective coloring, odor, texture, or taste to the plants in which they are found. When ingested, they have a demonstrable effect on the chemical processes in humans.

Scientists have identified thousands of phytochemicals in plant foods, and many seem to be involved in protecting our bodies against disease. It is estimated, for instance, that a diet rich in phytochemicals can reduce cancer risk by 20 percent.

Phytochemicals work together in several senses. They may have an additive effect; that is, two or more performing the same function at the same time get more done. They may have a synergistic effect; that is, two enhance each others performance far beyond the capacity of each acting alone.

Perhaps the best known function of phytochemicals is elimination of free radicals that can cause DNA damage leading to cancer. In fact, phytochemicals act in at least eight different ways we know of to reduce cancer risk. These ways range from causing spontaneous cancer cell death (apoptosis) to regulating hormones.

What is known about phytochemicals derives from two kinds of research: population studies showing that people who eat more plant foods have less cancer and laboratory studies showing how chemical compounds in plants affect the progression of cancer.

Scientists are now attempting to verify phytochemical theory through human studies. This phase of the research is moving slowly because long-term intervention and observational studies are notoriously difficult to conduct in regard to diet.

Experts at AICR believe that when research methodology is fine-tuned and models for studying the effect of multiple chemicals simultaneously are perfected, the anticancer activity of phytochemicals will be demonstrated. Meanwhile, they recommend eating a mostly plant-based diet affording a great variety of phytochemicals in order to fight chronic disease and to manage weight.

Maybe youve had this experience: After arriving at a restaurant, ravenously hungry, you first eat a good-sized salad. Later, when the main course arrives, all you can do is nibble and pick at it. If this has happened to you, youve stumbled across a good weight management strategy. Research shows that starting with a large salad can help cut overall calorie consumption at a meal. But your approach to the meal, as well as the salads size and composition, make a difference.To prove that salads can cut calorie intake, Pennsylvania State University researchers gave women large, low-calorie salads (three cups total) for lunch before serving them the rest of the meal. The women ate about 100 calories less at these meals compared to meals when no salad was served. The salads included lettuce, grated carrots, tomato, celery and cucumber with limited amounts of reduced-fat dressing. The women needed to eat large, three-cup salads to reduce calorie intake by 100 calories. Salads half that size, which are more typical of American portions, reduced total calories by only about half as much.The salads must be low-calorie to help you manage your weight. When salads slightly higher in fat and calories were served in the Penn State study, overall calorie consumption at the meal stayed the same. Worse yet, large portions of higher-calorie salads with cheese and regular dressings actually increased overall calorie consumption at meals by 17 percent.But before you make large, low-calorie salads your primary weight loss strategy, examine your eating style. In a survey commissioned by the American Institute for Cancer Research, many people report that the amount they eat is not governed by hunger, but by how much food is on the plate. Many people automatically clean their plate, regardless of their appetite.If you are a plate cleaner, beware of serving yourself the regular amounts of dishes following the salad. To reduce the total number of calories you eat at a meal, you need to eat smaller portions of the remaining dishes. Your hunger should be satisfied with smaller portions. Furthermore, wait a bit before serving yourself the rest of the meal after the salad. In the Penn State study, the remaining food was served 20 minutes after the salad. That space gave the women time to recognize how much they had already eaten. If you eat quickly, you might still eat the same amount after a large salad, if your body lacks the time to sense its fullness.While eating large salads first may be a good strategy, simply including more filling, low-calorie foods in your meal should help cut calories, too. Small salads, hearty portions of one or more vegetables, even a broth- or tomato-based soup, are worth a try, as well as healthy. Along with your low-calorie foods, however, be sure that your meal includes some source of protein, whether it is meat, poultry, fish, dairy or vegetarian. Otherwise, within a few hours, youll be ready to eat again, and your calorie savings may be wiped out.As you should see, the success to a salad strategy for weight control depends upon proper food portions. By filling up primarily on low-calorie foods, like salads, vegetables or light soups, you can cut back on high-calorie, high-fat foods like meats and desserts. Thats one reason why you should switch to a diet that emphasizes vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans. This style of eating is the New American Plate program that the American Institute for Cancer Research advocates for weight control and better health.

Skin cancer rates and deaths are increasing dramatically around the world. One in five Americans will develop skin cancer during their lifetime, and one American dies from it every hour. Experts say that by far the most important ways for us to protect ourselves are by minimizing sunlight exposure and avoiding indoor tanning beds or lamps. Along with sun protection, a healthy diet may help.Ozone depletion seems to be leaving us more vulnerable to damage from ultraviolet (UV) radiation. This radiation causes formation of highly reactive free radicals within our bodies, damaging our cells in ways that increase the chance for cancer to develop. In theory, antioxidants like beta-carotene and other carotenoids might stabilize free radicals and end the damaging chain reactions they start.Recent studies have shown very mixed results on the impact of blood and dietary levels of antioxidant nutrients like the carotenoids, vitamins E and C, and selenium. These nutrients are absorbed from a balanced diet that focuses on colorful fruits and vegetables and whole grains, along with beans, nuts and seeds. Some studies have shown less skin cancer among people who eat diets rich in these substances, while others show no effect.Limiting dietary fat is a step supported by a number of studies as a smart move to lower risk of skin cancer. High-fat diets may increase cancer risk by suppressing the immune system, according to some evidence. Polyunsaturated fats, such as most vegetable oils, may pose the biggest risk. Consuming more polyunsaturated fat means that our body cells contain more polyunsaturated fat, which is a relatively unstable fat more vulnerable to free radicals than other fats.Excess alcohol has been linked with greater risk of melanoma skin cancers by some researchers. In one study, those who drank the most alcohol had 65 percent greater risk of melanoma than those who drank the least.Sunlight exposure reportedly causes 80 to 90 percent of skin cancer, which is why experts recommend sunscreens with a Sun Protection Factor (SPF) of at least 15. SPF of 30 to 60 may even be preferable, especially if you will be spending significant time outdoors. Researchers say that most of us apply too little and forget that we need to reapply it every three hours when were outdoors, and sooner if we swim or sweat. Experts also note that while sunscreens are a valuable tool, their use is just one part of an overall strategy that also includes limited time in the sun and protective clothing. Some consumers believe that if they dont tend to get sunburns, sunlight is not damaging their skin and putting them at risk. Its true that highest skin cancer risks seem to fall on those with fair skin or family history of skin cancer. But studies now show that our risk is based on the intensity of sunlight exposure over a lifetime, even for those who tan but dont burn. Experts sometimes say, The only safe tan comes from a bottle. They are referring to sunless self-tanners, which contain an ingredient (DHA) that oxidizes on the outermost layers of the skin, giving the look of a tan. The American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) recommends a mostly plant-based diet with five to ten daily servings of a variety of fruits and vegetables to lower overall cancer risk. That includes some protection against skin cancer, but be sure to take the other vital precautions as well: avoid sun and indoor tanning, cover up with hats and long-sleeved clothing, and use sunscreen liberally.

Preheat oven to 350 degrees. Spray a large shallow baking dish with canola spray. Scoop out flesh from eggplants, cut into chunks and reserve. Sprinkle inside of the shells lightly with 1/4 teaspoon with salt. Place upside down on paper towels. Let stand 15 minutes. Meanwhile, spray large skillet with cooking spray. Cook garlic and onion over medium-high heat until browned, about 10 minutes. Add tomatoes, reserved eggplant flesh and allspice. Cook over medium heat, stirring frequently, until just tender, about 10 minutes. Stir in parsley, lemon juice, remaining salt and pepper. Pat eggplant shells dry with paper towels. Spoon eggplant mixture loosely into shells. Place filled shells in prepared baking dish. Cover with foil and bake until shells are tender, about 40 minutes. Remove foil; sprinkle tops evenly with feta cheese. Bake for 10 more minutes, then serve.Makes 8 servings. Per serving: 71 calories, 2 g. total fat (1 g. saturated fat), 12 g. carbohydrate, 3 g. protein, 5 g. dietary fiber, 236 mg. sodium.

Mangoes are Popular, Versatile from the American Institute for Cancer Research Once an exotic tropical fruit, the mango is now almost as common as the apple.Mangoes appear in salsas, chutneys, smoothies and fruit salads as well as puddings, tarts and cakes. They are such a versatile fruit in cooking that their popularity continues to grow. They also are delicious eaten with no embellishment.Mangoes are rich in nutrients and fiber. They also are an excellent source of beta-carotene and vitamins A, C and D.Mangoes have been cultivated in India where the mango tree is considered sacred since at least 2000 BC. Now the fruit is grown in temperate climates all over the world, including Florida and California.Mangoes can be oblong or round and weigh from six ounces to four pounds. Their thin, tough, green skin turns yellow with red mottling as the fruit ripens. The flesh of the mango is bright orange and has a rich, sweet taste with a hint of lime.When choosing mangoes, look for fruit with unblemished yellow skin with a red blush. Gently squeeze the nose of the fruit and, if there is a slight give, the mango is ripe. Mangoes can be stored in a cool place but not refrigerated for up to two weeks. The green, unripe fruit is used in the cooking of India, Malaysia and Thailand.Mangoes are in season from May to September, but imported fruit is available sporadically throughout the year. In addition to their many uses in cooking, mangoes make a fine sandwich ingredient.And a more versatile version of the sandwich is a wrap. Add some mango to a turkey wrap for a light summer lunch or dinner. Its cool, refreshing and fast three summer requirements.Turkey lends itself particularly well to a variety of seasonings and condiments. It also is a meat that goes well with many fruits. Wrap thin slices of turkey, along with lots of thinly sliced vegetables, in a whole-wheat tortilla and youre on your way to a healthful lunch. The following recipe pairs turkey with mango in a light curried mayonnaise and, for a change, uses a pita pocket rather than a tortilla.

Using a blender or food processor, blend oil with garlic, lemon juice and capers. Transfer to a non-metal container. Add fish and marinate 20 to 30 minutes, turning fish once in the process.Meanwhile, prepare the grill or preheat the broiler. Remove fish from marinade and pat dry with paper towelling. Season with salt and pepper. (If using an indoor grill, spray fish lightly with olive oil or canola oil spray.)Grill the fish about 4 to 5 minutes per side, depending on thickness of fish, or until fish is opaque in the center. (Fish usually takes about 10 minutes per inch of thickness to cook through.) Dont overcook or fish will be dry. Serve with wedges of fresh lemon, either hot or at room temperature.Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 169 calories, 8 g. total fat (2 g. saturated fat), 3 g. carbohydrate, 21 g. protein, less than 1 g. dietary fiber, 223 mg. sodium.

A new government-commissioned report urges restaurants and food retailers to face up to their role in the raging obesity epidemic, and take action. Thats something AICR, concerned about the clear connection between obesity and cancer, has been saying for a long time.

In fact, the lead article in the Summer 2006 AICR Newsletter, Putting Portions in Perspective, reviews the historical gap between what restaurants and food retailers say about their efforts to confront obesity and what theyve actually done.

AICRs New American Plate program helps individuals combat oversized portions by arming them with tools they can use. Click here to read what the brochure has to say about portion size, and to try the AICR Serving Size Finder.

A treadmill can give you a regular aerobic workout that is personalized to your needs. You can easily regulate your speed, how long you exercise and how steep an incline you want to tread.There are more advantages to these machines. Since you use them indoors, you avoid any safety and weather hazards outdoors. Their electronic screens tell you how many calories you are burning, how fast you are going and how much distance you are covering. Many treadmills even have preset programs to automatically vary speeds and incline levels.Before you start any exercise program, like using a treadmill, you should check with your doctor. Another important fact to remember is: Don't hold onto the handrails while you tread.Gripping May Produce PainWhen you're on a treadmill, you may think you need to hold on to keep from falling. Yet holding on may cause some painful problems.Gripping handrails overstretches your back muscles and compresses your chest muscles. The result is a slumped posture. If you already stoop, holding on will worsen it. Holding on can also wrench the muscles and joints in your upper body when you grip the front bar and lean far forward, or hold on with only one hand. Your shoulder and hip joints may also over-rotate, which can lead to repetitive stress injuries.Another reason to let go: Walking hands-off burns about 20 percent more calories, enabling better weight control and, therefore, lower risk of cancer and other diseases. Hands-free treading also avoids raising your blood pressure - which may occur if you grip tightly, especially at a fast speed (3.5 miles per hour or more).Tips for Treading WellIf you're afraid you'll lose your balance or get dizzy, slow your speed - to 2 mph, if necessary. Balancing is part of exercise and your body becomes more efficient only when challenged.If the machine tells you to "hold on for heart rate" because it uses sensors when you grip, let go after checking your heart rate. If you're holding on because "everybody else does it," remember that popularity doesn't make it right.Holding on, when using the incline feature, causes your body to tilt back at the same angle, canceling out the slope effect. Leaning forward won't correct this problem if you're gripping, because you are, in effect, pulling yourself forward. Your arms act as anchors while your legs get a free ride, even if your speed and incline settings are set high.Start out slowly and just let go. Pump your arms to keep them moving. Concentrate on correct posture. As your body adjusts to treading hands-free, you should increase the speed or incline over time to get a better workout.

Soup is known mostly as a winter comfort food and a "cure" for the common cold, but it can be a quick meal or a first course anytime of the year. In a varied and healthy diet, this versatile food can supply many of the different nutrients necessary for your health and well-being. You can fit more servings of vegetables into your diet with soup. And you can easily make it the main course by adding a good source of protein to meet your nutritional needs and keep your hunger satisfied. One excellent source is beans. In addition to protein, beans supply fiber and a whole variety of vitamins and minerals that today's meals may lack. Be sure to drain and rinse cans of beans before adding them to soup to eliminate excess sodium.The Many Benefits of BeansA half-cup serving of almost all types of cooked dried beans provides seven to eight grams of protein, which is equal to the amount in an ounce of meat. One-half cup of beans also provides three to four grams of fiber, regardless of the variety you choose. Almost all dried beans are extremely low in fat.Beans are also a good source of folate, which has been associated with a decreased risk for cancers of the breast, cervix, lung and esophagus. Magnesium, which has been linked to lower blood pressure, is plentiful in beans. And there are flavonoids - phytochemicals that seem to protect against both cancer and heart disease. Flavonoids are found primarily in the color pigments of the beans' skins. Darker beans (like black and red beans) seem to offer more antioxidant protection than yellow and white beans (like navy, pinto and Great Northern beans).Give your body a dose of good health with this bean-inspired springtime soup.

Our best chance to control colon cancer is to prevent - or detect and remove - a certain type of polyp before it becomes malignant. Colorectal polyps are extra bits of tissue, generally shaped like a mushroom or a small dome, growing inside the colon (large intestine) or rectum. These polyps are common. An estimated 30 to 40 percent of adults over the age of 50 develop them. Most are noncancerous and will never develop into cancer. However, one type known as adenomatous polyps, or adenomas, can become cancerous. About 95 percent of colon cancers develop from these benign polyps. Yet they are easily removed. However, less than half of people 50 and older follow national guidelines for colorectal screenings, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.When to Start ScreeningRectal bleeding or blood in the stool, which can make the stool black or streaked with red, can indicate the presence of a polyp. However, most polyps produce no symptoms at all. They are found only with a routine screening test, or a procedure conducted for other reasons that look into the colon.Some researchers say that it takes at least five years for a benign polyp to become cancerous, so frequent screenings are unnecessary. Health experts recommend that you begin having colorectal screening tests at age 50, or sooner if you or a family member has a history of polyps or colon cancer. Your physician can create a screening schedule appropriate for you, based on your individual level of risk.Prevention is the Better CourseInstead of detecting and removing polyps, it would be better to prevent them. Smoking, excessive alcohol consumption, a sedentary lifestyle and overweight all appear to increase polyp formation. If you are overweight or practice one of these risky behaviors, gradually try to change your habits to live more healthfully.To lower your colon cancer risk more, you should eat a lowfat, mostly plant-based diet. This kind of fiber-rich diet that is full of various vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans is commonly associated with a lower risk of colon cancer. Eating a diet like this might inhibit colon cancer in several ways, such as decreasing polyp formation, slowing the growth of polyps, or blocking their transition from benign to cancerous.For the best protection, you should limit red meat consumption and meet the current recommendations for folate. Folate is found in dark green leafy vegetables, orange juice and other plant foods, and it's often low in American diets. Calcium and vitamin D are also important. Most adults can meet current recommendations for calcium and vitamin D by having three cups of nonfat or lowfat milk a day. If you're over age 50 or don't drink much milk, consider other fortified foods or supplements.

The latest report card on the American diet tells us a lot about the food choices we've been making. If we reshape our eating patterns, we could improve our nutrient intake and lower our risk of cancer and other health problems.Low in Vitamins, Minerals and FiberThe new publication that details our nutritional shortcomings is called What We Eat in America. It's published by the U.S. Department of Agriculture and based on a dietary survey of almost 9,000 people. The survey showed that almost a third of us get too little vitamin C, almost half get too little vitamin A, more than half get too little magnesium, and at least 92 to 97 percent get too little fiber and potassium. These particular nutrients are important because they help lower the risk of our major health problems: cancer, heart disease, high blood pressure and diabetes. To keep our blood vessels healthy and block several steps in the cancer process, the survey indicates that all of us need to expand our produce choices and learn to enjoy more dark green and orange vegetables and more fruits. Most of us should try to eat from three-and-a-half to five cups of vegetables and fruits each day.Almost all of the shortfalls identified by this survey can be corrected by eating a balanced, mostly plant-based diet, which the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) recommends for cancer prevention. How to eat this way is explained at AICR's website, www.aicr.org.Part of this healthy diet includes eating more whole grains. If we aim for three or four servings of whole grains a day, we can get more of the nutrients our diets are low in, like magnesium, potassium and fiber. Although you don't have to give up all refined grains when choosing your breads, cereals, rice and pasta, refined carbohydrates are less nutritious. The calories from too many refined flour products, like cakes, cookies and pastries, can also make weight control more difficult.A Calcium and Vitamin D Deficit, TooTwo common nutritional deficiencies found in the survey can't be fixed by eating more vegetables, fruits and whole grains. To remedy shortages of calcium and vitamin D, from the age of nine onward we need three daily servings of dairy or calcium-fortified juice, cereal, or soymilk. These servings provide the calcium linked with sturdy bones, blood pressure control and possibly less colon cancer. For the elderly and anyone else who is advised to aim for the highest intake levels of vitamin D, a supplement may be needed.Although a vitamin D supplement may be wise for some people, you shouldn't immediately think of using supplements when you hear about common nutritional problems. By eating a mostly plant-based diet that's recommended for lower cancer risk, your food choices will supply most of the nutrients that are missing.

Going Berry PickingThe amount of freeze-dried fruit that most people eat - the few pieces in a bowl of cereal poured from a box - is too little to count as a serving of fruit. To get a real nutritional impact from fruit in your cereal, you need to add more fresh, frozen, dried, or freeze-dried fruit. A serving of diced, cooked, or frozen fruit is one-half cup. A serving of dried fruit is one-quarter cup.You can buy bulk packages of freeze-dried fruits at websites, outdoor gear stores and some large grocery stores. In addition to adding them to cold or hot cereals, you can use them as highly portable snacks in trail mixes, or put them in pancakes, cobblers, or hot oatmeal. You can even experiment with adding them to baked goods like cookies, muffins and quick breads.Although freeze-dried fruits provide both nutrients and phytochemicals, they seem to be lower in vitamins that are prone to breakdown, like vitamin C, than fresh and frozen fruits. More research is needed to clarify the actual differences. Until then, fresh, frozen, dried, freeze-dried and even canned fruits without added sugars are all good ways to meet the daily recommendation of three to four fruit servings.

Experts now believe that an energy balance is crucial to our overall health. In this state, a person's calorie intake is roughly equal to his or her calorie expenditure. When a person uses less energy than he or she takes in, the excess energy is stored in fat cells. Scientists call this state a positive balance. Most Americans exist in a perpetual state of positive energy balance. Nearly two-thirds of us are now overweight or obese.

Balance Your FoodsThere is a lot of scientific support for the advice to eat less and exercise more. A wealth of evidence from many different studies suggests that keeping an energy balance reduces your risk for cancer and other diseases, while it also prevents weight gain. Achieving and maintaining an energy balance involves calories, but you don't have to become obsessed with counting them. Simply alter what you put on your plate so you take in less energy. At the same time, reshape your day so you use more energy. To remake your plate, start by increasing the proportion of vegetables, fruit, whole grains and beans you eat at every meal. Fill your plate with at least 2/3 plant foods and 1/3 or less meat and dairy products. Hearty portions of plant foods provide vitamins, minerals and natural phytochemicals that help defend your cells from the kind of damage that can lead to cancer.

Smaller than a lima bean, edamame (eh-dah-MAH-meh) are immature soybeans that can be served in their pods or shelled. They're a trendy food that fits perfectly into a mostly plant-based diet that research suggests reduces the risk of cancer and other diseases. You can find fresh or frozen edamame soybeans at many grocery stores. Edamame must be cooked before serving. If the edamame soybeans you buy are uncooked, boil them in water for 7 to 8 minutes until tender.

A Many Purpose BeanIn Japan and China, edamame soybeans are popular as snacks served in the shell. You need to pop the beans out before eating them. Shelled edamame can be added to salads, stir-fries and mixed vegetable side dishes. Or put them in soups during the last ten minutes of simmering. They replace peas beautifully in casseroles.Although edamame soybeans look like vegetables and have a buttery, nutty flavor similar to baby lima beans, they are a healthy meat substitute. A half-cup of cooked beans, which is one serving, contains 11 grams of protein and four grams of fiber. Small portions of them are very satisfying. Like other soy foods, edamame may help lower your cholesterol. The Food and Drug Administration (FDA) suggests having 25 grams of soy protein a day to lower your heart disease risk. Two to four servings of soymilk or soy yogurt, soy nuts, tofu, or edamame supply this amount. Begin your edamame experience with this tasty bean side dish. This recipe could also become a filling main dish, if you serve it with brown rice.

Bring a pot of salted water to a boil. Add green beans and edamame to cook at a simmer until green beans are crisp but tender, about 4 minutes. Drain and transfer beans to a bowl of ice water. When beans are cool, drain well.In a 4-quart saucepan, heat olive oil. Add onion, garlic, bay leaf and rosemary. Cook over low heat, stirring, until onion is soft, 3 to 4 minutes.Add white beans, carrots, celery and stock. Bring to a simmer and cook, covered, about 10 minutes, stirring occasionally. Add green beans and edamame and simmer, uncovered, until just heated through. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Stir in parsley. Discard bay leaf and rosemary sprigs and serve.

Weight loss used to be a great cause for worry after someone was diagnosed with cancer, but researchers now say that excessive weight gain is possibly worse. Experts currently recommend that cancer survivors should control their weight and exercise regularly to improve their long-term health.Many people who develop a common cancer like breast or colon cancer tend to gain weight. Unfortunately, a study within the Nurses Health Study of more than 5,000 women showed that normal weight women who gained weight after diagnosis of their breast cancer were less likely to survive. Women who gained only a moderate amount on average about six pounds were 35 percent more likely to die from cancer than those who maintained their weight. Women who gained larger amounts averaging about 17 pounds were 64 percent more likely to die from cancer. This same study also confirmed the well-documented connection between overweight nonsmokers and a risk of breast cancer after menopause.The researchers of this study found that exercise improved the odds of survival in women who developed breast cancer. Women who spent the equivalent of three to five hours a week moderately walking cut their risk of death in half compared to women who walked less than an hour a week. Exercising more than five hours a week showed no additional benefit in this study.According to Wendy Demark-Wahnefried, a professor at Duke University Medical Center, women who receive adjuvant chemotherapy for breast cancer often rapidly develop sarcopenic obesity. This kind of weight increase results from gains in body fat and loss of lean muscle. These undesirable changes in body composition can be avoided, however. A controlled study of recent breast cancer survivors found that strength-training twice a week for six months produced increased muscle mass and a decreased percentage of body fat. This form of exercise uses weights or other resistance to build stronger muscles. One of the reasons that cancer survivors sometimes give for not exercising is fatigue. However, a review of 33 studies on exercise and cancer patients revealed that appropriate programs could improve these peoples physical states without increasing their symptoms of fatigue.A study is now under way, funded by a grant from the American Institute for Cancer Research, to examine the effects of a practical diet and exercise program for overweight women who have undergone breast cancer treatment. Calories will be reduced in their diet to promote weight loss, but they will eat more vegetables and fruits. The women will also do aerobic exercise three to five days a week. The researchers will test the programs effect on the womens weight, as well as on their body muscle, percentage of fat, psychological status and markers associated with disease recurrence. Many of the previous studies about the impact of peoples weight and exercise on their survival after cancer have involved breast cancer patients. Since a persons energy balance, weight control and exercise level also seem related to the risk of developing colon, uterus, kidney and prostate cancers, it seems likely that people who had these cancers may also benefit from healthy diet and exercise changes.After a diagnosis of cancer, people often ask what they can do to improve their odds of survival. For years, we didnt have enough research for a good answer. While we wait for a better answer, maintaining or aiming for a healthy weight and getting regular moderate exercise may help. Cancer survivors would be wise to discuss with their physicians what steps might be appropriate for them. The benefits may be more than you can imagine.

For a long time, the need for eating calcium to strengthen bones was almost unquestioned. But when results from the Womens Health Initiative (WHI) trial were released earlier this year, some people wondered whether trying to increase calcium consumption was worth the effort. A more detailed look at the results provides several take-home lessons. Giving up calcium is not one of them.In the WHI studies, more than 36,000 women aged 50 to 79 were randomly assigned to take either a supplement of 1,000 milligrams (mg) of calcium and 400 International Units (IU) of vitamin D or a placebo each day for about seven years. Although the hip bone density of the women who took supplements improved only slightly and their risk of fractures was the same, the data revealed important lessons.Lesson 1: More calcium helps only if you dont get enough. Half of all older American women eat less than 650 mg of calcium from food each day, although 1,200 mg is recommended for all adults after age 50. At the beginning of this study, however, almost one-third of the women in both groups took calcium supplements of at least 500 mg daily. Researchers did not ask the women to stop. Since the women in the supplement and placebo groups both started the study consuming about 1,150 mg of calcium a day, notes Jeri Nieves, PhD, Assistant Professor of Epidemiology at Columbia University, this ended up being a comparison of 1,000 mg versus 2,000 mg of calcium a day not inadequate versus adequate calcium.Lesson 2: You may need more vitamin D. Current federal recommendations for adults aged 51 to 70 still call for the 400 IU daily used in these studies. Yet research now shows that 700 to 1,000 IU of vitamin D a day appears necessary to reach the most healthy blood levels of vitamin D. A daily intake of 400 IU is now considered inadequate to prevent fractures.Lesson 3: You need consistently high nutrients for benefits. By the end of the trial, only 59 percent of women were still taking their pills as instructed. The women who actually took their calcium and vitamin D supplements had 29 percent fewer hip fractures.Lesson 4: Develop a cancer-protection strategy you can follow. Although no significant difference was seen in cancer risk, tumor characteristics, or reports of polyps in this study, a seven-year study is not enough time to see the effects on a disease that typically develops over 10 to 20 years. It should be noted, however, that women who started the study with low blood levels of vitamin D developed more than twice as much colorectal cancer as those with the highest blood levels. This evidence supports the idea that long-term vitamin D status may affect our risk for this cancer. The women with the lowest blood levels of this vitamin also tended to show the most benefit from supplements. Longer usages and higher doses than now recommended might have produced truly significant effects in the women who lacked vitamin D.Another new study of more than 45,000 Swedish men supports adequate consumption of calcium. Men in the top half of calcium consumption were 27 to 32 percent less likely to develop colorectal cancer than those who consumed less. Although a few but definitely not all studies have linked excessive calcium or dairy product consumption with a possible increase in prostate cancer, the colorectal protection in this study occurred when men ate at least an average of the currently recommended 1,200 mg per day.Final lesson: For bone health and lower colon cancer risk, meeting current recommendations for calcium and vitamin D is a good start. For optimal wellness protection, add regular exercise, weight control, limited sodium intake and a balanced, mostly plant-based diet with plenty of fruits, vegetables and whole grains to your daily habits.

Roast the peppers, whole, over a gas flame or on a grill, using tongs to turn them frequently, until blackened all over. Or, arrange halved and seeded peppers on a baking sheet and either roast at 500 degrees for 20 minutes or broil 4 to 5 minutes until they are blackened. Place the peppers in a large bowl, cover, and let sit for 20 minutes. Pull off as much skin as possible.Seed the whole peppers.Cut the peppers into strips, and place them in a plastic container. Add the vinegar, garlic and 1 tablespoon of oil. Cover and refrigerate the peppers for 24 hours.For the sandwich, split the rolls lengthwise. Arrange the spinach over the bottom half of each roll. In a bowl, mash the tuna with the oregano and remaining oil until well combined. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Press the tuna over the spinach. Arrange the olives and as many onion rings as desired over the fish. Scoop out most of the bread from the top half of the rolls. Pack it with as much of the roasted peppers as desired, pressing them down with a fork. Drizzle with 2-3 tablespoons of the marinade from the peppers. Close the rolls, wrap tightly in plastic wrap and refrigerate up to 12 hours. Allow sandwiches to come to room temperature before serving.Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 209 calories, 9 g. total fat (1 g. saturated fat), 29 g. carbohydrate, 6 g. protein, 5 g. dietary fiber, 296 mg. sodium.

Ambrosia has a jewel-like glow. To show it off at its best, assemble it in a glass container either a large glass bowl (or even a clear pie plate) or individual glass compotes or the kind of footed dishes used for sundaes, mousse or parfaits. Add mint for garnish and, if used as a dessert, serve it with vanilla yogurt for guests to dollop on.

In individual clear glass bowls or a serving dish or pie plate, arrange orange slices to cover bottom. Place the sugar in a small strainer and sprinkle some of it lightly over the oranges.Cover the orange with the strawberries and sprinkle on some sugar. Add another layer of orange, then one of kiwi. Finish with the remaining strawberries, sprinkling each layer with some sugar. Combine the orange juice and vanilla in a small container. Drizzle evenly over the top of the fruit. Add a layer of pineapple. Top with the coconut and sprinkle on any remaining sugar. Cover with plastic wrap and refrigerate 2 to 12 hours. Using a turkey baster, remove excess juices from bottom of each dish. Garnish with the mint and serve chilled. If desired, stir the yogurt and pass it as a sauce to drizzle over the Ambrosia.Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 76 calories, less than 1 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 18 g. carbohydrate, 1 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 2 mg. sodium.

When I first learned to cook, using herbs meant garnishing dishes with parsley and using dried herbs in cooked dishes. Nobody ate the parsley sprigsexcept me. If you wanted fresh herbs, you usually had to grow them and most of us bought dried dill and chives, not realizing how little their flavors resembled fresh. For me, this changed when I lived in Paris in the early 1980s. At the local street market, Mme. Epice, as she was known (French for spice), sold every kind of herb fresh and I quickly learned how much better they taste compared to dried. When I complained that using fresh thyme was too much work, Madame explained that you could toss whole sprigs into the pot for soups and stews rather than laboriously picking off the leaves from the stem. At the end, you could just pick out the woody stems, as you would a bay leaf. Later on, traveling in Italy, I fell in love with two sharp green sauces made with fresh herbs: Salsa Verde, from northern Italy, includes parsley, anchovies, capers, garlic and vinegar. Salmoriglio, from Sicily, uses parsley, oregano, and garlic, plus lemon juice. Both are great with grilled, roasted or poached fish or chicken. Recently, I created my own refreshing herb sauce, perfect for warm days. Simply whirl together fresh cilantro, basil, parsley and a chopped green chile with orange juice and a touch of low-fat mayonnaise until pureed.Serve this bright green sauce with grilled, broiled or poached fish or chicken. It also makes a great dipping sauce to accompany boiled shrimp, as a change from the usual red cocktail sauce. With all we now know about the benefits of carotenoids and the concentration of other health-protecting phytonutrients in herbs, this sauce is a great way to use them generously.

Place the orange juice and the mayonnaise in a blender or food processor. Add the cilantro, basil, parsley, and chile pepper. Process until the mixture is a pulpy puree. Season the sauce to taste with salt and pepper. Transfer it into a small bowl, cover and refrigerate until it is chilled and thickened, 3 hours to overnight. (Use within 24 hours.)To serve, bring the sauce and the shrimp to room temperature. If using for hors doeuvres, transfer the sauce to a serving bowl and place in the center of a large serving plate. For individual entrees, divide the sauce among 4 small bowls to place on 4 dinner plates. Arrange the shrimp around the bowls. For appetizers, use one large plate and bowl for a buffet-style meal, or use 8 small bowls and plates for individual servings. *For a hotter sauce, do not seed the pepper.Makes 4 entrees or main servings, or 8 servings as an appetizer. Per main serving: 145 calories, 3 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 4 g. carbohydrate, 24 g. protein, less than 1 g. dietary fiber, 239 mg. sodium.

When I was a child, my grandmothers landlord was French and, to top it off, a chef. On Sundays, his day off, Chef LaGrange always made coq au vin. This was before Julia Child taught us authentic French cooking, and the aroma drifting upstairs was like nothing I had ever known. The fragrance of that dish was what started my life-long passion for enticing chicken dishes. During college, while living near New York Citys Hungarian neighborhood, a clerk at a store that could have been in Budapest gave me her recipes for creamy chicken paprikash and a pungent goulash. Then my mother shared a recipe she found for Chicken Marengo. Made with garlic, tomatoes and white wine, in the late 1960s, it seriously impressed the men I dated.Next came the era of the wok, when everyone learned to stir-fry. My specialty was tossing together colorful combinations of chicken, crisp vegetables, and fresh pineapple that I seasoned with ginger, garlic and soy sauce. Northern Italian food then became the fashion, with restaurants featuring chicken picatta. What could be easier to make; just saute chicken cutlets, deglaze with chicken broth and lemon juice, and garnish with capers. But my chicken overcooked in the thin parts while remaining pink where it was thick. Cookbooks explained that pounding the chicken to an even thickness would prevent this.If, like me, you have resisted pounding chicken cutlets, trust me, it is worth the effort. Besides helping the chicken cook evenly, pounding tenderizes it. This helps cutlets come out as delicate in this Citrus Chicken, my version of picatta, as they are when served in the most exclusive restaurants. If you do not have a mallet or the round and short-handled metal implement called a meat pounder, using a small heavy frying pan works nicely.

Place one piece of the chicken breast between 2 sheets plastic wrap or wax paper. Using a meat pounder, mallet, or small, heavy frying pan, pound the chicken until it is evenly 1/4-inch thick. Repeat with remaining chicken pieces. In a measuring cup, combine the broth, lime juice, sugar, and shallots, and set aside.Heat the oil in a large skillet over medium-high heat. Add the chicken and cook 3 minutes. Turn, and cook until chicken is white in the center, 2-3 minutes. Transfer the chicken to a plate, cover loosely with foil, and set aside.Pour the broth mixture into the pan, scraping with a wooden spatula to gather up any browned bits. In a small bowl, dissolve the cornstarch in the cold water and add to the pan. When the sauce boils and turns clear, 1-2 minutes, remove pan from the heat and whisk in the butter. Season to taste with salt and pepper. In a large bowl, toss together the arugula and spinach leaves. Divide them among four dinner plates. Slice each chicken breast across the grain and at an angle. Arrange one sliced breast on top of the greens on each plate. Spoon over the sauce. Serve immediately, accompanied by cooked brown rice, if desired. Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 195 calories, 7 g. total fat (3 g. saturated fat), 5 g. carbohydrate, 28 g. protein, less than 1 g. dietary fiber, 194 mg. sodium.

Consider The Versatile Tomato from the American Institute for Cancer Research Its never too early to start thinking about what to do with all the tomatoes that will soon be overwhelming gardens and markets.There are, of course, soups, salads and pasta sauces. But consider making a tomato chutney that would be a nice accompaniment to grilled summer foods.Chutney  which comes from the East Indian word chatni  is a sweet and spicy condiment containing fruit, vinegar, sugar and spice. It is commonly served with Indian curries but has become widely used with other dishes as well. Using ripe summer tomatoes as a chutney base is a good way to deal with a surplus crop as well as to add a healthful bite to any meal. Tomatoes are a rich source of vitamins A and C, and a powerful cancer-fighting antioxidant called lycopene.Studies have linked diets high in lycopene with lower prostate cancer risk, as well as lower risk of stomach and pancreatic cancers.Lycopene is what gives tomatoes, watermelon, papaya and pink grapefruit their color. When tomatoes are cooked, more of the lycopene becomes available in the cancer-fighting process, so sauces, chutneys and other processed versions of tomatoes are health-protective as well as convenient.When choosing tomatoes, look for those that are vine-ripened and deeply colored. They should feel heavy for their size. Unripe tomatoes can be ripened in a paper bag at room temperature. Do not refrigerate fresh tomatoes because their texture will become mealy and their taste watery. Fragrant herbs such as basil, oregano, dill, parsley and thyme are ideal seasonings for tomatoes, but more pungent spices like curry powder, cumin, or chili powder also blend beautifully with tomatoes, as in this chutney.

Bring large pot of water to boil. Add tomatoes and cook 30 seconds, or until skin begins to peel. Drain. When cool enough to handle, remove skin and chop. Place tomatoes in a medium saucepan and add remaining ingredients. Set pan over medium-high heat and bring to boil. Reduce heat to low and simmer 20-25 minutes, or until tomatoes break down and mixture becomes thick. Serve warm or chilled with chicken, fish, or mild-tasting vegetables such as cauliflower. Makes 6 servings or 1 1/2 cups. Per serving: 48 calories, 0 g. total fat (0 g. saturated fat), 12 g. carbohydrate, less than 1 g. protein, 1 g. dietary fiber, 9 mg. sodium.

Seasonal Veggies Made For Primavera from the American Institute for Cancer Research As spring melts into summer, farmers markets are filling up with seasonal produce. If you cant choose among the vegetables, mix them all together and serve alla primavera, which in Italian means spring style. Any variety of fresh vegetables works.One of the most popular dishes prepared this way is Pasta Primavera, pasta tossed or topped with raw and blanched, or lightly cooked, vegetables. It proves that pasta can be part of a healthful diet without being smothered in cream sauce or swimming in oil.In addition to adding color and crunch to the pasta, the vegetables add nutrients and fiber. Asparagus is high in vitamins A, B and C, and a source of iron and potassium. Green beans have a fair amount of vitamins A and C. Translucent, bright green snow peas are entirely edible, including the pod. Although snow peas are available year round, they are at their peak in spring. Frozen snow peas can also be used.Pasta primavera fits well into the American Institute of Cancer Researchs (AICR) recommendation that people rethink their eating habits so that their diet is richer in health-protective phytochemicals. Nutritionists agree that vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans should cover two-thirds (or more) of the plate, and animal-based foods one-third (or less).Studies show a strong connection between a diet high in plant-based foods such as fruits, vegetables and whole grains, and a reduced risk of cancer and other chronic diseases. In the following recipe, the natural flavors of seasonal vegetables shine through a light tomato sauce. This dish is a perfect way to showcase the seasons harvest of new vegetables.

Heat oil in a saucepan over medium heat until hot. Add garlic and saute until golden, about 2 minutes. Add tomatoes and broth and cook over medium heat, about 5 minutes. Add basil and red onion, cover and remove from heat.Meanwhile, fill a pot large enough to hold all the vegetables with water and bring to a boil over high heat. Add vegetables and cook 1 minute. With a slotted spoon, transfer vegetables to a colander. Use the cooking water to cook the pasta according to package directions. While pasta cooks, briefly rinse the vegetables with cold water, drain and add to the pan containing the tomato mixture. Add salt and pepper to taste. Cover and put aside.Drain cooked pasta and transfer to a large serving bowl. Toss pasta with 3 tablespoons of Parmesan, then stir in the vegetable mixture. Sprinkle remaining cheese on top and serve.Makes 6 servings. Per serving: 326 calories, 7 g. total fat (1 g. saturated fat), 57 g. carbohydrate, 14 g. protein, 12 g. dietary fiber, 100 mg. sodium.

Salads arent always the rabbit food that dieters groan about. Nor are they necessarily the lettuce topped with fried chicken or fatty dressings that fast food restaurants offer on the supposedly healthier parts of their menus. In between these extremes is a vast array of healthy ingredients that can be combined into enough different salads to supply your every meal for the rest of the summer.

To build healthy salads, emphasize fresh, crisp and cool vegetables and fruits. Start with a foundation of dark, leafy greens that have cancer-fighting vitamins and phytochemicals. Baby spinach leaves (pre-washed and packaged) and dark lettuce, like Romaine or red leaf, can even be mixed with other greens, like some peppery watercress. Dark greens contain iron, the B vitamin folate and the phytochemical lutein.

You now have a palette for more brightly colored vegetables. How about shredded orange carrots, slices of red pepper and shredded purple cabbage? The beta-carotene, vitamin C and other phytochemicals in just these three boost health protection even higher than the greens do alone. Consider adding small broccoli or cauliflower florets. A salad is an ideal place to work these powerful health protectors into your diet. Want a hint of sweetness? Add some chopped fresh fruit.

If sweet is not the taste you want, try beans for a smooth contrast to your crunchy vegetable mix. Beans contain protein, folate and minerals. Explore the wide variety, including kidney, white cannellini, pinto and garbanzo. If using canned, drain and rinse them to lower the sodium content before tossing a half-cup into your salad to make it a complete meal.

Ever thought of grains aside from high-fat croutons? If you have some leftover cooked rice or pasta (preferably whole wheat), add these grains to your greens. The bulgur used in Turkish tabouleh salad works in many other kinds of salads, too. Or try quinoa, an ancient grain that is becoming trendy and provides plenty of protein. When you eat whole grains, you get fiber, vitamins and minerals.

Now that youve built a delicious salad, top it with a healthy dressing. Use a small amount of healthy fat, like olive, canola, or nut oil. Mix it with a flavored vinegar or lemon juice. Add some green herbs and spices for even more phytochemicals. If youre not using beans for protein, add a small, drained can of white tuna, a half-cup of shredded low-fat cheese, or a couple of slices of white-meat chicken or turkey, slivered for protein.

In small bowl, combine all dressing ingredients. Set aside. In salad bowl, lightly toss fruits, cabbage and cilantro or chives. Divide onto 4 salad plates. Divide dressing evenly among 4 plates; serve any remaining dressing on the side.

Hitting the trail may mean going for a heart-pumping hike or piling into your SUV for a trip to the mall. Either way, if you expect to be out for a while, and particularly if youngsters are along, snacks are probably part of the expedition.Snack bars and mini-bags of cookies, dried fruit, or fish-shaped crackers are easy to grab and eat on the go, but trail mix remains a popular choice, too. In theory, it is a healthy snack high in fiber, protein and natural sugars.At least that is what Paul Hadley, who claims he invented trail mix at his California farm, intended. The store he opened near the San Jacinto Mountains in 1931 was a popular stop for day-trippers and health nuts looking for an energy boost. To satisfy them, Hadley combined dried fruit with nuts and seeds and dubbed it trail mix.If trail mix still followed this model, it would be dense in calories but also rich in valuable nutrients and heart-healthy unsaturated fat. But most trail mix today, like many snack bars, is closer to candy than health food, usually including chocolate, marshmallows, or a sweetened breakfast cereal along with other high-calorie ingredients. These sugary foods make more of a dessert than a healthful snack rich in good nutrition.One way to keep trail mix fun, chunky and easy to eat out of hand is to include popcorn. Another snack food whose value is often diminished by sweetening or drenching in fat, plain air-popped popcorn, actually a whole grain, provides as much fiber in one cup as a serving of oatmeal or a slice of whole-wheat bread. In this trail mix, popcorn is combined with a basic, round oat cereal that is whole-grain and minimally sweetened. Dried berries, plus sunflower and pumpkin seeds add a variety of flavors, texture and color. This version contains dried pineapple, which can often be found processed with a minimum of sugar and no sulfites. If you can find it, it is pleasantly sweet yet tart, giving this trail mix flavor adults and kids enjoy.

Research keeps offering more reasons for eating fish rich in omega-3 fatty acids, particularly salmon. So far, studies indicate these anti-inflammatory, antioxidant substances are good for the heart, may inhibit cancer and appear to benefit blood pressure, the brain, rheumatoid arthritis and other health problems. On a practical level, the debate about eating farmed versus wild salmon continues. It centers around questions of the benefits, safety and cost of one versus the other. Safety issues relate to excessive levels of PCB, which is sometimes found in the meal-fed, farmed salmon and occasionally in ocean waters.The amount of omega-3s found in salmon depends on what they eat. For farmed fish, omega-3s must be added to the meal, while these substances occur naturally in what wild salmon eat. Some food sources available only to wild salmon, such as deep-sea algae, provide powerful phytochemicals that help protect against many health problems, including cancer. (They also give salmon their distinctive color.) For many consumers, price is a key factor in how much as well as what kind of salmon is purchased. Canned salmon is a great choice because most of it is wild fish and costs perhaps one-tenth of what fresh wild salmon does. It is even a good buy compared to fresh farmed fish. All canned salmon from Alaska is wild fish, and most brands specify origin on the label, so you can be sure.Today, the big question is whether to use canned salmon with bones or without. Boneless canned salmon, which is being widely introduced now, is neater but lacks the calcium bones provide. Its usually more expensive, and may also be farmed Atlantic, not Alaskan, fish. For the moist salmon cakes below, I suggest using mild-tasting pink salmon with bones. You can discard the hard backbones and mash up the rest. Mayonnaise, but not too much, is the secret for keeping these tender patties moist. Tangy mustard-dill sauce compliments their flavor nicely.

In a mixing bowl, combine the breadcrumbs, eggs, 1 tablespoon of the mayonnaise, lemon juice, paprika, and dash of cayenne pepper (if using) until well blended. Mix in the parsley and scallions. Add the fish to the breadcrumb mixture, using a fork to break it up well. With your hands, mix the ingredients together until well combined, about 1 minute, being careful not to overwork the mixture so that it becomes too compacted and dense. Form the salmon mixture into 4 patties, pressing firmly. Coat a skillet with cooking spray and set it over medium-high heat. Cook the salmon cakes until browned on the bottom, 5 minutes. Turn and brown on the other side, 4 minutes, reducing the heat if necessary.Meanwhile, for the mustard sauce, in small bowl, combine the remaining mayonnaise, yogurt, mustard, and dill until well combined. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Serve hot salmon cakes accompanied by a dollop of the mustard sauce. Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 249 calories, 12 g. total fat (3 g. saturated fat), 8 g. carbohydrate, 26 g. protein, 1 g. dietary fiber, 740 mg. sodium.

Steam sweet potatoes in a steamer or microwave until tender but not soft. While still hot, transfer them to a mixing bowl. Stir in the beans, pineapple, onion and jalapeno. In a small bowl, combine the orange juice, sugar, zest, chili powder, cumin and cinnamon. Whisk in the oil, then season to taste with salt and pepper. Drizzle over the sweet potato mixture while gently tossing. Set aside for about 30 minutes for flavors to meld.Just before serving, gently toss to redistribute dressing.Makes 5 cups or 10 servings. Per serving: 100 calories, 2 g. total fat (0 g. saturated fat), 41 g. carbohydrate, 5 g. protein, 7 g. dietary fiber, 238 mg. sodium.

Seasonal Fruits Make Perfect Desserts from the American Institute for Cancer Research As the weather gets warmer, the menu gets lighter. But that doesnt mean no dessert. Actually, the spring and summer months, with their bountiful fruits, are perfect dessert weather.The fruits of the season are delicious by themselves as an after-dinner sweet. They can also be the foundation on which to build other desserts.Two welcome signs of winters thaw are rhubarb and strawberries. And they often appear together. Because it is so tart, rhubarb regularly is paired with sweet strawberries in cakes, jams and pies. In Britain, rhubarb is commonly cooked with ginger.Because of its widespread use in sweets, rhubarb which is also called pieplant is thought of as a fruit. Botanically, however, it is a vegetable a member of the buckwheat family and a close relative of garden sorrel.Only the stalks of rhubarb, which look like big red celery, are eaten. The leaves, which contain oxalic acid, are toxic. Rhubarb has been around for about 4,000 years, but only as a food for the last few hundred. Native to Northern Asia, rhubarb was long prized for medicinal purposes.High in vitamin A, rhubarb is at its peak from April to June. Look for stalks that are crisp and bright colored. Rhubarb is quite perishable. It should be tightly wrapped in plastic and refrigerated. It will hold for up to three days.The strawberry season perfectly coincides with the rhubarb season, and the two foods seem made for each other. With just a little extra sugar, strawberries give rhubarb the sweetness it needs.Strawberries vary in size, color and shape. Usually, the smaller berries are sweeter because they are less watery. When choosing strawberries, pick those that are fat, brightly colored and still have their green caps on. Avoid soft or shriveled berries. Dont wash strawberries until youre ready to use them. They can be refrigerated in a moisture-proof container for up to three days.A rhubarb-strawberry parfait is a perfect, light dessert for the last days of spring and first days of summer.

Combine strawberries, rhubarb, water, orange juice, sugar and vanilla bean in a heavy, medium sauce pan. Bring to a boil over medium heat, stirring to dissolve the sugar. Reduce heat, cover and simmer until fruit is very soft, about 10 minutes. Put mixture in a bowl and refrigerate until cold, about 4 hours. Mix yogurt and vanilla until well combined. Taste and, if desired, stir in superfine sugar (if desired). Chill until serving time.To serve, layer yogurt mixture and strawberry-rhubarb mixture alternately into wineglasses or parfait glasses, ending with fruit. Parfaits can be prepared a few hours ahead and refrigerated.Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 131 calories, less than 1 g. total fat (0 g. saturated fat), 30 g. carbohydrate, 5 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 54 mg. sodium.

In a bowl, lightly mix together the meat and beans with a fork until well combined. Mix in the onion, garlic, jalapeno, chili powder, salt and pepper. Gently form the mixture into four 4-inch patties.Coat a baking sheet or griddle with canola oil spray and place over the grill. Cook the burgers, turning them once, 5-7 minutes per side or until a meat thermometer inserted in their centers registers 160 degrees. The burgers crumble easily, so handle them carefully, using a wide spatula. Serve immediately.Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 85 calories, 3 g. total fat (1g. saturated fat), 4 g. carbohydrate, 12 g. protein, 1 g. dietary fiber, 128 mg. sodium.

Many Ways to Crack an Egg from the American Institute for Cancer Research The egg is a tidy package of nutrition rich in protein, low in sodium, full of vitamins and minerals. Eggs also are inexpensive and versatile, creating many easy-to- make dishes. So theres a lot to celebrate during National Egg Month.Like many foods, we have learned to enjoy eggs in moderation. For healthy adults, the American Heart Association recommends we limit foods high in saturated fat, trans fat and/or cholesterol. Noting that eggs have a high cholesterol content (213 mg per yolk), the association advises limiting cholesterol intake to less than 300 mg per day. Egg yolks contain all of the eggs fat and are a good source of protein, iron, vitamins A and D, choline and phosphorus. Egg whites are an excellent source of protein and riboflavin. For those who are concerned with health issues, it is now easy to buy just egg whites, or order egg-white omelets or scrambled eggs at restaurants. Adding spinach and red pepper to an egg dish increases the nutrition content while adding color and flavor.Spinach and other dark leafy greens make a complementary foil to eggs, and are excellent sources of fiber and folate, an important B vitamin that may help prevent cancer and heart disease. They also contain a number of carotenoids that seem to help fight cancer. Researchers have found that carotenoids in dark green leafy vegetables can inhibit the growth of certain types of cancer cells in the breast, skin, lung and stomach. Red bell peppers add color and additional nutrients to the recipe that follows. Red peppers are simply the more mature form of green bell peppers. The calorie content of the two is the same, but red bell peppers contain much more of some of the nutrients. For example, although both types are excellent sources of vitamin C, red peppers contain much more, plus far more of many health-protective phytochemicals, including beta-carotene. While it is good hot, this Spinach and Red Pepper Quiche can also be served at room temperature, making it a perfect brunch dish for casual weekends and lunch al fresco.

Preheat oven to 375 degrees. Spray 8-inch square baking dish with cooking spray.In a bowl, whisk together eggs, egg whites and milk. Add spinach, dill, pepper and salt. Stir to combine well and pour into baking dish.Arrange cheese to cover spinach mixture. Lay roasted pepper over cheese in one layer, pressing down gently so some of egg mixture flows up over cheese.Bake until quiche is lightly puffed and browned on bottom, about 30 minutes. Run a sharp knife around edges. Let stand 15 minutes before cutting into squares and serving. Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 128 calories, 7 g. total fat (3 g. saturated fat), 5 g. carbohydrate, 10 protein, 1g. dietary fiber, 159 . sodium.

Southeast Asia Replaces Fat with Flavor from the American Institute for Cancer Research Southeast Asian cooking offers food with deep, rich flavor, but without a lot of fat and sweeteners. May is Asian Pacific American Heritage Month, a celebration of Asian and Pacific Islanders in the United States. Its a good opportunity to take a look at this healthful, flavorful cuisine.Southeast Asian cooks use a variety of herbs and other ingredients to maximize the flavor of a dish, instead of relying on salt, sugar and fat as so much Western cooking does. Southeast Asian cooks aim for a balance among the five basic tastes: sour, bitter, sweet, salty and hot. Outside the West, a sixth taste element has been recognized for thousands of years. Called by its Japanese name, umami, this component adds mouth feel and depth of flavor to a dish, especially soups and sauces.Instead of relying simply on salt for saltiness, many Asian cooks use a sauce made of fermented fish, or soybean products like miso, that add a level of richness and some pungency to a dish. Radish, ginger, garlic, mustard and chilies create some heat and a little bite. Herbs like cilantro and dark, leafy green vegetables like spinach and mustard greens offer the bitter element. Vinegar and citrus provide the sour component, and a touch of sugar gives balance with a hint of sweetness.

In skillet large enough to hold steamer, combine the mirin, clam juice, ginger and garlic. Bring to a boil. Reduce heat and gently simmer 5 minutes. Meanwhile, sprinkle the fish with pepper to taste. If you like a little spice, rub the fillets with chili paste. Place a rack or steaming device in the skillet. (If you don't have a rack to fit in a skillet, crumple pieces of aluminum foil, twist them and lay across the skillet like the bars of a rack to hold the fish above the liquid.)Place the fish on the steamer rack. Sprinkle onions over fish and spoon soy sauce and sesame oil over that. Cover the skillet and steam until the fish is opaque in the center, about 5 minutes. About halfway through the cooking, place the bok choy leaves on top of the fish. Meanwhile, heat a small skillet over medium-high heat. Add sesame seeds and heat them until they turn a golden brown, gently shaking the skillet to keep the seeds moving and avoid burning. Immediately transfer seeds to a small bowl to stop the browning process.Remove steamer from skillet. Arrange bok choy on each of four plates and top with fillets of fish. Pour pan juices over fish and sprinkle with sesame seeds.*Mirin is a Japanese rice cooking wine; sake is rice wine and, depending on the brand, is typically drier than mirin. Either can be used, based on either convenience or preference. If neither is available, use a mild chicken or vegetable broth.Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 261 calories, 5 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 17 g. carbohydrate, 26 g. protein, 1 g. dietary fiber, 399 mg. sodium.

May 5 is a big holiday north of the border Cinco de Mayo. It celebrates the victory of poorly-trained and hugely-outnumbered Mexican soldiers over the French at the Battle of Puebla on May 5, 1862. In Mexico, Independence Day is a far bigger holiday, celebrated on September 16, the day Mexico won independence from Spain. But here in the States, Cinco de Mayo has become a day to celebrate Latino culture. And in America, culture, of course, means food.Mexican cuisine is complex, with ancient roots. It goes far beyond tacos and enchiladas. The Mexican table reflects influences of the Aztecs and the Mayans as well as the Spanish and the French. Mexican soups are a good way to start an exploration of the cuisine as well as a good way to start a meal. They are so versatile that, once youve made a basic version, your creative spirit, plus whatever ingredients are on hand, can spin dozens of variations on the theme.In Mexico, the midday meal is usually the big meal of the day. This meal often starts with a chicken broth-based soup full of vegetables, herbs and spices. There are creamy corn soups, seafood stews, chile soups and mushroom and pepper soups. A chicken tortilla soup is a low-fat, high-flavor introduction to the tastes of Mexico. It is filling, rich in nutrients and easy to make.Garlic, scallions, green chiles, bay leaf, cumin, chili powder, cilantro and lime juice give the soup a depth of flavor with no added calories. Fat-free chicken broth provides a tasty base with few calories.Baked tortilla chips and a dollop of low-fat sour cream add a healthful, zesty garnish.This recipe for tortilla soup is a good way to start a celebration of Cinco de Mayo and the cuisine of Mexico.

Heat oil in a large saucepan over medium heat. Saut? garlic and scallions until garlic begins to color. Add broth, tomatoes, corn and spices and bring to a boil. Reduce heat and simmer 5 minutes. Add the chicken and heat until warmed through, about 5 minutes. Add cilantro and lime juice. Stir and warm through. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Ladle into soup bowls, sprinkle with crumbled tortilla chips and add a dollop of sour cream in the center for garnish.Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 231 calories, 6 g. total fat (1 g. saturated fat), 15 g. carbohydrate, 31 g. protein, 2 g. dietary fiber, 636 mg. sodium.

Recent studies remind us that the goal of eating less fat should focus on saturated fat. In the past, experts warned against saturated fat because of its direct relationship to LDL (bad) blood cholesterol and heart disease risk. Now research suggests that too much saturated fat may be problematic, even if your cholesterol isnt high, because of its possible effects on insulin functions, potentially raising the risk of diabetes, cancer, ovarian disorders and other health problems.Surveys suggest that American adults consume on average about 12 percent of their calories from saturated fat. However, the Advisory Committee for the 2005 Dietary Guidelines for Americans recommended a maximum target of 10 percent of calories for most adults. This target translates to 20 grams (g) per day for the average adult, which you can calculate by adding grams of saturated fat listed on food labels. People who are smaller, less active, or trying to lose weight, would have an 18 g daily limit, while those with higher calorie needs could eat 24 or 25 g per day.The traditional way of seeing whether these suggested limits reduce a persons saturated fat intake enough has been by measuring LDL blood cholesterol levels. Each percentage-point drop in saturated fat consumption generally reduces LDL by one to two percent. Cutting saturated fat from the current average to 10 percent would lower blood cholesterol by two to four percent. People whose blood cholesterol levels remain high even while meeting this goal may need to reduce their saturated fat intake even further, which would mean a maximum of 12 to 18 g per day.One of the new studies that links saturated fat consumption with problems in proper functioning of insulin suggests that initially too much saturated fat might decrease the pancreass secretion of insulin. Less insulin might then cause a chain of events that leads to over-production of insulin, resistance to its functioning and ultimately to the most common form of diabetes.When high insulin levels become established, a host of other problems seem to develop. One problem is polycystic ovarian syndrome (PCOS), which can cause fertility problems, irregular menstrual cycles and skin problems. An estimated 6 to 10 percent of all women have PCOS. Other problems include an increased risk of some cancers and possibly increased cognitive problems similar to Alzheimers disease. Although these consequences could make you afraid to eat any saturated fat, studies seem to show that the cancer risk relates mainly to very high levels of saturated fat. For now, you should simply aim for amounts that keep your blood cholesterol healthy.To reach the recommended levels of saturated fat, on average Americans need to cut 5 to 10 grams of it from their daily food choices. There are many ways to achieve this reduction. Each time you exchange a deck-of-cards-sized portion of a higher-fat red meat for lean red meat, seafood or skinless chicken, you cut at least 5 grams of saturated fat. If your meat portions are larger than a deck of cards, reducing them to this size will eliminate even more. For each ounce of regular cheddar or other high-fat cheese you replace with lowfat cheeses, you slash saturated fat by 5 grams. A cup of 1% or skim milk instead of whole milk will save you 3 to 5 grams. Two teaspoons of soft margarine or olive oil instead of butter will get rid of more than 3 grams.These small changes may give you far more than better blood cholesterol. You may find yourself enjoying better overall health.

The American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR), the nations leading authority on the relationship between diet and cancer, did not conduct the study but welcomed its conclusions as a valuable contribution to the scientific literature on a complex and often confusing issue.

The AICR experts added, however, that the study was simply not designed to investigate, and thus does not address, three important controversies about soy and breast cancer that now occupy many cancer researchers and the public.

Of the three big unanswered questions about soy and breast cancer, the issue of soy in survivorship has attracted the most controversy, Collins said. Laboratory studies that have investigated the relationship between soy and breast cancer at the cellular level have uncovered some evidence that individual soy components may have the potential to stimulate tumor growth in animal models under a specific set of conditions. Although no evidence has emerged that this effect occurs to any significant degree in humans, it has sparked concern in the breast cancer survivor community.

She noted that many Japanese consume no more than a single serving of soy food every day. Many soy researchers believe that, for women who are not at high risk, even two or three daily servings would be acceptable as part of a mostly plant-based diet.

Women who have or have had hormone-dependent breast cancer may still want to limit themselves to a few servings per week, and those who are taking tamoxifen or aromatase inhibitor medications may even want to limit soy foods more strictly, at least until more research on the effects of soy on cancer recurrence is published, Collins said.Unanswered Question #2: Are soy supplements and powders the same as soy foods in terms of safety and efficacy?

The use of soy supplements was not directly addressed by the JNCI meta-analysis (i.e., analysis of previously published studies). The authors of the study were careful to mention that most of the data they investigated were related to the consumption of whole soy foods. In fact, most of the studies involved in the meta-analysis measured intake of soy foods. A few of the studies, however, instead measured urinary excretion of the soy component called isoflavones. Its impossible to know for certain if those participants were consuming whole soy foods or soy supplements.

Thus, the observed lack of risk and modest potential benefit associated with soy foods in the new JNCI study may or may not ultimately prove to be associated with soy supplements. More research is needed.

Although the JNCI study did not answer this question, the authors did raise it themselves in their discussion. The authors noted that the observed reduction in breast cancer risk associated with soy foods was roughly the same (approximately 14 percent) in both Asian and Western populations.

That is interesting, the authors said, because Asian diets are higher in soy foods than Western diets. Thus, it would be reasonable to expect that any benefit from soy in this case, a reduction in risk would be larger in Asian populations. Yet in the JNCI study the risk reduction is similar. The authors suggested that this might have something to do with the fact that the two cultures tend to consume soy at different times of life.

Noted soyfoods expert Mark Messina, Ph.D., of Loma Linda University, whose talks on the issue of soy and cancer are a lynchpin of AICRs Nutrition After Cancer Conferences, agreed that research on how exposure to soy foods at different times of life influences breast cancer is on the rise. Researchers are paying particular attention to diet during periods of rapid breast tissue growth, he said.

Once again, however, it will fall to future studies that are expressly designed to investigate that question to provide concrete answers. Only strong clinical data will be able to move the hypothesis that soy foods are protective against breast cancer from speculation to fact, Messina said.

In a small bowl, combine the mayonnaise, lime juice and lime peel. Heat the tortillas in the microwave for 15-20 seconds on high to make it easier for you to roll them. Spread each tortilla evenly with the mayonnaise mixture. Arrange the spinach leaves on top of each tortilla, then the avocado slices, bell pepper and carrots. Roll the tortillas up tightly. Place the seam sides down on the serving plates.

The recent decision by a U.S. Environmental Protection Agency advisory committee to declare a compound used in the manufacture of Teflon, T-FAL and other nonstick and stain-resistant coatings a likely carcinogen has alarmed many consumers.

The AICR experts said today that they do not believe there is enough evidence on the real-world impact of the compound called perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA) to justify individuals making wholesale changes to their kitchen inventories, such as abandoning non-stick cookware altogether.

At the time of the third printing of this cookbook, an Environmental Protection Agency panel raised questions about a chemical used in the manufacture of nonstick cookware. If you are concerned, substitute other cookware and add a little more oil when necessary.

Low levels of PFOA occur in most peoples blood, but questions remain about how it got there, Collins said. The compound has been found in the air and water around manufacturing plants, and is used in the manufacture of electrical wiring, automotive parts, joint replacements, and stain-resistant clothing and carpet. The compound is also found in microwave popcorn bags and pizza delivery boxes.

When it comes to cookware, the science is inconsistent. Some studies show that the PFOA used in production of non-stick coatings is completely removed during the manufacturing process itself. Other research shows trace amounts remain. Whether or not such residual PFOA can be absorbed into food and thus, into our bodies is still unknown.

Some research suggests that trace residues of PFOA can escape as fumes during pre-heating that is, when an empty non-stick pan is kept over very high heat (approximately 600 degrees Fahrenheit) for long periods of time. Collins suggests briefly heating non-stick cookware only to the temperature needed (low to medium-high) and adding ingredients right away.

Whether old, scratched or chipped non-stick coatings affect the levels of PFOA present is not known. Until more science comes in, those who value the convenience of non-stick cookware may prefer to use newer pans with coatings that are less likely to chip.

Diets high in fat and calories are associated with increased risk for several cancers, but there are several rules of thumb for cooking with oil that can help keep meals healthy and cancer-protective.

Whatever individuals choose to do about non-stick cookware, AICR experts are hopeful that the frenzy surrounding the issue will not distract people from the decades of research conducted in populations, clinics and laboratories around the world that links everyday choices about diet, physical activity and weight management to lower cancer risk.

In a small bowl, cover the mushrooms with hot tap water and soak until soft, 20-30 minutes. Squeeze the mushrooms dry. Reserve 2 Tbsp. of their soaking water. Remove and discard stems. Cut the mushrooms into very thin strips and set aside.Cut green tops of bok choy into thin strips. Cut the white stalks into 2-inch lengths, then into thin strips. There should be about 1 cup greens and 2 cups of the white part.Combine the reserved mushroom liquid with the soy sauce in a small bowl. Stir in the vinegar, cornstarch, sugar and ginger. Set the sauce aside. In a wok, heat the oil over high heat until very hot. Stir-fry the bok choy, then add the garlic, mushrooms and bamboo shoots. Stir-fry 30 seconds. Add the meat and stir fry until the meat looks white. Add the sauce. When it starts to thicken, add the bean sprouts. Season with ground pepper, if desired. When the meat is cooked through, spoon the stir-fry over the rice on a serving platter. Top with the scallions and serve.Makes 5 cups or 5 servings. Per serving: 383 calories, 10 g. total fat (2 g. saturated fat), 58 g. carbohydrate, 19 g. protein, 7 g. dietary fiber, 151 mg. sodium.

Preheat the oven to 350 degrees.Place the eggplant on a baking sheet. Place the garlic in a square of foil. Add 2-3 drops olive oil, rubbing to coat the garlic. Seal the packet and place on the baking sheet.Bake the eggplant and garlic until very soft, 40-50 minutes for the garlic, 60-75 minutes for the eggplant. Turn the eggplant 3 to 4 times so it cooks evenly. Place the eggplant in a bowl, slit it open, and set aside to cool and drain. Discarding the drained liquid and the skin, place the roasted eggplant in a food processor. Squeeze the garlic from its skin and add, along with the chickpeas, tahini, yogurt, cumin, and 1 Tbsp. of lemon juice. Whirl until the hummus is smooth and fluffy. Season the hummus to taste with salt, pepper, and additional lemon juice, if desired. For best flavor, refrigerate hummus 4 to 24 hours before serving. Serve accompanied by toasted whole-wheat pita bread and raw vegetables.Makes 1 1/3 cups or about 9 2-tablespoon servings. Per each serving of two tablespoons: 59 calories, 2 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 9 g. carbohydrate, 2 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 64 mg. sodium.

Preheat the oven to 375 degrees. Coat a baking sheet with cooking spray and set aside.In a paper or plastic bag, combine the flour, onion powder, and lemon zest by shaking the well-shut bag. One by one, add pieces of trout and shake to lightly coat the fish with the mixture.Arrange the trout on the prepared baking sheet. Coat the top of the fish with canola or olive oil cooking spray.Bake, uncovered, until the fish is opaque white at the thickest point, about 20 minutes. Using a wide pancake turner, transfer each fillet to a warm dinner plate and sprinkle with some of the parsley. Place 2 lemon slices on each fillet, and serve. Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 216 calories, 9 g. total fat (2 g. saturated fat), 1 g. carbohydrate, 30 g. protein, less than 1 g. dietary fiber, 74 mg. sodium.

In a large bowl, toss together the lettuce, spinach and strawberries, or arrange them on 6 individual plates. Sprinkle the parsley on top.Whisk vinegar and olive oil in a small bowl to blend. Drizzle the dressing over the salad. Season salad to taste with salt and pepper and serve immediately.Makes 6 servings. Per serving: 62 calories, 5 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 4 g. carbohydrate, 1 g. protein, 2 g. dietary fiber, 23 mg. sodium.

In a medium bowl, combine oats and milk. Stir to blend and set aside.In a large bowl, combine flours, sugar, baking powder, salt, cinnamon and nutmeg. Blend well.Add eggs and vanilla to oat mixture, stir to blend and add to dry mixture. Stir just until all ingredients are moist. Do not overmix.Spray large frying pan with oil spray and preheat over medium heat.Use 1/4 cup batter for each pancake. Turn when bubbles appear on the surface and bottom is browned. Makes 18 pancakes. Per pancake: 78 calories, 1 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 13 g. carbohydrate, 4 g. protein, 1 g. dietary fiber, 157 mg. sodium.

Preheat oven to 375 degrees. Spray 12-cup muffin tin with canola oil and set aside. In medium bowl, whisk together oil, applesauce, sugar and eggs. Add vanilla, blueberries and strawberries. In separate bowl, blend together flours, baking powder and salt. Fold in half flour mixture, then half milk. Add remaining flour and milk, folding in just until blended. Scoop batter into prepared tins. Bake 25-30 minutes or until golden brown and inserted toothpick comes out dry. Allow muffins to cool for 20 minutes before removing from pan. Per serving (1 muffin): 165 calories, 5 g total fat (<1 g saturated fat), 28 g carbohydrates, 4 g protein, 2 g dietary fiber, 133 mg sodium.

Preheat oven to 400 degrees. Spray a 9-inch baking dish with canola or olive oil cooking spray and set aside. In medium bowl, toss potato, red pepper and cauliflower with oil and garlic and onion granules. Add salt and pepper to taste. Transfer vegetables to prepared baking dish. Drizzle milk evenly over top. Sprinkle with cheese. Cover tightly with foil and bake for 30-40 minutes, or until vegetables are tender. If desired, brown cheese by placing dish under broiler for 30 seconds, watching carefully. Garnish with parsley and serve hot as side dish.Makes 6 Servings. Per serving: 66 calories, 3 g total fat (<1 g saturated fat), 8 g carbohydrates, 3 g protein, 2 g dietary fiber, 64 mg sodium.

Place the chicken in a 1-quart resealable plastic bag. Combine the garlic, ginger, oregano, and broth in a small bowl. Add the seasoning mixture to the bag and massage it to coat the chicken with the seasonings. Marinate in the refrigerator for 6 hours to overnight.Coat a large Dutch oven with cooking spray and set it over medium-high heat. Sear the chicken pieces until they are white on all sides, about 5 minutes. Transfer them to a plate and set aside.Coat the pot again with cooking spray. Saut? the sliced onion until limp, 5 minutes, stirring occasionally. Add the tomatoes with half their liquid, the chile pepper and ketchup. Bring to a boil, reduce the heat and simmer the sauce 10 minutes, breaking up the tomatoes with a wooden spoon. Blend the peanut butter in the remaining tomato juice until smooth. Add it to the pot. Return the chicken to the pot. Simmer until the chicken is white in the center, about 15 minutes. Serve, accompanied by cooked brown rice.Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 341 calories, 11 g. total fat (2 g. saturated fat), 25 g. carbohydrate, 33 g. protein, 5 g. dietary fiber, 563 mg. sodium.

Place the beans in a deep saucepan. Add the sage, garlic, onion and 1 tablespoon oil. Pour in 1 cup water. Simmer uncovered 15 to 30 minutes, or until much of the liquid has evaporated and the beans are soft but not mushy. Remove the onion and, if desired, the garlic.Meanwhile, heat the remaining oil in a medium skillet over medium-high heat. Saut? the carrot, celery and onion until the onion is translucent, 5 minutes. Add the tomato and cook 5 minutes longer. Stir the mixture into the beans. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Serve warm, garnished with parsley, if desired. Makes 6 servings. Per serving: 174 calories, 5 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 25 g. carbohydrate, 6 g. protein, 7 g. dietary fiber, 309 mg. sodium.

Preheat the oven to 450 degrees. In a deep, oven-proof skillet, melt the butter over medium-high heat. Add the onion and rice. Stir until onion is translucent and rice is opaque, about 2 minutes. Add the lemon juice and cook until evaporated, stirring constantly. Pour in the broth and 1 cup water. Remove from heat.Cover with a large sheet of foil, pressing it down to touch the surface of the liquid. Seal the foil around the rim of the pan. Cover pan with a tight lid. Bake the risotto 25 minutes.Meanwhile, boil 1 cup water in a medium saucepan. Add the asparagus and cook 2 minutes. Transfer the asparagus to a bowl. Add the shrimp to the pot. When pink and curled, add them to the bowl. Place the mussels in the pot, cover and cook until opened, about 2 minutes. Drain and set aside. Remove the risotto from the oven and place it on top of the stove. Slowly peel off the foil, starting from the side furthest from you. Mix in the cheese, asparagus and shrimp.(Use oven mitts to prevent steam burns.) Season to taste with salt and pepper. Serve in shallow soup bowls or plates, using the mussels as garnish.Makes 4 main-course servings. Per serving: 279 calories, 8 g. total fat (5 g. saturated fat), 32 g. carbohydrate, 19 g. protein, 1 g. dietary fiber, 570 mg. sodium.

Place the cabbage, pepper, carrot and onion in a large bowl, tossing until they are evenly combined. In a small saucepan, combine the vinegar, honey, ginger, turmeric and celery seed. Over medium heat, bring the mixture to a boil, stirring to dissolve the honey. Remove from heat and mix in the oil. Pour the hot dressing over the vegetables. Toss until they are well combined. Season to taste with salt and pepper and adjust the amount of ginger and celery seed, if desired. (A little ginger goes a long way.)Cover the slaw and refrigerate 4 to 24 hours before serving. (It will become more golden after two or three days.) Makes 12 servings. Per serving: 46 calories, 1 g. total fat (0 g. saturated fat), 9 g. carbohydrate, less than 1 g. protein, 1 g. dietary fiber, 13 mg. sodium.

Place boiling potatoes and sweet potatoes in separate pots with enough cold water to cover. Cover with tight-fitting lids and bring to boil. Reduce heat to simmer and cook until just barely tender. (Potatoes will continue cooking after removed from pot.)Meanwhile, make dressing by mixing mustard and vinegar in bowl, and gradually whisking in oil until smooth and well combined. Mix in shallots and herbs. Season to taste with salt and pepper, as desired.When potatoes are not quite completely tender when pierced with a fork, drain and transfer to large bowl. Mix in half the dressing (about 1/4 cup) and set aside to allow potatoes to absorb flavors while cooling.When they reach room temperature, lightly mix in spinach and remaining dressing. Adjust seasoning with additional salt and pepper, as desired.*Baby spinach leaves can be used as is.Makes 12 1/2-cup servings. Per serving: 116 calories, 5 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 16 g. carbohydrate, 2 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 151 mg. sodium.

Combine the rice, lentils and vegetable broth in a deep saucepan with 1/2 cup water. Cook, covered, until the rice and lentils are tender, about 45 minutes. Drain and transfer to a mixing bowl.If using yellow squash, cut off the necks. Scoop out the seeds with a spoon. In a large pot of boiling water, cook the squash 4 minutes. Drain and transfer to a bowl of ice-cold water. When completely cooled, pat the squash dry and set aside. Place a rack in the center of the oven. Preheat the oven to 350 degrees.Heat the oil in a pan over medium-high heat until hot. Saut? the onion 3 minutes. Add the garlic and scallions. Cook until the onion is soft, about 5 minutes. Stir in the escarole and pepper flakes (if using). Cook until the escarole is wilted and bright green, about 5 minutes. Stir the vegetables into the rice mixture. Mix in the dill and parsley. Season to taste with salt and pepper. In a baking dish just large enough to hold them, arrange the squash. Spoon in the filling, generously mounding it. Sprinkle on the feta. Pour 1/2 cup water into the baking dish. Bake, uncovered, until the cheese is soft, about 20 minutes. Serve warm or at room temperature, or refrigerate, covered in foil, until ready to use. Reheat before serving.Makes 6 servings, each of a halved zucchini. Per serving: 173 calories, 5 g. total fat (2 g. saturated fat), 27 g. carbohydrate, 7 g. protein, 5 g. dietary fiber, 240 mg. sodium.

Melt the butter in a deep medium skillet over medium-high heat. Saut? the onion until translucent, about 4 minutes. Add the shrimp and corn, mixing occasionally until the shrimp turn pink and are cooked through, about 6 minutes. Stir in the scallions, lemon juice and zest. Season to taste with salt and pepper.

If you add up the number of people unhappy with their bodies, the percentage on a diet, or the billions of dollars spent on diet programs, books, foods and supplements, the figures all show that our society has become obsessed with weight. But if so many Americans are concerned with their weight, how can more people than ever be overweight?

To solve the obesity epidemic that threatens our health, some health experts argue that we should pay much more attention to our weight. Yet research shows that an obsession with becoming thin, contrary to what you might expect, creates more of a health problem.

When we try to control our eating with external rules, like a fad diet, our obsession and preoccupation with food increases. In America, where food is so widely available around the clock, a fixation with food is a foolproof recipe for overeating.

Rather than making weight loss your be-all and end-all goal, focus on choices that improve your health. Hoping for weight loss is okay, but making weight loss the goal almost always guarantees that you will give up healthier eating and more exercising, if those good habits don't bring the desired weight loss.

It's easy to make health your goal. For example, decide that you will lead a less sedentary life - no matter what you look like. Try to walk at least an hour a day. For cancer prevention, the American Institute for Cancer Research also recommends that you get an hour a week of vigorous exercise, like tennis.

Some people may need to do more to resist society's pressures than create goals for themselves. The stress and isolation in today's culture cause many to feel "out of balance." Instead of knowing how to nurture themselves and set personal limits, people may choose unhealthy habits like eating, smoking, or excessive shopping to cope.

If you're overwhelmed with stress, try changing how you respond. For example, when you feel under pressure, instead of ordering a pizza and splurging, call a good friend, read a new book, or take a walk.

Parents have a great opportunity to harness the natural energy children have and instill lifelong habits that will keep them active as they grow older. Regular exercise is as important for children as it is for adults because the problem of overweight affects both groups. In the 1970s, only about 5 percent of children were overweight. Today, at least 15 percent of children are overweight. Overweight children are more likely to become overweight adults.

By encouraging children to be active, parents can help prevent health risks associated with childhood overweight. Children who are overweight have measurable differences in blood pressure and cholesterol levels compared to children with a healthy weight. The rise in childhood diabetes is almost certainly linked to overweight and/or inactivity. An obese child is more likely to become an obese adult and suffer from heart disease, stroke, arthritis and some cancers.

The federal government's dietary guidelines suggest that children and adolescents should be physically active at least 60 minutes on most days, if not every day. For cancer prevention, the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) advises everyone to get an hour of moderate activity a day, like walking, and an hour of vigorous exercise a week, like jogging.

Parents can encourage children more effectively to stay active by setting a good example, rather than telling children what to do. If they want to give their children a reason for staying active, they should focus on the need to feel good and stay healthy, instead of drawing attention to body image.

There are many ways that parents can model good health behaviors, while getting some health benefits for themselves at the same time. Some ideas are:* Put your very young child in a stroller and go for a walk. Or strap your child into a bicycle carrier with a helmet and go for a ride.* If your child can ride a bicycle, jog alongside or get on your own bicycle.* Limit the amount of time you watch television. By doing this, you will find it easier to limit the amount of time your child watches TV, movies, or video and computer games. The American Academy of Pediatrics recommends a maximum of two hours of viewing time for children each day.* Stretch or exercise while watching TV. * Engage the whole family in physical activities, like Frisbee, playing catch, hiking, gardening, swimming, or rollerblading.* Sign up for exercise classes like kickboxing or join a sports team. Then sign your children up for classes or team sports.* Give children rewards, such as a basketball, that encourage them to be more active.

Studies show that people who eat at least three servings of whole grains a day have a lower risk of heart disease, diabetes and cancer. They also seem to maintain a healthy weight more easily. If you'd like to try something different from whole wheat, oats and brown rice, three common whole grains, consider quinoa ("KEEN-wah").

Quinoa, a protein-rich whole grain, was a staple of ancient Andean civilizations. The Conquistadors tried to eradicate it but failed. Today, there are thousands of quinoa varieties grown, ranging in color from pale ivory to yellow and even purplish black.

Nature protects each grain of quinoa with a coating of saponin, a bitter, soap-like substance that acts as a natural insect repellant, so it is important to rinse quinoa before cooking. Unlike other whole grains, the germ covers the entire kernel of quinoa. As quinoa cooks, the germ separates from the kernel, creating little white rings. When you see these rings, you know the grains are fully cooked.

To cook quinoa for a pilaf or salad, you can use water or broth. For cereal, try apple or orange juice. To make the cooked grains fluffier, first rinse and roast them in a dry non-stick pan over medium-low heat, stirring until they become fragrant and pop. In about three minutes, when the popping stops, add the liquid, cover and cook until the quinoa is done, about 15 minutes.

Heat oil in medium nonstick skillet over medium-high heat. Add chicken and brown on both sides, turning pieces once, about 10 minutes. Transfer chicken to a plate.In same pan, saut? onions until lightly browned, about 5 minutes. Add tomatoes and garlic. Cook until tomatoes soften, stirring occasionally, 5 minutes. Return chicken and any juices to pan. Add chicken broth, lime juice and salt. Cover pan tightly and simmer 20 minutes. Add quinoa, beans and thyme. Cover and cook until quinoa is swelled and almost tender to the bite, about 20 minutes. Remove pan from heat and let sit, covered, 10 minutes, until quinoa is fluffy and soft. Add salt and pepper to taste, if desired, and serve.

A: Yes. Studies now show that meat can look done before it reaches a temperature high enough to kill dangerous bacteria that can cause serious illness. The traditional large oven-safe thermometers that go in the oven with your roast or bird are still fine for these meats. But for burgers, steaks, chops and chicken pieces, an "instant-read" thermometer is best. Inexpensive digital and dial styles of this type of thermometer are available at discount department and grocery stores. To be completely safe, the following meats should reach these temperature readings: ground red meat, 160 degrees F; ground turkey or chicken, 165 degrees; fresh beef or lamb, 145 degrees (for medium-rare; higher for medium or well-done); fresh pork, 160 degrees; pre-cooked ham being reheated 140 degrees; chicken or turkey breast, 170 degrees; other poultry parts or whole roasts, 180 degrees.

A: No. The large, ongoing EPIC (European Prospective Investigation into Cancer and Nutrition) study has analyzed the effect of red meat and processed red meats separately. People who ate the most fresh red meat (more than 2.8 ounces a day) had a 17 percent greater risk of colon cancer than those who ate the least. The same amount of processed red meats caused an even greater increase in risk. Sodium and nitrites or nitrates may make processed meats a greater cancer concern. Fresh red meat, however, may damage the DNA of colon cells and increase the formation of certain cancer-causing compounds within the gut. If you want to eat red meat, you should choose lean cuts and cook them at moderate temperatures. The American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) also recommends that you limit your consumption of red meat to three ounces a day. By filling most of your plate with vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans - that are full of nutrients and good flavor - you will easily feel satisfied with a small amount of meat.

A: AICR recommends limiting your consumption of red meat to no more than three ounces a day because greater amounts of it are linked to an increased cancer risk. Red meat includes beef, lamb, pork and veal. The difference in risk between red and white meat seems to involve a specific protein that is more abundant in red meat.

A: Protein may play a role in weight loss, but current research does not suggest that low-carbohydrate diets are the way to obtain benefits. The high-protein, low-carbohydrate diets that had good results in the early weeks of long-term studies showed no advantage over balanced plans at the end. A current theory of appetite control suggests that high-fiber foods help fill us up, while a moderate amount of protein keeps us feeling full longer. This combination of an abundance of high-fiber foods (vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans) with a smaller amount of protein offers an eating pattern that can help us cut back on how many calories we eat, so we can lose weight.

Pilates (Puh-LAH-teez) continues to grow in popularity because it can be an excellent exercise program for adults of any age. If your doctor gives you the green light, a regular Pilates workout can slowly strengthen your most important muscles without pain and sweating. Daily exercise is a key part of a cancer-preventive lifestyle.

Besides improving your strength, Pilates increases your flexibility, balance and posture with its controlled movements on the floor or a mat or with machines. These movements concentrate on building your "core" muscles.

When you exercise, you need to single them out to keep them strong. A weak or neglected core increases your risk of back injury. Pilates can also help reduce older adults' risk of falling and prevent curvature of the spine due to osteoporosis.

A person beginning to learn Pilates will first be introduced to the abdominal connection. A typical workout should start with light warm-up exercises that loosen the shoulders, hip joints and spine. Some simple abdominal moves should come next, followed perhaps by leg work and finished off with upper-body strengthening in the chest and arms. In every exercise, it is important to keep the abdominal muscles connected to the movement.

Whether you are trying to control your weight, reduce your fat intake, or just eat better, the most important information on the label is directly under the words "Nutrition Facts." The serving size appears here, and it is the basis for the amounts of calories, fats and other nutrients listed further down. Since the serving size is set by food manufacturers, it can vary. If you are going to eat a portion that equals two servings of the food, you will eat double the amount of nutrients, like fat and calories, listed.

A large part of the rest of the food label is devoted to % Daily Values (DV). The numbers that appear are calculated for a 2,000-calorie daily diet. Although you may not know how many calories you eat during the day, you can use DVs as a guide to better nutrition.

The %DVs tell you whether a food is high or low in various nutrients. You can check DVs, for example, throughout the day to see if you are getting enough calcium. The DVs can also help you limit nutrients like sodium.

Although trans fats occur naturally in some animal fat, most trans fats in the American diet come from partially hydrogenated oils. There is no DV for trans fat yet, because researchers haven't agreed upon a safe amount. For now, you should get as little as you can while eating a balanced diet. Don't try to eat zero trans fat, because you would have to avoid foods that provide healthful nutrients and only trace amounts of trans fats. But steer clear of packaged baked goods, snack foods, margarine and fast food french fries.

When you try to reduce trans fat in your diet, you should consider the amount of both trans fat and saturated fat in your food choices. Trans fats raise blood levels of LDL ("bad") cholesterol just like saturated fat. Both kinds of fats may also promote cancer development.

One simple strategy to lower your consumption of these fats is to add the amounts listed for both on one product and compare that total to the totals of other products. Choose the one with the lower total.

Tobacco is unquestionably the major cause of lung cancer, accounting for 87 percent of lung cancer deaths. Smokers who quit reduce their risk of lung cancer death 30 to 50 percent after ten years. If they quit before age 50, they can eventually reach the risk level of someone who never smoked. Among non-smokers in the U.S., second-hand smoke, also known as passive smoking, accounts for 3,000 lung cancer deaths each year.

A major step to lower lung cancer risk for people who never smoke is to live and work in non-smoking areas. You should also stay away from radon, airborne asbestos and occupational exposure to other chemicals identified as carcinogens.

Healthy eating habits seem to help protect smokers, ex-smokers and non-smokers from lung cancer, too. According to a recent World Health Organization (WHO) report, eating the equivalent of at least four cups of vegetables and fruits a day could reduce lung cancer worldwide by 12 percent.

A variety of natural phytochemicals may be responsible for the protection vegetables and fruits provide. Some studies show that eating more cruciferous vegetables, such as broccoli, cauliflower, cabbage and bok choy, could reduce the risk of lung cancer in some people by as much as 40 percent.

Flavonoids are one type of phytochemicals that these vegetables and other kinds of produce supply. Their antioxidant power may prevent DNA damage that could lead to cancer. Research suggests that flavonoids may also inhibit cancer by slowing cell growth and reproduction and stimulating the self-destruction of cancer cells.

Other phytochemicals, called carotenoids, in vegetables and fruits may also help prevent lung cancer. In some studies, people who eat more foods high in a carotenoid known as beta-cryptoxanthin have about a 25 percent lower risk of developing this disease. Concentrated sources of this phytochemical include oranges, papayas, tangerines and peaches, as well as red peppers and carrots.

Another substance that may offer protection is the nutrient folate, which is found in dark green vegetables such as spinach, broccoli and asparagus. In one study, ex-smokers who were in the top half of folate consumption from food sources - not supplements - cut their risk of lung cancer by 40 percent.

If you want to reduce your risk of lung cancer, you should clearly avoid tobacco and second-hand smoke. The next step is to pattern your diet after the New American Plate eating style introduced by the American Institute for Cancer Research.

When you eat this way, you fill two-thirds or more of your plate with plant foods such as vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans. Visit www.aicr.org for more information on the New American Plate. Health experts like AICR emphasize that a wide variety of fruits and vegetables is more likely to lower your lung cancer risk than any particular anti-cancer vegetable or fruit.

A: Lifting weights, if done correctly, can work wonders no matter what your age. In fact, structured, systematic use of weights, particularly machines, will help prevent osteoporosis, increase your metabolism rate and significantly minimize back and shoulder strains from daily activities and other athletic pursuits. Always check with your doctor before starting any new exercise routine.

A: If done with proper form, weight workouts can be safer than many other activities such as bowling and gardening. With correct weight routines, the tension is more equally distributed in a person's body.

A: Aim for three or four times a week. Do not work the same muscles two days in a row. Muscles become stronger during rest. However, if you use different sets of muscles, it's okay to lift weights two days in a row.

A: Beginners should use weights that are light enough for 15-20 repetitions. Your muscles may be strong enough for heavier weights if you only do 8 repetitions. However, tendons attaching muscles to bones may be fragile and prone to injury, even though the muscles can handle heavier loads. Light weights will strengthen tendons with many repetitions. After 4-6 weeks, your joints will be able to handle heavier weights.

To produce greater health results, increase the amount of weight you lift over time. After your tendons catch up to your new muscle strength, choose a weight that requires you to exert yourself somewhat to complete 8-12 repetitions.

Don't increase the weight too rapidly, however, because you may injure yourself. Challenge yourself gradually. When 8-12 repetitions become fairly easy, move to the next level. Otherwise, you'll end up maintaining your physical state, rather than improving it.

A: As we age, we lose muscle, which is often replaced with fat. Research shows that too many fat cells can increase hormone production. By exercising regularly, you can reduce the amount of hormones such as estrogen and insulin that are factors in the development of breast and colon cancers. By weightlifting, you can also restore muscle that helps maintain a healthy weight and your ability to exercise every day.

To learn proper posture and techniques for lifting weights and avoiding injury, go to your local gym or YMCA for a weight circuit demonstration by a fitness professional. For a list of trainers you can work with, call your county's department of recreation, phone a local fitness center, or visit the American Council on Exercise home page at http://www.acefitness.org/.

Since ancient times, asparagus has been a prized food. The Greeks ate wild asparagus and the Romans cultivated it in their gardens. But asparagus did not become a big crop in North America until the end of the 19th century. It has been popular ever since. In addition to its delicate taste, asparagus is high in vitamins A, B and C and is a source of iron and potassium.Asparagus can be eaten raw, steamed, boiled, grilled, or roasted. You may be most familiar with asparagus as a side dish, but it can be used in soups, casseroles and pasta sauces. Raw asparagus is tasty served with a flavorful dip. Salads are another good way to showcase asparagus, like White Bean Salad with Asparagus, below.You don't need to have a salad every day. But scientific evidence suggests that a mostly plant-based diet with a variety of vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans is best for preventing both overweight and chronic diseases.

When you shop for asparagus, look for firm, smooth, bright green stalks with tight tips. Wrinkled spears are dried out. Stalks of a uniform thickness will cook evenly.Asparagus can be kept for three or four days refrigerated. Take off the rubber bands the stalks may be bundled in, because they make the spears sweat and spoil more quickly. You should also trim the stems a bit and store asparagus upright, like flowers, in a tall glass with about an inch of water, loosely covered with a plastic bag.Before cooking, trim the spears by bending the stalks until the woody, inedible parts break off. Rinse the tips well, since they are grown in sandy soil.

WASHINGTON, DC According to a survey released today from the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR), the recent flurry of scientific and media attention on the subject of growing U.S. portion sizes has made some Americans more observant about the amount of food on their plates, yet most are more likely than ever to polish off everything they find on those plates.

The national discussion on portion distortion, which was touched off in 2003 by research documenting portion growth in the American home, has made the public more aware about oversized portions. Awareness that portion sizes have grown in US restaurants has ticked up a modest 7 percentage points to 45 percent, while awareness that portions have increased in American homes has surged from 20 percent in 2003 to 52 percent today.

However, few Americans are putting this newfound awareness into action by cutting down on the actual amount of food they eat. One in four Americans (25 percent) say the size of the portions they personally eat at restaurants has gotten smaller since 2003. Only 37 percent of Americans say the size of food portions they serve and eat at home have decreased since the issue of portion size has been in the news.

Portion Size Takes Center StageIn 2003, the issue of Portion Distortion rose to national prominence. Two analyses of nationally representative survey data appearing in the Journal of the American Medical Association and the Journal of the American Dietetic Association showed for the first time that growing portion sizes had found their way into American homes. According to those reports, portion sizes for many foods (including bread, cereal, cookies, pasta, soft drinks and beer) had increased in the American home, by as much as 16 percent.

Penn State researcher Barbara Rolls presented findings at the 2003 AICR Annual Research Conference documenting that U.S. portion sizes had never been bigger, and establishing scientifically for the first time that bigger portions on a plate encourage overeating, by as much as 56 percent.

Since the initial flurry of scientific and media attention in 2003, the issue of portion size has remained in the news. The documentary Supersize Me brought the issue down to a compelling human level. McDonalds phased out the Supersize. In April 2005, the Ruby Tuesday restaurant chain temporarily cut back on the portion sizes of French fries, pasta and some entrees.

The Ruby Tuesday restaurant chain removed the smaller portion options from menus after only five months, blaming a 5 percent drop in business on a failed experiment with smaller portions. Recently, in a move that may signify the beginnings of an industry-wide backlash, the chain introduced the 1,800-calorie Ultimate Colossal Burger.

That, she says, is why increasing awareness isnt enough to change behavior. People need to arm themselves with tools to realize, and adjust, how much they eat. She says that food is more cheap, abundant and available than at any time in history, which means that people now have to develop portion control strategies strategies that werent necessary just a generation ago.

When asked by AICR which is more important for losing weight the amount of food you eat or the kind of food you eat Americans in 2000 and 2003 showed a remarkably consistent tendency (78 percent in both surveys) to blame kind of food.

That fact that an overwhelming majority of Americans chose kind of food in past surveys caused AICR experts to worry that Americans were focusing too exclusively on cutting out fat, carbohydrates, sugar or some other factor and losing sight of the most pressing concern: total calorie intake.

Today, 45 percent of Americans say they have observed an overall increase in food portions served in American restaurants. In 2003, only 38 percent said they believed restaurant food portions had experienced any increase.

Today, 52 percent of Americans say they believe that the size of food portions most Americans eat at home has generally increased. When surveyed in 2003, before the portion issue took center stage, only 20 percent said they believed food portions had increased in US homes.

Only 25 percent of Americans say the size of the portions they personally eat at restaurants have gotten smaller since 2003. Only 37 percent of Americans say the size of food portions they personally eat at home have decreased over the same time period.

When asked to choose which of two options is more important for losing weight, 62 percent said kind of food is more important than amount of food. In 2003, the percentage of Americans who chose kind of food was 78 percent.

"This study merely confirms what weve known for some time: total fat is not the issue. Different kinds of fat affect tumor progression and other aspects of the cancer process in different ways that demand further research. While we continue to investigate these connections, people should continue to eat more fruits, vegetables and whole grains, increase their physical activity and watch their weight."

In fact, the new findings simply mirror the steady advances in scientific understanding that have taken place since the WHI study was designed and launched in the early 1990s. Research conducted in the 1980s focused on high overall fat intake as a risk factor for many diseases. The study was designed to test this theory.

The WHI study was simply not designed to track the divergent influences of different kinds of fat (saturated and trans-fats vs. fats from vegetable oil, nuts and fish.) Nor was it designed to study other factors only now attracting considerable scientific attention, such as how time of life influences the interaction of diet and cancer risk, the influences of weight and exercise, the role of genetic variation among individuals, and the specific effect of whole grains.

The best strategy for lowering risk for cancer and other diseases is to consume a diet high in a variety of fruits, vegetables, whole grains and beans, low in saturated and trans-fats, maintain a healthy weight, and stay physically active.

Dr. Erdman will study whether lycopene, vitamin E, and selenium will additively or synergistically reduce the growth of prostate cancer cells and test whether this interaction relates specifically to androgen-regulated proliferation.

This study focuses on two derivatives of garlic, S-allylcysteine and S-allylmercaptocysteine that are thought to suppress the motility and decrease survival of prostate cancer cells, mediated through Rho-CTPase and E-cadherin pathways.

Dr. Edwards will examine the role of membrane proteoglycans in regulation of cell proliferation and apoptosis, and how dietary omega 3 fatty acids through alteration of proteoglycan metabolism can prevent or slow the growth of breast cancer.

Dr. Campbell proposes to determine if gamma-tocopherol, one of the tocotrienols of Vitamin E, induces growth arrest and apoptosis in colon cancer cell lines through a peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor (PPAR)-gamma mechanism, based on epidemiological studies suggesting that vitamin E negatively correlates with the incidence of colon cancer, and that the anti-proliferative effects of vitamin E are associated with PPAR-gamma.

Dr. Crowe will test whether dietary lipids and retinoids promote interaction of peroxisome proliferator-activated receptors/retinoid other receptors (PPAR/RXR) heterodimers with their coactivator proteins to regulate proliferation of normal and cancerous human breast cells.

To investigate the folate deficiency and increased risk of colon cancer, Dr. Chapkin intends to use a mouse model in which there is no folate binding protein to determine how this loss influences colonic gene expression and DNA methylation following carcinogen (AOM) treatment.

Dr. White proposes to investigate the effects of height, weight, and physical activity at various ages, and age of sexual maturation on the risk for prostate cancer, based on the assumption that obesity, inactivity, and earlier sexual maturation increase prostate cancer risk.

Dr. Clinton will study the role of interactions between vitamin D and calcium in prostate carcinogenesis. He will test a novel and intriguing hypothesis to explain the relationship of elevated prostate cancer risk associated with higher calcium intakes, specifically that the dietary calcium blocks the hydroxylation of 25-OH-D to 1,25-OH D in the kidney, in a mouse transgenic model.

Dr. Zeng will try to identify the consensus DNA binding sites for Rex-1, a transcription factor that is highly expressed in normal stem cells, that could play a role in human breast cancer, and that is repressed by vitamin A and retinoic acid.

The intent of this postdoctoral application is to determine how quercetin inhibits endothelial nitric oxide synthase (eNOS) activity, characterize the effect of quercetin on endothelial cell proliferation, and establish the capacity of quercetin to inhibit tumor angiogenesis.

WASHINGTON A new brochure offered by the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) explains why experts now believe energy balance the state at which a persons caloric intake is roughly equal to his or her caloric expenditure is crucial to overall health.

A Closer Look at Energy Balance lays out the science behind the concept, explains why achieving energy balance is so important, and offers practical advice for how to do it. Following the brochures tips on dietary choices, portion size and physical activity will help readers strike the right balance for themselves.

When a person uses less energy than he or she takes in a state scientists call positive energy balance the excess energy is stored in fat cells. Most Americans exist in a perpetual state of positive energy balance; nearly two-thirds of Americans are now overweight or obese.

Obesity increases risk for heart disease, stroke, type 2 diabetes, and several forms of cancer, including those of the breast and colon. The underlying physiological reason or more likely, reasons for the observed link between excess fat and cancer risk is now undergoing furious study.

Achieving and maintaining energy balance has everything to do with calories. But according to AICR, people dont have to become obsessed with calculating calories with counters or charts or preoccupy themselves with the readouts on the treadmill.

A Closer Look at Energy Balance advises individuals to start by increasing the proportion of vegetables, fruit, whole grains and beans in every meal. Plates filled with at least 2/3 plant foods and 1/3 or less with meat and dairy products are filling, because the plant foods contain fiber and water that adds volume without adding the excess calories and fat that weigh down meat-centered meals.

Meals that fit the 2/3 to 1/3 proportions also provide extra cancer protection, because vegetables and fruits contain vitamins, minerals and natural phytochemicals that help defend cells from the kind of damage that can lead to cancer.

The AICR brochure also includes tips on managing portion size at home and in restaurants. Helping people regain a sense of just how much they are eating is crucial to combating the unconscious overconsumption that disposes them toward weight gain.

Physical activity burns up only a fraction of the total calories an individual consumes. Most of the calories derived from food and drink get used by the body to perform basic metabolic functions such as digestion, breathing, and blood circulation.

And although a host of factors metabolism, body size and composition, genes influence the total amount of energy an individual uses through physical activity, engaging in some form of regular activity is nonetheless vital to achieving energy balance, Collins said.

A Closer Look at Energy Balance outlines three distinct types of physical activity: resistance activity, in which muscles work against weight; aerobic activity, in which muscle groups move in ways that increase heart rate and boost energy use; and flexibility activity, in which muscles stretch and relax.

The physiological basis of the link between physical activity and cancer risk, like the link between obesity and cancer, is the subject of intense scientific interest. Much of the research focuses on the hormonal and metabolic changes that occur in the bodies of physically active people. Regular physical exercise has been shown to lower the levels of hormones, insulin and other factors circulating in the blood that have been tied to cancer, diabetes and other diseases.

In addition, regular physical activity reduces body fat. Some studies suggest activity preferentially targets abdominal fat, which is known to be more metabolically active than fat that occurs elsewhere in the body.

The presence of trans-fats in food is a health concern because trans-fats have been shown to act like saturated fat  they increase levels of LDL (low-density lipoprotein, or bad) cholesterol in the blood, which in turn increases risk for heart disease.

So a modest single serving of our hypothetical macaroni and cheese would contain a whopping 4.5 grams out of the recommended 20-gram daily limit. Thats nearly one-quarter of recommended daily intake.

The AICR Guide to the Nutrition Facts Label offers similar advice for making sense of all the numbers, limits and goals listed on the Nutrition Facts panel. The handy 14-page leaflet talks about each number separately, and helps readers put information on carbohydrates, fiber, fat, sugar, calories, protein, vitamins and minerals in a practical context.

For the filling, combine sweet potatoes with eggs, milk, sugar, maple syrup, orange zest, cinnamon, nutmeg, cloves and salt in blender or food processor. Puree until smooth. Pour filling into prepared crusts.

Bake pie in center of oven for 45-60 minutes, until all but center of pie is set; center will still be slightly soft. If necessary, cover edges of pie with aluminum foil during last 15 minutes to prevent burning.

Steam the asparagus in a saucepan over boiling water until just tender, about 3 to5 minutes. Meanwhile, in a cold saucepan, blend canola oil with flour using a wire whisk. Slowly whisk in the milk and heat the sauce over medium heat, stirring constantly. Add onion powder, salt and pepper to taste. Continue to stir until thickened, about 5 to 10 minutes. Stir in the cheese. Pour hot cheese sauce over asparagus and serve immediately.

Insulin Resistance and Breast Cancer Riskby the American Institute for Cancer Research The ability of several hormones to influence breast cancer risk and recurrence is becoming clearer. Study results presented at the recent American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) International Research Conference on Food, Nutrition and Cancer highlighted the effect that high levels of the hormone estrogen, as well as testosterone, insulin, insulin-like growth factors and fat cell cytokines, can have on breast cancer risk. A healthy diet and lifestyle should be able to lower the risk from these hormones.The Evidence in CirculationAll of us have male and female hormones in our bodies, and the risk of breast cancer seems to be affected by both. For some time, studies have pointed to estrogen and progesterone as risk factors. But now research from part of an extremely large European study confirms that high levels of testosterone, usually considered a male hormone, raise a womans risk of premenopausal, and possibly postmenopausal, breast cancer.Research also consistently links high levels of the hormone insulin and insulin-like growth factors with increased rates of breast cancer, at least after menopause. Women with high insulin levels have lower rates of breast cancer survival, too.A common thread in scientific thinking about the link between high insulin levels and breast cancer is the connection to overweight. Studies show that fat cells dont lie dormant in our bodies. They produce a variety of substances called cytokines that have hormone-like functions. At least six cytokines secreted by fat cells promote angiogenesis, the process by which cancer cells develop a blood supply to grow and spread.The Healthy Eating and Exercising Hormone TherapyLifestyle changes can lower hormone levels. One small study presented at the AICR conference showed that two weeks of a high-fiber, extremely lowfat diet with daily exercise reduced insulin levels by 29 percent. One main insulin-like growth factor fell 19 percent.Regular exercise seems especially important in lowering breast cancer risk. Consistently, research shows that exercise leads to lower levels of insulin-like growth factors and testosterone. Diet seems to affect these hormones in several ways, too. Limiting saturated fat (the kind found in meat and high-fat dairy products) is recommended to control both insulin and the available levels of male and female sex hormones. Choosing whole grains, vegetables, fruits and beans, while limiting refined carbohydrates (sweets, sugar-loaded drinks and refined grains like white bread) may also help keep insulin at healthier levels. How much you eat is just as important as what you eat. Excess calorie consumption may increase the levels of growth factors, while a reduced calorie intake lowers them. Even if you dont reach your target weight by cutting calories, any weight reduction appears to be beneficial.To help detect breast cancer early, women should perform a monthly self check-up. AICR offers a handy reminder on how to do it. To get this free health aid, call AICR and request a Breast Self Examination Shower Card. The number to dial is 1-800-843-8114, ext. 111.

The Most Important Health Habitsby the American Institute for Cancer Research All healthy habits are not equal. Since the media bombard us with so many different ways to improve our health, its easy to jump from one to another, or just give up in confusion. Although the right habits can pay good health dividends, several studies show that few Americans successfully focus on the habits that offer the most benefits.Disappointing Survey ResultsA recent national survey asked more than 153,000 Americans aged 18 to 74 how well they practiced four of the most important healthy habits. The most widely adopted healthy habit was tobacco avoidance: 76 percent said they were nonsmokers. Forty percent reported a weight that put them in the healthy body mass index (BMI) range of 18.5 to 25.0. But only 23 percent reported eating five or more servings of fruits and vegetables a day. And just 22 percent said they were physically active 30 minutes or more at least five times a week.Since each of these habits brings health benefits, practicing even one is better than none. But, surprisingly, nearly 40 percent of those surveyed followed only one of these basic healthful habits. A meager three percent carried out all four of these widely recommended behaviors.A Short Checklist to FollowWhat are the best health habits to practice? To lower your cancer risk, the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) advises people to follow seven steps. Eating a lot of vegetables and fruits and the other guidelines below are advocated by other major health organizations like the American Heart Association and the American Stroke Association to decrease your risk of chronic health problems.AICR Diet and Health Guidelines for Cancer Prevention1. Choose a diet rich in a variety of plant-based foods. 2. Eat plenty of vegetables and fruits.3. Maintain a healthy weight and be physically active. 4. Drink alcohol only in moderation, if at all. 5. Select foods low in fat and salt.6. Prepare and store foods safely. And always remember...Do not use tobacco in any form. Tested and ProvenA large study looked at the validity of AICRs cancer guidelines and found them significantly effective. In this study, the health habits of nearly 30,000 women were tracked for 13 years. Although no woman followed all of the guidelines, the 10 percent who practiced a majority of them reduced their cancer risk by 31 percent.People who incorporate more healthy eating and lifestyle habits into their everyday routine, like this small percentage of women, dramatically improve their chance of staying healthy. To see how you can make a transition to a more healthful life, order the free brochure Simple Steps to Prevent Cancer from AICR. Call 1-800-843-8114, ext. 111, to request your copy.

Dr. Christiani will study the predictive value of 25-hydroxy vitamin D levels and vitamin D receptor polymorphisms in patients with non small cell lung cancer, and examine the relationships between vitamin D and vitamin D receptor polymorphisms on survival rates and cancer recurrence.

Dr. Meric-Bernstam will examine whether dietary restriction of leucine will increase the efficacy of breast cancer therapy by down-regulating the mTor/S6K1 signaling pathway, which is activated in about 50% of breast cancers and correlates with poor prognosis.

Dr. Hankinsons studies are designed to address the antitumor mechanism and the potential chemopreventive effects of 3, 3-di-indolylmethanine (DIM), a phytochemical found in cruciferous vegetables. Dr. Hankinson will examine if DIM inhibits metastasis of human breast and ovarian cancer cell lines through modulation of chemokine receptors and chemotaxis.

In this postdoctoral application will study the effect of caffeine on multidrug resistance (MDR) by investigating the transcriptional regulation of the MDR1 gene and its gene product P-glycoprotein in the presence of caffeine.

Dr. Giuliano has discovered various genes on chromosome 12p that are repressed by retinoic acid and correlate with retinoic acid-induced loss of tumorigenicity. In this postdoctoral proposal, Dr. Giuliano will investigate whether these retinoic acid-repressed genes have oncogenic properties.

The latest report card on the nutritional composition of the American diet tells us a lot about the food choices weve been making. If we reshape our eating patterns, we could improve our nutrient intake and lower our risk of cancer and other health problems.The new publication, which details our nutritional shortcomings, is called What We Eat in America: NHANES 2001-2002. Its based on a federal dietary survey of almost 9,000 people. Almost all of the shortfalls identified in this report can be corrected by eating a balanced, mostly plant-based diet recommended in both the 2005 Dietary Guidelines for Americans and the American Institute for Cancer Researchs cancer prevention guidelines.Results of the survey show that almost a third of us get too little vitamin C, almost half get too little vitamin A, more than half get too little magnesium, and at least 92 to 97 percent get too little fiber and potassium. Since vegetables, fruits and beans are major sources for these nutrients, to end any deficiency we might have, most of us should try to eat three-and-a-half to five cups of vegetables and fruits a day. The survey indicates that all of us need to expand our produce choices and learn to enjoy more dark green and orange vegetables and more fruit.These particular nutrients are important because they help lower the risk of our major health problems: cancer, heart disease, high blood pressure and diabetes. When we expand the amounts and variety of vegetables, fruits and beans we eat, we get a wide range of natural phytochemicals, along with these nutrients, that seem to keep blood vessels healthy and block several steps in the cancer development process. By including more whole grains in our choice of breads, cereals, rice and pasta, we can also get more magnesium, potassium and fiber. If we aim for three or four servings of whole grains a day, we can still include a few of the refined grain products that we find hardest to give up. Too many refined carbohydrates can mean too many calories that challenge weight control.According to the survey, vitamin E consumption falls below recommended levels for 93 percent of us. Getting enough of this vitamin poses a challenge, because its major sources are high-fat, high-calorie vegetable oils, nuts, and seeds, although some can be found in dark green leafy vegetables. You can use soft tub margarine and canola or olive oil to add vitamin E to your diet without too much saturated fat. However, people who are trying to cut back on calories may have difficulty getting enough vitamin E this way without exceeding their calorie limit.Vitamin E supplements arent a good option, however. New studies confirm past findings that these supplements dont protect against heart disease or cancer. Furthermore, some researchers suggest that the gamma-tocopherol form of vitamin E, which is more abundant in nuts and seeds, may lower cancer risk. Supplements with the alpha-tocopherol form should be considered carefully, because they can reduce blood levels of the gamma form. If you wish to take vitamin E supplements, you should use one with mixed tocopherols.The only other common nutritional deficiencies found in the survey that cant be fixed by taking the steps above are shortages of calcium and vitamin D. To remedy these shortcomings, from the age of nine onward we need three daily servings of dairy or calcium-fortified juice, cereal, or soymilk. These servings provide the calcium linked with sturdy bones, blood pressure control and possibly less colon cancer. For the elderly and anyone else who is advised to aim for the highest intake levels of vitamin D, a supplement may be needed.But you shouldnt think immediately of using supplements when you hear about common nutritional problems. By eating a mostly plant-based diet thats recommended for lower cancer risk, your food choices will supply most of the nutrients that are often missing.

A recent study of women in a cancer risk assessment program highlights the confusion people still have about soy foods. Forty-five percent of the women who ate soy foods on a regular basis said that part of the reason they did so was to lower their risk of cancer. Yet seven percent of the women in the study who did not eat soy foods on a regular basis said that they were concerned that soy might increase their risk of breast cancer.This difference in opinion is understandable because the evidence is still inconclusive. Several types of studies suggest that soy could help lower the risk for at least some cancers. For instance, the low risk that Asians have for most cancers may stem from their lifelong use of soy foods. Laboratory studies also show that soys estrogen-like phytochemicals can bind to estrogen receptors. This activity could possibly block estrogens breast cancer-promoting effects. In other studies, soy phytochemicals inhibit the growth of prostate cancer cells.Soy also appears to protect a person in studies that compare soy intake between people diagnosed with cancer and people who are cancer-free. Those who ate the most soy, which ranged from several servings a week to once a day, had a 25 to 50 percent lower risk of prostate, breast and uterine cancers. In some cases, however, the link between soy consumption and lower cancer risk disappears when the analysis figures in the impact of weight control, vegetable consumption, limited meat intake and regular exercise.Cancer survivors are often highly concerned about soys effects on cancer recurrence, yet the evidence on soy for this group is also inconclusive. Research presented at the most recent American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) international conference showed that the Prostate Specific Antigen (PSA) count, which can identify prostate enlargement or cancer, dropped in 34 percent of a group of men, after they ate soy protein daily for eight weeks.Some researchers, however, worry that the weak estrogens in soys phytochemicals could stimulate the development of precancerous cells or malignant cells of estrogen-sensitive cancers like breast cancer. This is a very difficult theory to test, but a few laboratory studies suggest there may be grounds for concern.Part of why its so hard to identify soys influence on cancer risk may be that its benefits depend on when it is consumed. In several population and laboratory studies, much of soys protection against breast cancer comes when it is consumed before or around puberty. At this age, soy appears to affect how breast tissue develops. If women start consuming soy later in life, its benefits may be more limited.For now, most researchers say it is reasonable for everyone to include soy foods as part of a balanced, mostly plant-based diet. While cancer-prevention benefits are uncertain, these foods offer a healthy amount of protein, fiber, vitamins and sometimes calcium with little saturated fat. Although soy foods are often suggested for their phytochemicals like genistein, the impact of traditional soy foods such as tofu, soy nuts and soymilk are probably quite different from the effects of soy supplements or a bar containing corn syrup, vegetable oil, chocolate and soy protein When you consider any foods nutritional value, you should focus on more than its phytochemical content. Whether or not soy reduces the chance of cancer recurrence, most researchers think soy foods are safe for cancer survivors to eat anywhere from once a day to several times a week. For more proven cancer protection, however, cancer survivors and everyone else should concentrate on reaching and maintaining a healthy weight, exercising regularly, and eating a mostly plant-based diet centered around vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans.

Cook spinach in 1 cup water, covered, for 5 minutes, or until defrosted and slightly tender. Drain in colander. Run cold water over spinach to stop the cooking. Squeeze spinach, a handful at a time, to remove all water. Place spinach in bowl.

Drain pears, reserving juice. In blender or food processor, puree pears with spices, adding juice as needed to produce applesauce consistency. Serve warm. Sauce can be made in advance and stored up to 2 days in refrigerator. To reheat, heat in microwave, covered, 45 seconds or in saucepan over low heat, stirring.

The following cider sauce was created as a healthful accompaniment for both Indian pudding and gingerbread. Its full flavor is as satisfying  but much lower in fat and calories  as syrups and other high-calorie toppings used with these desserts. This sauce can be used for other desserts as well, such as baked apples and custards.

Using a blender or a large bowl and whisk, mix together cider, sugar and cornstarch. Transfer mixture to a non-stick saucepan and heat over medium heat, whisking while sauce comes to a simmer and thickens, 3-5 minutes. Immediate remove from heat and whisk in lemon juice and ginger. Serve warm with Indian pudding or gingerbread.

Fruit Topping: Brush a light coating of melted jelly over the top of the cheesecake. Arrange papaya slices in a pinwheel design, then add kiwis the same way to fill the center. Arrange diced mango along the edges. Gently, so as not to disturb fruit, brush on a light coating of melted jelly.

Add the canola oil and maple syrup to the hot sweet potatoes and mash with a fork or a masher until smooth. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Spray a 9-inch square baking pan with cooking spray. Spread the sweet potatoes into the prepared dish, making an even layer.

Melt the 2 teaspoons of butter in the microwave. Peel, halve and core the apple. Place each half, cut-side down, on a cutting board and cut it crosswise into thin slices. Arrange the slices in overlapping rows to cover the sweet potatoes. Brush the apples lightly with the melted butter.

Set a rack in the center of the oven. Preheat the oven to 350 degrees. In a roasting pan just large enough to hold the turkey, arrange the carrots, celery, leek and onion to serve as a base or bed on which to roast the turkey.

Using the fingers of one hand to slide under the turkey breast skin near the neck and gently pry it from the meat, use the other hand to gently lift up the skin as it releases from the meat, taking care not to tear the skin, until all the breast skin is loosened from the meat.

Rub or sprinkle the salt on the exposed breast meat. Add the thyme. On one side of the breast, insert a lemon slice, slipping it to the back. Add an orange slice to the same side, then a second lemon slice, keeping the herb under the citrus as much as possible. Repeat on the other side of the breast. Gently pulling the loosened skin, pat it down so it nearly reaches the neck.

Coat the skin generously with cooking spray and set the breast on the bed of vegetables, arranging them to hold it upright. Place the pan on the oven rack. Add the broth. Roast until an instant-read thermometer (inserted into the thickest part of the breast and not touching the bone) registers 165 degrees (about 20 minutes per pound). If the skin is browning too quickly or too much, loosely tent the breast with foil. Remove the breast to a platter and let it rest 20 minutes.

Since increased physical activity is one of the major ways to reduce cancer risk, along with eating a nutritious diet and maintaining a healthy weight, different exercise programs can offer important benefits to your health. Pilates is one system that can slowly strengthen your most important muscles as part of an active, cancer-preventive lifestyle, if your doctor gives you the green light first.You've probably heard of Pilates - or have at least seen this term in magazine articles or in activity-program booklets. Chances are, you still don't really know just what Pilates is, or that it is pronounced "Puh-LAH-teez.""Pilates provides strength training just like a free-weight workout or using machines, but adds an extra component," says Lisa Johnson, a certified Pilates instructor who has been teaching the program since 1998. "By focusing every movement back to the spine, you are always improving "core strength" and balance."Think of the core as the muscles that support and stabilize your lower spine, back and hip areas. These are the muscles that enable you to sit up straight from a lying-down position, or get up from a deep chair. They need to be deliberately singled out during exercise to keep them strong and prevent weakening."Many people who already exercise believe they're actually working their core while doing "ab exercises," when they're hardly targeting these special muscles," Lisa says. "A weak or neglected core increases your risk of back injury from falls, and even just bending over to greet a grandchild. My oldest client was 94 and I got her from a walker down to a cane."The Back ConnectionBesides strength, Pilates develops flexibility, range of motion and balance. Some of Pilates' movements are quite simple and smooth, she notes. Others are more complex and require learning the choreography before they can be properly executed. But every Pilates routine addresses posture, spinal and torso strength. Keeping the abdominal muscles firm as the exercises are done is the key to success with Pilates.Lisa explains, "A person can expect to learn the abdominal connection first. You should start with some light warm-up exercises that loosen the shoulders, hip joints and spine. Then you should do some simple abdominal moves, and perhaps move into leg work and finish with upper body strengthening in the chest and arms. You'll always be cued to keep your abs connected, no matter what, in every single exercise."Getting StartedAfter checking with a physician, many people get into Pilates through introductory books and videotapes, or by learning from a friend. By following instructions carefully and progressing slowly, it is possible to develop simple work-out routines that can be done at home with only a floor mat. After mastering some of the beginner's exercises, people who enjoy Pilates can go on to take classes where more advanced movements are taught and advanced equipment is used.

AICR's most recent international conference unveiled new findings on the cancer-fighting power of green tea. Research now shows that a major component in green tea may short-circuit the cancer process more extensively than scientists had realized.Green tea is one of the substances in Asian diets that may provide potent protection against cancer, according to research studies. Even though green tea has yet to catch on in the U.S. and other Western countries as a daily drink of choice, a growing number of laboratories are exploring green tea's cancer-fighting effects on a cellular level.One scientist who has spent the past several years studying a particular phytochemical found in green tea is Dr. Thomas A. Gasiewicz, Professor and Chairman of the Department of Environmental Medicine at the University of Rochester Medical Center.Green Tea Short-Circuits the Cancer Process "A unique quirk of biochemistry allows green tea's protective effects to extend to many different kinds of cells," says Dr. Gasiewicz. "In fact, one of the active green tea substances - called EGCG (epigallocatechin-3-gallate) - seems to target one protein that is common throughout our bodies. And it does so with a degree of precision that cancer drugs still aren't able to match."This protein is called HSP90, and it is present at high levels in many cancer cells. Scientists believe that, in some circumstances, HSP90 helps to trigger the series of changes in cells that eventually lead to cancer.However, when green tea's EGCG binds to this protein, it helps to prevent these changes from happening. "EGCG targets HSP90, binds directly to it, and keeps it from passing on signals that can start the cancer process," Dr. Gasiewicz explains. "As a result, potentially harmful genes are less likely to get turned on." This is important, because HSP90 is present in all of our cells.Solving a Diet-Cancer Mystery"If further research confirms that EGCG's ability to bind to such a basic protein enables it to provide protection throughout our bodies, it explains a scientific mystery," says Dr. Gasiewicz. "Studies that track the diets of human subjects over several years - particularly studies conducted in Asia, where green tea consumption is common - have associated regular usage of green tea with lower risk for cancers that are vastly different from one another."Asian data links green tea to reduced risk for breast, prostate, bladder, colon, stomach, pancreatic and esophageal cancers. This new finding shows that EGCG may be effective against an important "common denominator" for many different cancers, at the very start of the cancer process.EGCG Does What Cancer Drugs Can't Yet Do Green tea's EGCG acts with a natural precision that scientists have not yet been able to duplicate in a drug. Because cancer cells tend to have higher levels of HSP90 than healthy cells, pharmaceutical researchers have tried to develop a drug that keeps HSP90 from sending the biochemical signals that can trigger cancer. But nothing seems to work as perfectly as green tea's EGCG.Unlike black tea or oolong, regular green tea leaves are baked or steamed before they can oxidize, so their EGCG level remains high. Regular green tea has more EGCG than decaffeinated green tea, although you can drink more cups of the decaffeinated kind to compensate. As for caffeine alone, regular green tea has 30 mg per cup compared to 43 mg in black tea and 135-179 mg per cup of caffeinated coffee.Warm Up to Green Tea's BenefitsAn AICR telephone survey showed that Americans rarely drink green tea, even though it is higher in beneficial phytochemicals and lower in caffeine than black tea, coffee, or colas. Even those who said they drank it every day drank far smaller amounts than Asian populations.Japanese and Chinese people drink an average of 3-4 cups of green tea daily, per person. According to the AICR survey, fewer than 1 percent of Americans are drinking the equivalent amount (roughly 2-3 American-size cups) of green tea. Nearly 7 in 10 Americans (68 percent) said they drank green tea rarely or never. By comparison, a recent scientific study reported that only 8 percent of Japanese people say they drink green tea rarely or never."Drinking some green tea every day is a good way to add to the cancer protection we get from eating a diet high in plant foods and low in fat and salt," says Dr. Ritva Butrum, Senior Science Advisor at AICR.Try different kinds of green tea to find which ones you like best. More than 40 types of Chinese green tea and eight different types of Japanese green teas can be found either at specialty sto+res or through web sites. Create your own special brew with lemon, honey or mint.

Spread out pumpkin seeds on a baking sheet. Bake 6 minutes, stirring once, or until seeds are crisp and lightly colored. Set aside to cool. Coarsely chop the cooled seeds. This can be done a day ahead and the seeds stored in an airtight container at room temperature.

Raise oven temperature to 400 degrees. Roast the yams until fork-tender, 40 to 60 minutes, depending on size. Remove from the oven and increase oven heat to broil. When cool enough to handle, cut yams into bite-size pieces and place in a mixing bowl.

Spread bread cubes in 1 layer on a baking sheet and leave them out overnight to dry. Or, toast the cubes in a 300 degree oven until dry, 15 to 20 minutes. Place dried cubes in a large bowl and set aside.

Heat oil in a medium skillet over medium-high heat. Saute celery, onion, leek, and shallot until soft, 4 minutes. Mix in the apple to coat it with oil. Add this mixture to the bread cubes. With a fork, mix in the egg. Add rosemary, thyme, salt and pepper to taste. Toss with a fork to blend. Pour in 1 cup broth and mix until dressing is moist but not soggy, adding more broth if needed. Pack dressing firmly into the prepared pan, and cover with foil.

Transfer logs to a cutting board. With a serrated knife, cut each log diagonally into 1/2-inch thick slices. Arrange them cut-side down in one layer on the baking sheet, with slices touching each other. Bake 10 minutes, turn, and bake 10 more minutes, or until biscotti are a honey color and dry to the touch. Turn the oven off and leave biscotti there for 10 more minutes. Remove them from the oven and let them cool on the baking sheet. Store sealed in an air-tight container for up to 3 weeks.

Heat the oil in a medium skillet over medium-high heat. Saut? the celery, leek, onion and scallions until soft, about 5 minutes. Mix in the apples and grapes to coat them with oil. Add this mixture to the bread cubes. Add the poultry seasoning, eggs, nuts and a light sprinkling of salt and pepper. Toss with a fork to blend. Pour in 1 cup of the broth. Mix until dressing is moist but not soggy, adding more broth as needed. Pack the dressing firmly into the prepared pan and cover with foil.

Place cranberries, sugar, allspice and the reserved liquid in a deep saucepan. Bring to a boil, reduce heat and simmer until berries pop and are very soft, about 15 minutes. Remove from heat and mix in pineapple and walnuts.

Place bulgur in a medium bowl. Pour the hot water over it. Set aside for 30 minutes. Line sieve with a double layer of cheesecloth or paper towels. Pour bulgur into the sieve and drain well. Using paper towels and your hands, squeeze bulgur to extract as much excess moisture as possible. Return bulgur to the bowl.

In nonstick skillet, heat oil over medium heat. Add garlic and onion and saut? 5 minutes. Add tomato, basil and oregano. Cook 2 minutes. Add green beans. Cover and cook 6 minutes. Add salt and pepper, to taste.

Many people think of adolescence as a time to eat without worry about future health consequences. Most teenage girls, if they think about what they eat at all, are concerned about how their nutrition affects their sports performance or weight control. But research now suggests that adolescence may offer a unique window of opportunity for substantially lowering the risk of breast cancer later in life.Unlike other tissues in the body, breast tissue in babies and young girls has only one duct. Hormones secreted during puberty cause this duct to grow rapidly into a tree-like structure with more ducts. Carcinogens bind more readily to DNA in the immature cells that develop while this duct expands. These cells also appear less efficient at repairing damage to genes that these carcinogens may cause. After a woman's first full-term pregnancy, breast cells reach maturity and are much less sensitive to DNA damage.Genistein, a phytochemical in soy, may promote the development of immature breast cells into more mature cells less vulnerable to carcinogens, according to studies presented at the most recent American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) international conference on diet and cancer. The University of Alabama researcher who presented the new studies at the conference said that genistein offered no protection from breast cancer when it was first given to animals in adulthood. But when the animals ate it before puberty, they had less breast cancer development. The benefits were even greater when they continued to eat it into adulthood. The evidence suggests that the time around puberty offers a chance to imprint cells with a "blueprint" that creates cellular pathways for long-term protection.Results from human studies support the findings of these laboratory studies. In a study of Chinese women, those who reported consuming three or four servings of soy foods a week as teenagers were half as likely to develop breast cancer as those who rarely ate soy foods. Soy consumption as adults had no effect on the women's breast cancer risk in this study. In another study, Asian-American women who ate soy even once a week during adolescence reduced their risk of breast cancer later. In this study, regular consumption of soy foods during adolescence lowered their breast cancer risk even if they did not eat it regularly later in life. But the women who continued eating soy as adults had the lowest risk.Omega-3 fat, found in salmon and other high-fat fish, may also offer more protection against breast cancer when consumed before or around puberty rather than in adulthood. Several studies have linked omega-3 fat consumption with a lower risk of breast cancer, especially if teenagers eat low amounts of other polyunsaturated fats. Research presented at the AICR conference showed that omega-3 fats, when part of an overall lowfat diet before puberty, reduced growth of the breast cells most likely to develop cancer and increased the activity of genes responsible for DNA repair. While a lowfat diet with this kind of fat was linked with less DNA damage, girls who consumed a high-fat diet and the same amount of omega-3 fat experienced greater DNA damage.Healthy eating during adolescence appears to be a significant way to reduce breast cancer risk later, but two other studies make it unclear whether the benefit comes from an immediate effect upon breast tissue or the long-term effects of good eating that continues into adulthood.Furthermore, since we now know how vulnerable breast tissue is during adolescence, we need more research on the impact of carcinogens from sources like tobacco and alcohol. Some studies suggest that both "passive" and actual smoking during adolescence may increase breast cancer risk. If science shows such a link, we have another reason to speak out strongly against teenage tobacco and alcohol use.

Scientists are discovering that the effect of soy phytochemicals on breast cancer prevention and risk may depend partly on the age at which a woman eats soy foods. An AICR-funded researcher at Georgetown University is investigating this theory.It has long been suggested that high soy intake among Asian women may be why they have a lower risk of breast cancer than American women. However, experiments to test this idea have shown no association in laboratory animals. In fact, in some of the studies, phytochemicals in soy actually increased breast cancer cell growth.But scientists haven't yet written off the benefits of soy. For many years, Dr. Leena Hilakivi-Clarke has been studying genistein, a phytochemical found in soy foods that has effects similar to the hormone estrogen. Recent research by her lab and others shows that the timing of genistein exposure is key: If given to animals before the onset of puberty, genistein appears to offer protection against breast cancer. If it is consumed only in adulthood, it does not seem to have a protective effect.Dr. Hilakivi-Clarke's latest research, funded by an AICR grant, is investigating how this protection occurs at the gene level and why exposure before puberty is essential.In the Right Place at the Right TimeGenistein is known to stimulate the growth of both normal and malignant breast cells. So how can it be protective? "When genistein is given to rats at the pre-pubertal stage," Dr. Hilakivi-Clarke explains, "it appears to activate a tumor suppressor gene called BRCA-1." This gene can repair DNA damage and keep breast cancer from developing.More importantly, perhaps, genistein exposure before puberty can induce a process called differentiation. Breast cancer usually develops in specific cells-called terminal end buds - in the breast. However, early genistein exposure causes these cells to differentiate, meaning that they are converted to lobular-like structures that are less likely to give rise to malignant tumors. But if genistein is given later in life, it's probably too late for this differentiation process to be of any help, Dr. Hilakivi-Clarke says. Instead, the breasts of older women are likely to have acquired precancerous cells. Genistein may make those cells grow and transform into breast cancer cells, she explains.Laboratory Trials Underway In her current experiments, Dr. Hilakivi-Clarke is feeding soy isoflavones to laboratory rats and mice with specific genetic mutations before they hit puberty to see if and how their risk of breast cancer can be lowered."We're giving the soy isoflavones to the mice at two levels," says the scientist. "In addition to the control group that receives a diet containing no isoflavones, we will feed the animals a diet that contains genistein at levels typical to Asian consumption. The third diet will contain genistein at levels that would represent high soy consumption." A fourth group will be fed indole-3-carbinole, a phytochemical in broccoli and other cruciferous vegetables, which is also believed to activate the valuable BRCA-1 gene.Although human trials are still far off, "our ultimate goal is to determine whether some breast cancer could be prevented by feeding young girls soy," says Dr. Hilakivi-Clarke.Until more research can confirm the effects of eating soy foods at different times of life, eating a moderate level of 2-3 servings of soy foods per week is likely to benefit good health, regardless of age or gender. Soy also contains a form of omega-3 fatty acids, which may help prevent heart disease and cancer.

Research suggests that diet can affect a man's risk of prostate cancer. Mounting evidence indicates that certain foods may aid in preventing this cancer if they are part of a mostly plant-based diet.Overall, scientists believe that cancer risk can be lowered 30-40 percent by eating a diet that contains mainly plant-based foods, like vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans, along with getting regular exercise and maintaining a healthy weight. Studies show these healthy habits can also help prevent prostate cancer.Now researchers are beginning to get a clearer picture of how particular foods may lower prostate cancer risk. Among them are tomatoes and cruciferous vegetables, such as broccoli. Other foods that may fight prostate cancer include soy, garlic, green tea and flaxseed. Minerals such as zinc and selenium, as well as vitamin E, are also under investigation.A Menu for PreventionCruciferous vegetables: With funding from AICR, researchers are investigating how the compound indole-3-carbinol (I3C) may inhibit the growth of prostate cancer cells in cultures and help to eliminate tumor cells in the body. A new study will compare the effects of consuming cruciferous vegetables to taking I3C supplements on lowering PSA (prostate-specific antigen) levels in patients that have had prostate surgery. Researchers are also looking at whether isothiocyanates, found in cruciferous vegetables, can help prevent prostate cancer. Scientists also have found evidence that eating cancer-fighting foods together, like tomatoes with broccoli, may maximize the cancer-preventive effect of these foods.Selenium: Selenium is found in fish, poultry,eggs, grains, mushrooms and other foods. With a grant from AICR, Arthur Sytkowski, M.D., of Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center in Boston, has been investigating how selenium may suppress prostate cancer."In laboratory and animal studies on prostate cancer cells, when the gene for this protein (which scientists call hSP56) was turned on, prostate cancer slowed. But when the gene was turned off, the cancer grew and spread more rapidly," says Dr. Sytkowski. Selenium binds to the protein and appears to regulate its action, which may help explain selenium's role in cancer prevention.To find out whether selenium and vitamin E supplements can lower prostate cancer risk, more than 35,000 men have enrolled in the Selenium and Vitamin E Cancer Prevention Trial. Results are expected in 2013.Soy: Laboratory and animal studies show that genistein, a phytochemical in soybeans, may inhibit prostate cancer cell growth and tumor development. In an AICR-supported study of early stage prostate cancer patients, Nagi Kumar, Ph.D., of the University of South Florida, found that PSA levels in the blood and other indicators of prostate cancer risk were moderately reduced in patients taking an isoflavone-rich supplement compared to those not taking the supplement. (The PSA test is controversial; however it may be a valuable screening when repeated with the same patient.)"Although long-term trials are needed, it is reasonable for men concerned about their prostate health to incorporate soy foods into their diets 2-3 times per week," says Dr. Kumar.With funding from AICR, Gilda Hillman, Ph.D., of the Karmanos Cancer Institute at Wayne State University in Michigan, has been studying how soy may potentially increase the effect of radiation therapy for prostate cancer."In cell cultures, genistein increased the destruction of prostate tumor cells when given with radiation," says Dr. Hillman. "We also found that prolonged feeding of genistein to mice, combined with tumor irradiation, caused a significant reduction of cancer growth in the prostate and controlled the spread of cancer to the lymph nodes."On the horizon: Garlic, green tea, flaxseed and zinc are also being investigated through AICR-sponsored research. For example, in laboratory and animal studies, epigalocatechin-3-gallate (EGCG), a polyphenol in green tea, stopped the development and growth of prostate cancer cells. A new clinical study of prostate cancer patients will examine to what degree drinking green tea can lower PSA levels and kill cancer cells. The effects of a flaxseed-supplemented diet on prostate cell growth and PSA levels are also being studied. Flaxseed is rich in lignans, a type of fiber, and in omega-3 fatty acids, which may slow tumor growth.

You've probably heard the expression, aging gracefully. Here's a better one: "Aging creatively," the motto of an avid cyclist and hiker from Richmond, Virginia. Physical activity and an enthusiastic attitude are her answers to keeping breast cancer at bay."My goal is to do something active five or six days a week, and I often hit seven," says 73-year-young Emily Kimball of Richmond, Virginia. "I walk or run an hour each morning before breakfast if I'm not going to hike, bike, or play tennis that day."Emily defines creative aging as: "Staying involved in the community and volunteering. Also, keeping a positive attitude. You need to challenge your mind, choose to eat healthily and exercise regularly."Emily thinks nothing of hiking 7 - 10 miles locally. But one of her most outstanding achievements was hiking the entire Appalachian Trail (2,168 miles), one month at a time over a 9-month period, covering 8 - 12 miles a day. The commitment to fitness that enabled her to accomplish this feat later enabled Emily to maintain tennis, bike riding and morning walks during several months of chemotherapy following a diagnosis of breast cancer in 2003.Another dream Emily made come true was a cross-country cycling trip. "When I told others of my planned bike trip across America, they said, 'You can't possibly do that - you're 62 and you're the slowest biker on the road,'" she recalls. '"What makes you think you can ride over the Rockies and the Cascades? You're crazy. Act your age.'"Emily completed the trip of 4,700 miles over 110 days after training for it with 50 pounds of saddlebags on the bike. "Unless it's your doctor telling you to set limits, the only way to overcome preconceived ideas about age is to go ahead and do whatever people are saying you can't do," she advises.Helping Seniors to Keep MovingEmily now helps people to exercise and make the most of their golden years. In 1994, she started Make It Happen, a consulting business influenced by her pre-retirement experience in leisure management and Masters degree in sociology.Although many people over 60 "keep active" by working, their jobs may keep them standing or sitting in one spot, she observes. "There are so many wonderful options that can keep you moving in your spare time - and a lot of them don't cost much money," she notes.Emily has produced "A Resource Guide for Aging Adventurers." It's filled with suggestions for volunteering, travel, adventure and education. For more information on how to age creatively, visit Emily's web site at www.theagingadventurer.com."The better health we are in as we age, the more ready we are to successfully combat the diseases of old age, like cancer," she says. "So keep up the exercise, eat right and keep your mind active. It will pay off in more years of healthy living."Covering huge distances is not the ambition of most people, nor does it have to be. The simple goal of a half-hour of moderate exercise most days of the week and an hour of vigorous activity once a week may help keep cancer at bay, researchers say. Ask your doctor before starting a new excercise program or increasing your current level of physical activity.AICR's brochure, Getting Active, Staying Active, gives you plenty of ideas for getting more exercise every day.

The AICR cancer experts said the survey results are significant because an increasing amount of scientific evidence including six papers presented at the International Research Conference on Food, Nutrition and Cancer for the first time suggests that regular drinking of green tea may have a role in preventing a variety of cancers.

Throughout Asia, green tea is a staple of the diet. Consumption seems lowest among the young, while studies of older populations (ages 70 +) often show that drinking more than 10 cups of green tea per day is not unusual.

From figures reported in various scientific studies of food intake in Asian populations, together with tea industry data, it is possible to extrapolate an average per capita consumption figure of 3 to 4 cups of green tea per day in Japan and China.

Yet according to the AICR survey on beverage consumption in the U.S. -- which asked Americans to tell us both what they drank and how much on a typical day -- most Americans who drink green tea drink only a single cup per day.

Question: Thinking of the various types of beverages that you drink each day, on a typical day how many glasses/bottles of Green Tea do you drink? Please include both hot and cold Green Tea beverages.

This survey was conducted to ask about U.S. green tea consumption in a slightly different way a way that would double check AICRs first survey results and enable more direct comparisons to Asian green tea consumption.

The second AICR beverage survey asked Americans how frequently they consumed various beverages, including green tea. Respondents were asked to quantify the frequency of their consumption in accordance with the scheme used in the JACC study.

A total of 22 percent of Americans said they drank green tea at least once a week. (This figure was achieved by adding together all those who answered Once or twice a week, three or four times a week and five or more times a week.) In Japan, an overwhelming 85 percent of respondents said they drank green tea at least once a week.

AICR believes this trend should continue, and urges those concerned about lowering risk for cancer to consider adding green tea to a diet that is rich in a variety of plant foods and low in fat and salt. The AICR announcement is based on the ever-growing amount of research on the cancer-protective potential of green tea (see the AICR Fact Sheet: Green Tea) and the results of these latest AICR surveys showing that consumption in the U.S. remains very low.

Clinical trials are now underway to determine the precise amount of green tea needed for maximum anti-cancer activity. Until those results come in, researchers who have studied green tea in Asian populations note that drinking between three to four cupsof green tea (an amount roughly equivalent to 2 to 3 U.S. teacups) per day has been associated with cancer protection in many studies.

The experts at AICR are concerned about the drop, because it is one of few consistent trends in cancer risk awareness observed over the course of three biennial Facts vs. Fears Surveys. The latest survey, trended with previous data, can found online.

Only 39 percent of Americans were aware of the link between red meat and cancer in 2001. At that time, nutrition experts at AICR and elsewhere saw that low level of awareness as cause to redouble education efforts.

The new survey, which shows an alarming downward trend, has raised the obvious questions: why is awareness of this particular link one of the few that has seen any change, and why has that change been in the wrong direction?

The answer, experts believe, lies in a combination of factors. They point to the popularity of high-protein diets over the past few years. Such diets encouraged Americans to think about meat chiefly as a tool for quick weight loss.

The issue was clouded further by the efforts of meat marketers to downplay health risks by emphasizing leaner cuts as heart-healthy options. Yet AICR experts point out that even lean red meat poses cancer risks.

Based on a thorough analysis of the research, AICRs recommendations for lowering cancer risk call for a reduction in red meat consumption. The Institute recommends that people eat no more than three ounces of red meat per day an amount that was considered the standard serving in 1982, but that is less than most Americans consume today.

In this years survey, 1,010 adult Americans were telephoned at random and read a list of 28 factors, including actual risk factors (such as tobacco, obesity, and diets low in vegetables and fruits) and many others that have no proven cancer link (such as cell phones and stress). The list of factors was based on the most commonly asked questions about cancer risk received by AICRs Nutrition Hotline. Survey respondents were asked whether or not they believed these factors are linked to increased cancer risk.

In fact, after three biennial surveys, the AICR experts have noticed an unsettling pattern emerging in the responses, Collins said. When asked to identify significant risk factors for cancer, Americans consistently blame the disease on a host of factors that are beyond their control and for which evidence is as yet unconvincing, such as pollution, food additives and pesticide residues.

At the same time, a majority of Americans overlook the well-established impact of diet and lifestyle on cancer risk, with only 35 percent naming insufficient physical activity as a risk factor and less than half (43 percent) citing diets low in vegetables and fruits as risk-increasers. These numbers have also held steady over the three surveys.

In preparing the landmark AICR/WCRF Expert Report, Food, Nutrition and the Prevention of Cancer: a global perspective, an international panel of leading scientists reviewed over 4,500 scientific studies and graded the evidence for specific diet-cancer links. The panel concluded that a link between diets high in red meat and colorectal cancer was probable, and links to cancers of the breast, prostate, kidney and pancreas was possible.

In the few years since the AICR/WCRF Report was published, a considerable amount of research has investigated the role of meat in cancer risk. This year alone, two major studies have confirmed that diets high in meat are strongly associated with increased risk for cancer in general and colorectal cancer in particular.

In January, a study published in the Journal of the American Medical Association (JAMA) found that among 148,610 adults aged 50 to 74, those with the highest long-term consumption of processed meat (sausages, ham, bacon, and cold cuts) had a 50 percenthigher risk of distal colon cancer (a section of the colon near the rectum) than those who ate the least. This relationship was present even after researchers adjusted for the impact of weight, exercise, fruit/vegetable/whole grain intake & vitamin supplement use on colon cancer risk.

Results from the ongoing European Prospective Investigation into Cancer (EPIC) study the largest to ever examine the role of diet in cancer risk appeared in the June 2005 issue of the Journal of the National Cancer Institute. Researchers tracked the diets of over almost half a million subjects in ten European countries for an average of 5 years.

The EPIC researchers found that after only five years, those subjects who ate the most red meat and processed meats (less than 6 ounces a day, on average) had a 35 percent greater risk of developing colon cancer compared to those subjects who ate the least of these foods.

An AICR/WCRF International expert panel is currently reviewing these and thousands of other studies as it prepares a second Expert Report. Until then, AICR stands by its recommendation to limit intake of red meat to less than 3 ounces a day, if eaten at all.

In light of this mounting evidence, the nine-point drop in U.S. awareness of the meat-cancer link revealed by the survey has AICR experts deeply concerned. This concern is compounded by meat industry reports that red meat sales jumped by almost 18 percent between 2002 and 2004.

When it comes to cancer risk, however, the situation is more complex, says Collins. Researchers who examine the biological reasons that high meat intake is linked to cancer are less likely to implicate fat alone than they were in the past. Recently, scientific attention has turned to excessive amounts of heme iron the iron derived from the residual blood present in red meat as a potential factor linking meat and cancer at the cellular level.

The latest Facts vs. Fears survey does contain some encouraging news. An overwhelming majority of Americans can correctly identify tobacco (91 percent) and excessive exposure to the sun (88 percent) as risk factors.

The previous Facts vs. Fears Survey showed that awareness of obesity as a risk factor for cancer jumped from 33 percent in 2001 to 45 percent in 2003. The new numbers show that this increased awareness is hanging on, although it may have plateaued: in 2005, 44 percent of Americans correctly named obesity as a risk factor for cancer.

The number of Americans who ascribe cancer to pesticide residue on produce has gone down, from 72 percent in 2001 to 63 percent in 2005. According to AICR, there is no convincing evidence that foods with pesticide residues increase cancer risk when pesticides are used according to U.S. regulations.

On a daily basis, free of charge, registered dietitians at AICR respond to questions submitted by phone or, now, through the organizations website. Most of the questions concern diet and cancer, diet and weight management, or simply healthy eating.

The questions directed to the hotline vary. Often they concern the appropriate diet for preventing cancer and other chronic diseases. Then there are questions about how to manage the predominantly plant-based diet that AICR recommends for that purpose.

The responses offered by AICR dietitians are based on a thorough review of the existing research on diet and cancer or weight management. When the research is not yet definitive, helpful but qualified suggestions are made.

The AICR Nutrition Hotline can be accessed most easily by going to www.aicr.org/hotline and clicking on submit a question. An email response from an AICR dietitian will be received within 3 working days.

WASHINGTON, DC Maria, a 70-year-old woman of Cuban descent, enjoys going out with friends and family to sample the various international cuisines available to her in Miami. She eats daintily but with great pleasure, eagerly sampling many different dishes and desserts around the table.

Maria is too decorous to say the word, but shes talking about gas. And shes not alone. Millions of Americans complain of bloating and flatulence from time to time. Some of these people can trace their G.I. difficulties to medical conditions such as a serious food allergy, diverticulosis, irritable bowel syndrome or celiac disease.

But many people particularly older Americans like Maria have simply come to associate bloating and gas (or flatus) with specific foods like lettuce, beans, broccoli and many others. These convictions can become deeply entrenched over time.

Yet health experts say that Marias problem likely stems in part from not eating enough salad or at least, enough of foods high in fiber such as vegetables, fruits, whole grains and, yes, beans. Because her daily diet is so low in fiber, even a modest salad represents a sudden and significant change that her body hasnt learned how to compensate for. The result: gas.

Most digestion takes place within the small intestine. There, enzymes and bile break down foods first into carbohydrates, protein and fat, and then into nutrients and other substances that are absorbed into the bloodstream and stored for later use.

But our enzymes arent equipped to break down certain elements of our diet such as specific sugars found in beans and other fiber-rich plants. The undigested matter passes into the large intestine, where it is set upon by bacteria residing there.

These bacteria can and do consume the sugars our bodies cant. In fact, they ferment it, producing a mixture of carbon dioxide, methane and hydrogen with the occasional telltale hint of hydrogen sulfide in the process.

So why, then, might the same three-bean salad cause trouble for one person, but not another? The answer, according to Collins, is that how much gas a person experiences depends upon many highly specific factors.

Start slowly, she advises, with a bowl of whole grain cereal one morning. Each day thereafter, add a single serving of fruit, or a vegetable, or whole grain bread. In the beginning, concentrate on foods that contain soluble fiber, which is easier to digest: oats, oat bran, apples and carrots.

In the specific case of onions, garlic and cruciferous vegetables (broccoli, cabbage, cauliflower), cooking also helps dissipate the plants natural volatile oils that may promote gas in some individuals.

Even beans, which have gained a certain reputation for  musicality, dont have to be off limits. One reason many bean and chili recipes call for soaking beans overnight is that doing so helps remove the sugars that are fermented by intestinal bacteria.

Of course, Collins says, how these foods are cooked also makes a difference. Several seasonings have been historically associated with reducing flatulence. But although ginger, fennel, turmeric and coriander are increasingly common in the U.S., they are still not widely used, especially among elderly Americans.

Foods cooked in oil and butter tend to linger in the gut; this extra time may contribute to digestive problems. On the other hand, roasting, baking, broiling, poaching and steaming are methods that help break down food without slowing its passage through the colon.

According to AICR, diets high in a variety of plant foods have been convincingly linked to lower risk for cancer, heart disease, adult-onset diabetes, and many other chronic diseases. Recent research provides an additional incentive: there is increasing evidence that dietary fiber can play an important role in managing weight and preventing obesity.

Lycopene: Another Defense Against the Most Common CancerEach year, more than one million new cases of nonmelanoma skin cancer are diagnosed in the U.S. This number is greater than the incidence of all other cancers combined. To prevent and treat this type of skin cancer, Huachen Wei, M.D., Ph.D., M.P.H., is looking at lycopene in an AICR-funded study.There are two kinds of skin cancers:melanomas and nonmelanomas. Non- melanoma skin cancer is the more common one, and it includes basal and squamous cell carcinomas. Although nonmelanoma skin cancers are highly treatable, approximately $650 million is spent each year on treatment. This cost to the healthcare system, along with the 2,300 related deaths per year, calls for prevention.Another reason for prevention is that the incidence of human skin cancers has increased significantly in the past 20 years and continues to increase at the alarming rate of four percent per year on average. Dr. Huachen Wei, Professor of Dermatology and Director of Dermatology Research Laboratories at Mount Sinai Medical Center, thinks that sunscreen lotions are partly at fault. "The early sunscreen applications of the 1980s did not always protect a person from UVA radiation, which can contribute to skin cancer," he says. "However, UVB radiation is the better known cause of skin cancer, especially in the presence of other factors, like benzopyrene, which is found in cigarette smoke." UVA and UVB rays are the two kinds of ultraviolet radiation that reach the earth's surface.The Well-Known Antioxidant in TomatoesLycopene, the phytochemical in tomatoes and their products, could possibly be used to prevent or treat skin cancer caused by UVB rays. "Although lycopene has shown an anticancer effect against other cancers like breast and prostate cancers, it has never been tested as a preventive agent against UVB-induced skin cancer," says Dr. Wei. "Epidemiological studies show, however, that those who consume more lycopene have less skin cancer."In his AICR-funded laboratory study, Dr. Wei and his colleagues will feed lycopene to hairless mice in different amounts and then expose them to UVB rays to see how well lycopene inhibits carcinogenesis. After 50 percent of the mice have developed tumors, they will stop UVB exposure and continue to give one-half of the mice lycopene to see if it reduces the size of tumors.Because other studies show that a high dose of lycopene can be given animals to delay or reduce the volume of tumors, it could possibly become part of a cancer treatment. "Lycopene has no obvious toxicity," says Dr. Wei.The Next StepIf this study is successful and Dr. Wei confirms lycopene's effect against the initiation and progression of skin cancer by measuring biomarkers, a human trial will be started at Mount Sinai Hospital. A similar skin cancer study that Dr. Wei conducted with genistein, also funded by AICR, has already been translated into a clinical trial there."The clinical trial would see whether dietary lycopene can prevent skin cancer among people at high-risk for it, like patients with kidney transplants or psoriatic patients receiving PUVA (psoralen and ultraviolet A) treatments," according to Dr. Wei.As a practicing dermatologist and cancer researcher, Dr. Wei always advises people to use a sunscreen that protects against both UVA and UVB rays and has an SPF factor in the range of 30 to 60 to help prevent skin cancer. "If you are active outdoors," he recommends, "reapply it every 3 hours." A long-sleeved shirt, pants and a hat - even an umbrella - offer good protection, too. However, you should try to avoid outdoor activity from 10 am to 3 pm when the rays are strongest.ReferenceZsuzsanna Fazekas et al. Protective effects of lycopene against ultraviolet B-induced photodamage. Nutr. Cancer. 2003;47(2):181-7.

Plant-Derived Monoterpenes May Help Fight LeukemiaA class of phytochemicals known as monoterpenes is under investigation as a possible treatment for leukemia. Steven S. Clark, Ph.D., believes that the study of one monoterpene, perillyl alcohol, may also increase our ability to treat and prevent other cancers as well.Monoterpenes are found in the essential oils of many plants. Two of the best known are limonene, found in orange peel, and perillyl alcohol, found in the essential oils of peppermint, spearmint, sage, cherries and cranberries, as well as in caraway and celery seeds.Dr. Steven S. Clark, Associate Professor at the University of Wisconsin Comprehensive Cancer Center, has been working with perillyl alcohol and leukemia for nearly seven years, ever since a serendipitous discovery by one of his colleagues. The colleague's experiments showed that monoterpenes could prevent and treat breast cancer by inhibiting a particular cell-signaling pathway. Because that same pathway is involved in the development of some leukemias, Dr. Clark conducted similar experiments with leukemia. The results greatly surprised him. Instead of affecting the expected cell regulatory pathway, perillyl alcohol influenced two others. His studies show that perillyl alcohol appears to operate differently on leukemias (cancers of the organs that make the blood, including bone marrow and the lymph system) than it does on carcinomas, the most common form of cancer."It's highly unusual for a simple molecule like perillyl alcohol to affect two separate signaling pathways. There seems to be an unidentified convergence of these pathways that monoterpenes affect," says Dr. Clark. "This double effect also tells us something about how leukemia arises."The Bad Chromosome PhiladelphiaThe particular type of leukemia Dr. Clark focuses on is chronic myeloid leukemia (CML). CML is predominantly an adult leukemia and fairly rare. It is characterized by an abnormal chromosome, the Philadelphia chromosome, which causes an abnormal enzyme to be released. This abnormal enzyme interferes with signaling pathways in the bone marrow and causes cells to reproduce rapidly. Perillyl alcohol, however, blocks some of these pathways that are affected by this enzyme, causing leukemia cells to stop growing and die.Until only four or five years ago, CML was untreatable. But then a drug called Gleevec was developed that specifically targets the abnormal enzyme from the Philadelphia chromosome. However, this drug doesn't work for everyone, and some people who are successfully treated relapse later with a Gleevec-resistant form of leukemia.Dr. Clark theorizes that perillyl alcohol - or a monoterpene relative - might be useful in treating patients who don't respond to Gleevec. This phytochemical might also be effective after cancer treatment in preventing a Gleevec-resistant relapse.In his current experiment, funded by an AICR research grant, Dr. Clark is administering perillyl alcohol orally to mice that are treated with an agent that causes CML to develop. The mice will be examined to see whether perillyl alcohol prevents or slows the cancer growth. Dr. Clark's ultimate goal is to identify the specific cell signaling mechanism for the two pathways that perillyl alcohol targets. Perillyl alcohol's ability to influence two pathways at the same time first excited him about the phytochemical's anti-cancer potential."In one sense, what we're doing is using perillyl alcohol and this specific leukemia model as a tool," the scientist says. "Once we understand the mechanisms of activity, we may see that they are involved in many kinds of cancers and leukemias."If scientists can demystify how perillyl alcohol works, chemists may be able to develop a monoterpene-like synthetic drug that can do the job more effectively, he says.The Return of MonoterpenesMany years ago, monoterpenes were a popular research subject. Researchers thought they could prevent and treat a wide variety of cancers, including breast, stomach, pancreatic, colon, lung and liver cancers. However, although animal studies appeared promising, early human trials using monoterpene therapy were disappointing.Part of the problem is that when a monoterpene like perillyl alcohol is consumed, the human body metabolizes it to a less active form. In the case of perillyl alcohol, it becomes perillic acid. Surprisingly, perillic acid appears to be just as effective against leukemia as perillyl alcohol, says Dr. Clark. That's why his research has potential for expanding our knowledge of cancer treatment.ReferenceClark S et al. Anti-leukemia effect of perillyl alcohol in Bcr/Abl-transformed cells indirectly inhibits signaling through Mek in a Ras- and Raf-independent fashion. Clinical Cancer Research. 2003;9:4494-504.

Preventing the Wasting of Advanced Cancer PatientsMore than half of the people with advanced, metastatic cancer suffer from the anorexia/cachexia syndrome, a debilitating condition marked by a loss of appetite and weight, especially lean body tissue. In general, patients who experience this wasting syndrome die sooner and suffer more than patients who do not experience it."This syndrome is not starvation, and it can't be treated as starvation," says Aminah Jatoi, M.D., a scientist at the Mayo Clinic, who has studied the anorexia/cachexia syndrome for nearly a decade. "There are metabolic changes and certain mediators that come into play in patients with advanced incurable cancer that contribute to the uncontrollable, debilitating weight loss."Infliximab May Halt the Loss of MuscleScientists discovered years ago that feeding patients calories intravenously often doesn't alleviate this condition or improve survival odds. Most importantly, increasing calorie intake doesn't stop the loss of lean tissue, which serves important metabolic functions in the body.More recent research has shown that a protein called TNF-alpha, which is secreted by the body's immune cells, contributes to this wasting condition."TNF-alpha directly affects a certain degradation pathway in the body," says Dr. Jatoi. "Whenever any type of protein becomes old, this pathway removes those proteins. But in cancer patients, for some reason that pathway revs up, destroying muscle at an abnormal rate."To inhibit TNF-alpha, Dr. Jatoi and her colleagues are studying Infliximab, a drug already used to treat rheumatoid arthritis and other conditions.Although Infliximab has been studied for its anti-wasting effects in animals, Dr. Jatoi and her colleagues, as part of a multi-institutional effort within the North-Central Cancer Treatment Group, are conducting one of the first human trials of this drug with a grant from AICR. They will study its effects in 200 patients with non-small-cell lung cancer.The patients will receive weekly injections of Infliximab along with a standard chemotherapy drug. The investigators will then record the effect of the therapy upon the patients' weight, appetite, quality of life and survival. Dr. Jatoi has already conducted a pilot study to ensure that Infliximab and the chemotherapy agent work safely together.As part of the study, the researchers will also see whether genetic variations predict who is more likely to suffer from the anorexia/cachexia syndrome. They will identify patients with two specific variations associated with higher circulations of TNF-alpha and see how these patients fare.A Novel Study for AICRAlthough AICR usually supports cancer research that relates to food and nutrition, Infliximab does not come from a nutritional source or phytochemical. Dr. Jatoi convinced AICR that this important, innovative study might be the only way to help restore the nutritional status of these patients."A tremendous amount of data shows that caloric repletion doesn't work in treating this syndrome," she points out. "We may have no other choice than a pharmacologic intervention to improve the quality of life of the majority of patients with advanced incurable cancer. This study is also a first step in better understanding the nutritional problems these patients face."ReferenceJatoi A et al. A pilot study on safety and pharmacokinetics of in_iximab for the cancer anorexia/weight loss syndrome in non-small-cell lung cancer patients. Supportive Care in Cancer. 2004;12(12):859-63.

Scientist in the Spotlight: Diane Birt, Ph.D.AICR researchers often speak at AICR's annual research conference. Some researchers also organize sessions on certain topics for this event. Diane Birt, Ph.D., Professor of Food Science and Human Nutrition at Iowa State University, has served AICR in both of these ways. This past spring, she also helped to evaluate some of the many grant proposals submitted to AICR for funding."I was definitely impressed with how well all of us reviewers worked together and with the high quality of the proposals. I now understand why I sometimes don't get funding from AICR," Dr. Birt says with a laugh.Since 1996, AICR has funded four of Dr. Birt's proposals. Two of the projects examined the anticancer effect of calorie restriction, one tested the phytochemical apigenin (found in parsley, celery and lettuce) for colon cancer prevention, and the current project will see whether alfalfa, which provides the phytochemical resveratrol, can help prevent colon cancer.Growing up in rural, conservative northern California, Dr. Birt did not plan on becoming a scientist. "My dad was a logger, and I participated in a youth farm group," she says. "My course of college study was expected to relate to home, so at first my major was home economics."As part of that major, she had to take chemistry courses. "I fell in love with chemistry," she recalls, "and strengthened my skills tutoring pre-med students. I enjoyed seeing reactions occur in the laboratory and visualizing in my mind what was happening at the atomic level. So I graduated with a double major."Upon graduation, she decided to integrate her two majors. "I could go into the field of textiles, but I was more interested in biochemistry, which directed me toward the study of nutrition." From Purdue University in Indiana she earned a Ph.D. in experimental nutrition.Dr. Birt began her cancer research when she joined the Omaha Eppley Institute for Research in Cancer in 1976. At that time, researchers focused on the role of fat in the diet. In the 1980s, like others, Dr. Birt began looking at the connection between energy intake and cancer.One of her findings shows that cellular proteins that are important in cell division are turned off by energy restriction. This process can help prevent cancer. "With more research," she says, "it may be possible to create a tool that measures cellular metabolism and tells people when they are overeating. This could be a noninvasive screening device that you simply stick your hand or finger in."In addition to energy restriction, Dr. Birt has been interested throughout her career in plant components. Now, as Director of the Iowa Botanical Supplements Research Center, she oversees research on the bioactive parts of Echinacea and Hypericum (St. John's Wort).Her favorite pastimes outside of work include bicycling, backpacking and rock climbing with her husband, an electrical engineer. She also gardens.One of her daughters is pursuing a graduate degree in epidemiology, while the other is on a Fulbright scholarship in the Netherlands, studying sustainable design.Although Dr. Birt and her husband both try to eat a plant-based diet, she admits that it is difficult to make their high-school-aged son eat that way, especially since he works at a fast food restaurant.

Preventing Overweight to Prevent Cancer Obesity is now a global epidemic. To thwart its spread, AICR has rolled out a health campaign titled "Don't Let It Happen," urging people to safeguard a healthy weight. For the first time in history, the world faces an epidemic of overweight and obesity. Profound social changes have led to more sedentary lifestyles and high calorie diets in developed countries like the U.S., as well as in many developing countries. The number of overweight individuals around the world now rivals the number of those underweight. In the U.S., 64 percent of adults are either overweight or obese.Among the many pressing reasons to avoid overweight and obesity, the link between cancer and overweight tends to be unknown or overlooked. In a study conducted by AICR, only 25 percent of the public was aware of the connection. Yet it is estimated that being overweight and inactive accounts for one-fifth to one-third of all breast, colon, endometrial, kidney and esophageal cancers. In the U.S., that means between 102,000 and 135,000 cases each year. Still worse: Researchers predict that the epidemic growth in rates of overweight and obesity will cause cancer rates to soar worldwide by 2020.Prevention Is the Best StrategyTo reverse the growing health problem, AICR is urging adults who have a healthy weight to adopt a preventive strategy. "The easiest way to manage overweight is to never let it happen," says Jeff Prince, Vice President for Education and Communications at AICR. A panel of scientists assembled by AICR concluded that people should limit weight gain during adulthood to 11 pounds to reduce their risk of cancer.How should people prevent unhealthy weight gain? "The best way to keep pounds off is to increase the proportion of vegetables and fruits in your diet, increase physical activity and reduce portion sizes," Prince points out. A new brochure from AICR, Don't Let It Happen - Preventing Obesity in Adulthood, describes this effective approach in detail and highlights the periods of life when women and men should be extra vigilant.Staying Lean in Fattening TimesThe brochure argues that "we live in fattening times." Food is abundant and relatively cheap, so we tend to overeat. If we're pressed for time, we tend to choose processed foods in large servings that are full of calories, fat and added sugars. Modern conveniences keep us physically inactive. Our environment is a prescription for steady weight gain.Because of the health risks involved in gaining excess weight and the extraordinary difficulty most people have in losing weight and maintaining any loss, prevention is the wisest policy. The brochure advises slender people to set a limit by mentally adding 11 pounds(5 kilograms) to their current weight. They should then commit themselves to never exceeding that limit.If you see your weight moving toward that limit, the brochure advises that it's time to act. Make changes in your daily routine that will keep you within this healthy weight range. Increase the amount of vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans in your meals and increase your physical activity. If those two steps do not stop weight gain, consider gradually reducing the portion sizes of the foods you eat.Don't Let It Happen is addressed to people who have achieved their adult weight. Since AICR is a member of the World Cancer Research Fund global network, this brochure sports the logo of the network's obesity campaign: Watch Your Waist! The logo features an apple and a measuring tape.Multiple copies of the brochure are available at a discounted price by calling 1-800-843-8114.

Antioxidants May Repair DNA Mutations What you eat can influence your cancer risk. With funding from AICR, Robert Schiestl, Ph.D., and his collaborator, Ramune Reliene, Ph.D., are looking at how resveratrol, an antioxidant in grapes, may reverse genetic damage that leads to a rare disease with an extremely high risk of cancer.Although scientists have been studying the relationship between substances in foods and genes for decades, the term "nutrigenomics" was coined only a few years ago. According to Dr. Schiestl, Professor of Pathology, Environmental Health and Radiation Oncology at UCLA's School of Medicine and Public Health, "Nutrigenomics research is particularly interested in discovering if people with genetic predispositions for diseases can be helped with nutritional interventions, like a special diet."Recently, Dr. Schiestl was awarded a grant from AICR to see whether antioxidants in grapes can slow the progression of a rare fatal disease called ataxia telangiectasia or AT. Patients with AT, which is caused by a mutation in the ATM gene, suffer from increasing neurological deterioration. They are at extremely high risk for leukemia, lymphoma and other types of cancer. Most patients die before age 30. There is no cure or treatment for the disease.Grape PotencyBased on his past laboratory work, Dr. Schiestl knows that mice with this gene mutation - known as ATM-deficient mice - suffer a higher frequency of chromosomal damage and develop more tumors than mice without this mutation. He thinks that substances such as resveratrol, a potent antioxidant and phytochemical found in grapes, might be able to reverse or slow the oxidative damage and genetic mutations."Resveratrol, which is found at highest concentrations in the skin and seeds of grapes, as well as in wine, has been shown to have all kinds of antioxidant activities," Dr. Schiestl explains, including the prevention of genetic mutations.In the AICR-funded study, Dr. Schiestl will feed two groups of ATM-deficient mice either grape powder (a food from dehydrated grapes that includes the skin and seeds) as 10 percent of their diet, or an equal percentage of pure resveratrol. Some of these mice will receive the diet in utero through their mothers' diet, while others will eat it as soon as they are weaned. A third group of ATM-deficient mice will eat a regular diet.By comparing the effects of resveratrol alone with the effects of grape powder made from whole grapes, Dr. Schiestl will determine if there are other components besides resveratrol in grapes that have antioxidant powers, and if the whole grape is needed for a synergistic effect."We'll look at the frequency of DNA damage, oxidative DNA damage and tumors in the mice," says Dr. Schiestl.ATM-deficient mice form black spots on their fur and black pigments in their eyes that are markers for genetic mutations. Dr. Schiestl and his team will count and measure the eye and fur spots on the mice and compare the numbers among the groups of mice to measure the frequency of DNA deletions. The amount of oxidative damage will be determined by measuring a chemical called 8-hydroxydeoxyguanosine in the mice's DNA.Other Antioxidant TreatmentsDr. Schiestl's AICR-funded project follows a series of previous experiments in which ATM-deficient mice were fed an antioxidant called N-acetyl cysteine (NAC) in utero. NAC is a product used in cold remedies. In those studies, NAC counteracted genetic instability so well that ATM-deficient mice experienced no more DNA damage than normal mice.Based in part on these dramatic results, a clinical trial for patients with AT is planned to test a treatment of several types of vitamins and phytochemicals, as well as NAC.Dr. Schiestl's research has the potential to help more than those with AT, who number about one in 40,000 to 100,000 people. Another 5 percent of the population has a particular type of heterozygous ATM mutation. These people will not have AT, but they are predisposed to certain types of cancer, such as breast cancer and lymphoma.Furthermore, several diseases result from genetic instabilities, like AT. These include Li-Fraumeni syndrome, Bloom syndrome, Werner syndrome, and Fanconi anemia. All are associated with an increased risk for cancer. Scientists hope that antioxidants may play a role in preventing several diseases that come with genomic instability.ReferenceReliene R et al. Effect of N-acetyl cysteine on oxidative DNA damage and the frequency of DNA deletions in ATM-deficient mice. Cancer Research. 2004;64(15):5148-53.

Go Easy on Your Sweetsby the American Institute for Cancer Research Chocolate, bakery goods, soft drinks and other sweets are available around the clock. Their constant accessibility can make eating moderate amounts difficult. Although complete avoidance of sweets is unnecessary for good health, the calories in sweets add up quickly, making weight control more difficult. Sweets can also replace nutritious foods that have vitamins, fiber, phytochemicals and other substances vital to our well-being.Hold the Sugar, Honey PiePart of the problem with sweets is that setting reasonable limits can be confusing. Some experts suggest that no more than ten percent of our calories should come from added sugars. Added sugars means sweeteners like table sugar, high fructose corn syrup and honey, not the natural sugars in fruits and milk, for example.According to these experts, a reasonable amount of added sugars would vary with a person's calorie needs. Adults who are sedentary or trying to lose weight might limit themselves to a 12-ounce regular soft drink or 2 cookies and a cup of ice cream, as long as few other sweetened foods, like jelly or sugary cereals are eaten during the day. Moderately active people, who want to maintain their weight, could enjoy a small candy bar and six small cookies per day.A Sweet Choice You Can LoveComing up with a personal goal for eating sweets in moderation is only part of the problem. The bigger challenge is sticking with it. This necessarily involves making choices.One way to reduce the tempting power of sweets is to limit the variety around you. If ice cream or cookies are your weakness, stock your home with only one flavor at a time. If you're eating out, avoid multi-dessert buffets where you're tempted to sample many kinds of desserts.Identify the sweets you enjoy most in life and stick to small amounts of them. Some people find that eating sweets only for dessert - never as snacks - makes it easier to limit them and decrease cravings. One study found that after two weeks of eating chocolate twice a day, 15 to 30 minutes after a meal, people who craved chocolate felt their desire for chocolate drop. But cravers and non-cravers who ate chocolate between meals felt their desire increase. Regularly eating chocolate or other sweets to satisfy hunger between meals may teach us to crave it.Likewise, eating behavior experts say that using sweets to cope with disturbing emotions encourages us to depend on them. For this reason, it is best to learn how to manage stress without turning to food.It is a pleasure to eat sweets, but in order to reduce excess calorie intake, we need to choose those that give us the most pleasure and eat them in moderation. Doing so will make room for nutritious foods that build good health: vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans.For more suggestions about healthy snacking, call the American Institute for Cancer Research at 1-800-843-8114, ext. 111, and ask for your free copy of Snacks - Homemade for Health.

Strengthen Your Workoutby the American Institute for Cancer Research Strength training is an essential part of a good exercise program. The physical and mental conditions that a regular strengthening workout improves, especially as you grow older, include arthritis, osteoporosis, back pain, quality of sleep and depression. Regular exercise has also been linked to the prevention of some cancers, primarily colon and breast cancers.Exercise on the Go or at HomeIf the cost and hassle of dumbbells and heavy gym equipment have kept you from strength training, there is an excellent alternative: rubber resistance bands. With these, strength training can be done while in the comfort of your home or hotel room. They're easy to grab at home instead of those 5, 10, 15, or 20 lb. weights collecting dust. Or throw them in your suitcase when you travel.Unlike free weights and machines, the tension of resistance bands remains constant during each phase of an exercise, which will give you a better workout. In addition, they offer versatility unlike pieces of gym equipment. You can create resistance from all directions - above, below, the side - and work a wide range of muscles.Pull Yourself into Shape If you exercise correctly with resistance bands, your muscles will benefit just as if you were using weights. Simply remember to position the band well and perform the exercises slowly to control resistance both when you pull and when you return to the starting position. Try doing some of the following exercises:Upper Arms: Stand straight with feet hip-distance apart. Place one foot in one handle of the band. With the hand from the same side grab the other end of the band. With your arm straight down in front of your thigh, palm holding the end of the band facing inward, slowly raise your arm, bending your elbow, stretching the band as much as possible. Keep your wrist straight. Slowly lower your arm back to starting position. If you need to balance yourself, touch the wall or hold onto the back of a chair. Repeat 12-16 times and then switch sides. Shoulders and Upper Back: In the same stance, place your right foot on one side of the band while holding the other handle in your right hand. Tip forward from the hips at a 45-degree angle, keeping your back flat and stomach in. Slowly lift your right arm out to the side. Keep your wrist straight, your elbow slightly bent and the palm side of your hand with the handle or knot toward the ground. Slowly lower the bands back to starting position. Switch sides and repeat 12-16 times.You can search the Internet for websites featuring more resistance-band exercises. For more information on the connection between exercise and cancer, call the American Institute for Cancer Research at 1-800-843-8114, ext. 111, and ask for your free copy of Taking a Closer Look at Calories, Exercise and Cancer.

The Importance of Potassiumby the American Institute for Cancer Research Potassium is a mineral found in almost every food group, but poor eating habits can leave you short. Although a deficiency is not directly linked to any disease, you want to get enough potassium for your body's vital functions.This mineral helps balance many different body processes. Adequate levels of potassium decrease the amount of calcium excreted in urine. This makes kidney stones less likely to form. It also helps protect bones from osteoporosis.Potassium may also enhance the action of insulin in the body.A Boon for Your Blood Pressure and Stroke RiskLimiting your sodium consumption is a good way to lower your blood pressure. To help control blood pressure even more, the National High Blood Pressure Education Program strongly suggests getting enough potassium. In fact, the famous Dietary Approaches to Stop Hypertension (DASH) eating plan, which is low in sodium and saturated fat and high in potassium and calcium, has proven successful at lowering blood pressure. To find out more about the DASH plan, visit the website of the National Heart, Lung, and Blood Institute (www.nhlbi.nih.gov).Several large studies also link higher levels of potassium in the diet with a lower risk of stroke. Potassium's impact on blood pressure could be the link. But potassium may also help prevent harmful changes in the walls of blood vessels going to or inside of the brain.For all the benefits of potassium, there are a few precautions. As long as your kidneys work properly, any excess potassium is excreted in urine. But if the kidneys are compromised, high levels of potassium from supplements or excess use of salt substitutes can accumulate and cause abnormal heart rhythms. Certain medications also limit your body's ability to eliminate excess potassium.Reach Your Potassium PotentialAverage adult consumption of potassium is now between 2,100 and 3,200 mg a day. Many adults consume considerably less. Although some researchers suggest 2,500 to 3,500 mg as a good target for adults to aim for, the latest federal dietary recommendations encourage a daily potassium intake of 4,700 mg.Food processing often reduces the amount of potassium people get. Refined white flour is lower in potassium than whole-wheat flour. Vegetables boiled in large amounts of water lose potassium during cooking. Commercial snacks and baked goods high in fat and sugar, which play a large role in some people's diets, are generally very low in potassium.To get more potassium, concentrate on eating more vegetables and fruits. The forms of potassium found in these plant foods are preferable to the forms of potassium found in grains, meats, dairy foods and supplements. By striving each day to eat the eight or more servings of vegetables and fruits recommended by the DASH diet to reduce blood pressure, you can build your potassium intake, as well as reduce your cancer risk.

There are more than 9 million individuals currently living after cancer in the US alone, and this number will grow as efforts to screen and treat cancer continue to improve. Each day, these individuals must make important decisions about what to eat and how to live. These decisions may influence their risk of recurrence or secondary cancers, their ability to deal with any late effects of cancer treatment, and their overall quality of life.

Diana Dyer, MS, RD, nutrition expert and three-time cancer survivor, will discuss the diet she follows and how she determines what foods could help build the bodys capacity to fight cancer. Mark Messina, PhD, of Loma Linda University in California, will report and evaluate the latest research on the hotly contested benefits of soy and flaxseed for cancer survivors. Nagi Kumar, PhD, RD, of the H. Lee Moffitt Cancer Center and Research Institute, will review the research on weight management and its relationship to cancer development and cancer patient outcome. Wendy Demark-Wahnefried, PhD, RD, LDN of Duke Comprehensive Cancer Center, will outline what science can tell us about the influence of diet and exercise in lowering risk for cancer recurrence. Karen Collins, MS, RD, Nutrition Advisor for AICR, will provide an empowering take home message translating the available science into practical, everyday advice.

The American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) is the cancer charity that funds research on diet and cancer and educates the public about the results. The Institute provides a wide range of education programs that help millions of Americans learn to make dietary changes for lower cancer risk. AICR also supports innovative research in cancer prevention and treatment at universities, hospitals and research centers across the U.S. The Institute has provided over $73 million in funding for research in diet, nutrition and cancer. AICR's Web address is www.aicr.org. AICR is a member of the World Cancer Research Fund International.

Prevent Cancer by Preventing Overweightby the American Institute for Cancer Research For the first time in history, the world faces an epidemic of overweight and obesity. Profound social changes have led to more sedentary lifestyles and high calorie diets in developed countries like the U.S., as well as in many developing countries. In the U.S., 64 percent of adults are either overweight or obese. Among the many pressing reasons to avoid overweight and obesity, the link between cancer and overweight tends to be unknown or overlooked. In a survey conducted by the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR), only 25 percent of the public was aware of the connection. Yet it is estimated that being overweight and inactive accounts for one-fifth to one-third of all breast, colon, endometrial, kidney and esophageal cancers. In the U.S., that means between 102,000 and 135,000 new cases each year.Prevention Is the Best StrategyTo reverse the growing health problem, AICR urges adults who have a healthy weight to adopt a preventive strategy. The easiest way to manage overweight is to never let it happen. A panel of scientists assembled by AICR concluded that people should limit weight gain during adulthood to 11 pounds to reduce their risk of cancer.The best way to keep pounds off is to increase the proportion of vegetables and fruits in your diet, increase physical activity and reduce portion sizes. A new brochure from AICR, Dont Let It Happen Preventing Obesity in Adulthood, describes this effective approach in detail and highlights the periods of life when women and men should be extra careful.Staying Lean in Fattening TimesThe brochure argues that we live in fattening times. Food is abundant and relatively cheap, so we tend to overeat. If were pressed for time, we tend to choose processed foods in large servings that are full of fat and added sugars. Modern conveniences keep us physically inactive. Our environment is a prescription for steady weight gain.Because of the health risks involved in gaining excess weight and the extraordinary difficulty most people have in losing weight, prevention is the wisest policy. The brochure advises slender people to set a limit by mentally adding 11 pounds (5 kilograms) to their current weight. They should then commit themselves to never exceeding that limit.If you see your weight moving toward that limit, its time to act. Make changes in your daily routine that will keep you within this healthy weight range. Increase the amount of vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans in your meals and increase your physical activity. If those two steps do not stop weight gain, consider gradually reducing the portion sizes of the foods you eat.Dont Let It Happen is for adults. To obtain a free copy, call AICR at 1-800-843-8114, ext. 111.

Warm up before starting and cool down after you are finished with a short walk and a few stretches to prevent muscle soreness, back pain and repetitive strain injuries.Use steady, smooth motions to avoid injury.Protect yourself from the sun by wearing sunscreen, long-sleeved shirts and pants, and a wide-brimmed hat.Stay hydrated with plenty of water, especially if the temperature and humidity are high.When picking up tools or lifting bags of soil, bend your knees and keep your back straight.

If you read weight loss advice in diet books, magazines, or on the Internet, you might conclude that a vegetarian diet is a guaranteed way to lose weight. Although surveys show that vegetarians tend to weigh less than meat-eaters, you may not experience sustained weight loss by turning vegetarian. A recent study compared the eating habits of people before and after they began eating vegetarian. After following a self-selected vegetarian diet for six months, the calorie consumption of these people dropped by almost 200 calories per day. Their weight did not change, but people seemed to be leaner. There were reductions in their waist and hip measurements, as well as their skinfold measure of body fat stores.A British study did find weight differences between vegetarians and meat-eaters. This study divided more than 65,000 participants into four groups: meat-eaters, fish-eaters, lacto-ovovegetarians (who eat eggs and dairy products but no meat), and vegans (who eat no animal products). The body mass index (BMI), which is the most common way to measure body fatness, was at a healthy level in all groups. But the meat-eaters had the highest BMI as a group, which brought them closest to being overweight. Fish-eaters and lacto-ovovegetarians had similar, intermediate BMI averages, while vegans had the lowest. Among meat-eaters, 7 percent of the men and 9 percent of the women were obese. In the fish-eater and lacto-ovo groups, 3 percent of the men and 4 percent of the women were obese. Only 2 percent of the men and women vegans were obese.The difference in weight among these groups probably comes from the difference in calorie intake. Fish-eaters and lacto-ovovegetarians ate about 4 percent fewer calories than the meat-eaters. The vegans average calorie intake was 14 percent lower than the meat-eaters. Anyone who fills up on more vegetables and fruits, like the vegans, should experience a drop in calories and weight because these foods contain fewer calories in the same size portion, compared to higher-fat meat or cheese dishes.Age could help explain the weight differences in this study, too, since the participants estimated their calorie intakes a bit inaccurately. Vegans were much more likely to be in their 20s and 30s. Of the people in their 40s and 50s, two-thirds to three-quarters were meat-eaters. This age allocation is significant because the average BMI increased one to two points between the ages of 20 to 40 in each eating group. The higher BMI among meat-eaters could reflect the greater proportion of middle-aged people in the group.Nevertheless, for people of all ages, the impact of vegetarian eating on their weight depends on how it affects their calorie consumption. A healthy plant-based diet  whether it is totally vegan or includes some dairy, fish, eggs, or meat  focuses on vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans. This eating style, even with moderate amounts of nuts and healthful fats, is lower in calories than a diet with large amounts of fatty sausages and cheeseburgers.You can still consume a lot of unnecessary calories with a vegetarian diet, however. A large proportion of the average Americans calorie intake comes from soft drinks and other sweetened beverages, chips, French fries and cookies  not meat or dairy products.If you want to lose weight, look at where your excess calories come from. Try to fill up on low-calorie vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans. This is the crucial part. You can choose to omit all meats or include some fish, poultry, or lean kinds of red meat. No matter which style of eating you choose, portion control is essential. Overeating even healthy foods piles up calories that prevent weight loss.

Experts say that our best chance to control colon cancer is to detect and remove or prevent a certain type of polyp before it can become malignant. About 95 percent of colon cancers develop from benign (noncancerous) polyps that are easily removed. However, less than half of people 50 and older follow national guidelines for colorectal screenings, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. Colorectal polyps are extra bits of tissue, generally shaped like a mushroom or a small dome, growing inside the colon (large intestine) or rectum. Polyps are common. An estimated 30 to 40 percent of adults over the age of 50 develop them. Most are benign and will never develop into cancer. However, one type known as adenomatous polyps, or adenomas, can become cancerous. Genetic changes in these polyps lead to changes in the growth and regulation of their cells, causing them to multiply abnormally. Most adenomas dont become cancerous, but experts say removing them is an excellent way to make sure they dont.Rectal bleeding or blood in the stool, which can make the stool black or streaked with red, can indicate the presence of a polyp. However, most polyps produce no symptoms at all. They are found only with a routine screening test, or a procedure conducted for other reasons that looks into the colon.Some researchers say that it takes at least five years for a benign polyp to become cancerous, so frequent screenings are unnecessary. Health experts recommend that you begin having colorectal screening tests at age 50, or sooner if you or a family member has a history of polyps or colon cancer. Your physician can create a screening schedule appropriate for you, based on your individual level of risk. Of course, instead of detecting and removing polyps, it would be better to prevent them altogether. Research suggests that smoking, excessive alcohol consumption, a sedentary lifestyle and overweight all increase polyp formation.Many studies have been done to see how a persons eating habits might promote or block the formation of polyps, but specific answers are still lacking. A fiber-rich diet with plenty of vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans is commonly associated with a lower risk of colon cancer. Yet in one recent large population study, fiber consumption was unconnected to colon cancer occurrence. No randomized clinical trial the most convincing type of human study has shown that increasing peoples dietary fiber decreases the first appearance or recurrence of polyps either. The problem with the randomized clinical trials so far may be their short duration. None has been more than four years long. It is probable that diets affect on colon cancer takes place over a longer period of time. Despite the lack of supporting evidence from randomized clinical trials, you should still eat the lowfat, mostly plant-based diet researchers recommend to lower colon cancer risk. This eating style might inhibit colon cancer in several ways, such as decreasing polyp formation, slowing the growth of polyps, or blocking their transition from benign to cancerous.Other steps you could take to decrease the formation of colon polyps include limiting your red meat consumption and meeting the current recommendations for folate. This nutrient is found in dark green leafy vegetables, orange juice and other plant foods, and its often low in Americans diets. You should also get enough calcium and vitamin D. Unfortunately, the definition of what constitutes enough calcium and vitamin D is still in flux, but it appears that Americans should get more of both. Most adults can meet current recommendations for calcium and vitamin D by having three cups of nonfat or lowfat milk a day. If youre over age 50 or dont drink much milk, consider other fortified foods or supplements.

Some of the study results presented at the recent American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) International Research Conference on Food, Nutrition and Cancer focused on several hormones that may influence breast cancer risk and recurrence. The significance of the hormone estrogen, as well as testosterone, insulin, insulin-like growth factors and fat cell cytokines, for cancer risk is becoming clearer. The scientists speaking noted that a healthy diet and lifestyle can apparently modify levels of these hormones.All of us have male and female hormones in our bodies, and the risk of breast cancer seems to be affected by both. For some time, studies have pointed to estrogen and progesterone as risk factors. But now research from a part of an extremely large European study known as EPIC confirms that high levels of testosterone, usually considered a male hormone, raise a womans risk of premenopausal, and possibly postmenopausal, breast cancer. In a study of breast cancer survivors, those women with testosterone levels in the top third had more than a seven-times greater chance of recurrence than women with levels in the bottom third.Research also consistently links high levels of the hormone insulin and insulin-like growth factors with increased rates of breast cancer, at least after menopause. Women with high insulin levels have lower rates of breast cancer survival, too. These women tend to suffer a complex of changes known as the metabolic syndrome, which is characterized by high insulin levels that are less effective at controlling blood sugars. People with this condition tend to have low levels of HDL (good) cholesterol, high blood pressure, high blood triglycerides, and a greater risk of diabetes. Some scientists think that the amount of insulin and insulin-like growth factors in these women stimulate the growth of breast cancer cells. Others suggest that the cancer risk comes from insulin raising testosterone levels.A common thread in scientific thinking about the link between high insulin levels and breast cancer is the connection to overweight. Studies show that fat cells dont lie dormant in our bodies. They produce a variety of substances called cytokines that have hormone-like functions. At least six cytokines secreted by fat cells promote angiogenesis, the process by which cancer cells develop a blood supply to grow and spread. Although this connection requires further testing, it seems one more good reason to avoid overweight.Because a growing number of hormones seem related to breast cancer, researchers are testing lifestyle changes that could lower hormone levels. One small study presented at the AICR conference showed that two weeks of a high-fiber, extremely lowfat diet with daily exercise reduced insulin levels by 29 percent. One main insulin-like growth factor fell 19 percent.Lifestyle studies clarify at least one reason why regular exercise is so important to lower breast cancer risk. Consistently, research shows that exercise leads to lower levels of insulin-like growth factors and testosterone. Diet seems to affect these hormones in several ways, too. Limiting saturated fat (the kind found in meat and high-fat dairy products) is recommended to control both insulin and the available levels of male and female sex hormones. Choosing whole grains, vegetables, fruits and beans, while limiting refined carbohydrates (sweets, sugar-loaded drinks and refined grains like white bread) may also help keep insulin at healthier levels. How much you eat is just as important as what you eat. Excess calorie consumption may increase the levels of growth factors, while a reduced calorie intake lowers them. Even if you dont reach your target weight, simply limiting the calories you eat appears to be beneficial.

Using a whisk and bowl or a blender, combine all ingredients until well combined and smooth.*Asian fish sauce is found in the Asian or specialty foods section of most supermarkets and is often labeled Thai fish sauce or nam pla. The Vietnamese version, called nuoc mam, is also suitable. Fish sauce is different from the thin table sauce usually offered at Thai and Vietnamese restaurants, called nuoc cham which contains garlic, dried chile, sugar, lime or lemon juice and rice vinegar, plus fish sauce. Makes scant 3/4 cup.

Coat a large, non-stick skillet with cooking spray. Heat pan over medium-high heat until hot. Brown chicken lightly, about 8 minutes, turning pieces occasionally so they color on all sides. Transfer chicken to a plate. Heat oil in the pan. Saut? onions and garlic until translucent, about 4 minutes. Add mushrooms. Saut? until they release liquid, about 4 minutes. Add tomatoes with their liquid, oregano, basil, and pepper flakes, if using. Season with salt and pepper. Return chicken to the skillet. Simmer until chicken is white at the bone, about 40 minutes, turning it after 25 minutes. Transfer chicken pieces to plate and set sauce aside. When cool enough to handle, pull the chicken meat from the bones. There will be about 8 ounces of white meat and 6 of dark meat. Wrap the white meat in plastic wrap or foil and refrigerate until ready to use another time. Mix the dark meat into the sauce.Cook pasta according to package directions. Drain and divide among 4 bowls. Reheat chicken/sauce under low heat until hot. Spoon sauce over pasta. Sprinkle with cheese and serve.Makes 4 servings.

In a small bowl, combine jam, soy sauce, water and cornstarch. Set aside. In a large non-stick skillet, heat sesame oil over medium high heat. Add pork and ginger and stir-fry until pork is browned and just cooked through, about 3 to 5 minutes. Transfer pork and ginger to a bowl with a slotted spoon. Add canola oil to skillet. Stir-fry peppers, water chestnuts, and apples until peppers are crisp tender, about 3 minutes. Add pork back to skillet along with scallions. Stir-fry 30 seconds. Stir jam mixture to recombine, then blend into stir-fry. Continue to stir-fry 30 seconds to one minute, or until sauce thickens. Season to taste with black pepper. Serve over brown rice or whole-wheat pasta. Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 351 calories, 8 g. total fat (2 g. saturated fat), 54 g. carbohydrate, 17 g. protein, 10 g. dietary fiber, 346 mg. sodium.

Some people seem to interpret the results of a new study incorrectly by suggesting that milk drinking drives the problem of overweight among American children. A closer look at the results affirms a weight-control message long-given to adults: If you increase calorie consumption beyond your energy needs, you risk weight gain.The study that raises the question about milk drinking followed more than 12,800 American children aged 9 to 14 for three years. Those who drank more than three servings of milk a day increased their weight ranking according to the Body Mass Index (BMI) more than those who drank less. One-percent and skim milk also contributed to greater weight gain, but no one should be surprised that calories from even healthy foods can add up.In this study, the most important influence on the childrens weight changes was not calcium, total milk consumption, or the kind of milk. The childs total calorie intake was the decisive factor. Greater milk consumption was only linked to weight gain when it was part of a higher-calorie diet. The results suggest that milk was often consumed on top of other calorie-containing drinks rather than instead of them.Another study involving the same children showed that changes in their use of sugar-added drinks influenced yearly changes in their BMI. Further analysis showed that most of the change in their BMI readings was related to changes in their total calorie consumption.In another study among children aged 6 to 13, drinking more than 12 ounces of sweetened beverages each day was linked to about a six-ounce drop in milk consumption. Despite the drop in the amount of protein, calcium and other nutrients the children experienced, their overall calorie intake increased. When children drank more calories, they did not decrease calories from solid foods, so their total calories and weight gain increased. A study of younger children, aged 2 to 5, showed that, as long as their total calorie intake remained the same, changes in their juice, milk or soda consumption had no effect on their weight. Overall, studies dont show that more milk leads to weight gain. In another small study of 9-year-old girls, one group continued eating their usual diet with about 960 milligrams (mg) of calcium, while another group ate at least 1,500 mg of calcium per day. The increase came from more milk, cheese, yogurt and (to a lesser degree) calcium-fortified juices and other foods. The second groups calorie consumption was not regulated, so it rose by an average of 150 calories per day. However, these girls did not gain more in weight, BMI or body fat.In a study of 9- to 14-year-old girls, greater calcium consumption was actually linked with lower body fat, while greater soft drink consumption led to higher weights. Likewise, in a study of children aged 5 to 9, at least two servings of milk per day correlated with a lower BMI. Two servings is the amount recommended to meet the calcium needs of 4- to 8-year-old children.Increasing peoples calcium consumption could affect fat metabolism and help them lose weight. But further research is needed to confirm the limited adult studies that show when overall calories are reduced, eating more dairy products or calcium promotes greater weight loss.For now, the fight against childhood obesity should target the total amount of calories children eat, especially when they come from sweetened drinks that provide no added nutrition. Compared to 20 years ago, young people drink less milk and consume larger portions of juice and sweetened drinks. Since studies show that almost 40 percent of peoples peak bone mass is established during adolescence, and even small deficits seem to increase the lifetime risk of hip fracture, it is important for children to get the recommended amount of dairy foods. They should be more active, too, so weight gain is less likely to occur.

Scientists still are unsure how much daily vitamin E is best. The committee that created the latest federal governments Dietary Guidelines for Americans says that many adults and children in the U.S. may not consume optimum amounts of vitamin E. Although symptoms of a vitamin E deficiency are not seen, dietary surveys often show that people consume less than the Recommended Dietary Allowance (RDA).Yet the panel that established the most recent RDAs states that the publics average intake is probably above the RDA for this vitamin. One reason is that the food composition tables used to determine vitamin E consumption are incomplete. Another reason is that people often underestimate the amount of fats and oils they eat, which are major sources of this vitamin.The RDA for vitamin E for all adults is 15 milligrams (mg). Vegetable oils are the major sources. A tablespoon of canola oil supplies 2.4 mg, while a tablespoon of olive oil has 1.9 mg. Almonds are the most concentrated nut source, with 13.5 mg in a one-third cup serving. Peanuts have 2.44 mg in the same portion. Ready-to-eat fortified cereals provide from 7 to 17 mg. Lesser sources include a half-cup of cooked dark leafy green vegetables, which delivers 2 mg. Because many of the foods with vitamin E are concentrated in calories, its hard to meet the RDA for this vitamin if youre trying to cut calories. For example, the lowfat DASH diet, which is a highly recommended mostly plant-based eating style, provides only about 11 to 12 mg of vitamin E, unless you make specific food choices to raise the amount.Vitamin E is important because it is an antioxidant. It decreases the oxidation of LDL cholesterol to keep it in a less damaging form. Vitamin E also protects the heart by decreasing the tendency of blood cells to clot and stick to blood vessel walls. It may help prevent cancer by neutralizing substances called free radicals that damage cells DNA. It could also stop cancer cells from developing the blood supply they need to grow and spread.Although taking supplements and eating fortified foods that give you 1,000 International Units (IU) are clearly unsafe because they increase the risk of hemorrhage, it is unclear whether you should try to go beyond the RDA of 15 mg (about 22 to 33 IU) for this vitamin.The HOPE and HOPE-TOO trials followed people taking 400 IU vitamin E supplements for an average of 4.5 and 7 years. Their blood levels of vitamin E increased dramatically, but there was no difference in cancer incidence, cancer deaths, heart attack, or stroke between the this group of people and another group in the study which took no vitamin E supplements. However, the group taking vitamin E was 21 percent more likely to be hospitalized for heart failure. A recent review of 19 studies of vitamin E supplementation also noted that most studies of people using doses of 400 IU or more found slight increases in overall death rates. Lower doses such as the 30 IU found in multivitamins did not show such dangers.Although another recent review discovered that six out of seven large randomized trials indicate that vitamin E supplements have no effect on heart attack, stroke, or heart-related death, there may be a health difference between vitamin E supplements and the vitamins natural form. Most supplements contain and thus most research looks at the form of vitamin E known as alpha-tocopherol. However, gamma-tocopherol is actually the major form in the American diet. This is the kind that is high in walnuts, peanuts and pecans, as well as corn and soy oils. Some studies show that blood levels of gamma-tocopherol are a good or better indicator of heart and cancer risk. Gamma-tocopherol may even have unique cancer-suppressing functions within cells. Some studies suggest that alpha-tocopherol supplements may have the undesirable effect of reducing blood and tissue levels of gamma-tocopherol.

All healthy habits are not equal. Since the media bombards us with so many different ways to improve our health, its easy to jump from one to another, or just give up. Although the right habits can pay good health dividends, several studies show that few Americans successfully focus on the habits that offer the most benefits.One recent survey asked more than 153,000 Americans aged 18 to 74 how well they practiced four of the most important healthy habits. The most widely adopted healthy habit was tobacco avoidance: 76 percent said they were nonsmokers. Forty percent reported a weight that put them in the healthy body mass index (BMI) range of 18.5 to 25.0. But only 23 percent reported eating five or more servings of fruits and vegetables a day. And just 22 percent said they were physically active 30 minutes or more at least five times a week.Since each of these habits brings health benefits, practicing even one is better than none. But, surprisingly, nearly 40 percent of those surveyed followed only one of these basic healthful habits. A meager three percent carried out all four of these widely recommended behaviors.Two earlier studies, part of the Nurses Health Study, examined how well people met five good health criteria. These criteria were a healthy weight, nonsmoker, at least 30 minutes of moderate to vigorous activity daily, a healthy diet and a moderate use of alcohol. Since a healthy diet is made up of many habits, scientists in these two studies looked for a high-fiber diet low in saturated and trans fats, with limited sweets and refined grains. Only three percent of the women in these studies met all of the standards, but those who did were far better off healthwise. The other women developed almost five times more heart problems and ten times more diabetes than they did.Another large study looked at how peoples compliance with the former federal governments Dietary Guidelines for Americans affected their cancer incidence. Post-menopausal women earned points for: a healthy weight; moderate or vigorous activity more than four days a week; limiting fat intake; eating a variety of vegetables, fruits and grains; three or more daily servings of whole grains; curbing sweets and sodium; getting adequate servings from all the food groups; and no more than one drink of alcohol a day. None of the women had a perfect score, but twenty percent met at least six of the nine standards. Compared to those who practiced four or fewer of the recommendations, the healthy-habit group developed 15 percent less cancer. The cancer risk of this same group of post-menopausal women was evaluated again in another interesting study. This time, the women were compared on the basis of how well they followed the dietary guidelines of the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) for cancer prevention. These guidelines differ somewhat from the Dietary Guidelines for Americans. The women were ranked according to nine points from AICRs guidelines. The nine points covered: nonsmoking, maintaining a healthy weight and limiting adult weight gain, exercising moderately each day, eating at least five servings of vegetables and fruits a day, consuming adequate whole grains and other complex carbohydrates, limiting red meat, fat and sodium, and having no more than one standard alcoholic drink per day.No woman achieved all nine guidelines. Most people met about four out of the nine. Only 10 percent met six or more, but those who did reduced their cancer risk by 31 percent.In all of these studies, only a minority practiced most or all of the steps that promote good health. These people dramatically improved their chances of staying healthy. The rest of us should now focus on these habits that have the most impact.

In a glass, ceramic, or plastic bowl, combine the tomatoes with the salt, onion and 2 tablespoons of the oil. Set aside for 15 minutes. Meanwhile, boil a large pot of water and cook the spaghetti al dente according to package directions. Drain the spaghetti and turn it into a large, warm serving bowl. Toss the pasta with the remaining tablespoon of oil to keep it from sticking together.Mix the parsley and basil into the tomatoes. Season generously with pepper. Pour the salsa cruda over the warm pasta. Toss the entire mixture to blend well. Serve immediately.Makes 5 servings.Per serving: 325 calories, 9 g. total fat (1 g. saturated fat), 54 g. carbohydrate, 11 g. protein, 10 g. dietary fiber, 478 mg. sodium.

In a shallow pan, mix together 1/4 cup soy sauce, 1 tsp. sugar, 1 tablespoon Mirin, the scallion and ginger. Add chicken and marinate 10-30 minutes, then drain and pat dry with paper toweling. (Discard used marinade, which should never be reused, as it may be contaminated by potentially harmful bacteria and could lead to food-borne illness.) Meanwhile, mix together in a small bowl or cup the remaining soy sauce, Mirin and sugar with the cornstarch until well blended. Set aside to use later.Heat pan until very hot. Add 1 tablespoon of oil, or enough to stir-fry meat, and heat until very hot. Add meat and stir-fry until it turns color. Remove with slotted spoon and set aside.Using small amounts of oil as needed, stir-fry vegetables. Do not overcrowd the pan; cook in batches if necessary, starting with those that take the longest to cook. Transfer cooked vegetables to a covered dish to keep warm. When all the vegetables are tender-crisp, add back to the pan any that were removed and the meat. Stir the sauce to recombine and add, stirring until sauce thickens. Serve immediately with steamed rice.Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 341 calories, 10 g. total fat (1 g. saturated fat), 44 g. carbohydrate, 16 g. protein, 4 g. dietary fiber, 663 mg. sodium.

How do you feel about gaining 10 to 20 pounds? Researchers say that most Americans probably will within the next ten years, if they continue their current exercise and eating habits. In fact, the average American gains one to two pounds a year throughout much of adulthood. Yet studies show that practical healthy eating and exercise habits can prevent or minimize this weight gain.Although adult weight gain is common, you shouldnt consider it normal or healthy. Middle-age weight gain increases the risk of diabetes and heart disease. In one study, for every two pounds men gained, their risk of developing diabetes in the next 10 years rose by over 7 percent. A waist increase of over one inch during 10 years correlated with 20 percent of the new diabetes cases in that study.Weight gain damages your joints, too. When normal-weight young adults become overweight, their risk of developing osteoarthritis of the knees requiring surgery rises three-fold.The worst consequence of overweight may be the greater risk of several cancers, especially colon cancer and post-menopausal breast cancer. A gain of more than 45 pounds during adulthood doubles the risk of this type of breast cancer, while smaller weight gains can raise the risk by 20 percent. For breast cancer survivors, weight gain lifts the risk of cancer recurrence and death from 35 percent for small increases to 64 percent for larger ones of about 17 pounds.The latest edition of the federal Dietary Guidelines for Americans stresses the importance of preventing weight gain like never before. For years, the American Institute for Cancer Research has recommended that adults gain no more than 11 pounds after reaching adulthood.Changing your balance of calories by 100 fewer calories a day by consuming less or exercising more would probably be enough to prevent any gradual yearly weight gain. One recent report says you may have to decease calorie consumption by 100 calories day and add 2,000 steps, or a 15-to-20-minute brisk walk. Two easy ways to cut 100 calories from your day are to replace a cup of pasta with vegetables at your dinner or choose fruit instead of chips when you lunch or snack.Studies consistently show that your activity level is a key influence on your weight. A new study shows that a 30-minute brisk walk three days a week may be enough to reduce weight gain by close to a pound a year. To prevent weight gain altogether, another study suggests that 45 to 60 minutes a day of walking, yard work or similar activity may be needed. Of course, your eating habits matter, too. In one large study, middle-aged men and women with a healthy weight, who ate more raw vegetables, fruits and whole grains and less processed meat, high-fat dairy products, and butter or margarine, either maintained their weight or gained much less weight than those who followed the opposite eating patterns. Other studies have shown that whole grains, as well as vegetables and fruits, can independently reduce weight gain and waistline increases. In a study of middle-aged women, those who increased their vegetable and fruit consumption the most had a 28 percent less risk of a major weight gain than those who cut back the most on these nutritious foods. To switch to a plant-based diet built around vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans, gradually make small changes that you can sustain. Combine these changes with exercise to further reduce your chance of adult weight gain and its health risks.

Many Americans still do not know that grilling can be unhealthy. The cancer risk from grilling, however, is real, but it changes dramatically with what you grill and how you do it.The problem with traditional grilling comes from the combination of meat with intense heat. Whether you are using red meat, poultry or seafood, substances in the muscle proteins of these foods react under high heat to form carcinogenic compounds called heterocyclic amines (HCAs). HCAs can damage the DNA of our genes, beginning the process of cancer development. Consumption of HCAs is mostly clearly linked to cancers of the colon and stomach. One study found that people who eat the most barbecued red meat (beef, pork and lamb) almost doubled their risk of colon polyps, compared to those who did not eat these foods. Colon polyps can develop into colon cancer. Some evidence also suggests that these carcinogenic compounds can travel through the bloodstream to other tissues. This would explain why HCAs could be a factor in breast cancer and other cancers.A simple way to decrease formation of carcinogenic HCAs is to cook your meat at lower temperatures, like roasting it in the oven and stewing it. If you still want to grill, turn the gas down or wait for charcoal to become low-burning embers. By raising the grilling surface from the heat source, you can also reduce black char that can form on meat. This char has a high carcinogen content.Pan-frying is another method of cooking that you should do at a lower temperature. Research shows that frying meat at a higher pan temperature, which saves only two minutes of cooking time, produces three times the HCA content of meat cooked at medium temperatures. Two more ways to reduce HCAs when grilling are flipping meat every minute and marinating. Marinating can decrease HCA formation by up to 96 percent, although studies are still underway to determine which ingredients help the most. To avoid a different class of cancer-causing compounds called polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs), grill leaner meat cuts that will drip less and cause fewer flare-ups and smoke. PAHs form in smoke and are deposited on the outside of meat. Although it is a good idea to use an instant-read thermometer to be sure meat is thoroughly cooked, the further you cook meat past that point, the more HCAs will form. A higher consumption of well-done meat is linked with two to five times more colon cancer and two to three times more breast cancer. Risk of cancers of the stomach, pancreas and prostate may also increase.Since the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) recommends limiting all red meat to no more than three ounces a day, another way to reduce your cancer risk when grilling is to change what you grill. Fish and marinated skinless chicken are both great on the grill, although HCAs can still form on them. If you still want to eat red meat, make kabobs. The small pieces of meat cook quickly, and you can add lots of vegetables. The best choice for grilling, however, is vegetables and fruits, because they dont form HCAs. These foods also supply a whole range of cancer-fighting nutrients and phytochemicals. In fact, the natural phytochemicals in vegetables stimulate enzymes that can convert HCAs to an inactive, stable form that is easily eliminated from the body. Even during barbecue season, your health will benefit by following AICRs model of healthy eating called the New American Plate that makes vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans the centerpieces of the meal.

When a new government report from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention concluded that moderate overweight may not affect death rates as much as previously thought, many Americans reacted with confusion and frustration, as they recalled numerous messages about the dangers of skyrocketing obesity. Although the actual fatalities from moderate overweight may be lower than originally estimated, the harm from excess weight is real. Serious health problems, the costs of treating such problems and quality of life issues should encourage all of us to avoid as much excess weight as we can.Weight studies generally describe weight in terms of the Body Mass Index (BMI), which expresses weight in proportion to height. There is little question about the dangers of excessive weight called obesity, defined as a BMI of 30 or more. However, research is less clear about the impact of moderate overweight, which registers as a BMI of 25 to 30.Part of the uncertainty about the effects of moderate overweight revolves around the level of a persons fitness compared to their fatness. Some researchers suggest that physically fit people in this category have less health risks than inactive people.Other researchers emphasize the negative influence of any excess weight. A study in Finland found that among adults who had never smoked, the risk of heart disease was two times higher in men and 1.6 times higher in women with BMIs of 25 to 29.9, compared to people with a BMI under 25. Obesity raised the risk of heart disease even more. In the same study, moderate overweight was linked with a substantially greater need for long-term medications and more years on work disability.In addition to heart disease, moderate overweight increases the risk of high blood pressure, especially before the age of 55, by 30 to 90 percent. Medications to control blood pressure can be costly and can adversely affect peoples quality of life.Diabetes is another major danger related to weight and a sedentary lifestyle. Studies show that moderate overweight increases the risk of it more than three-fold making overweight a more significant risk factor for diabetes than lack of exercise while obesity increases the risk more than nine-fold. Adult weight gain is especially problematic. In one study, for every two pounds adult men gained their risk of developing diabetes increased by about 7 percent.Moderate overweight also increases a persons overall cancer risk, according to a landmark report on diet and cancer from the American Institute for Cancer Research. The report highlights the dangers of weight gain in adults. This weight gain may activate hormones and growth factors that promote cancer development. A recent report on breast cancer confirms the harmful impact of moderate overweight and adult weight gain on breast cancer risk.Lastly, the smaller ways in which excess weight damages and stresses the body should not be overlooked. Gallstones become much more common. Arthritis, especially of weight-bearing joints such as the knees, becomes more common, too. Gout is almost twice as common among the moderately overweight, but can decrease with weight loss. If you have a BMI of 25 or over even if you are obese you should reap multiple health benefits by striving for and maintaining a ten percent drop in your weight. To do this, establish a lifestyle that includes daily exercise, portion control, limiting fat and sugar consumption, and eating a mostly plant-based diet.

The recent results from the Womens Intervention Nutrition Study (WINS) renew hope for breast cancer survivors. The women who followed a lowfat diet in this study reduced their risk of a recurrence during the next five years by 24 percent. Although it is important to know how much less fat these women ate and how they cut back, less fat may be only a part of the reason for their lower cancer risk.This important study tracked two groups of women aged 48 to 79 for five years who had received treatment for early breast cancers. One group received nutrition counseling to learn how to reduce their fat consumption, while the other group was merely told about healthful eating without fat reduction. The first group decreased the fat in their diets from about 29 percent of calories to about 20 percent, eating an average of close to 33 grams of fat a day. The second group averaged about 51 grams daily.An examination showed that some women in the first group who consistently met the fat targets set for this group chose lower-fat types of cheese, red meat, poultry, added fat (like salad dressing) and sweets. The biggest reason that these women succeeded better at meeting the fat goals, however, is that they cut back more on high-fat foods, such as muffins, doughnuts, cookies, snack foods, dairy desserts, cheese, nuts, eggs, red meat and added fats. Despite the convincing results of WINS, the impact of dietary fat on breast cancer risk and recurrence remains unclear. Different types of fat or various proportions of fats may have different effects. For example, omega-3 fats, found in certain fish, walnuts and flaxseed, may protect against breast cancer. The risk from fat may also vary with a womans life stage. Other diet and lifestyle choices could also override fats influence.One major factor that could help explain the lower cancer risk of the lowfat WINS group is a higher consumption of vegetables and fruits. A Swedish study found that people who had a lowfat diet ate more vegetables, fruits and cereals. These foods have plenty of cancer-protective nutrients and fiber.Low-fat diets may also cause weight loss, lowering cancer risk. Studies repeatedly link both overweight and weight gain with a greater risk of postmenopausal breast cancer and breast cancer recurrence. In the Nurses Health Study, large weight gains after a diagnosis of breast cancer correlated with a 64 percent greater risk of recurrence; smaller weight gains led to smaller increases in risk.While we wait to learn more about why lowfat diets reduced cancer recurrence, a smart strategy to prevent breast cancer or its recurrence should include several steps. First, reach and maintain a healthy weight. Second, limit high-fat foods because of their high-calorie content, whether or not their fat poses a direct cancer risk. Keep in mind that omega-3 fats may be protective. Third, although exercise was not part of the WINS study, it helps control weight. It also seems to protect against breast cancer. Fourth, focus on eating lowfat foods that provide cancer-fighting nutrients and phytochemicals vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans rather than lowfat or low-calorie foods that offer no nutritional benefits. Fifth, because a lowfat, plant-based diet wont lead to weight control if portions are too large, take portions appropriate for your energy needs. A good guide to follow is in the American Institute for Cancer Researchs New American Plate brochures, which you can read online at www.aicr.org.

Assemble the salad by tearing lettuce into large pieces. Arrange leaves to cover a serving platter. Mound tuna in center of platter. Arrange potatoes in a ring around tuna. Arrange beans around potatoes. Sprinkle capers over potatoes. Place hard-boiled egg whites, tomato wedges and anchovies (if using) around beans, in alternating fashion. Sprinkle olives and arrange onion rings over top of salad. In a small bowl, combine vinegar and garlic. Whisk in oil. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Pour dressing over salad, making sure to moisten fish well. Place salad platter on buffet or dining table alongside individual plates to allow diners to serve themselves. Makes 4 servings.

The proposed Alcohol Facts panel would carry information about health risks and calorie content, a step the cancer experts say is needed to combat a striking drop in public awareness of the connection between alcohol consumption and chronic diseases like cancer.

At a time when the aging American population is recognizing that diet and physical activity are directly connected to chronic disease and overweight and obesity, having standardized information about the alcohol and calorie content on the labels of beer, wine and distilled spirits products will be an in important way for all of us to make better informed decisions about how much beverage alcohol we consume.

The cancer experts point to research showing a convincing link between excessive alcohol consumption and cancers of the mouth, pharynx, larynx, esophagus and liver. Evidence linking alcohol to colorectal and breast cancers is slightly less strong, but the experts judge the link probable, while evidence linking alcohol to lung cancer is considered possible.

The complete Facts vs. Fears Survey Table at www.aicr.org/survey/ contains year-by-year breakdowns of survey responses, with each potential risk factor ranked by popularity. The scientific evidence for each potential cancer link, graded as convincing, probable, possible or insufficient evidence/no proven link, is also provided.

The drop in awareness of the alcohol-cancer link is the one of the only observable changes that has taken place in American attitudes about cancer risk, according to the survey. More importantly, the downward trend shows no sign of leveling off.

Some of these studies have suggested that alcohol itself inhibits the formation of blood platelets, reducing undesirable clotting; it may also raise HDL (good) cholesterol. Red wine contains substances called polyphenols (such as the much-studied resveratrol) that are potent antioxidants and anti-inflammatory agents, which may also benefit heart health. Resveratrol has also been shown to exhibit a range of potential cancer-fighting activities in laboratory studies.

But the key issue, Collins said, is that all of these possible health benefits are associated with moderate drinking. And many Americans who consider their drinking moderate might be surprised to learn how AICR, the USDA and other health organizations define the term.

Although the possible benefits of moderate consumption demand further study, there is wealth of clear and convincing evidence that excessive consumption of alcohol is associated with increases in blood pressure, triglyceride levels and stroke risk, as well as with cancers of the mouth, pharynx, larynx and esophagus (especially among those who drink and smoke simultaneously), liver, colon and rectum.

In the letter to the Chief of the Regulations and Procedures Division, AICRs Browning concluded by urging the Bureau to permit bottlers to provide this health information immediately, on a voluntary basis, until changes to the Bureaus regulations can be enacted.

Canola cooking spray2 tsp. extra virgin olive oil1 medium red onion, finely chopped1 small leek, thinly sliced2 small zucchini (6-inches), thinly sliced2 tsp. dried oregano3 large eggs6 large egg whites or 3/4 cup liquid egg whites 2 Tbsp. reduced-fat (2%) milk1/3 cup grated Parmesan cheese1/4 cup chopped fresh basil1/2 tsp. saltPinch cayenne pepper2 large plum tomatoes, thinly sliced crosswiseMinced flat-leaf parsley, for garnish (optional) Place a rack in the center of the oven. Preheat the oven to 375 degrees. Coat 6 6-ounce heatproof ramekins or custard cups generously with cooking oil spray and set aside. (For dishes holding more or less volume, count on enough to hold a total of 4 1/2 cups of egg mixture.) Heat the oil in a medium, non-stick skillet over medium-high heat. Saut? the onion until soft, 4 to 5 minutes. Mix in the leek, zucchini and oregano. Cook until the zucchini is just soft, about 4 minutes, stirring occasionally. Set the vegetables aside to cool.In a large mixing bowl, whisk the eggs, whites and milk to combine them. Mix in the vegetables, cheese, basil, salt and cayenne. Spoon the mixture into the prepared dishes, dividing it evenly. Arrange 2 tomato slices on the top of each frittata. Set a baking sheet on the oven rack. Place the ramekins on the baking sheet. Bake 25 minutes or until the frittatas are puffed, browned and a knife inserted into the center comes out clean. Remove from the oven and let them sit 5 minutes. Unmold the frittatas and serve hot, or let stand up to 2 hours, to serve at room temperature. Garnish with parsley just before serving.Makes 6 6-oz. ramekins or custard cups. Per serving: 113 calories, 6 g. total fat (2 g. saturated fat), 6 g. carbohydrate, 9 g. protein, 1 g. dietary fiber, 359 mg. sodium.

The U.S. Department of Agriculture (USDA) and the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) both issue science-based guidelines for healthful eating. But do these recommendations apply to everyone? Research does show that certain eating patterns, like the USDA and AICR prescribe, lower the risk of chronic diseases, including cancer, heart disease and diabetes. Yet a blossoming field of research suggests that inherited differences may make some individuals respond differently to the same diet.It has been known for a while that some inherited genes can make some people more likely to develop certain diseases. For example, 5 to 10 percent of all cancers are linked to inherited genes. With more research on how genes work, the ability of doctors to diagnose health problems at very early stages even before they fully develop and select the proper treatment is expected to improve. Furthermore, some researchers are looking exclusively at how peoples genetic makeup might affect their bodys response to diet. As research in these areas progresses, people with a strong family history of heart disease, cancer, diabetes, osteoporosis or other chronic ailments may be able to meet with a health professional and work out a prevention plan. Together they could review the many interacting influences that might affect their risk of developing the disease and how best to avoid them. For example, people with a family history of heart disease might develop a multi-dimensional prevention strategy that goes way beyond monitoring blood cholesterol levels. The strategy might include setting exercise goals, consuming specific antioxidant nutrients and phytochemicals, and the choice of dietary fats. All these steps may help prevent heart disease due to chronic inflammation that can be measured in blood tests by a marker called CRP. People with a family history of colon cancer might develop a prevention plan that outlines specific amounts and kinds of fat, fiber, carbohydrates, meat, calcium, vitamin D and calories, in addition to exercise routines. A better understanding of genetic differences could improve the health of people without a family history of some disease, as well. For the vast majority of us, HDL (good) cholesterol stays higher when we limit the polyunsaturated fat found in most vegetable oils and margarine. That is why the Mediterranean diet, which emphasizes olive oil with its higher monounsaturated fat content, is an excellent eating style. For a few people, however, a particular genetic variation causes them to have healthier HDL levels with a slightly higher polyunsaturated fat consumption. Genetic variations also seem to explain why alcohol can affect different peoples risk of heart disease in different ways. Depending on their inherited traits, people might want to avoid alcohol altogether or strongly limit its use.The promising research on the interactions between genes and diet does not, however, diminish the value of todays dietary recommendations for the general public. A primary recommendation of any science-based guidelines for the prevention of cancer and other diseases is: Eat a mostly plant-based diet. This healthy eating style focuses on vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans. Although some people may benefit from these foods or particular kinds of these foods more than others, these foods still supply vitamins, fiber, minerals, and a host of health-promoting phytochemicals that are vital to us all. People may vary in the health benefit they receive from drinking alcohol in moderation or not at all, but nobody benefits from excessive alcohol. Likewise, some people may need more exercise than others, but we all benefit from more activity. And even if individuals differ in the ideal amounts of monounsaturated, polyunsaturated and even total fat they should have, limiting saturated fat and trans fat should still be good advice for us all.

Good nutrition is a highly important part of cancer prevention. It can also influence the survival and the quality of life of people who have been diagnosed with cancer. Although general dietary information is sometimes enough to help cancer patients eat more healthfully, personal dietary counseling can make a major difference in helping people apply nutrition knowledge to their lifestyle, food preferences, medical condition and family situation.A recent study shows the usefulness of personal dietary counseling. Radiation therapy for colon cancer often causes undesirable weight loss and side effects such as diarrhea and nausea. In this recent study, researchers selected 111 patients with colorectal cancer who were to be given radiation therapy. One group was allowed to eat what they desired without any guidance. Another group was prescribed a nutrient dense, high-protein liquid supplement. If the supplement was taken twice a day as the patients were instructed, 400 calories and 40 grams of protein would be added to their diet. A third group was provided with individual nutrition counseling on how to use regular foods to meet their nutrient needs in a way that satisfied their personal food preferences and counteracted any side effects of their treatment. When the radiation therapy ended, the calorie intake of those patients receiving no help had fallen by 285 calories per day. Those patients who took the supplement increased their intake by 296 calories per day. And those receiving individual counseling had increased their calorie intake by 555 calories per day. Three months later, those who received personal dietary counseling maintained their calorie intake, while the intake of the other two groups had declined to their initial calorie levels. The group that received no nutritional help, however, had the highest rates of side effects such as loss of appetite, nausea and diarrhea, directly after radiation therapy and three months later. The nutritional status of almost all of these patients had deteriorated since diagnosis. In comparison, about half of the group who took the supplement were able to maintain their nutritional status. Yet 90 percent of those who received individual counseling maintained their nutritional status and suffered the least amount of side effects, weight loss and muscle loss.Individual dietary counseling is also able to help cancer patients reduce their weight and the chance of weight gain. For example, excess weight and weight gain both appear linked with poorer survival rates for women diagnosed with breast cancer. A new study that followed over 5,000 women from the Nurses Health Study for about nine years shows that among never-smokers, those more overweight before diagnosis of breast cancer had greater odds of cancer recurrence and death than normal weight never-smokers. Among never-smokers who were normal weight at the time of diagnosis, those who gained about six pounds faced a 35 percent increased risk of death due to breast cancer, compared to women who maintained their weight. Those who gained about 17 pounds faced a 64 percent increased risk of death.A small pilot study has found that dietary guidance, along with an exercise program, is able to help breast cancer survivors receiving adjuvant chemotherapy to lose modest amounts of weight. Larger studies are now in progress evaluating other possible forms of dietary support, including cooking classes and personal counseling by telephone.As research continues to show the impact that sound eating habits can have on the survival and quality of life of cancer patients during and after cancer treatment, it is apparent that individualized care can make a difference. To find a registered dietitian with expertise in cancer care, cancer patients can ask their physician for a referral, or use the American Dietetic Association website (www.eatright.org) to locate one in their area.

Consumers now worry about which carbohydrate foods they choose, as well as how much of them they eat. Sometimes they worry about the vitamin, fiber, phytochemical, or sugar content of these foods. More often people seem to think about the glycemic index, although they are confused about how to apply it. Despite the confusion, the all-important message is still: Eat a mostly plant-based diet.Carbohydrates that are broken down quickly in the body, rapidly raising blood sugar levels and causing a quick insulin response are said to have a high glycemic index (GI). These carbohydrates include sweets, potatoes, white rice and refined cereals and breads. High GI foods may make blood sugar control worse in people with diabetes. But everyone may quickly become hungry and fatigued after eating these fast-burning foodsFoods with a low GI are digested and absorbed more slowly. They should satisfy hunger and maintain energy levels for longer periods of time. Whole-grain breads, pasta, beans, and most fruits and vegetables all have a low GI.Low GI foods are often mentioned as aiding weight loss, but a new study suggests that both low and high GI foods may help. In this study, moderately overweight women were divided into two groups and given equal amounts of either low or high GI foods to include in their meals and snacks for 10 weeks. Both groups ate a high-carbohydrate, lowfat diet similar in fiber content. Afterwards, the women reported no differences in hunger or fullness. Both groups lost weight, and there was no difference in their weight loss or calorie intake. It should be noted, however, that the women who ate low GI foods lost more than twice as much body fat as women eating mainly high GI foods. Although the fat loss was statistically insignificant, it could be more important over a longer period of time.This studys attempt at measuring the impact of foods with high and low glycemic indices, however, does not correspond to carbohydrate choices we normally face. This study tried to keep the fiber intake and energy density (the amount of calories in a portion size) of the diets the two groups of women ate the same. Yet low GI foods, which include whole grains, vegetables, fruits and beans, are often lower in calories and higher in fiber than similar portions of high GI foods. The concept of glycemic load is related to glycemic index, but it is a more useful term because it refers to the effects of actual amounts of foods eaten. Glycemic index, on the other hand, is based on a standard amount, which may not correspond to how much you would actually eat. The glycemic index of foods and the portions someone eats of them are used to calculate the glycemic load. Studies suggest that a diet with a high glycemic load may double the risk of heart disease for those who are overweight. The glycemic index or glycemic load of foods may or may not influence cancer risk. Some studies link high GI foods or high glycemic load with a 24 percent to almost 300 percent greater risk of colon, pancreatic, prostate, uterine, stomach, or post-menopausal breast cancers. Yet other studies show no link at all. When you think about the concepts glycemic index or glycemic load, keep in mind that it is best to see your diet as a whole package, rather than individual pieces. You shouldnt choose foods just because they have a low GI, because you may deprive yourself of fiber, vitamins, minerals and phytochemicals and overload your body with fat and protein. A mostly plant-based diet, which is associated with a lower risk for cancer and heart disease, tends to contain a lot of low GI foods and other beneficial characteristics like fiber. Thats why its the best choice for good health.

If you wonder what the future holds for you, you may want to look at a pedometer. Recent studies emphasize that the amount of exercise you get independently affects your long-term health, no matter what your weight, blood cholesterol, or blood pressure may be.Although weight control can help lower your risk for both heart disease and cancer, so can exercise. For all weight levels, a lifestyle with at least 3.5 hours of exercise a week lowers the risk of death 25 to 30 percent, according to a recent study of more than 116,000 women. In an earlier study, mens fitness test scores had more impact on their risk of death during the next 10 years than being overweight or obese.Regular exercise can help lower the risk of several cancers. In a study of women after menopause, participants who had a history of regular vigorous exercise at age 35 had a 14-percent-less risk of breast cancer than less active ones. Women who were walking briskly for 30 minutes three to five times a week, or did a similar activity for the same amount of time, at the start of the study faced an 18 percent lower breast cancer risk over the next four to five years.Exercise can also help people with type 2 diabetes. Many of these people suffer from heart disease. A recent Finnish study followed men and women with diabetes who were aged 25 to 74 for almost 19 years. People with at least moderate levels of physical activity were less likely to die from heart disease or any other cause than less active adults. The benefits of exercise applied to a wide range of people: overweight or not, with or without high blood pressure, and nonsmokers or smokers.As these studies show, exercise can help protect us from illness. But our quality of life depends on much more. It includes the ability to walk enough for errands or trips, carry packages or suitcases, and climb stairs easily. A new study from the U.K. links the ability to perform such routine activities with regular physical activity in middle age. In this study, 2.5 hours of moderate exercise (such as biking or leisurely swimming), or one hour of vigorous activity (such as running or swimming laps) per week was protective. Unfortunately, most of the healthy middle-aged people who began the study did not meet these minimum standards. Nine years later, most of them had developed some physical limitations. Experts often recommend physical activity in terms of time. The most recent Dietary Guidelines for Americans from the U.S. Department of Agriculture repeat advice from the American Institute for Cancer Research that we should aim for at least one hour of moderate activity every day. Of course, those who have been sedentary will benefit from any increase in activity. These people should try for 30 minutes a day most days of the week, until they can do more.Another way to measure physical activity is to use a pedometer. This device clips on your waistband and counts the steps you take. A new study compares the actual physical activity between women who followed a 30-minute guideline and women who tried to reach 10,000 steps a day. Before the study, both groups walked less than 7,000 steps each day. The women who aimed for 30 minutes of exercise reached 9,505 steps on the days in which they included a 30-minute walk. But on the days without this walk, they reached less than 5,600 steps a day. In contrast, the women who tried for 10,000 steps averaged 11,775 steps when they met their goal. Even when they fell short, however, they still averaged 7,780 steps.Perhaps a time goal leaves us vulnerable to an all-or-nothing attitude. If we cant fit in 30 minutes or an hour of exercise, we may give up. Wearing a pedometer, on the other hand, may help us see how seizing each opportunity to be active adds up for our health.

Place peas in a heat-proof bowl or a saucepan. Add boiling water and let stand about 5 minutes or until peas are tender. Drain and place in a blender with mint and yogurt. Blend until smooth. Gradually blend in enough buttermilk to desired consistency and until mixture is smooth. Pour through a fine-mesh sieve set into a bowl or deep container, stirring to speed liquid through the sieve. Discard contents of sieve. Chill mixture until cold. Before serving, shake, check taste and add salt if desired. Makes about 1 3/4 cups, or 2 servings. Per serving: 101 calories, less than 1 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 17 g. carbohydrate, 8 g. protein, 4 g. dietary fiber, 146 mg. sodium.

Preheat grill or barbecue at medium-high heat.Place first 6 ingredients cut-side up on a baking sheet. Lightly spray with canola oil spray and season with salt and pepper. Mix 3 garlic cloves with 1/4 cup vinegar. Drizzle over vegetables. Grill vegetables until tender, turning once. As each vegetable becomes tender, transfer to a bowl. Let cool. Save all vegetable juices.Mix remaining 2 garlic cloves and 5 Tbsp. vinegar with broth, basil, thyme and oil. Chop vegetables very coarsely and place in large bowl. Pour saved vegetable juices into mixture. Add lettuce and Parmesan to vegetables and pour vinegar mixture over. Toss well. Season with salt and pepper.Makes 4 servings.Per serving: 173 calories, 5 g. total fat (1 g. saturated fat), 27 g. carbohydrate, 7 g. protein, 6 g. dietary fiber, 207 mg. sodium.

Canola oil spray1 large zucchini, cut crosswise into 1-inch slices1 small eggplant, about 1 pound, cut in 1-inch cubes1 Tbsp. extra virgin olive oil1 large sweet onion, chopped3 large garlic cloves, finely chopped2 Tbsp. chili powder2 Tbsp. dried oregano1 Tbsp. ground cumin1/4 1/2 tsp. ground chipotle chili1 Tbsp. tomato pasteOne can (28 oz.) whole plum tomatoes, drained, liquid reserved2 cans (15 oz. each) black beans, rinsed and drained1/2 packed cup cilantro leavesCayenne pepper, to taste (optional)Salt and freshly ground black pepper, to taste1/2 cup reduced fat sour cream, for garnish1-2 Tbsp. lime juice, for garnish Preheat the oven to 425 F. Coat a baking sheet with cooking spray. Place the squash and eggplant on the sheet. Generously spray the vegetables with cooking spray and toss to coat them all over. Spread them in one layer. Roast until the eggplant is lightly colored and soft but holding its shape, 20-25 minutes, turning the vegetables after 15 minutes. This can be done up to 4 hours ahead. Meanwhile, heat the oil in a large pot over medium heat. Saut? the onion until translucent, 4 minutes. Add the garlic and cook until the onion is soft, 3 minutes longer. Mix in the chili powder, oregano, cumin, and chipotle chili. Stir in the tomato paste. Add the tomatoes and 1/2 cup of their liquid. Break up the tomatoes with a spoon. Simmer 15 minutes. Add the beans and roasted vegetables. Cook 10 minutes, stirring occasionally, adding more tomato liquid to keep the chili moist but not soupy. When the zucchini is soft but not mushy, remove from the heat. Mix in the cilantro and cayenne, salt and pepper to taste. Divide the chili among 8 bowls. Mix the sour cream with the lime juice, and garnish each bowl with a dollop. Makes 8 servings. Per serving: 150 calories, 3 g. total fat (0 g. saturated fat), 25 g. carbohydrate, 8 g. protein, 8 g. dietary fiber, 340 mg. sodium.

Chocolate, bakery, soft drinks and other sweets are available around the clock. Their constant availability can make eating moderate amounts of them difficult. Although complete avoidance of sweets is unnecessary for good health, the calories in sweets add up quickly, making weight control more difficult. Sweets can also replace nutritious foods that have vitamins, fiber, phytochemicals and other substances vital to our well-being.Part of the problem with sweets is that setting reasonable limits can be confusing. Some experts suggest that no more than ten percent of our calories should come from added sugars. Added sugars means sweeteners like table sugar, high fructose corn syrup and honey, not the natural sugars in fruits and milk, for example. According to these experts, a reasonable amount of added sugars would vary with a persons calorie needs. Adults who are sedentary or trying to lose weight might limit themselves to 160 to 180 calories of added sugar (4045 grams) per day. This amount could be a 12-ounce regular soft drink or 2 cookies and a cup of ice cream, as long as few other sweetened foods, like jelly or sugary cereals were not eaten during the day. Moderately active people who want to maintain their weight, might have 200240 calories of added sugar (5060 grams). These people could enjoy a small candy bar and six small cookies, for instance, but sugar in a 12-ounce regular soft drink adds up quickly and leaves room for little else.The latest food guidelines from the U.S. Department of Agriculture show another way to eat sweets in moderation. These guidelines lay out how many discretionary calories people have to use as they please, after meeting their nutritional needs with lowfat, low-sugar foods. While some people may want to eat high-fat foods or larger portions of nutrient-rich foods with their extra calories, others may choose to spend those calories on sweets. Depending on their calorie needs, a person could eat from 130 to 400 calories, or one to three servings of a sweet treat a day.Coming up with a personal goal for eating sweets in moderation is only part of the problem. The bigger challenge is sticking with it. This necessarily involves making choices.Studies show that one way to reduce the tempting power of sweets is to limit the variety of them around you. If ice cream or cookies are your weakness, stock your home with only one flavor at a time. If you have a great weakness for sweets, you might try keeping only one kind around. If youre eating out, avoid multi-dessert buffets where youre tempted to sample many kinds of desserts. Identify the sweets you enjoy most in life and stick to them.Some people find that eating sweets only for dessert  never as snacks  makes it easier to limit them and decrease cravings. Sweets usually dont provide long-lasting fuel as snacks anyway. One study found that after two weeks of eating chocolate twice a day, 15 to 30 minutes after a meal, people who craved chocolate felt their desire for chocolate drop. But cravers and non-cravers who ate chocolate between meals felt their desire increase. Regularly eating chocolate or other sweets to satisfy hunger between meals may teach us to crave it. Likewise, eating behavior experts say that using sweets to cope with disturbing emotions encourages us to depend on them. For this reason, it is best to learn how to manage stress without turning to food. It is a pleasure to eat sweets, but in order to reduce excess calorie intake, we need to choose those that give us the most pleasure and eat them in moderation. Doing so will make room for nutritious foods that build good health: vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans.

Many different cooking and salad oils are available today. Fortunately, there are a number of healthful options, so you should pick one or several of these based on how you intend to use it and your particular health concerns.The newest cooking and salad oil, Enova oil, is made from soybean and canola oils. Its manufacturer claims it helps reduce body fat. While fats and oils normally have a chemical structure consisting of a backbone with three fatty acid arms on it, this oil is specially processed, so that most of the fat is composed of a backbone and two arms, also known as a diacylglycerol (DAG). This type of oil is digested and absorbed just like other fats, but the body handles it differently because of its unique structure. Instead of circulating through the body, DAGs seem to go directly to the liver to be burned for energy.While one brief study has shown that DAG oil increases fat burning, the rate of increase would make a difference of only three to four pounds a year. Based on the results of four- and six-month studies, substituting one to three tablespoons of Enova oil for the oil or margarine you now use might produce four to six pounds of weight loss per year. (Note that this possible weight loss depends on replacing your current oil with Enova, not adding it to what oils you currently eat.) If you substitute an average of only one teaspoon of this oil a day, weight loss for the year might be one pound. Because the possible weight loss is so slight, Enova is unlikely to influence weight management much, although it may help prevent the small yearly gains many adults experience. And, contrary to some sources that suggest DAG oil may lower blood triglycerides, studies do not consistently show that it has an effect on blood triglycerides or cholesterol. Results are not completely positive about its effect on blood sugar either.Like Enova oil, canola oil is exceptionally low in cholesterol-raising saturated fat. Canola oil contains more monounsaturated fat, however, while Enova oil has more polyunsaturated fat. Although both types of fat are heart-healthy, research suggests that polyunsaturated fats are less stable and can leave cells more vulnerable to damaging free radicals. Cell damage from free radicals can lead to cancer, age-related vision loss and other health problems. The predominantly monounsaturated fat in canola oil is more stable.Another advantage of canola oil is that about one-third of its polyunsaturated fat is omega-3 fat, the healthful fat found in salmon and other fatty fish. Experts say that increasing the proportion of omega-3 to omega-6 fat (the other type of polyunsaturated fat) in your diet could help prevent heart disease, cancer and other health problems. Because Enova oil supplies less omega-3 fat, the omega-3 to omega-6 balance is more favorable in canola oil.Olive oil is another healthy choice. Although its saturated fat content is slightly higher, it remains under two grams per tablespoon. And olive oil contains even more of the highly stable monounsaturated fat in canola oil. Although it has considerably less omega-3 fat than canola oil, olive oil offers natural phytochemicals such as phenols, flavonoids and lignans, which are powerful antioxidants that seem to inhibit the development of some cancers. Squalene, another phytochemical in olive oil, may inhibit cell changes and the activity of enzymes that can result in cancer. Research has yet to clearly show how many phytochemicals are in canola oil or if they remain in Enova oil after processing.Enova, canola and olive oils are all healthy choices, each with their own advantages. But remember to use them in moderation. Although we need the fatty acids they provide for good health, they all contain 120 calories per tablespoon.

Place a large skillet or medium stockpot over high heat. Add the olive oil and heat until very hot. Add the chicken and stir-fry for about 5 minutes, until it loses its pink color. With a slotted spoon, remove the chicken from the skillet and set it aside. Add the bell pepper, zucchini and garlic to the skillet. Stir-fry about 2 minutes, until the vegetables are crisp but tender. Add the mushrooms and stir-fry for about 2 minutes, until the liquid released from the mushrooms evaporates.Return the chicken to the skillet and add the basil, oregano, red pepper flakes and chicken broth. Cook for about 4 minutes, stirring, until the chicken is completely cooked through. Remove from the heat. Add the cheese, season to taste with salt and pepper, and toss ingredients together. Serve immediately over the brown rice.Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 364 calories, 11 g. total fat (2 g. saturated fat), 32 g. carbohydrate, 34 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 303 mg. sodium.

Bring 4 quarts salted water to a boil in a 5-quart saucepan. Add pasta and cook according to package directions until al dente. Drain. Meanwhile, in a large skillet or wok, cook garlic and pepper flakes in oil over moderate heat, stirring, until garlic begins to turn color. Be careful not to let garlic burn. Add bell peppers and stir until peppers soften. Stir in basil, broth, and olives. Simmer, covered, until peppers are tender, about 5 minutes. Season with salt and pepper, to taste.Add cooked pasta to the pan and toss mixture over moderate heat until linguine is heated through. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Serve immediately.Makes 8 servings.

As studies show the impact blood cholesterol has on rates of heart attack and stroke, experts keep lowering the blood cholesterol levels people should strive for to stay healthy. Although some people say theyve tried everything to lower their cholesterol, they may not realize how many of the foods they eat affect it. With smart food choices, most people can lower their cholesterol significantly and reduce their risk of cancer, too.The most vital step you can take in lowering your blood cholesterol is to eat less saturated fat. If you think youve been doing this and your blood cholesterol still remains high, keep a diary of everything you eat and drink for a few days. Then consult an online diet analysis site or a registered dietitian to check your saturated fat total for those days. Recommended saturated fat levels vary with a persons blood cholesterol level and calorie intake. Most people can keep their saturated fat daily tally below 18 to 27 grams, but people with a hard-to-budge cholesterol problem may need to stay under 12 to 19 grams.You can limit saturated fat by choosing lean cuts of meat and nonfat or lowfat dairy products. However, regardless of the fat content of the red meat you eat, too much red meat increases the risk of colon and possibly other cancers, so you should have no more than one three-ounce serving a day of red meat. Choose lean poultry, seafood, beans and nuts for protein in other meals. You shouldnt skip dairy products, unless you consume several servings of other foods fortified with calcium and vitamin D, which seem to work together to inhibit colon cancer.The second step for lowering cholesterol is to minimize trans fat. Major sources are deep-fried foods like French fries and donuts and commercial bakery products made with hydrogenated oils. To lower your cancer risk, dont switch to snacks made of refined flour and sugar. Better alternatives are vegetables, fruits and whole grain products because they contain antioxidant vitamins and phytochemicals that help block different cancer stages. These plant foods also help reduce calories for weight control and even greater protection against cancer.Instead of butter or stick margarine, rely mainly on oils like olive and canola, and soft-tub margarine if you want a spread, to control your saturated and trans fats intake. If your cholesterol still doesnt drop, try margarines with plant sterols or stanols that help reduce the absorption of cholesterol. A variety of polyunsaturated oils like vegetable oil do fit into a cholesterol-lowering diet, but dont overdo them. Research suggests that too much of these oils, which are high in omega-6 fats, throw off your bodys balance with omega-3 fats. Omega-3 fats appear to help avoid inflammation that can damage blood vessels and promote cancer. Experts encourage eating fatty fish like salmon and tuna twice a week because theyre high in omega-3 fats.For the best diet to lower cholesterol, include other heart-protective foods, like soy and nuts. The Food and Drug Administration (FDA) suggests having 25 grams of soy protein a day. Two to four servings of soymilk or yogurt, soy nuts, tofu or edamame (green soybeans) supply this amount. Some sausage and burger alternatives supply a serving of soy, too. Besides lowering your heart risk, the phytochemicals in soy may lower your risk of cancer, too. Nuts provide sterols, fiber and phytochemicals that can lower cholesterol and cancer risk.You can also eat 10 to 25 grams of soluble fiber daily to reduce your cholesterol level 10 percent more on top of the steps above. Soluble fiber decreases the amount of cholesterol we absorb from food, causing more of our bodys cholesterol to be broken down. Concentrated sources are oats, oat bran, dried beans, peas, lentils, barley and ground flaxseeds. Vegetables and fruits also contain soluble fiber. All of these foods also offer protective phytochemicals.The final, vital step for lowering your risk of heart disease and cancer is regular exercise.

Since the health risks of being overweight are mostly related to excess fat, many people think they should check how much body fat they have. Technology to estimate body fat levels has now become readily available. With the numbers you get, which are only estimates of your actual body fat, you can roughly chart your progress reducing excess fat.Excess weight from body fat can damage knees and hips. It also produces hormonal and metabolic changes that increase the risk of diabetes, heart disease and several forms of cancer. Body Mass Index, known as BMI, is a way of expressing weight that can predict a persons risk for all of these diseases. BMI is a good tool for most adults, but it can encourage people with more muscle or heavy bones to lose weight unnecessarily. Its also inappropriate for those who are elderly or who have lost a lot of muscle.There is general agreement that the BMI ranges for normal, underweight, overweight and obese weight categories are accurate. However, there are no corresponding universal standards for identifying healthy and unhealthy levels of body fat. One chart may list your body fat level as normal, while another may not. Health experts emphasize that any body fat standards should allow for wide differences in inherited body types and changes that may be normal as we age. One accepted standard states that women should aim for a range of 19 to 35 percent body fat, while adult men strive for 8 to 25 percent. Athletes have slightly lower ranges, but going below 5 percent fat in men, or 16 percent fat in women, poses health risks and doesnt increase performance.A special tank that weighs a person underwater or a special X-ray test known as DEXA are considered the best tools for measuring body fat. But now special scales are available that measure your weight and also estimate your percent of body fat based on Bioelectrical Impedance Analysis (BIA). These scales do not actually measure body fat. They measure how much your body resists a tiny electrical current. More body fat means more resistance. Based on the amount of resistance and other personal information, the scale calculates an estimate of your body fat percentage.BIA produces results close to the two traditional gold standard methods. However, in some studies, figures vary by two to five points. When precision is vital, BIA is not used. BIA cannot measure short-term changes in body fat due to diet or exercise, but it can record long-term fluctuations. If you want to use a BIA body fat scale, choose your model carefully. Since the scales readings are based on standardized calculations, people who exercise even a few hours a week should get a model with an athlete mode that uses an adjusted calculation. Carefully follow the scales directions, or your results can be significantly skewed. BIA measures how the tiny electrical current runs through fluid in the body, so anything that changes your fluid balance changes your results. Alcohol, caffeine, medications, hormonal changes, recent exercise or drinking, even use of the toilet, can affect the reading. Each time, test yourself at the same time of day under the same circumstances. Many health clubs and physical trainers offer another option for assessing body fat: special calipers designed to measure skinfold thickness in several spots. These measurements are then used to calculate an estimate of body fat. Their accuracy varies widely, however, depending on the skill of the person performing this test. Since waistline fat poses the greatest health risk, you could also just measure your waist. A number of studies validate the greater health dangers associated with a large waist. A waist measurement over 40 inches in men, or over 35 inches in women, puts you at risk.

The recent death due to lung cancer of respected news anchor Peter Jennings, who had once been a long-time smoker, reminded us of the terrible toll that tobacco takes. Soon afterward, Dana Reeves, the actress and widow of Christopher Reeves, who had never smoked, announced that she had begun treatment for lung cancer. Now, questions about how to avoid this potentially fatal disease are in the forefront of many peoples minds. About 174,000 new cases of lung cancer are diagnosed in the U.S. every year, and the five-year survival rate is only 15 percent. Tobacco is unquestionably the major cause of lung cancer, accounting for 87 percent of lung cancer deaths. Smokers who quit reduce their risk of lung cancer death 30 to 50 percent after ten years. If they quit before age 50, they can eventually reach the risk level of someone who never smoked. Passive smoking, technically referred to as Environmental Tobacco Smoke (ETS), accounts for 3,000 deaths each year from lung cancer among non-smokers in the U.S. A major step to lower lung cancer risk for people who never smoke is to make family homes and workplaces non-smoking areas. You should also stay away from radon, airborne asbestos and occupational exposure to other chemicals identified as carcinogens.Healthy eating habits seem to help protect smokers, ex-smokers and non-smokers from lung cancer. According to a recent World Health Organization (WHO) report, eating the equivalent of at least four cups of vegetables and fruits a day could reduce lung cancer worldwide by 12 percent. Although vegetable and fruit consumption is not linked with lower lung cancer risk in all studies, in some cases a too-short follow-up period may be the reason. It may take many years to see the full effects of a good diet against this cancer, which can develop slowly over decades.A variety of natural phytochemicals may be responsible for the protection vegetables and fruits provide. Some studies show that higher intakes of cruciferous vegetables, such as broccoli, cauliflower, cabbage and bok choy, could reduce the risk of lung cancer in some people by as much as 40 percent.Many other vegetables and fruits supply phytochemicals called flavonoids. Their antioxidant power may prevent DNA damage that could lead to cancer. Research suggests that flavonoids may also inhibit cancer by slowing cell growth and reproduction and stimulating the self-destruction of cancer cells.Other phytochemicals, called carotenoids, in vegetables and fruits may also offer protection. In some studies, people who eat more foods high in a carotenoid known as beta-cryptoxanthin have about a 25 percent lower risk of developing lung cancer. Concentrated sources of this phytochemical include oranges, papayas, tangerines and peaches, as well as red peppers and carrots.Another substance that may offer protection is the nutrient folate, which is found in dark green vegetables such as spinach, broccoli and asparagus. In one study, ex-smokers who were in the top half of folate consumption from food sources not supplements cut their risk of lung cancer by 40 percent.If you wonder what you can do to ward off lung cancer, the first answer is clearly to avoid tobacco and second-hand smoke. The next step is to pattern your diet after the New American Plate eating approach introduced by the American Institute for Cancer Research. Fill two-thirds or more of your plate with plant foods such as vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans. Experts emphasize that our total consumption of a wide variety of fruits and vegetables is more likely to lower lung cancer risk than any particular anti-cancer vegetable or fruit.

Heat the oil in a medium skillet over medium-high heat. Brown the chicken lightly on both sides, about 8 minutes. Transfer the chicken to a plate and set aside.In the same pan, saut? the onion until translucent, about 4 minutes. Add the garlic and cook 1 minute longer. Add the mushrooms and cook, stirring often, until they release their liquid and soften, about 6 minutes. Mix in 2 tablespoons of the parsley and the rosemary. Add the tomatoes, tomato paste and vinegar, scraping the bottom of the pan with a wooden spoon to incorporate any browned bits into the sauce. Return the chicken to the pan. When the sauce bubbles, reduce the heat, partially cover and simmer 15 minutes. Turn the chicken and cook until it is no longer pink in the center at the thickest part, about 5 minutes longer. Season to taste with salt and pepper.Divide the cacciatora among 4 plates. Garnish with the remaining parsley and serve. Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 211 calories, 5 g. total fat (less than 1 g. saturated fat), 12 g. carbohydrate, 29 g. protein, 3 g. dietary fiber, 222 mg. sodium.

In a shallow dish, combine half the soy sauce with the lemon juice, mustard and spice powder. Add the salmon and turn to coat it with the marinade. Cover with plastic and refrigerate 1 hour. (Bring salmon to room temperature before cooking.)Preheat broiler. Spray medium skillet with cooking spray. Heat skillet over medium heat. Add sesame seeds. Saut? just until seeds begin to pop and turn golden, 1 to 2 minutes. (Watch them carefully, as sesame seeds can burn quickly.) Immediately transfer sesame seeds to a plate and set aside to cool. Spray skillet again. Saut? carrot and leek until crisp but tender, 5 to 10 minutes. Add broth, remaining soy sauce and sesame oil. Simmer until most of liquid evaporates, 10 to 15 minutes. Meanwhile, place salmon on broiler pan. Broil 4 inches from heat until fish is cooked through, about 5 minutes. Divide leek mixture among 4 plates. Top with salmon, then with sesame seeds. Serve immediately.Makes 4 servings. Per serving: 233 calories, 10 g. total fat (2 g. saturated fat), 6 g. carbohydrate, 27 g. protein, 1 g. dietary fiber, 585 mg. sodium.

Breakfast may be the most important meal of the day. Studies from the National Weight Control Registry show that people who successfully maintain significant weight loss eat breakfast almost every day. And depending upon what you choose for your first meal in the morning, you can help your health in other ways, like lowering your cancer risk.

After fasting through the night, eating breakfast raises your energy level. By fueling your body in the morning with slow-burning foods like whole grains and fruits, you can satisfy your appetite until midday. You will also be less likely to overeat at lunch and throughout the day. Because these healthy foods contain vitamins, fiber and phytochemicals, they are staples of a cancer-preventive diet.

People who skip breakfast tend to make up for the missed calories later in the day. Often they eat whatever food is nearby, instead of looking for healthier choices. These people also tend to have less energy later in the day, which makes efforts at weight control difficult.

If you start your day off with nutrient-poor, sugary pastries and cereals, your energy level can plummet by mid-morning. You may find yourself snacking just like the people who had no breakfast. That's why it's important for long-lasting energy to concentrate on whole-grain breads and cereals and fruits.

For a quick, minimal-preparation morning meal, simply stock your pantry with healthful ingredients like oatmeal, whole-wheat bread, nuts and fruits (fresh, frozen, dried or canned without sugar). If you have time to cook, try whipping up these yummy muffins. For a while afterwards, you can grab one on your way out the door.

Preheat the oven to 400 degrees. Coat a 12-cup muffin pan with canola oil spray. In a large bowl, combine the dry ingredients. Stir well. In a medium bowl, combine the pumpkin, oil, buttermilk, eggs and vanilla; mix well. Pour the liquid mixture into the dry ingredients and stir. Divide the combined mixture among 12 muffin cups. Top with chopped walnuts, if using. Bake about 20 minutes or until the muffins bounce back when pressed lightly.

Five percent of the purchase price of specific items of clothing and accessories emblazoned with a pink ribbon including t-shirts, caps, socks, pins, lanyards, nursing scrubs, teddy bears, pens, and many other items will be donated to AICR to fund a breast cancer research grant.

AICR funds innovative research at universities, hospital and research centers throughout the U.S. To date, AICR has contributed over $72 million dollars to research on diet, nutrition, physical activity and cancer.

The American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) has put together three different takes on the simple but elegant frittata, a classic Italian dish. Essentially an open-faced (and easier-to-make) omelet, the frittata is a perfect all-in-one breakfast to whip up, even if youre still feeling your way around the kitchen.

Each of the three frittatas below boasts a different cultural influence, adding a certain touch of sophistication to the humble breakfast tray. Weve also made each recipe lighter and healthier by substituting egg whites for some of the eggs, while retaining the dishs traditional richness with a generous amount of vegetables and seasonings.

In a medium bowl, combine the broccoli, scallions, onion, bean sprouts, shrimp, sesame oil, and pepper. In another bowl, whisk the eggs, egg whites, and flour for about 2 minutes, until the lumps are almost gone. Pour this over the vegetable mixture, mix well with a fork, and set it aside.

In a small bowl, mix the cornstarch into the 1 tablespoon cold water to dissolve and place it near the stove. In a small pan, bring the soy sauce, vinegar, garlic, ginger, sugar and broth to a boil over medium heat. Stir the cornstarch mixture, pour it into the hot liquid, and whisk 1 to 2 minutes, until the sauce is thick and translucent.

Coat a large, ovenproof, nonstick skillet with canola oil spray. Heat the skillet over medium-low heat. Stir the egg and vegetable mixture and pour it into the skillet, smoothing the mixture into an even layer. Cook for about 4 minutes, until the eggs are set and the bottom is browned. Place the skillet under the broiler for about 2 minutes, until the top is browned and the center is almost dry.

With a simple but satisfying mix of potatoes, onion, eggs and Parmesan cheese, this next recipe is a little closer to the traditional Italian frittata. Weve added a splash of balsamic vinegar at the end, which wakes up the frittatas classic flavors with its characteristic mellow sweetness.

Use a cooking oil spray to generously coat the saucepan you just used for the onions. Set the pan over medium-high heat and heat until hot. Pour in the egg mixture, making sure the onions and potatoes are evenly distributed in pan. As the eggs set, keep lifting the edges with a spatula or mixing spoon, tilting the pan so any liquid flows to the edges. Continue cooking over medium heat until set, 12 to 15 minutes.

Slide the frittata onto a plate. Place the skillet upside-down over the plate. Using hot pads or mitts, hold both the skillet and plate tightly together and invert so the frittata is in the pan, underside on top. Return to heat. Cook 3 minutes or until cooked through. Slide the frittata onto a serving plate.

Place the dried tomatoes and 1 cup of cold water in a small saucepan. Bring to a boil, then simmer for 2 minutes. Remove the pan from the heat and let it sit until the tomatoes are soft but not mushy, 10 to 20 minutes. Squeeze out the moisture, chop the tomatoes and set them aside.

Coat an 8-inch skillet that can go under the broiler with cooking spray. Saut? the garlic over medium heat until it starts to color, 1 minute. Add the spinach and cook just until it collapses, 30 seconds. Remove the pan from the heat and set it aside.

Add oil to the pan and heat over medium heat until hot, tilting the pan to coat the sides with oil. Pour in the egg mixture. Cook 1 minute. Continue cooking while lifting the edges so the liquid flows underneath. When only the center of the frittata is moist, about 4 minutes, broil until the top is golden, 1 to 1 1/2 minutes. Loosen edges and slide the frittata onto a serving plate. Let it sit for 10 minutes before cutting, or cool to room temperature.

High-heat cooking methods like grilling and broiling cause "muscle meats" (red meats, poultry, game and fish) to produce compounds collectively called heterocyclic amines (HCAs). One kind of HCA has been on the Department of Health and Human Services list of cancer-causing agents since 2002. In February of this year, three more HCAs that arise from grilling meat were added to the list.

Another class of carcinogens on the list of cancer-causing agents are polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs). PAHs are formed when fat drips onto hot coals or stones. These potent carcinogens are deposited back onto food by smoke and flare-ups.

Marinate meats before grilling. This could reduce the amount of HCAs produced, in some studies by as much as 92 to 99 percent. (The brochure provides a tasty, cancer-fighting marinade recipe.) Pre-cook meats in the oven or microwave, then briefly grill for flavor. Keep meat portions small so they need only a brief time on the grill. Use lean meat and trim the fat to reduce the chance of fat dripping onto the coals, because its these drips that cause that smoke and flare-ups that create PAHs. Covering the grill with punctured aluminum foil will help. Use tongs or a spatula to turn food and flip frequently to help limit formation of HCAs. Remove all charred or burnt portions before serving. Grill less meat and more veggies and fruits instead. The natural sugars in these foods caramelize during grilling, making them sweeter and more succulent.

"The Facts About Grilling" also contains guidelines for overall cancer prevention and tips for food safety, plus a section on the role of meat in a cancer-protective diet. A good general rule of thumb for lowering cancer risk is to always fill at least two-thirds of your plate with a variety of plant foods like vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans, allowing only one-third or less for animal meats.

Adjusting your plate proportions in this way will lower your consumption of fat and calories while boosting your intake of vitamins, minerals and the cancer-protective phytochemicals (substances found only in plants) that promote overall health.

We at AICR are greatly encouraged by the results from the Womens Intervention Nutrition Study (WINS) announced on May 16, which show that breast cancer survivors who reduced the amount of fat in their diets were significantly less likely to experience a recurrence of breast cancer over the next five years.

As a cancer charity devoted exclusively to the study of diet, nutrition and cancer, AICR has called for more and better science on the role of diet in cancer survivorship for years. The WINS study is one example of such sorely needed research, and we applaud it.

The precise relationship between dietary fat and breast cancer risk has been controversial. Until the 1980s, high levels of dietary fat were thought to be strongly associated with increased risk for breast cancer. In the 1990s, some research results cast doubt on this link.

Determining the kind of diet that is best to lower cancer risk is a long, ongoing and piecemeal process. Final, comprehensive conclusions may take years to arrive. In the meantime, people concerned about cancer and cancer recurrence would do well to eat a healthy diet rich in a variety of vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans and low in fat and salt.

The scientific thinking on fat and breast cancer is still forming. (In fact, AICR researchers are currently conducting studies suggesting that different kinds of fat exert vastly different influences upon breast cancer risk.) Today, the millions of breast cancer survivors across the US should take heart in the knowledge that what we eat and how we live has a direct and demonstrable protective effect.

The WINS study, and several thousand other diet-cancer studies, are now being reviewed by an expert international panel for the second landmark AICR/WCRF report, Food, Nutrition, Physical Activity and the Prevention of Cancer: A Global Perspective. This report, which will issue a series of dietary recommendations for individuals and policy makers alike, is the most comprehensive examination of the diet-cancer link ever undertaken. It is due to be published in 2007.

LOS ANGELES The New American Plate Cookbook, which in three short months has earned rave reviews (and brisk sales) by offering a bold new model for healthy eating with a gourmet sensibility, will soon find its way into the hands of thousands of dedicated teachers in the Los Angeles Unified School District.

Next month, each of the 13,000 teachers who participated in the districts innovative nutrition education program over the course of this school year will receive a copy of the cookbook, which lays out a healthy and flavorful approach to meal making. With 200 recipes that increase the proportion of vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans found in traditional meals, the New American Plate Cookbook shows how to add flavor, texture and color without adding fat and calories.

The cookbooks are being provided to teachers participating in the Los Angeles Unified School District Nutrition Network, a comprehensive nutrition education program that incorporates information and activities related to healthy eating and exercise throughout the K-12 school day.

Instructors who participate in the LAUSD Nutrition Network, now in its fifth year, weave fruits and vegetables into all aspects of the curriculum, from reading and mathematics to science, history and the arts. Students learn about healthy eating in hands-on ways such as taste testing, classroom gardening and cooking, and are introduced to new ways to enjoy physical activity through play.

Larsen is a devotee of the New American Plate Cookbook herself. She first read about the book in O: The Oprah Magazine, and became intrigued by the books practical and flavorful approach to nutrition.

The cookbook was created by a team of chefs, nutritionists, researchers and food writers at the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR), which doggedly tested and retested each recipe until the teams most hard-core foodie and strictest health nut were happy.

WASHINGTON, DC-- Experts at the American Institute for Cancer Research have introduced a new term into the discussion of overweight and obesityprevention. Since we live in an obesogenic environment, they say, even slender people have to take steps to avoid the gradual but incessant weight gain that otherwise seems inevitable.

Our environment is a prescription for steady weight gain, Collins adds. Food is abundant and relatively cheap, so we tend to overeat. If were pressed for time, we choose processed foods in large servings that are full of fat, added sugar and calories. Modern conveniences keep us physically inactive.

To help people contend with this environment, AICR has issued a new brochure entitled, Dont Let It Happen. Released during the season of graduations and weddings, it is intended particularly for young people who are about to enter a new phase in their lives in which they manage their own diet and time.

Move Toward a Plant-based diet. By eating a greater proportion of vegetables and fruits, whole grains and beans, people can reduce the number of calories they consume and still feel full.Keep Physically Active. Weight gain is usually preceded by an often unnoticed decrease in physical activity. Getting active again will help to prevent further the damage.Watch Your Portion Sizes. During the past two decades, portion sizes in restaurants and homes have escalated. If eating more vegetables and fruits and increasing physical activity do not bring weight under control, then maintaining the proportion of plant foods on the plate, but reducing portion sizes all around should do so. In a nut shell, people are advised to serve themselves a little less than they are used to and stop eating when they are satisfied, not when the plate or package is empty.

Dont Let It Happen: Preventing Obesity in Adulthood is intended for people who have achieved their adult weight. A physician or registered dietician should be consulted about appropriate weights for growing children, adolescents and pregnant women.

WASHINGTON, DC -- Experts at the American Institute for Cancer Research (AICR) today welcomed the latest results from the largest scientific study to investigate the links between diet and cancer risk ever undertaken. Todays findings corroborate what cancer experts at AICR have been saying for years: diets high in red and processed meats are associated with higher risk of colon cancer.

They found that those subjects who ate the most red meat (beef, pork, veal, lamb) and processed meats (sausages, ham, bacon, and cold cuts) had a 35 percent greater risk of developing colon cancer compared to those subjects who ate the least of these foods.

Interestingly, the same study also revealed that consumption of fish was associated with lower risk of colon cancer. Previous evidence linking consumption of fish to lower risk colon cancer has been less consistent.

The authors found that the two effects meat increasing risk and fish lowering risk were independent of each other. This is intriguing, because many experts have assumed that any lowering of colon cancer risk seen in populations who consume diets high in fish should be attributed to the relative lack of meat in such diets.

The cancer experts at AICR said that all of this new evidence will be factored into an upcoming landmark report authored by AICR and the World Cancer Research Fund that will assess and evaluate thousands of studies on diet and cancer risk. This expert report, entitled Food, Nutrition, Physical Activity and Cancer: A Global Perspective will be published in the fall of 2007.

Research presented this week at AICRs International Research Conference on Food, Nutrition and Cancer revealed that an active substance in green tea targets a specific stage in the cancer process more effectively than current cancer drugs do. Human studies conducted in Asia, where green tea consumption is pervasive, have found that regular consumption of green tea is associated with a lower risk of many diverse cancers, such as those of the breast, colon, stomach, esophagus, bladder and pancreas.

In a press briefing at which recent research on the effects of green tea was discussed, AICR nutritionist Karen Collins talked about types of green tea and how to brew them, and suggested how green tea could be incorporated into the diet. The press briefing concluded with an opportunity for journalists to sample three types of green tea, a spread containing green tea, which was served on toasted bagels, and a Jasmine Tea Poundcake with Ginger.

Green tea experts advise using the best quality possible and, since overbrewing can easily happen, the tea should be first brewed for half the time suggested in the package directions, then tasted to see if further brewing is desired.

The length of brewing time as well as the temperature of the water can affect the flavor and sweetness of green tea. The higher the water temperature, the more bitter and astringent the taste can become. Higher temperatures should be used only for lower quality tea, to more easily extract the most flavor and substance.

Experts in green tea recommend only using filtered or bottled water, although some experts prefer filtered tap water, as many bottled waters contain less oxygen, an important factor in making green tea. Ideally, the teapot and tea cups should be warmed in hot water before using.

Good choices for teapots are glass, which makes it easy to monitor the strength of the tea, or either china or porcelain. Although china or porcelain cups are most commonly used in China and Japan, clear glass mugs can enhance ones appreciation for the delicate color of most green teas.

Water should be below boiling temperature when added to most green teas. One way of adjusting the water to the right temperature is to bring the water to a boil, immediately remove from heat and allow the water to cool 1-3 minutes, depending on the amount of water used, until the steam drifts sideways rather than rising straight up.

Ideally, tea should be made in a teapot with loose tea, in order to allow enough room for the leaves to blossom, or open, and move through the water. Although small teapots for 1-2 servings are becoming easily available, an infusion basket or tea ball can be used for a single serving, but such baskets and tea balls should be large enough for the leaves to unfurl and move.

However, tea experts warn, infusers shaped like two half-teaspoons wired so they open and close, intended for a single cup of tea, do not allow room for the tea leaves to open, and thus produce an inferior flavor.

In China, green tea is used in many types of cooking. In making stir-fries, the home cook will often toss some loose green tea leaves into a wok and toast them lightly before adding other ingredients.

Place tea bags in a heat-proof glass or ceramic container that holds more than 1 cup. Bring 1 cup of water to a not-quite boil and remove from heat immediately. (Water that has come to a boil should be cooled for about 1 minute before using.) Pour water over tea bags and allow the tea to steep for 3-5 minutes.

Remove tea bags, squeeze out liquid and discard. Allow tea to cool to room temperature. If not using immediately, refrigerate (covered) until ready to use. (Depending on the temperature of the room, tea left standing will eventually develop mold.) Allow refrigerated tea to come to room temperature before using.

In a separate large bowl, beat the eggs, first at low/medium speed to blend, then at high speed until light in color. Slowly add sugar, beating after each addition, until mixture becomes thick, pale and creamy. At high speed, gradually beat in the oil, juice and vanilla.

Transfer batter to the prepared pan and bake until a toothpick inserted in the center comes out clean, about 50-55 minutes. (If edges of tea bread begin to turn dark brown before the bread is done in the center, lightly cover top of loaf with foil to avoid over-baking at the perimeter.) Remove the pan from the oven.

Bring water to not quite the boiling point in a small saucepan that is not made of aluminum. (A glass, enameled, stainless, or stick-free pan is acceptable.) Remove from heat and stir in tea leaves. (In place of loose tea, tea removed from tea bags can be used, but must be measured before brewing, as the amount of tea can vary according to both brand and type.) Cover and allow tea to steep 5 minutes. Strain and put tea back in the saucepan. Add sugar. Over medium heat, stir until sugar is dissolved. Raise heat to high and simmer about 5 minutes, or until tea becomes syrupy. Stir in extract. Set aside until room temperature.

Pour mixture into an ice cream maker and follow manufacturers directions for making sorbet. (Ice cream makers create a lightly less icy texture.) Or, use a shallow pan and cover mixture with plastic wrap, pressing down so it makes contact with the mixture and place in freezer. Using a fork, mash and re-blend mixture every hour for about 4 hours, recovering pan with plastic wrap after each re-mixing. After the fourth hour, transfer sorbet to a container that will hold 5 cups. Cover and store in freezer until ready to use.

Over 40 types of Chinese green tea is available in the United States, although many are only available through websites. About eight different types of Japanese green teas are available as well, either at specialty stores or through websites. Less frequently, Korean, Thai, Vietnamese and Sri Lankan green teas can be found as well.

The most popular Chinese green teas include Dragons Well (or Lung Ching), a classic flat-leaf green tea that is pan-fired. This tea, which is known for its smooth aromatic flavor, can be steeped up to 2 minutes. Snow Dragon, a Chinese green tea, is known for its complex and somewhat sweeter flavor and a more robust taste. Chinese Gunpowder Green Tea (also sold as Pearl Tea or Zhucha) is made with a blend of old and new leaves, and can turn bitter if the tea is of poor quality or overbrewed. Sencha is the most commonly used tea for everyday use in Japan. It has a rich, emerald color and slightly tangy, full-bodied flavor. Be careful not to overbrew, which causes bitterness. Bancha is another common Japanese tea, but usually lacks the delicate sweetness of Sencha. It has a light green color and deep, robust flavor. Hojicha is similar to Bancha, but is traditionally roasted over charcoal. It is known for its red-to-brown color, and a deep aroma and taste.Genmaicha is known for its popularity among Westerners unaccustomed to green tea. This Japanese tea is unusual in that it also contains roasted rice. Some of the rice pops and looks like tiny popcorn kernels. The more aromatic and expensive Genmaicha has a higher amount of popcorn-like rice. Newcomers to green tea find Genmaicha has an agreeably nutty and pleasantly toasted flavor.

White tea is the produced chiefly from tea leaf buds. Because it is minimally processed, it may exhibit potent disease-fighting potential. To date, however, there is comparatively little research on its health effects.

To make oolong and black tea, the leaves are picked and exposed to the air for a period of time. During this period, the leaves ferment. Oolong tea is exposed to the sun and allowed to partially ferment; black tea is fermented completely.

The process of fermentation slightlychanges the essential chemical makeup of tea. The longer the leaves are allowed to ferment, the weaker the teas natural roster of cancer-fighting compounds becomes, while the caffeine content of the tea leaves steadily increases.

Throughout China and Japan, green tea is a staple of the diet, particularly among the older generation. Epidemiological studies (mostly conducted in Asian populations) have consistently associated green tea consumption with lower incidence of many different cancers.

A 1989 study in the Japanese Journal of Nutrition reported that in tea-producing regions of Japan (where residents consume green tea in several forms, including gum, candy and desserts) stomach cancer mortality rates are lower than in other regions of Japan.

One of the first studies to suggest a protective effect of green tea appeared in the journal Cancer Research in 1994. The studys authors found that rates of lung cancer among Japanese smokers were half that of American smokers, and postulated that this difference was likely due to differences in tea consumption between the two populations.

In a case-control study conducted at the Shanghai Cancer Institute in China that appeared in the Journal of the National Cancer Institute in 1994, green tea drinkers had a 50 percent reduction in risk for esophageal cancer.

Green tea seemed to disrupt the process of stomach cancer in another Chinese case-control study. A 50 percent reduction in risk for stomach cancer was associated with consumption of green tea, regardless of the age at which green tea drinking began, according to a study that appeared in the journal Cancer Causes Control in 1995.

A 1997 case-control study among residents of Shanghai found regular consumption of green tea to be associated with significant (between 12 and 53 percent) reductions in risk for cancers of the colon, rectum and pancreas. The study appeared in the International Journal of Cancer.

A study published in 1998 involving Stage I and Stage II breast cancer patients in Japan showed that subjects who drank more than five cups of green tea a day had a lower recurrence rate and longer disease-free period than subjects who drank four or less cups per day. This study, in which it was also shown that green tea consumption did not affect recurrence among Stage III breast cancer patients, was published in the Japanese Journal of Cancer Research.

A 1999 Phase I/Phase II study found that persons who drank green tea had short-term reductions in levels of specific lipid compounds (prostaglandin E2) that are believed to be an important factor in the development of cancer in rectal tissue. This study appeared in the journal Cancer Epidemiology, Biomarkers and Prevention.

A study involving 1,160 breast cancer patients found that consumption of three or more cups of green tea daily was associated with significantly reduced recurrence of stage I breast cancer after seven years. The effect of tea consumption of stage II recurrence was smaller. This study appeared in the journal Cancer Letters in 2001.

A case-control study conducted in southeast China showed that prostate cancer risk declined steadily as the amount, frequency and duration of green tea consumption increased. This study was published in the International Journal of Cancer in 2004.

A case-control study conducted in Taixing, China and published in the April 2005 issue of the International Journal of Cancer found that regular consumption of green tea was associated with a 41 percent reduction in risk for stomach cancer.

A meta-analysis published in June 2005 in the journal Integrative Cancer Therapies reviewed the epidemiological evidence on green tea and breast cancer and concluded that, to date, consumption of 5 or more cups of green tea per day shows a non-statistically significant trend toward prevention of breast cancer. The evidence also indicates that consumption of green tea may help prevent recurrence of Stage I and Stage II breast cancers.

The laboratory/experimental evidence linking green tea in general (and EGCG in particular) to cancer prevention is considerable and continually growing. Numerous potential biological mechanisms are currently being investigated. A database search of the published scientific literature showed that over 100 separate scientific papers on EGCGs potential anti-cancer benefits have been published in peer-reviewed journals in 2005 alone.

Research on the compounds found in green tea suggests that the best way to take advantage of green teas health benefits is to drink it freshly brewed, after steeping the leaves for one to five minutes.

In Asian cultures, green tea is found in many forms, including gum, candy, ice cream, bread and other foods. In America, bottled, flavored green tea drinks and instant green teas are increasingly common. Although these preparations offer alternative dietary sources of green tea compounds and add variety to the diet, they contain fewer, and less bioavailable, catechins than fresh-brewed green tea.

Green tea contains caffeine. Although green teas caffeine content is less than that of black tea or coffee in fact, three or four cups of green tea contains approximately the same amount of caffeine found in a single cup of coffee -- it is important to be aware that caffeine has deleterious effects in large doses.

For this reason, people who suffer from heart or kidney problems, stomach ulcers or anxiety should avoid green tea. Pregnant and breastfeeding women should not drink green tea. Caffeine has also been shown to interact with various prescription drugs, including heart and blood pressure medications, sedatives, oral contraceptives, and drugs used to treat depression.

In large doses, green tea has been shown to interact with drugs that affect blood clotting, such as aspirin and warfarin (Coumadin). People on any of the above medications should check with a health professional before adding green tea to the diet.

AICR experts also released the results of surveys showing that only 15 percent of Americans say they drink green tea on a typical day, and less than one percent of Americans are currently drinking enough green tea to match the average per capita consumption in Asian countries.

The protein in question is called HSP90, which is present at higher levels in many cancer cells. Scientists believe that in some circumstances, HSP90 helps to trigger the cascade of events that eventually leads to cancer.

The protein called HSP90 is essentially a helper or chaperone protein, in that it exists to help stabilize other proteins and keep them together. Because it has to bind to so many different proteins it is present, in varying amounts, in all of our cells. In fact, it is referred to as a promiscuous protein because it is so pervasive.

But scientists have recently discovered that cancer cells tend to have higher levels of HSP90 than healthy cells. This has led scientists to try to develop pharmaceutical means to block HSP90, to keep it from sending the specific biochemical signals that can trigger cancer. So far, they have been unable to perfect a drug that is both highly specific and easy to administer.

Given the possibility of such broad protection from a major component in green tea, AICR conducted two telephone surveys to gauge consumption levels among Americans. Results show that although green tea is higher in beneficial phytochemicals and lower in caffeine than black tea, coffee or colas, Americans rarely drink it.

Average per capita consumption in Japan and China hovers around 3 to 4 cups per day. According to the AICR survey, less than 1 percent of Americans are drinking the equivalent amount (roughly 2 to 3 U.S. teacups) of green tea.

Another AICR survey asked about green tea consumption in a slightly different way. Nearly seven in ten Americans (68 percent) said they drank green tea rarely or never. According to a recent scientific study of Japanese food intake, only 8 percent of Japanese people say they drink green tea rarely or never.

Dr. Gasiewiczs EGCG study was presented on July 14 th at the International Research Conference on Food Nutrition and Cancer in Washington, DC. It was one of six scientific papers linking green tea to the prevention of cancer presented at the conference. The results were published recently in the journal Biochemistry. The study was coauthored by Ph.D. student Christine Palermo and undergraduate Claire Westlake.

Antioxidants May Repair DNA MutationsWhat you eat can influence your cancer risk. With funding from AICR, Robert Schiestl, Ph.D., and his collaborator, Ramune Reliene, Ph.D., are looking at how resveratrol, an antioxidant in grapes, may reverse genetic damage that leads to a rare disease with an extremely high risk of cancer.Although scientists have been studying the relationship between substances in foods and genes for decades, the term "nutrigenomics" was coined only a few years ago. According to Dr. Schiestl, Professor of Pathology, Environmental Health and Radiation Oncology at UCLA's School of Medicine and Public Health, "Nutrigenomics research is particularly interested in discovering if people with genetic predispositions for diseases can be helped with nutritional interventions, like a special diet."Recently, Dr. Schiestl was awarded a grant from AICR to see whether antioxidants in grapes can slow the progression of a rare fatal disease called ataxia telangiectasia or AT. Patients with AT, which is caused by a mutation in the ATM gene, suffer from increasing neurological deterioration. They are at extremely high risk for leukemia, lymphoma and other types of cancer. Most patients die before age 30. There is no cure or treatment for the disease.Grape PotencyBased on his past laboratory work, Dr. Schiestl knows that mice with this gene mutation - known as ATM-deficient mice - suffer a higher frequency of chromosomal damage and develop more tumors than mice without this mutation. He thinks that substances such as resveratrol, a potent antioxidant and phytochemical found in grapes, might be able to reverse or slow the oxidative damage and genetic mutations."Resveratrol, which is found at highest concentrations in the skin and seeds of grapes, as well as in wine, has been shown to have all kinds of antioxidant activities," Dr. Schiestl explains, including the prevention of genetic mutations.In the AICR-funded study, Dr. Schiestl will feed two groups of ATM-deficient mice either grape powder (a food from dehydrated grapes that includes the skin and seeds) as 10 percent of their diet, or an equal percentage of pure resveratrol. Some of these mice will receive the diet in utero through their mothers' diet, while others will eat it as soon as they are weaned. A third group of ATM-deficient mice will eat a regular diet.By comparing the effects of resveratrol alone with the effects of grape powder made from whole grapes, Dr. Schiestl will determine if there are other components besides resveratrol in grapes that have antioxidant powers, and if the whole grape is needed for a synergistic effect."We'll look at the frequency of DNA damage, oxidative DNA damage and tumors in the mice," says Dr. Schiestl.ATM-deficient mice form black spots on their fur and black pigments in their eyes that are markers for genetic mutations. Dr. Schiestl and his team will count and measure the eye and fur spots on the mice and compare the numbers among the groups of mice to measure the frequency of DNA deletions. The amount of oxidative damage will be determined by measuring a chemical called 8-hydroxydeoxyguanosine in the mice's DNA.Other Antioxidant TreatmentsDr. Schiestl's AICR-funded project follows a series of previous experiments in which ATM-deficient mice were fed an antioxidant called N-acetyl cysteine (NAC) in utero. NAC is a product used in cold remedies. In those studies, NAC counteracted genetic instability so well that ATM-deficient mice experienced no more DNA damage than normal mice.

Toss the beets with just enough dressing to coat them, about 2 teaspoons. Add the remaining dressing to the greens, tossing gently just until coated. Divide greens among 6 salad plates. Top each with some of the beets and a sprinkling of blue cheese. Serve.

For dressing, in small bowl, whisk together oil, vinegar, orange juice, orange peel, salt and pepper and set aside. In four salad bowls, divide spinach evenly. Arrange orange sections on top. Sprinkle greens with carrot, onion and walnuts. Drizzle salads with dressing; sprinkle feta on top.

For the first time in history, the world faces an epidemic of overweight and obesity. Profound social changes have led to more sedentary lifestyles and high calorie diets in developed countries like the U.S., as well as in many developing countries. The number of overweight individuals around the world now rivals the number of those underweight. In the U.S., 64 percent of adults are either overweight or obese.

Among the many pressing reasons to avoid overweight and obesity, the link between cancer and overweight tends to be unknown or overlooked. In a study conducted by AICR, only 25 percent of the public was aware of the connection. Yet it is estimated that being overweight and inactive accounts for one-fifth to one-third of all breast, colon, endometrial, kidney and esophageal cancers. In the U.S., that means between 102,000 and 135,000 cases each year. Still worse: Researchers predict that the epidemic growth in rates of overweight and obesity will cause cancer rates to soar worldwide by 2020.

To reverse the growing health problem, AICR is urging adults who have a healthy weight to adopt a preventive strategy. "The easiest way to manage overweight is to never let it happen," says Jeff Prince, Vice President for Education and Communications at AICR. A panel of scientists assembled by AICR concluded that people should limit weight gain during adulthood to 11 pounds to reduce their risk of cancer.

How should people prevent unhealthy weight gain? "The best way to keep pounds off is to increase the proportion of vegetables and fruits in your diet, increase physical activity and reduce portion sizes," Prince points out. A new brochure from AICR, Don't Let It Happen - Preventing Obesity in Adulthood, describes this effective approach in detail and highlights the periods of life when women and men should be extra vigilant.

The brochure argues that "we live in fattening times." Food is abundant and relatively cheap, so we tend to overeat. If we're pressed for time, we tend to choose processed foods in large servings that are full of calories, fat and added sugars. Modern conveniences keep us physically inactive. Our environment is a prescription for steady weight gain.

Because of the health risks involved in gaining excess weight and the extraordinary difficulty most people have in losing weight and maintaining any loss, prevention is the wisest policy. The brochure advises slender people to set a limit by mentally adding 11 pounds(5 kilograms) to their current weight. They should then commit themselves to never exceeding that limit.

If you see your weight moving toward that limit, the brochure advises that it's time to act. Make changes in your daily routine that will keep you within this healthy weight range. Increase the amount of vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans in your meals and increase your physical activity. If those two steps do not stop weight gain, consider gradually reducing the portion sizes of the foods you eat.

Dr. Platz believes that being overweight affects colorectal cancer risk in several ways. "Fat cells or adipocytes, rather than being metabolically inactive," she says, "do actively increase inflammation in several interrelated ways." Adipocytes produce and secrete factors that influence insulin resistance and inflammation. These problems could lead to DNA damage and enhance cell proliferation.

It turns out Morley Safer didnt quite get the whole story. True, French people drink more red wine that we do. But they also eat more vegetables and fruits, eat less red meat, and end up consuming fewer calories. Those are all big factors in heart health.

Use two red peppers. Coat peppers lightly with olive oil. Spear one at the base with a two-pronged fork and hold it over a flame on your stove burner or a grill, until the first side is blackened. Then turn and blacken the other side.

What causes cancer? Ask most Americans, and theyll name chemicals, high-fat diets, or exposure to the sun. Only 6 percent will name obesity and overweight as a cause of cancer, according to a recent AICR survey -- an alarming statistic, since science has clearly established the link between obesity and cancer risk.

AICR recommends working toward a healthy exercise routine gradually. If youre not currently exercising, start by checking with your doctor. Then slowly begin adding more physical activity into your life.

Remember, many everyday activities burn calories. Walking the dog, gardening, taking the stairs instead of the elevatorall of these activities can add up to an hour of moderate exercise. More vigorous exercise can be done in short spurts, rather than all at once. Use our exercise calculator below to see how many calories are burned during specific activities.

Note: Figures are based on moderate (as opposed to vigorous) activity. But remember, exercising harder and faster only increases the calories expended slightly. To burn more calories it is better to exercise for a longer time. Determining how many calories you burn is not an exact science. This number should only be used as an estimate of calorie expenditure. Courtesy of the Calorie Control Council.

The fact that a clear majority of Americans are still adopting this old-fashioned, common-sense approach, even after a low-carb marketing craze, is encouraging news to health experts concerned about the state of nutrition in the U.S.Read more in our brochure Moving Toward a Plant-based Diet.

The first two things to do when you want to lose weight are to move toward a mostly plant-based diet and to increase your physical activity. But if you have taken these steps and still have weight to lose, it is time to focus on portion size.

Large portions are a fact of life in the United States today. In restaurants, fast-food outlets, and even at home, many Americans consume far more calories than they really need. Enormous bagels, 32-ounce sodas, heaping dinner platters and value meals are contributing to our nations obesity problem.

Of the three, moving toward a plant-based diet seems to challenge people the most. Reshaping your diet conjures up all those guidelines to memorize and all that counting of calories, servings, or grams. It can get pretty confusingand discouraging before you even begin.Thats why AICR developed the New American Platea way of planning healthy meals without any calculation or guidelines. Instead, you get used to relying on a wide range of vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans so your plate will be filled with delicious foods that will reduce cancer risk and help you manage your weight.

By putting plant-based foods at the center of the New American Plate, you are giving yourself rich sources of plant-food substances that help keep us in good health and protect against many types of cancer. Plant-based foods are also naturally low in calories, so that you can eat more filling and satisfying mealsall for fewer calories than the typical American diet.

This brochure contains 18 recipes for one-pot meals. hey are stews, stir-fries, casseroles and grain-based salads. They all contain a variety of health-promoting ingredients, and they all can serve as a meal in themselves.

Most people are used to a plate with meat and vegetables on it. The one-pot meals in this brochure provide variety. Their look, aroma, texture and flavor are novel and enticing. The blended taste of a variety of vegetables, spices and herbs flavored with small amounts of meat or other protein will tempt even the most finicky eater..

Finally, all the one-pot recipes in this brochure lend themselves to healthy eating. A healthy meal supplies the energy to last you several hours, but not excess energy that turns to fat. It also supplies various nutrients that help your body fight off chronic diseases like cancer, heart disease and stroke.

If your plate looks like that, youre probably taking in too many calories and certainly too many calories from fat. Furthermore, you may not be getting enough of the vitamins, minerals and health-protecting phytochemicals found in plant foods. As a result, the traditional American plate may not help you maintain a healthy weight or defend your body against chronic disease.

In contrast, the New American Plate is planned around plant foods. The proportion of food on the plate is radically different. Vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans cover two-thirds (or more) of the plate; animal protein covers one-third (or less). In fact, experts at AICR often recommend that animal protein be reduced to a three-ounce portion or less in order to make room for a variety of plant foods.

These recommendations are based on strong scientific evidence. A panel of experts from around the world, convened by AICR, evaluated 4,500 studies on the links between diet and cancer. Their conclusions were published in Food, Nutrition and the Prevention of Cancer: a global perspective and indicate that diet is associated with reduced risk of cancer in 18 sites. This panel identified 192 studies that show vegetables and fruit to be cancer protective.

There is a strong consensus today among scientists that a diet high in vegetables, fruits, whole grains and beans reduces the risk of cancer. They have concluded that if everyone ate such a diet, exercised regularly and maintained a healthy weight, there would be 30 to 40 percent fewer cases of cancer in the U.S. Furthermore, this predominantly plant-based diet also reduces risk of heart disease, stroke and adult-onset diabetes.

Take a look at your plate. If what you see is a large slab of meat with small servings of vegetables and potato, it may be time to make a few changes. Even small changes can provide health benefits. Every new vegetable, fruit, whole grain or bean you add contributes disease-fighting power. And any excess calories you eliminate will help you manage your weight.

Make it interesting. Instead of mashed potatoes, try seasoned brown rice or sweet potatoes mashed with apple cider and cinnamon. Add a little olive oil and herbs to your string beans, or just sprinkle them with lemon juice. Remember, it helps if the plant foods steal the scene from the meat.

After youve grown accustomed to this transitional plate, take the next step. Reduce the animal protein on your plate to three ouncesabout the size of a deck of cards. Then add a wider variety of plant foods. Rice with sliced mushrooms might be nice, and two cancer-fighting vegetables such as broccoli and yellow squash or snow peas and carrots.

These dishes cooked in one pot (or prepared on one plate) are bursting with colorful vegetables, fruit, whole grains and beans. Red meat, fish or poultry is used as a condiment, to add flavor and substance to the meal. And one-pot meals make the transition to the New American Plate easy. The change in proportion is not evident, but the delicious, new flavors are. When you are ready to try some of these healthful and great-tasting meals, youll find 18 recipes in this booklet.

People arriving in the U.S. from abroad often comment on how large the portions are on American plates. That may be because restaurateurs and food retailers are committed to value marketing. They compete by offering us more food for less money. The supersized meals and oversized snacks we buy away from home tend to confuse us about reasonable portion sizes when were at home. Today Americans eat 148 more calories per day than they did two decades ago. That extra intake could add up to 15 pounds per year.

When it comes to reaching a healthy weight, its not just what you eat, but also how much you eat that matters. Many of the fad diet books sold today recommend eliminating some or all carbohydrates from your meals in order to lose weight. In fact, those diets wont lead to lasting weight loss unless they also involve reduced consumption of calories.

It is important to maintain the right proportion of plant food (usually carbohydrates) and animal food (usually protein and fat) for your long-term health. Furthermore, doing so may in fact help you manage your weight. Vegetables and fruits tend to be more filling and have fewer calories. But if you eat oversized portions of even the most healthy foods, you are likely to gain weight. The only practical way to shed excess pounds is to eat less and exercise more.

To come to terms with the size of the portions we eat, we need a point of comparison. A list of standard serving sizes published by the U.S. Department of Agriculture follows. In comparison with what we usually eat, these servings seem remarkably small. Many people eat three cups of pasta at a sitting. Some restaurants are known to serve six or eight cups on a plate. Yet USDA defines a standard serving of pasta as one-half cup.

No one is suggesting that half a cup of pasta should suffice even as a side dish. Each of us has different calorie needs during the day. A jogger who runs three miles every morning and a pregnant woman burns more calories than a sedentary office worker who commutes by car.

These standard servings provide us with a way to assess the amount of food we eat, and they allow us to ask ourselves some important questions: How many standard servings are there in the portion I regularly eat? Do I actually require that many?

After checking the chart, measure out the standard serving size of the same food onto another plate or bowl. Compare the two plates. Ask yourself how many standard servings go into the portion you normally eat. If your weight is satisfactory, you are probably eating the right number of servings to meet your energy needs. If you are overweight, the first thing you should consider is reducing the number of standard servings in your regular portions.

Remember, maintaining the right proportion of plant foods to animal foods is important to your long-term health. So reduce the portion sizes on your plate, but maintain the two-thirds to one-third proportion.

Each of these recipes is a meal in itself. You may, however, consider serving the hot dishes with a salad to add some healthy crunch to the meal. Whole grain bread could accompany these dishes and some of the salads, too. Round off the meal with fresh fruit for dessert.

In large bowl, place ice and water and set aside. In large pot, bring water to boil. Add snow peas and cook for 30 seconds. Drain in colander. Immediately plunge peas into bowl of ice water to set their color and crisp them. Drain peas and halve lengthwise.

Pour dressing over salad and toss. Let salad sit for 20 minutes to allow flavors to develop. Divide salad among 4 plates. Sprinkle one-fourth of sesame seeds, almonds and cilantro ever each serving. Serve with warm, crusty whole-grain bread.

To same skillet, add remaining canola oil. Add peppers, onion and cherry tomatoes. Cook, stirring constantly over medium-high heat until onions and peppers are just crisp-tender. Stir in cayenne, dried mustard powder, chili powder, onion powder and paprika. Add rice and stir to combine completely.

The traditional French cassoulet can be very high in fat and calories. This version trims the fat, but not the flavor. Its still hearty and filling by the fireside. Add a tossed salad with low-fat dressing to round out the meal.

In Dutch oven or similar pot, heat oil over medium heat. Add chicken and saut? for 4 minutes. Transfer chicken to plate and set aside. In same pot, saut? onion and carrots for 7 minutes until onion is soft. Add tomatoes with juice, beans and orange zest. Bring to boil, lower heat and add chicken.

Hearty Lentil and Chicken StewA fix and forget dish, this stews taste is subtly enriched with the Eastern spices ginger, coriander and cinnamon. Youll need less animal protein when you use protein-rich lentils to partially replace meat.

To same pan, add onion, peppers and garlic and saut? for 5 minutes. Add lentils, broth, water, tomatoes and spices and bring to boil. Reduce heat, cover and simmer for 20 minutes until lentils are tender.

Glimpse into Ronald and Nancy Reagans devoted marriage, a love story straight out of a Hollywood script. Learn about Reagans growing involvement in politics. Witness his presidency, from reviving the economy, reducing the size of the federal government, and ending the threat of nuclear war. See a piece of the Berlin Wall, immerse yourself in Camp David and Rancho del Cielo. And, in 2005, walk through the Air Force One that President Reagan used throughout his eight years in office.

The Library also has a Bulk Mail collection and the Presidential Handwriting File. Bulk Mail information is not available online. The Presidential Handwriting File is treated as an individual office collection and finding aids can be found within the White House Staff and Office Files.

Files -- Governor Reagan reorganized the Executive Branch of the California into four agencies, the Directors of which reported directly to the Governor and made up what was referred to as the Cabinet.

Please note, because of limited parking and tight turn areas, we recommend visitors with large recreational vehicles or motorhomes find alternative parking and, if possible, use a passenger vehicle to visit the Library.

Reagan Library is proud to assist the Library of Congress in creating this wonderful collection of living history. Space is limited. If you are interested in participating in this program, email us at reaganeducation@nara.gov, or contact the Library of Congress for more information.

Nearsighted since childhood. Began wearing glasses around the time he entered high school. Began wearing contact lenses when he began his acting career, which was shortly after they first became available.

Hard of hearing, especially in the right ear, since an actor fired a pistol near his head during the making of a motion picture. The film was one of the four, released in 1939 and 1940, in which Reagan portrayed Secret Service agent Brass Bancroft. To avoid causing embarrassment, Reagan never publicly identified the particular film, or the individual who fired the gun.

President. After winning the party's nomination, he chose George Bush as his running mate. The platform called for "a new consensus with all those across the land who share a community of values embodied in these words: family, work, neighborhood, peace, and freedom."

Reagan moved back to the apartment in which he had lived immediately prior to the marriage. He kept the apartment until he and Nancy Davis, whom he married in March 1952, were able to move into a house together.

Nancy Davis? apartment residence prior to her marriage to Ronald Reagan. After their marriage, Ronald and Nancy Reagan lived here together until they were able to move into a house. Ronald Reagan also kept his Londonderry View apartment (see above entry for that residence) until they moved into the house.

I am going to talk of controversial things. I make no apology for this. I have been talking on this subject for ten years, obviously under the administration of both parties. I mention this only because it seems impossible to legitimately debate the issues of the day without being subjected to name-calling and the application of labels.

Those who deplore use of the terms "pink" and "leftist" are themselves guilty of branding all who oppose their liberalism as right wing extremists. How long can we afford the luxury of this family fight when we are at war with the most dangerous enemy ever known to man?

If we lose that war, and in so doing lose our freedom, it has been said history will record with the greatest astonishment that those who had the most to lose did the least to prevent its happening. The guns are silent in this war but frontiers fall while those who should be warriors prefer neutrality. Not too long ago two friends of mine were talking to a Cuban refugee. He was a businessman who had escaped from Castro.

In the midst of his tale of horrible experiences, one of my friends turned to the other and said, "We don't know how lucky we are." The Cuban stopped and said, "How lucky you are? I had some place to escape to."

It's time we asked ourselves if we still know the freedoms intended for us by the Founding Fathers. James Madison said, "We base all our experiments on the capacity of mankind for self-government." This idea that government was beholden to the people, that it had no other source of power except the sovereign people, is still the newest, most unique idea in all the long history of man's relation to man. For almost two centuries we have proved man's capacity for self-government, but today we are told we must choose between a left and right or, as others suggest, a third alternative, a kind of safe middle ground. I suggest to you there is no left or right, only an up or down. Up to the maximum of individual freedom consistent with law and order, or down to the ant heap of totalitarianism; and regardless of their humanitarian purpose those who would sacrifice freedom for security have, whether they know it or not, chosen this downward path. Plutarch warned, "The real destroyer of the liberties of the people is he who spreads among them bounties, donations, and benefits.

Today there is an increasing number who can't see a fat man standing beside a thin one without automatically coming to the conclusion the fat man got that way by taking advantage of the thin one. So they would seek the answer to all the problems of human need through government. Howard K. Smith of television fame has written, "The profit motive is outmoded. It must be replaced by the incentives of the welfare state." He says, "The distribution of goods must be effected by a planned economy."

Another articulate spokesman for the welfare state defines liberalism as meeting the material needs of the masses through the full power of centralized government. I for one find it disturbing when a representative refers to the free men and women of this country as the masses, but beyond this the full power of centralized government was the very thing the Founding Fathers sought to minimize. They knew you don't control things; you can't control the economy without controlling people. So we have come to a time for choosing. Either we accept the responsibility for our own destiny, or we abandon the American Revolution and confess that an intellectual belief in a far-distant capitol can plan our lives for us better than we can plan them ourselves.

Government tends to grow; government programs take on weight and momentum, as public servants say, always with the best of intentions, "What greater service we could render if only we had a little more money and a little more power." But the truth is that outside of its legitimate function, government does nothing as well or as economically as the private sector of the economy. What better example do we have of this than government's involvement in the farm economy over the last thirty years.

In contrast, the three-fourths of farming unregulated and unsubsidized has seen a 21 percent increase in the per capita consumption of all its produce. Since 1955 the cost of the farm program has nearly doubled. Direct payment to farmers is eight times as great as it was nine years ago, but farm income remains unchanged while farm surplus is bigger. In that same period we have seen a decline of five million in the farm population, but an increase in the number of Department of Agriculture employees.

There is now one such employee for every thirty farms in the United States, and still they can't figure how sixty-six shiploads of grain headed for Austria could dis- appear without a trace, and Billy Sol Estes never left shore. Three years ago the government put into effect a program to curb the over-production of feed grain. Now, $2.5 billion later, the corn crop is one hundred million bushels bigger than before the program started.

And the cost of the program prorates out to $43 for every dollar bushel of corn we don't grow. Nor is this the only example of the price we pay for government meddling. Some government programs with the passage of time take on a sacrosanct quality.

One such considered above criticism, sacred as motherhood, is TVA. This program started as a flood control project; the Tennessee Valley was periodically ravaged by destructive floods. The Army Engineers set out to solve this problem. They said that it was possible that once in 500 years there could be a total capacity flood that would inundate some six hundred thousand acres. Well, the engineers fixed that. They made a permanent lake which inundated a million acres. This solved the problem of floods, but the annual interest on the TVA debt is five times as great as the annual flood damage they sought to correct.

Of course, you will point out that TVA gets electric power from the impounded waters, and this is true, but today 85 percent of TVA's electricity is generated in coalburning steam plants. Now perhaps you'll charge that I'm overlooking the navigable waterway that was created, providing cheap barge traffic, but the bulk of the freight barged on that waterway is coal being shipped to the TVA steam plants, and the cost of maintaining that channel each year would pay for shipping all of the coal by rail, and there would be money left over.

One last argument remains: the prosperity produced by such large programs of government spending. Certainly there are few areas where more spending has taken place. The Labor Department lists 50 percent of the 169 counties in the Tennessee Valley as permanent areas of poverty, distress, and unemployment.

In Cleveland, Ohio, to get a project under way, city officials reclassifled eighty-four buildings as substandard in spite of the fact their own inspectors had previously pronounced these buildings sound. The owners stood by and watched 26 million dollars worth of property as it was destroyed by the headache ball. Senate Bill 628 says: "Any property, be it home or commercial structure, can be declared slum or blighted and the owner has no recourse at law. The Law Division of the Library of Congress and the General Accounting Office have said that the Courts will have to rule against the owner."

Now the government announces, "We are going to build subsidized housing in the thousands where we have been building in the hundreds." At the same time FHA and the Veterans Administration reveal they are holding 120 thousand housing units reclaimed from mortgage foreclosure, mostly because the low down payment and the easy terms brought the owners to a point where they realized the unpaid balance on the homes amounted to a sum greater than the homes were worth, so they just walked out the front door, possibly to take up residence in newer subsidized housing, again with little or no down payment and easy terms.

Some of the foreclosed homes have already been bulldozed into the earth, others, it has been announced, will be refurbished and put on sale for down payments as low as $100 and thirty-five years to pay. This will give the bulldozers a second crack. It is in the area of social welfare that government has found its most fertile growing bed. So many of us accept our responsibility for those less fortunate.

Federal welfare spending is today ten times greater than it was in the dark depths of the Depression. Federal, state, and local welfare combined spend 45 billion dollars a year. Now the government has announced that 20 percent, some 9.3 million families, are poverty-stricken on the basis that they have less than a $3,000 a year income.

If this present welfare spending was prorated equally among these poverty-stricken families, we could give each family more than $4,500 a year. Actually, direct aid to the poor averages less than $600 per family. There must be some administrative overhead somewhere.

Now, are we to believe that another billion dollar program added to the half a hundred programs and the 45 billion dollars, will, through some magic, end poverty? For three decades we have tried to solve unemployment by government planning, without success. The more the plans fail, the more the planners plan.

Agency, and in two years less than one-half of one percent of the unemployed could attribute new jobs to this agency, and the cost to the taxpayer for each job found was $5,000. But beyond the great bureaucratic waste, what are we doing to the people we seek to help?

Recently a judge told me of an incident in his court. A fairly young woman with six children, pregnant with her seventh, came to him for a divorce. Under his questioning it became apparent her husband did not share this desire. Then the whole story came out. Her husband was a laborer earning $250 a month. By divorcing him she could get an $80 raise. She was eligible for $350 a month from the Aid to Dependent Children Program. She had been talked into the divorce by two friends who had already done this very thing. But any time we question the schemes of the do-gooders, we are denounced as being opposed to their humanitarian goal. It seems impossible to legitimately debate their solutions with the assumption that all of us share the desire to help those less fortunate. They tell us we are always against, never for anything. Well, it isn't so much that liberals are ignorant.

We are for a provision that destitution should not follow unemployment by reason of old age. For that reason we have accepted Social Security as a step toward meeting that problem. However, we are against the irresponsibility of those who charge that any criticism or suggested improvement of the program means we want to end payment to those who depend on Social Security for a livelihood.

We have been told in millions of pieces of literature and press releases that Social Security is an insurance program, but the executives of Social Security appeared before the Supreme Court in the case of Nestor v. Fleming and proved to the Court's satisfaction that it is not insurance but is a welfare program, and Social Security dues are a tax for the general use of the government. Well it can't be both: insurance and welfare. Later, appearing before a Congressional Committee, they admitted that Social Security is today 298 billion dollars in the red. This fiscal irresponsibility has already caught up with us.

Faced with a bankruptcy, we find that today a young man in his early twenties, going to work at less than an average salary, will, with his employer, pay into Social Security an amount which could provide the young man with a retirement insurance policy guaranteeing $220 a month at age 65, and the government promises him $127.

Now, are we so lacking in business sense that we cannot put this program on a sound actuarial basis, so that those who do depend on it won't come to the cupboard and find it bare, and at the same time can't we introduce voluntary features so that those who can make better provision for themselves are allowed to do so? Incidentally, we might also allow participants in Social Security to name their own beneficiaries, which they cannot do in the present program. These are not insurmountable problems.

We have today 30 million workers protected by industrial and union pension funds that are soundly financed by some 70 billion dollars in- vested in corporate securities and income earning real estate. I think we are for telling our senior citizens that no one in this country should be denied medical care for lack of funds, but we are against forcing all citizens into a compulsory government program regardless of need.

Now the government has turned its attention to our young people, and suggests that it can solve the problem of school dropouts and juvenile delinquency through some kind of revival of the old C.C.C. camps. The suggested plan prorates out to a cost of $4,700 a year for each young person we want to help.

We are for an international organization where the nations of the world can legitimately seek peace. We are against subordinating American interests to an organization so structurally unsound that a two-thirds majority can be mustered in the U.N. General Assembly among nations representing less than 10 percent of the world population.

Is there not something of hypocrisy in assailing our allies for so-called vestiges of colonialism while we engage in a conspiracy of silence about the peoples enslaved by the Soviet in the satellite nations? We are for aiding our allies by sharing our material blessings with those nations which share our fundamental beliefs. We are against doling out money, government to government, which ends up financing socialism all over the world.

We set out to help nineteen war-ravaged countries at the end of World War II. We are now helping 107. We have spent 146 billion dollars. Some of that money bought a $2 million yacht for Haile Selassie. We bought dress suits for Greek undertakers. We bought one thousand TV sets with 23-inch screens for a country where there is no electricity, and some of our foreign aid funds provided extra wives for Kenya government officials. When Congress moved to cut foreign aid they were told that if they cut it one dollar they endangered national security, and then Senator Harry Byrd revealed that since its inception foreign aid has rarely spent its allotted budget. It has today $21 billion in unexpended funds.

Some time ago Dr. Howard Kershner was speaking to the Prime Minister of Lebanon. The Prime Minister told him proudly that his little country balanced its budget each year. It had no public debt, no inflation, a modest tax rate, and had increased its gold holdings from seventy to 120 million dollars. When he finished, Dr. Kershner said, "Mr.

Prime Minister, my country hasn't balanced its budget twenty-eight out of the last forty years. My country's debt is greater than the combined debt of all the nations of the world. We have inflation, we have a tax rate that takes from the private sector a percentage of income greater than any civilized nation has ever taken and survived. We have lost gold at such a rate that the solvency of our currency is in danger. Do you think that my country should continue to give your country millions of dollars each year?" The Prime Minister smiled and said, "No, but if you are foolish enough to do it, we are going to keep on taking the money."

And so we built a model stock farm in Lebanon, and we built nine stalls for each bull. I find something peculiarly appropriate in that. We have in our vaults $15 billion in gold. We don't own an ounce. Foreign dollar claims against that gold total $27 billion. In the last six years, fifty-two nations have bought $7 billion worth of our gold and all fifty-two are receiving foreign aid.

Because no government ever voluntarily reduces itself in size, government programs once launched never go out of existence. A government agency is the nearest thing to eternal life we'll ever see on this earth. The United States Manual takes twenty-five pages to list by name every Congressman and Senator, and all the agencies controlled by Congress. It then lists the agencies coming under the Executive Branch, and this requires 520 pages.

Since the beginning of the century our gross national product has increased by thirty-three times. In the same period the cost of federal government has increased 234 times, and while the work force is only one and one-half times greater, federal employees number nine times as many. There are now two and one-half million federal employees. No one knows what they all do. One Con- gressman found out what one of them does. This man sits at a desk in Washington. Documents come to him each morning. He reads them, initials them, and passes them on to the proper agency. One day a document arrived he wasn't supposed to read, but he read it, initialed it and passed it on. Twenty-four hours later it arrived back at his desk with a memo attached that said, "You weren't sup- posed to read this. Erase your initials, and initial the erasure."

While the federal government is the great offender, the idea filters down. During a period in California when our population has increased 90 percent, the cost of state government has gone up 862 percent and the number of employees 500 percent. Governments, state and local, now employ one out of six of the nation's work force. If the rate of increase of the last three years continues, by 1970 one-fourth of the total work force will be employed by government. Already we have a permanent structure so big and complex it is virtually beyond the control of Congress and the comprehension of the people, and tyranny inevitably follows when this permanent structure usurps the policy-making function that belongs to elected officials.

Under bureaucratic regulations adopted with no regard to the wish of the people, we have lost much of our Constitutional freedom. For example, federal agents can invade a man's property without a warrant, can impose a fine without a formal hearing, let alone a trial by jury, and can seize and sell his property at auction to enforce payment of that fine.

An Ohio deputy fire marshal sentenced a man to prison after a secret proceeding in which the accused was not allowed to have a lawyer present. The Supreme Court upheld that sentence, ruling that it was an administrative investigation of incidents damaging to the economy. Someplace a perversion has taken place. Our natural unalienable rights are now presumed to be a dispensation of government, divisible by a vote of the majority. The greatest good for the greatest number is a high-sounding phrase but contrary to the very basis of our nation, unless it is accompanied by recognition that we have certain rights which cannot be infringed upon, even if the individual stands outvoted by all of his fellow citizens. Without this recognition, majority rule is nothing more than mob rule.

It is time we realized that socialism can come without overt seizure of property or nationalization of private business. It matters little that you hold the title to your property or business if government can dictate policy and procedure and holds life and death power over your business. The machinery of this power already exists.

Lowell Mason, former anti-trust law enforcer for the Federal Trade Commission, has written "American business is being harassed, bled and even blackjacked under a preposterous crazy quilt system of laws." There are so many that the government literally can find some charge to bring against any concern it chooses to prosecute. Are we safe in our books and records?

The natural gas producers have just been handed a 428-page questionnaire by the Federal Power Commission. It weighs ten pounds. One firm has estimated it will take 70,000 accountant manhours to fill out this questionnaire, and it must be done in quadruplicate. The Power Commission says it must have it to determine whether a proper price is being charged for gas. The National Labor Relations Board ruled that a business firm could not discontinue its shipping department even though it was more efficient and economical to subcontract this work out.

The Supreme Court has ruled the government has the right to tell a citizen what he can grow on his own land for his own use. The Secretary of Agriculture has asked for the right to imprison farmers who violate their planting quotas. One business firm has been informed by the Internal Revenue Service that it cannot take a tax deduction for its institutional advertising because this advertising espoused views not in the public interest.

A child's prayer in a school cafeteria endangers religious freedom, but the people of the Amish religion in the State of Ohio, who cannot participate in Social Security because of their religious beliefs, have had their livestock seized and sold at auction to enforce payment of Social Security dues.

We approach a point of no return when government becomes so huge and entrenched that we fear the consequences of upheaval and just go along with it. The federal government accounts for one-fifth of the industrial capacity of the nation, one-fourth of all construction, holds or guarantees one-third of all mortgages, owns one-third of the land, and engages in some nineteen thousand businesses covering half a hundred different lines. The Defense Department runs 269 supermarkets. They do a gross business of $730 million a year, and lose $150 million. The government spends $11 million an hour every hour of the twenty-four and pretends we had a tax cut while it pursues a policy of planned inflation that will more than wipe out any benefit with depreciation of our purchasing power.

We need true tax reform that will at least make a start toward restoring for our children the American dream that wealth is denied to no one, that each individual has the right to fly as high as his strength and ability will take him. The economist Sumner Schlicter has said, "If a visitor from Mars looked at our tax policy, he would conclude it had been designed by a Communist spy to make free enterprise unworkable." But we cannot have such reform while our tax policy is engineered by people who view the tax as a means of achieving changes in our social structure. Senator [Joseph S.] Clark (D.-Pa.) says the tax issue is a class issue, and the government must use the tax to redistribute the wealth and earnings downward.

President [Lyndon Johnson] told a group of citizens they were going to take all the money they thought was being unnecessarily spent, "take it from the haves and give it to the have-nots who need it so much." When Karl Marx said this he put it: . . . "from each according to his ability, to each according to his need."

Have we the courage and the will to face up to the immorality and discrimination of the progressive surtax, and demand a return to traditional proportionate taxation? Many decades ago the Scottish economist, John Ramsey McCulloch, said, "The moment you abandon the cardinal principle of exacting from all individuals the same proportion of their income or their property, you are at sea without a rudder or compass and there is no amount of injustice or folly you may not commit."

No nation has survived the tax burden that reached one-third of its national income. Today in our country the tax collector's share is thirty-seven cents of every dollar earned. Freedom has never been so fragile, so close to slipping from our grasp. I wish I could give you some magic formula, but each of us must find his own role. One man in Virginia found what he could do, and dozens of business firms have followed his lead. Concerned because his two hundred employees seemed unworried about government extravagance he conceived the idea of taking all of their withholding out of only the fourth paycheck each month. For three paydays his employees received their full salary. On the fourth payday all withholding was taken. He has one employee who owes him $4.70 each fourth payday. It only took one month to produce two hundred conservatives.

Are you willing to spend time studying the issues, making yourself aware, and then conveying that information to family and friends? Will you resist the temptation to get a government handout for your community? Realize that the doctor's fight against socialized medicine is your fight. We can't socialize the doctors without socializing the patients.

Recognize that government invasion of public power is eventually an assault upon your own business. If some among you fear taking a stand because you are afraid of reprisals from customers, clients, or even government, recognize that you are just feeding the crocodile hoping he'll eat you last.

If all of this seems like a great deal of trouble, think what's at stake. We are faced with the most evil enemy mankind has known in his long climb from the swamp to the stars. There can be no security anywhere in the free world if there is not fiscal and economic stability within the United States. Those who ask us to trade our freedom for the soup kitchen of the welfare state are architects of a policy of accommodation.

They tell us that by avoiding a direct confrontation with the enemy he will learn to love us and give up his evil ways. All who oppose this idea are blanket indicted as war-mongers. Well, let us set one thing straight, there is no argument with regard to peace and war. It is cheap demagoguery to suggest that anyone would want to send other people's sons to war. The only argument is with regard to the best way to avoid war. There is only one sure way--surrender.

The specter our well-meaning liberal friends refuse to face is that their policy of accommodation is appeasement, and appeasement does not give you a choice between peace and war, only between fight and surrender. We are told that the problem is too complex for a simple answer. They are wrong. There is no easy answer, but there is a simple answer.

We must have the courage to do what we know is morally right, and this policy of accommodation asks us to accept the greatest possible immorality. We are being asked to buy our safety from the threat of "the bomb" by selling into permanent slavery our fellow human beings enslaved behind the Iron Curtain, to tell them to give up their hope of freedom because we are ready to make a deal with their slave masters.

Alexander Hamilton warned us that a nation which can prefer disgrace to danger is prepared for a master and deserves one. Admittedly there is a risk in any course we follow. Choosing the high road cannot eliminate that risk. Already some of the architects of accommodation have hinted what their decision will be if their plan fails and we are faced with the final ultimatum. The English commentator [Kenneth] Tynan has put it this way: he would rather live on his knees than die on his feet.

Some of our own have said "Better Red than dead." If we are to believe that nothing is worth the dying, when did this begin? Should Moses have told the children of Israel to live in slavery rather than dare the wilderness? Should Christ have refused the Cross? Should the patriots at Concord Bridge have refused to fire the shot heard 'round the world? Are we to believe that all the martyrs of history died in vain?

You and I have a rendezvous with destiny. We can preserve for our children this, the last best hope of man on earth, or we can sentence them to take the first step into a thousand years of darkness. If we fail, at least let our children and our children's children say of us we justified our brief moment here. We did all that could be done.

In his inaugural address after taking the oath of office on January 20, Ronald Reagan called upon Americans to "begin an era of national renewal." In response to the serious problems facing the country, both foreign and domestic, he asserted his familiar campaign phrase: "Government is not the solution to our problem, government is the problem." He hoped that America "will again be the exemplar of freedom and a beacon of hope for those who do not have freedom."

Reagan advanced domestic policies that featured a lessening of federal government responsibility in solving social problems, reducing restrictions on business, and implementing tax cuts. Internationally, Reagan demonstrated a fierce opposition to the spread of communism throughout the world and a strong distrust of the Soviet Union, which in 1983 he labeled an "evil empire."

When Reagan took office the economy was one of the double-digit inflation and high interest rates. During the campaign Reagan promised to restore the free market from excessive government regulation and encourage private initiative and enterprise.

"waste, fraud and abuse." Reagan embraced the theory of "supply side economics," which postulated that tax cuts encouraged economic expansion which in turn increased the government's revenue at a lower tax rate.

Reagan engineered the passage of $39 billion in budget cuts into law, as well as a massive 25 percent tax cut spread over three years for individual, and faster write-offs for capital investment for business. At the same time, he insisted on, and for the most part, was successful in gaining increased funding for defense.

The economic gains, however, came at a cost of a record annual deficit and a ballooning national debt. The budget deficit was exacerbated by a trade deficit. Americans continued to buy more foreign-made goods than they were selling. Reagan, however adhered to his free trade stance, and signed an agreement to that effect with Canada. He also signed, reluctantly, trade legislation designed to open foreign markets to U.S. goods.

Reagan's domestic policies had a major impact on the American people and will have for many years. He followed p the passage of the largest tax cut in U.S. history by supporting and signing into law the Tax Reform law of 1986. Reagan led the battle for a Social Security reform bill designed to ensure the long-term solvency of the system, and oversaw the passage of immigration reform legislation, as well as the expansion of the Medicare program to protect the elderly and disabled against "catastrophic" health costs.

Rehnquist to the position of the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court and appointed three justices to the bench: Anthony Kennedy, Antonin Scalia, and the first woman named to the Supreme Court, Sandra Day O' Connor. In all of the court appointments, Reagan chose individuals who he believed would exercise "judicial restraint."

Reagan consistently received very high approval ratings, although he was not popular with some minority groups, particularly blacks, many of whom did not benefit from the economic prosperity. In 1986, over 30 percent of the black population had an income below the official poverty level. While many labor leaders disliked Reagan, especially after he fired the air traffic controllers, when they refused to end their strike (1981), he was popular with labor union members.

Reagan encouraged the development of "private sector initiatives" as well as federalism, with the objective of transferring from the federal government some of the responsibilities believed to be better served by private business or state and local government.

As the president called for international cooperation to stop the influx of illegal drugs, especially cocaine, into the U.S., First Lady Nancy Reagan led the campaign against drug abuse, urging the nation's youth to "just say no."

At the heart of Reagan's foreign policy was the prevention of communist expansion. This was demonstrated in the Western Hemisphere by the strong financial and military support of the Contras against the communist Nicaraguan government, the aid given to the government of El Salvador in their fight against the communist guerrillas, and the U.S. invasion of Grenada when that nation was perceived as falling under Cuban domination in 1983, and the support given to rebels fighting Soviet troops in Afghanistan. While effort for peace in Central America faltered, the Soviets announced the withdrawal of forces from Afghanistan in 1988, ending their futile eight year war.

Reagan believed that the nation should negotiate with the Soviet Union from a position of strength. To such an end, the administration embarked on a strategic modernization program which included the production of intercontinental missile and a feasibility study for the Strategic Defense Initiative. The increase in military spending, and the rise of Mikhail Gorbachev as General Secretary of the Soviet Union at the beginning of Reagan's second term, opened a new era of relations between the two superpowers. After a number of meetings between Reagan and Gorbachev, the two men signed an Intermediate Nuclear Force (INF) Treaty at the Washington Summit in December, 1987. The agreement promised to eliminate an entire class of intermediate-range nuclear missiles and was the first arms control agreement in history to reduce the nuclear arsenal. In addition, the administration began the Strategic Arms Reduction Talks (START) which would reduce the strategic nuclear arsenals by 50%, including large multiple warhead missiles.

When pro-U.S. dictators in Haiti and the Philippines appeared on the verge of being toppled from power, Reagan engineered their safe removal from their countries, ensuring bloodless coups and new government which, he hoped, would be friendly to the U.S.

In Middle East affairs, Reagan reported in his inaugural address that the 52 American hostages held in Iran for 444 days were at that moment being released and would soon return to freedom. The President maintained a firm stance against terrorism, exemplified by the American retaliating against Libya for an air attack in 1981 and again in 1986 for the death of Americans in a Berlin discotheque. Reagan's peacekeeping force in war-torn Lebanon experienced tragedy in 1983 when a truck bomb killed 241 soldiers. Tragedy struck again in 1987 when a missile from an Iraqi warplane killed 37 sailors aboard the U.S.S. Stark, part of a U.S. naval taskforce which had been sent to the Persian Gulf to keep that waterway open during the Iran-Iraq war.

The darkest hour of the Reagan administration would become known as the Iran-Contra affair. After lengthy, nationally televised hearings, a special congressional hearings review board reported that Reagan authorized the sale of arms to Iran in exchange for help in freeing U.S. hostages in Lebanon. It was revealed that the money gained from the arms sale illegally diverted to aid the Contras, opponents of the Nicaraguan Sandinista government. The congressional report criticized Reagan for his detached, hands-off style of management. In the aftermath of the affair, National Security Advisors Robert McFarlane and John Poindexter, as well as National Security Council aide Colonel Oliver North were indicted by a federal grand jury and convicted of lying to Congress.

The eight years of the Reagan presidency was one of the most dynamic periods, in recent U.S. history, resulting in a major refocusing of the nation's social, business, and international agenda. Few presidents have enjoyed the affection of so many of the American people.

Support for Ronald Reagan grew when he was seriously wounded by an assassin's bullet in 1981 and during major surgical procedures in 1985 and 1987. Reagan was known as the "Great Communicator," and often went on television to ask the viewers for their support for a particular piece of legislation.

Mondale, Reagan stood by his record and asked the voters if they were better off now than they were four years ago. At 73 years of age, Reagan became the oldest man ever elected president, receiving 525 electoral votes, the most of any presidential candidate. As his second term ended, polls showed that more than half of the American people gave him a favorable rating. When Ronald Reagan became president, he had a clear vision of what the nation should be and spelled out the direction he hoped it would take during his administration.

Reagan had a clear social, economic, and foreign policy agenda, and with political guile and personal persuasiveness he was able to achieve many of his goals. Early in his presidency, Reagan remarked: "What I'd really like to do is go down in history as the President who made Americans believe in themselves again."

A month before the election of his successor, Reagan looked back on his eight years in office: "I am the same man I was when I came to Washington," he said, "I believe the same things I believed when I came to Washington, and I think those beliefs have been vindicated by the success of the policies to which we hold fast." About his foreign policy, he said, "At every point on the map that the Soviets have applied pressure, we've done all we can to apply pressure against them." He went on "And now we are seeing a sight many believed they would never see in our lifetime: the receding of the tide of totalitarianism."

Most foreign official gifts which the President and First Lady do not retain for themselves are transferred to the National Archives by the Gift Unit, and become part of a presidential library museum collection. Most domestic gifts that the President and First Lady do not keep are given to charitable organizations or other non-Government recipients by the Gift Unit, or transferred to the National Archives for the future presidential library museum.

This collection consists of individual folders from White House offices and specific staff members in the Reagan Administration. The staff of the National Security Council and its offices are included. The Reagan Library has over 700 individual staff and office collections.

These issues were marked as "CM-#" and you will find frequent reference to this tracking system within the records of the Office of Cabinet Affairs and the Counsellor to the President. While Cabinet Affairs handled the Cabinet issue tracking and worked with agencies, the actual Cabinet Council secretaries were from the Office of Policy Development.

This office was largely an umbrella White House office over the offices of speechwriting, media relations, public affairs, public liaison, and the press office, although the mix varied somewhat during the eight years of the Reagan presidency. The primary function of this office was to ensure that the White House staff was consistent in dealing with the media, and that the White House had a focused message. From January 1984 to February 1985 the Communications office was downgraded to a unit within the Office of the Deputy Chief of Staff, allowing Deputy Chief of Staff Michael Deaver direct oversight of communications during the 1984 campaign season.

This office primarily provided planning and coordination assistance to the President for head of state and foreign official visits, as well as other international meetings in which the President participated.

An outgrowth of NSDD-3, which established a NSC structure for managing national security crisis's, the Crisis Management Center (CMC) was set up in the first Administration and disbanded in early 1987. As described by Robert McFarlane, the CMC was designed to "conduct pre-crisis collection and analysis of information about likely crisis areas in an effort to anticipate events and to provide extensive background information to decision makers as a crisis preventive."

The White House had a deputy chief of staff position throughout the administration. The Deputy Chief had a separate office and staff only when Michael Deaver held the post of Deputy Chief of Staff from 1981 to 1985. Mr. Deaver was a long-time associate and advisor to the President and Mrs. Reagan. He formed part of the "ruling troika? with Edwin Meese and James Baker during the first administration. Deaver had general oversight of scheduling, travel, and communications, and maintained close contact with the Office of the First Lady and the Military Office.

Record keeping practices at the NSC varied greatly during the first and second Reagan administrations. This is further complicated by numerous office reorganizations - see specific collection and series descriptions for more details on these changes.

These offices retained many of their records into the following administration, but they also transferred some materials to the National Archives and Records Administration at the end of the Reagan administration.

The use of a likeness of another individual, either in photographs or other audiovisual materials, furnished to you by the Reagan Library, may be subject to California Civil code 3344 or similar statute of another state. The California statute prohibits the use of a photograph of an individual, without that person's consent, in certain situations and provides a course of action to recover damages for such nonconsensual use. For example, it is prohibited to use the likeness of another for purposes of advertising or selling or soliciting purchases of produces or services. It is incumbent upon you as the researcher to know and abide by the restrictions imposed on the usage of these materials by the state of California, as well as other states which regulate the use of photographs or likenesses of another.

This collection consists of videotape footage recorded off the air from various network sources (All signifies ABC, CBS and NBC). The footage is subject to copyright law and duplication is restricted in most cases to private study, scholarship or research. Audiovisual researchers must obtain permission from the copyright holder to publish or display materials. Please contact the Reagan Library audiovisual staff with any questions. Times listed are approximate.

The footage is subject to copyright law and duplication is restricted in most cases to private study, scholarship or research. Audiovisual researchers must obtain permission from the copyright holder to publish or display materials. If you have any questions please contact the Reagan Library audiovisual staff. Times listed are approximate and signify the beginning of each news story.

This collection consists of videotape footage recorded off the air of nightly newscasts from CBS, ABC and NBC. The footage is subject to copyright law and duplication is restricted in most cases to private study, scholarship or research. Audiovisual researchers must obtain permission from the copyright holder to publish or display materials. If you have any questions please contact the Reagan Library audiovisual staff. Times listed are approximate and signify the beginning of each news story.

Key topics included the 1981 transition at Department of Treasury; the cabinet council process; and responsibilities in the Office of Policy Development and as executive secretary for the Cabinet Council for Commerce and Trade.

Chancellor Kohl, Governing Mayor Diepgen, ladies and gentlemen: Twenty four years ago, President John F. Kennedy visited Berlin, speaking to the people of this city and the world at the city hall. Well, since then two other presidents have come, each in his turn, to Berlin. And today I, myself, make my second visit to your city.

Behind me stands a wall that encircles the free sectors of this city, part of a vast system of barriers that divides the entire continent of Europe. From the Baltic, south, those barriers cut across Germany in a gash of barbed wire, concrete, dog runs, and guardtowers. Farther south, there may be no visible, no obvious wall. But there remain armed guards and checkpoints all the same--still a restriction on the right to travel, still an instrument to impose upon ordinary men and women the will of a totalitarian state. Yet it is here in Berlin where the wall emerges most clearly; here, cutting across your city, where the news photo and the television screen have imprinted this brutal division of a continent upon the mind of the world. Standing before the Brandenburg Gate, every man is a German, separated from his fellow men. Every man is a Berliner, forced to look upon a scar.

President von Weizsacker has said: "The German question is open as long as the Brandenburg Gate is closed." Today I say: As long as this gate is closed, as long as this scar of a wall is permitted to stand, it is not the German question alone that remains open, but the question of freedom for all mankind. Yet I do not come here to lament. For I find in Berlin a message of hope, even in the shadow of this wall, a message of (Pg. 635) triumph.

In West Germany and here in Berlin, there took place an economic miracle, the Wirtschaftswunder. Adenauer, Erhard, Reuter, and other leaders understood the practical importance of liberty--that just as truth can flourish only when the journalist is given freedom of speech, so prosperity can come about only when the farmer and businessman enjoy economic freedom. The German leaders reduced tariffs, expanded free trade, lowered taxes. From 1950 to 1960 alone, the standard of living in West Germany and Berlin doubled.

In the 1950's, Khrushchev predicted: "We will bury you." But in the West today, we see a free world that has achieved a level of prosperity and well-being unprecedented in all human history. In the Communist world, we see failure, technological backwardness, declining standards of health, even want of the most basic kind-too little food. Even today, the Soviet Union still cannot feed itself. After these four decades, then, there stands before the entire world one great and inescapable conclusion: Freedom leads to prosperity. Freedom replaces the ancient hatreds among the nations with comity and peace. Freedom is the victor.

And now the Soviets themselves may, in a limited way, be coming to understand the importance of freedom. We hear much from Moscow about a new policy of reform and openness. Some political prisoners have been released. Certain foreign news broadcasts are no longer being jammed. Some economic enterprises have been permitted to operate with greater freedom from state control. Are these the beginnings of profound changes in the Soviet state? Or are they token gestures, intended to raise false hopes in the West, or to strengthen the Soviet system without changing it? We welcome change and openness; for we believe that freedom and security go together, that the advance of human liberty can only strengthen the cause of world peace.

I understand the fear of war and the pain (Pg. 636) of division that afflict this continent--and I pledge to you my country's efforts to help overcome these burdens. To be sure, we in the West must resist Soviet expansion. So we must maintain defenses of unassailable strength. Yet we seek peace; so we must strive to reduce arms on both sides.

Beginning 10 years ago, the Soviets challenged the Western alliance with a grave new threat, hundreds of new and more deadly SS-20 nuclear missiles, capable of-striking every capital in Europe. The Western alliance responded by committing itself to a counterdeployment unless the Soviets agreed to negotiate a better solution; namely, the elimination of such weapons on both sides. For many months, the Soviets refused to bargain in earnestness. As the alliance, in turn, prepared to go forward with its counterdeployment, there were difficult days--days of protests like those during my 1982 visit to this city--and the Soviets later walked away from the table.

But through it all, the alliance held firm. And I invite those who protested then--I invite those who protest today--to mark this fact: Because we remained strong, the Soviets came back to the table. And because we remained strong, today we have within reach the possibility, not merely of limiting the growth of arms, but of eliminating, for the first time, an entire class of nuclear weapons from the face of the Earth. As I speak, NATO ministers are meeting in Iceland to review the progress of our proposals for eliminating these weapons. At the talks in Geneva, we have also proposed deep cuts in strategic offensive weapons. And the Western allies have likewise made far-reaching proposals to reduce the danger of conventional war and to place a total ban on chemical weapons.

While we pursue these arms reductions, I pledge to you that we will maintain the capacity to deter Soviet aggression at any level at which it might occur. And in cooperation with many of our allies, the United States is pursuing the Strategic Defense Initiative-research to base deterrence not on the threat of offensive retaliation, but on defenses that truly defend; on systems, in short, that will not target populations, but shield them. By these means we seek to increase the safety of Europe and all the world. But we must remember a crucial fact: East and West do not mistrust each other because we are armed; we are armed because we mistrust each other. And our differences are not about weapons but about liberty. When President Kennedy spoke at the City Hall those 24 years ago, freedom was encircled, Berlin was under siege. And today, despite all the pressures upon this city, Berlin stands secure in its liberty. And freedom itself is transforming the globe.

Pacific, free markets are working miracle after miracle of economic growth. In the industrialized nations, a technological revolution is taking place--a revolution marked by rapid, dramatic advances in computers and telecommunications.

Yet in this age of redoubled economic growth, of information and innovation, the Soviet Union faces a choice: It must make fundamental changes, or it will become obsolete. Today thus represents a moment of hope. We in the West stand ready to cooperate with the East to promote true openness, to break down barriers that separate people, to create a safer, freer world.

Free people of Berlin: Today, as in the past, the United States stands for the strict observance and full implementation of all parts of the Four Power Agreement of 1971. Let us use this occasion, the 750th anniversary of this city, to usher in a new era, to seek a still fuller, richer life for the Berlin of the future. Together, let us maintain and develop the ties between the Federal Republic and the Western sectors of Berlin, which is permitted by the 1971 agreement.

Let us work to bring the Eastern and Western parts of the city closer together, so that all the inhabitants of all Berlin can enjoy the benefits that come with life in one of the great cities of the world. To open Berlin still further to (Pg. 637) all Europe, East and West, let us expand the vital air access to this city, finding ways of making commercial air service to Berlin more convenient, more comfortable, and more economical. We look to the day when West Berlin can become one of the chief aviation hubs in all central Europe.

With our French and British partners, the United States is prepared to help bring international meetings to Berlin. It would be only fitting for Berlin to serve as the site of United Nations meetings, or world conferences on human rights and arms control or other issues that call for international cooperation. There is no better way to establish hope for the future than to enlighten young minds, and we would be honored to sponsor summer youth exchanges, cultural events, and other programs for young Berliners from the East. Our French and British friends, I'm certain, will do the same. And it's my hope that an authority can be found in East Berlin to sponsor visits from young people of the Western sectors.

Olympics to take place in the North. International sports competitions of all kinds could take place in both parts of this city. And what better way to demonstrate to the world the openness of this city than to offer in some future year to hold the Olympic games here in Berlin, East and West?

In these four decades, as I have said, you Berliners have built a great city. You've done so in spite of threats--the Soviet attempts to impose the East-mark, the blockade. Today the city thrives in spite of the challenges implicit in the very presence of this wall. What keeps you here? Certainly there's a great deal to be said for your fortitude, for your defiant courage. But I believe there's something deeper, something that involves Berlin's whole look and feel and way of life--not mere sentiment. No one could live long in Berlin without being completely disabused of illusions.

Something instead, that has seen the difficulties of life in Berlin but chose to accept them, that continues to build this good and proud city in contrast to a surrounding totalitarian presence that refuses to release human energies or aspirations. Something that speaks with a powerful voice of affirmation, that says yes to this city, yes to the future, yes to freedom. In a word, I would submit that what keeps you in Berlin is love--love both profound and abiding.

Perhaps this gets to the root of the matter, to the most fundamental distinction of all between East and West. The totalitarian world produces backwardness because it does such violence to the spirit, thwarting the human impulse to create, to enjoy, to worship. The totalitarian world finds even symbols of love and of worship an affront. Years ago, before the East Germans began rebuilding their churches, they erected a secular structure: the television tower at Alexander Platz. Virtually ever since, the authorities have been working to correct what they view as the tower's one major flaw, treating the glass sphere at the top with paints and chemicals of every kind. Yet even today when the Sun strikes that sphere--that sphere that towers over all Berlin--the light makes the sign of the cross. There in Berlin, like the city itself, symbols of love, symbols of worship, cannot be suppressed.

As I looked out a moment ago from the Reichstag, that embodiment of German unity, I noticed words crudely spray-painted upon the wall, perhaps by a young Berliner, "This wall will fall. Beliefs become reality." Yes, across Europe, this wall will fall. For it cannot withstand faith; it cannot withstand truth. The wall cannot withstand freedom.

And I would like, before I close, to say one word. I have read, and I have been questioned since I've been here about certain demonstrations against my coming. And I would like to say just one thing, and to those who demonstrate so. I wonder if they have ever asked themselves that if they should have the kind of government they apparently seek, no one would ever be able to do what they're doing again.

This subseries consists of polls, summaries, brochures, studies, press kits, fact kits and other printed material about Proposition One, mostly from the administration, but also from opposition and other interested parties.

To a few of us here today this is a solemn and most momentous occasion, and yet in the history of our nation it is a commonplace occurrence. The orderly transfer of authority as called for in the Constitution routinely takes place, as it has for almost two centuries, and few of us stop to think how unique we really are. In the eyes of many in the world, this every-4-year ceremony we accept as normal is nothing less than a miracle.

Mr. President, I want our fellow citizens to know how much you did to carry on this tradition. By your gracious cooperation in the transition process, you have shown a watching world that we are a united people pledged to maintaining a political system which guarantees individual liberty to a greater degree than any other, and I thank you and your people for all your help in maintaining the continuity which is the bulwark of our Republic.

The business of our nation goes forward. These United States are confronted with an economic affliction of great proportions. We suffer from the longest and one of the worst sustained inflations in our national history. It distorts our economic decisions, penalizes thrift, and crushes the struggling young and the fixed-income elderly alike. It threatens to shatter the lives of millions of our people.

Idle industries have cast workers into unemployment, human misery, and personal indignity. Those who do work are denied a fair return for their labor by a tax system which penalizes successful achievement and keeps us from maintaining full productivity.

But great as our tax burden is, it has not kept pace with public spending. For decades we have piled deficit upon deficit, mortgaging our future and our children's future for the temporary convenience of the present. To continue this long trend is to guarantee tremendous social, cultural, political, and economic upheavals.

You and I, as individuals, can, by borrowing, live beyond our means, but for only a limited period of time. Why, then, should we think that collectively, as a nation, we're not bound by that same limitation? We must act today in order to preserve tomorrow. And let there be no misunderstanding: We are going to begin to act, beginning today.

The economic ills we suffer have come upon us over several decades. They will not go away in days, weeks, or months, but they will go away. They will go away because we as Americans have the capacity now, as we've had in the past, to do whatever needs to be done to preserve this last and greatest bastion of freedom.

In this present crisis, government is not the solution to our problem; government is the problem. From time to time we've been tempted to believe that society has become too complex to be managed by self-rule, that government by an elite group is superior to government for, by, and of the people. Well, if no one among us is capable of governing himself, then who among us has the capacity to govern someone else? All of us together, in and out of government, must bear the burden. The solutions we seek must be equitable, with no one group singled out to pay a higher price.

We hear much of special interest groups. Well, our concern must be for a special interest group that has been too long neglected. It knows no sectional boundaries or ethnic and racial divisions, and it crosses political party lines. It is made up of men and women who raise our food, patrol our streets, man our mines and factories, teach our children, keep our homes, and heal us when we're sick -- professionals, industrialists, shopkeepers, clerks, cabbies, and truckdrivers. They are, in short, ``We the people,'' this breed called Americans.

Well, this administration's objective will be a healthy, vigorous, growing economy that provides equal opportunities for all Americans with no barriers born of bigotry or discrimination. Putting America back to work means putting all Americans back to work. Ending inflation means freeing all Americans from the terror of runaway living costs. All must share in the productive work of this ``new beginning,'' and all must share in the bounty of a revived economy. With the idealism and fair play which are the core of our system and our strength, we can have a strong and prosperous America, at peace with itself and the world.

So, as we begin, let us take inventory. We are a nation that has a government -- not the other way around. And this makes us special among the nations of the Earth. Our government has no power except that granted it by the people. It is time to check and reverse the growth of government, which shows signs of having grown beyond the consent of the governed.

It is my intention to curb the size and influence of the Federal establishment and to demand recognition of the distinction between the powers granted to the Federal Government and those reserved to the States or to the people. All of us need to be reminded that the Federal Government did not create the States; the States created the Federal Government.

Now, so there will be no misunderstanding, it's not my intention to do away with government. It is rather to make it work -- work with us, not over us; to stand by our side, not ride on our back. Government can and must provide opportunity, not smother it; foster productivity, not stifle it.

If we look to the answer as to why for so many years we achieved so much, prospered as no other people on Earth, it was because here in this land we unleashed the energy and individual genius of man to a greater extent than has ever been done before. Freedom and the dignity of the individual have been more available and assured here than in any other place on Earth. The price for this freedom at times has been high, but we have never been unwilling to pay that price.

It is no coincidence that our present troubles parallel and are proportionate to the intervention and intrusion in our lives that result from unnecessary and excessive growth of government. It is time for us to realize that we're too great a nation to limit ourselves to small dreams. We're not, as some would have us believe, doomed to an inevitable decline. I do not believe in a fate that will fall on us no matter what we do. I do believe in a fate that will fall on us if we do nothing. So, with all the creative energy at our command, let us begin an era of national renewal. Let us renew our determination, our courage, and our strength. And let us renew our faith and our hope.

We have every right to dream heroic dreams. Those who say that we're in a time when there are not heroes, they just don't know where to look. You can see heroes every day going in and out of factory gates. Others, a handful in number, produce enough food to feed all of us and then the world beyond. You meet heroes across a counter, and they're on both sides of that counter. There are entrepreneurs with faith in themselves and faith in an idea who create new jobs, new wealth and opportunity. They're individuals and families whose taxes support the government and whose voluntary gifts support church, charity, culture, art, and education. Their patriotism is quiet, but deep. Their values sustain our national life.

We shall reflect the compassion that is so much a part of your makeup. How can we love our country and not love our countrymen; and loving them, reach out a hand when they fall, heal them when they're sick, and provide opportunity to make them self-sufficient so they will be equal in fact and not just in theory?

Can we solve the problems confronting us? Well, the answer is an unequivocal and emphatic ``yes.'' To paraphrase Winston Churchill, I did not take the oath I've just taken with the intention of presiding over the dissolution of the world's strongest economy.

In the days ahead I will propose removing the roadblocks that have slowed our economy and reduced productivity. Steps will be taken aimed at restoring the balance between the various levels of government. Progress may be slow, measured in inches and feet, not miles, but we will progress. It is time to reawaken this industrial giant, to get government back within its means, and to lighten our punitive tax burden. And these will be our first priorities, and on these principles there will be no compromise.

On the eve of our struggle for independence a man who might have been one of the greatest among the Founding Fathers, Dr. Joseph Warren, president of the Massachusetts Congress, said to his fellow Americans,  "Our country is in danger, but not to be despaired of . . . . On you depend the fortunes of America. You are to decide the important questions upon which rests the happiness and the liberty of millions yet unborn. Act worthy of yourselves."

Well, I believe we, the Americans of today, are ready to act worthy of ourselves, ready to do what must be done to ensure happiness and liberty for ourselves, our children, and our children's children. And as we renew ourselves here in our own land, we will be seen as having greater strength throughout the world. We will again be the exemplar of freedom and a beacon of hope for those who do not now have freedom.

To those neighbors and allies who share our freedom, we will strengthen our historic ties and assure them of our support and firm commitment. We will match loyalty with loyalty. We will strive for mutually beneficial relations. We will not use our friendship to impose on their sovereignty, for our own sovereignty is not for sale.

As for the enemies of freedom, those who are potential adversaries, they will be reminded that peace is the highest aspiration of the American people. We will negotiate for it, sacrifice for it; we will not surrender for it, now or ever.

Our forbearance should never be misunderstood. Our reluctance for conflict should not be misjudged as a failure of will. When action is required to preserve our national security, we will act. We will maintain sufficient strength to prevail if need be, knowing that if we do so we have the best chance of never having to use that strength.

Above all, we must realize that no arsenal or no weapon in the arsenals of the world is so formidable as the will and moral courage of free men and women. It is a weapon our adversaries in today's world do not have. It is a weapon that we as Americans do have. Let that be understood by those who practice terrorism and prey upon their neighbors.

I'm told that tens of thousands of prayer meetings are being held on this day, and for that I'm deeply grateful. We are a nation under God, and I believe God intended for us to be free. It would be fitting and good, I think, if on each Inaugural Day in future years it should be declared a day of prayer.

This is the first time in our history that this ceremony has been held, as you've been told, on this West Front of the Capitol. Standing here, one faces a magnificent vista, opening up on this city's special beauty and history. At the end of this open mall are those shrines to the giants on whose shoulders we stand.

Directly in front of me, the monument to a monumental man, George Washington, father of our country. A man of humility who came to greatness reluctantly. He led America out of revolutionary victory into infant nationhood. Off to one side, the stately memorial to Thomas Jefferson. The Declaration of Independence flames with his eloquence. And then, beyond the Reflecting Pool, the dignified columns of the Lincoln Memorial. Whoever would understand in his heart the meaning of America will find it in the life of Abraham Lincoln.

Beyond those monuments to heroism is the Potomac River, and on the far shore the sloping hills of Arlington National Cemetery, with its row upon row of simple white markers bearing crosses or Stars of David. They add up to only a tiny fraction of the price that has been paid for our freedom.

Each one of those markers is a monument to the kind of hero I spoke of earlier. Their lives ended in places called Belleau Wood, The Argonne, Omaha Beach, Salerno, and halfway around the world on Guadalcanal, Tarawa, Pork Chop Hill, the Chosin Reservoir, and in a hundred rice paddies and jungles of a place called Vietnam.

Under one such marker lies a young man, Martin Treptow, who left his job in a small town barbershop in 1917 to go to France with the famed Rainbow Division. There, on the western front, he was killed trying to carry a message between battalions under heavy artillery fire.

The crisis we are facing today does not require of us the kind of sacrifice that Martin Treptow and so many thousands of others were called upon to make. It does require, however, our best effort and our willingness to believe in ourselves and to believe in our capacity to perform great deeds, to believe that together with God's help we can and will resolve the problems which now confront us.

A few days ago I was presented with a report I'd asked for, a comprehensive audit, if you will, of our economic condition. You won't like it. I didn't like it. But we have to face the truth and then go to work to turn things around. And make no mistake about it, we can turn them around.

I'm not going to subject you to the jumble of charts, figures, and economic jargon of that audit, but rather will try to explain where we are, how we got there, and how we can get back. First, however, let me just give a few ``attention getters'' from the audit.

The Federal budget is out of control, and we face runaway deficits of almost $80 billion for this budget year that ends September 30th. That deficit is larger than the entire Federal budget in 1957, and so is the almost $80 billion we will pay in interest this year on the national debt.

And finally there are 7 million Americans caught up in the personal indignity and human tragedy of unemployment. If they stood in a line, allowing 3 feet for each person, the line would reach from the coast of Maine to California.

Well, so much for the audit itself. Let me try to put this in personal terms. Here is a dollar such as you earned, spent, or saved in 1960. And here is a quarter, a dime, and a penny -- 36 cents. That's what this 1960 dollar is worth today. And if the present world inflation rate should continue 3 more years, that dollar of 1960 will be worth a quarter. What initiative is there to save? And if we don't save we're short of the investment capital needed for business and industry expansion.

What's happened to that American dream of owning a home? Only 10 years ago a family could buy a home, and the monthly payment averaged little more than a quarter -- 27 cents out of each dollar earned. Today, it takes 42 cents out of every dollar of income. So, fewer than 1 out of 11 families can afford to buy their first new home.

Regulations adopted by government with the best of intentions have added $666 to the cost of an automobile. It is estimated that altogether regulations of every kind, on shopkeepers, farmers, and major industries, add $100 billion or more to the cost of the goods and services we buy. And then another 20 billion is spent by government handling the paperwork created by those regulations.

I'm sure you're getting the idea that the audit presented to me found government policies of the last few decades responsible for our economic troubles. We forgot or just overlooked the fact that government -- any government -- has a built-in tendency to grow. Now, we all had a hand in looking to government for benefits as if government had some source of revenue other than our earnings. Many if not most of the things we thought of or that government offered to us seemed attractive.

In the years following the Second World War it was easy, for a while at least, to overlook the price tag. Our income more than doubled in the 25 years after the war. We increased our take-home pay in those 25 years by more than we had amassed in all the preceding 150 years put together. Yes, there was some inflation, 1 or 1\1/2\ percent a year. That didn't bother us. But if we look back at those golden years, we recall that even then voices had been raised, warning that inflation, like radioactivity, was cumulative and that once started it could get out of control.

By 1960 our national debt stood at $284 billion. Congress in 1971 decided to put a ceiling of 400 billion on our ability to borrow. Today the debt is 934 billion. So-called temporary increases or extensions in the debt ceiling have been allowed 21 times in these 10 years, and now I've been forced to ask for another increase in the debt ceiling or the government will be unable to function past the middle of February -- and I've only been here 16 days. Before we reach the day when we can reduce the debt ceiling, we may in spite of our best efforts see a national debt in excess of a trillion dollars. Now, this is a figure that's literally beyond our comprehension.

We know now that inflation results from all that deficit spending. Government has only two ways of getting money other than raising taxes. It can go into the money market and borrow, competing with its own citizens and driving up interest rates, which it has done, or it can print money, and it's done that. Both methods are inflationary.

Then, of course, we resent the person who puts on the price tags, forgetting that he or she is also a victim of inflation. Inflation is not just high prices; it's a reduction in the value of our money.

But in all these years of government growth, we've reached, indeed surpassed, the limit of our people's tolerance or ability to bear an increase in the tax burden. Prior to World War II, taxes were such that on the average we only had to work just a little over 1 month each year to pay our total Federal, State, and local tax bill. Today we have to work 4 months to pay that bill.

Some say shift the tax burden to business and industry, but business doesn't pay taxes. Oh, don't get the wrong idea. Business is being taxed, so much so that we're being priced out of the world market. But business must pass its costs of operations -- and that includes taxes -- on to the customer in the price of the product. Only people pay taxes, all the taxes. Government just uses business in a kind of sneaky way to help collect the taxes. They're hidden in the price; we aren't aware of how much tax we actually pay.

Today this once great industrial giant of ours has the lowest rate of gain in productivity of virtually all the industrial nations with whom we must compete in the world market. We can't even hold our own market here in America against foreign automobiles, steel, and a number of other products. Japanese production of automobiles is almost twice as great per worker as it is in America. Japanese steelworkers outproduce their American counterparts by about 25 percent.

Now, this isn't because they're better workers. I'll match the American working man or woman against anyone in the world. But we have to give them the tools and equipment that workers in the other industrial nations have.

We invented the assembly line and mass production, but punitive tax policies and excessive and unnecessary regulations plus government borrowing have stifled our ability to update plant and equipment. When capital investment is made, it's too often for some unproductive alterations demanded by government to meet various of its regulations. Excessive taxation of individuals has robbed us of incentive and made overtime unprofitable.

We once produced about 40 percent of the world's steel. We now produce 19 percent. We were once the greatest producer of automobiles, producing more than all the rest of the world combined. That is no longer true, and in addition, the ``Big Three,'' the major auto companies in our land, have sustained tremendous losses in the past year and have been forced to lay off thousands of workers.

All of you who are working know that even with cost-of-living pay raises, you can't keep up with inflation. In our progressive tax system, as you increase the number of dollars you earn, you find yourself moved up into higher tax brackets, paying a higher tax rate just for trying to hold your own. The result? Your standard of living is going down.

Over the past decades we've talked of curtailing government spending so that we can then lower the tax burden. Sometimes we've even taken a run at doing that. But there were always those who told us that taxes couldn't be cut until spending was reduced. Well, you know, we can lecture our children about extravagance until we run out of voice and breath. Or we can cure their extravagance by simply reducing their allowance.

In the past we've tried to fight inflation one year and then, with unemployment increased, turn the next year to fighting unemployment with more deficit spending as a pump primer. So, again, up goes inflation. It hasn't worked. We don't have to choose between inflation and unemployment -- they go hand in hand. It's time to try something different, and that's what we're going to do.

I've already placed a freeze on hiring replacements for those who retire or leave government service. I've ordered a cut in government travel, the number of consultants to the government, and the buying of office equipment and other items. I've put a freeze on pending regulations and set up a task force under Vice President Bush to review regulations with an eye toward getting rid of as many as possible. I have decontrolled oil, which should result in more domestic production and less dependence on foreign oil. And I'm eliminating that ineffective Council on Wage and Price Stability.

But it will take more, much more. And we must realize there is no quick fix. At the same time, however, we cannot delay in implementing an economic program aimed at both reducing tax rates to stimulate productivity and reducing the growth in government spending to reduce unemployment and inflation.

Now, at the same time we're doing this, we must go forward with a tax relief package. I shall ask for a 10-percent reduction across the board in personal income tax rates for each of the next 3 years. Proposals will also be submitted for accelerated depreciation allowances for business to provide necessary capital so as to create jobs.

Now, here again, in saying this, I know that language, as I said earlier, can get in the way of a clear understanding of what our program is intended to do. Budget cuts can sound as if we're going to reduce total government spending to a lower level than was spent the year before. Well, this is not the case. The budgets will increase as our population increases, and each year we'll see spending increases to match that growth. Government revenues will increase as the economy grows, but the burden will be lighter for each individual, because the economic base will have been expanded by reason of the reduced rates.

Here you see two trend lines. The bottom line shows the increase in tax revenues. The red line on top is the increase in government spending. Both lines turn upward, reflecting the giant tax increase already built into the system for this year 1981, and the increases in spending built into the '81 and '82 budgets and on into the future. As you can see, the spending line rises at a steeper slant than the revenue line. And that gap between those lines illustrates the increasing deficits we've been running, including this year's $80 billion deficit.

Now, in the second chart, the lines represent the positive effects when Congress accepts our economic program. Both lines continue to rise, allowing for necessary growth, but the gap narrows as spending cuts continue over the next few years until finally the two lines come together, meaning a balanced budget.

I am confident that my administration can achieve that. At that point tax revenues, in spite of rate reductions, will be increasing faster than spending, which means we can look forward to further reductions in the tax rates.

Our basic system is sound. We can, with compassion, continue to meet our responsibility to those who, through no fault of their own, need our help. We can meet fully the other legitimate responsibilities of government. We cannot continue any longer our wasteful ways at the expense of the workers of this land or of our children.

Since 1960 our government has spent $5.1 trillion. Our debt has grown by 648 billion. Prices have exploded by 178 percent. How much better off are we for all that? Well, we all know we're very much worse off. When we measure how harshly these years of inflation, lower productivity, and uncontrolled government growth have affected our lives, we know we must act and act now. We must not be timid. We will restore the freedom of all men and women to excel and to create. We will unleash the energy and genius of the American people, traits which have never failed us.

To the Congress of the United States, I extend my hand in cooperation, and I believe we can go forward in a bipartisan manner. I've found a real willingness to cooperate on the part of Democrats and members of my own party.

I urge those great institutions in America, business and labor, to be guided by the national interest, and I'm confident they will. The only special interest that we will serve is the interest of all the people.

Our aim is to increase our national wealth so all will have more, not just redistribute what we already have which is just a sharing of scarcity. We can begin to reward hard work and risk-taking, by forcing this Government to live within its means.

And to you, my fellow citizens, let us join in a new determination to rebuild the foundation of our society, to work together, to act responsibly. Let us do so with the most profound respect for that which must be preserved as well as with sensitive understanding and compassion for those who must be protected.

We can leave our children with an unrepayable massive debt and a shattered economy, or we can leave them liberty in a land where every individual has the opportunity to be whatever God intended us to be. All it takes is a little common sense and recognition of our own ability.

Only a month ago I was your guest in this historic building, and I pledged to you my cooperation in doing what is right for this Nation that we all love so much. I'm here tonight to reaffirm that pledge and to ask that we share in restoring the promise that is offered to every citizen by this, the last, best hope of man on Earth.

All of us are aware of the punishing inflation which has for the first time in 60 years held to double-digit figures for 2 years in a row. Interest rates have reached absurd levels of more that 20 percent and over 15 percent for those who would borrow to buy a home. All across this land one can see newly built homes standing vacant, unsold because of mortgage interest rates.

Almost 8 million Americans are out of work. These are people who want to be productive. But as the months go by, despair dominates their lives. The threats of layoff and unemployment hang over other millions, and all who work are frustrated by their inability to keep up with inflation.

One worker in a Midwest city put it to me this way: He said, ``I'm bringing home more dollars than I ever believed I could possibly earn, but I seem to be getting worse off.'' And he is. Not only have hourly earnings of the American worker, after adjusting for inflation, declined 5 percent over the past 5 years, but in these 5 years, Federal personal taxes for the average family have increased 67 percent. We can no longer procrastinate and hope that things will get better. They will not.

Can we, who man the ship of state, deny it is somewhat out of control? Our national debt is approaching $1 trillion. A few weeks ago I called such a figure, a trillion dollars, incomprehensible, and I've been trying ever since to think of a way to illustrate how big a trillion really is. And the best I could come up with is that if you had a stack of thousand-dollar bills in your hand only 4 inches high, you'd be a millionaire. A trillion dollars would be a stack of thousand-dollar bills 67 miles high. The interest on the public debt this year we know will be over $90 billion, and unless we change the proposed spending for the fiscal year beginning October 1st, we'll add another almost $80 billion to the debt.

Adding to our troubles is a mass of regulations imposed on the shopkeeper, the farmer, the craftsman, professionals, and major industry that is estimated to add $100 billion to the price of the things we buy, and it reduces our ability to produce. The rate of increase in American productivity, once one of the highest in the world, is among the lowest of all major industrial nations. Indeed, it has actually declined in the last 3 years.

Now, I've painted a pretty grim picture, but I think I've painted it accurately. It is within our power to change this picture, and we can act with hope. There's nothing wrong with our internal strengths. There has been no breakdown of the human, technological, and natural resources upon which the economy is built.

Based on this confidence in a system which has never failed us, but which we have failed through a lack of confidence and sometimes through a belief that we could fine-tune the economy and get it tuned to our liking, I am proposing a comprehensive four-point program. Now, let me outline in detail some of the principal parts of this program. You'll each be provided with a completely detailed copy of the entire program.

This plan is aimed at reducing the growth in government spending and taxing, reforming and eliminating regulations which are unnecessary and unproductive or counterproductive, and encouraging a consistent monetary policy aimed at maintaining the value of the currency. If enacted in full, this program can help America create 13 million new jobs, nearly 3 million more than we would have without these measures. It will also help us to gain control of inflation.

It's important to note that we're only reducing the rate of increase in taxing and spending. We're not attempting to cut either spending or taxing levels below that which we presently have. This plan will get our economy moving again, [create] productivity growth, and thus create the jobs that our people must have.

Now, I know that exaggerated and inaccurate stories about these cuts have disturbed many people, particularly those dependent on grant and benefit programs for their basic needs. Some of you have heard from constituents, I know, afraid that social security checks, for example, were going to be taken away from them. Well, I regret the fear that these unfounded stories have caused, and I welcome this opportunity to set things straight.

We will continue to fulfill the obligations that spring from our national conscience. Those who, through no fault of their own, must depend on the rest of us -- the poverty stricken, the disabled, the elderly, all those with true need -- can rest assured that the social safety net of programs they depend on are exempt from any cuts.

The full retirement benefits of the more than 31 million social security recipients will be continued, along with an annual cost-of-living increase. Medicare will not be cut, nor will supplemental income for the blind, the aged, and the disabled. And funding will continue for veterans pensions.

School breakfasts and lunches for the children of low-income families will continue, as will nutrition and other special services for the aging. There will be no cut in Project Head Start or summer youth jobs.

All in all, nearly $216 billion worth of programs providing help for tens of millions of Americans will be fully funded. But government will not continue to subsidize individuals or particular business interests where real need cannot be demonstrated. And while we will reduce some subsidies to regional and local governments, we will at the same time convert a number of categorical grant programs into block grants to reduce wasteful administrative overhead and to give local governments and States more flexibility and control. We call for an end in duplication to Federal programs and reform of those which are not cost-effective.

Now, already some have protested that there must be no reduction in aid to schools. Well, let me point out that Federal aid to education amounts to only 8 percent of the total educational funding, and for this 8 percent, the Federal Government has insisted on tremendously disproportionate share of control over our schools. Whatever reductions we've proposed in that 8 percent will amount to very little in the total cost of education. They will, however, restore more authority to States and local school districts.

Historically, the American people have supported by voluntary contributions more artistic and cultural activities than all the other countries in the world put together. I wholeheartedly support this approach and believe that Americans will continue their generosity. Therefore, I'm proposing a savings of $85 million in the Federal subsidies now going to the arts and humanities.

There are a number of subsidies to business and industry that I believe are unnecessary, not because the activities being subsidized aren't of value, but because the marketplace contains incentives enough to warrant continuing these activities without a government subsidy. One such subsidy is the Department of Energy's synthetic fuels program. We will continue support of research leading to development of new technologies and more independence from foreign oil, but we can save at least $3.2 billion by leaving to private industry the building of plants to make liquid or gas fuels from coal.

Bank loan authority, be reduced by one-third in 1982. We're doing this because the primary beneficiaries of taxpayer funds in this case are the exporting companies themselves -- most of them profitable corporations.

This brings me to a number of other lending programs in which government makes low-interest loans, some of them at an interest rate as low as 2 percent. What has not been very well understood is that the Treasury Department has no money of its own to lend; it has to go into the private capital market and borrow the money. So, in this time of excessive interest rates, the government finds itself borrowing at an interest rate several times as high as the interest it gets back from those it lends the money to. And this difference, of course, is paid by your constituents -- the taxpayers. They get hit again if they try to borrow, because government borrowing contributes to raising all interest rates.

By terminating the Economic Development Administration, we can save hundreds of millions of dollars in 1982 and billions more over the next few years. There's a lack of consistent and convincing evidence that EDA and its Regional Commissions have been effective in creating new jobs. They have been effective in creating an array of planners, grantsmen, and professional middlemen. We believe we can do better just by the expansion of the economy and the job creation which will come from our economic program.

The Food Stamp program will be restored to its original purpose, to assist those without resources to purchase sufficient nutritional food. We will, however, save $1.8 billion in fiscal year 1982 by removing from eligibility those who are not in real need or who are abusing the program.

We will tighten welfare and give more attention to outside sources of income when determining the amount of welfare that an individual is allowed. This, plus strong and effective work requirements, will save $520 million in the next year.

I stated a moment ago our intention to keep the school breakfast and lunch programs for those in true need. But by cutting back on meals for children of families who can afford to pay, the savings will be $1.6 billion in the fiscal year 1982.

Now, let me just touch on a few other areas which are typical of the kind of reductions we've included in this economic package. The Trade Adjustment Assistance program provides benefits for workers who are unemployed when foreign imports reduce the market for various American products, causing shutdown of plants and layoff of workers. The purpose is to help these workers find jobs in growing sectors of our economy. There's nothing wrong with that, but because these benefits are paid out on top of normal unemployment benefits, we wind up paying greater benefits to those who lose their jobs because of foreign competition than we do to their friends and neighbors who are laid off due to domestic competition. Anyone must agree that this is unfair.

Earlier I made mention of changing categorical grants to States and local governments into block grants. Now, we know of course that the categorical grant programs burden local and State governments with a mass of Federal regulations and Federal paperwork. Ineffective targeting, wasteful administrative overhead -- all can be eliminated by shifting the resources and decisionmaking authority to local and State government. This will also consolidate programs which are scattered throughout the Federal bureaucracy, bringing government closer to the people and saving $23.9 billion over the next 5 years.

Our program for economic renewal deals with a number of programs which at present are not cost-effective. An example is Medicaid. Right now Washington provides the States with unlimited matching payments for their expenditures; at the same time, we here in Washington pretty much dictate how the States are going to manage those programs. We want to put a cap on how much the Federal Government will contribute, but at the same time allow the States much more flexibility in managing and structuring the programs. I know from our experience in California that such flexibility could have led to far more cost-effective reforms. Now, this will bring a savings of $1 billion next year.

The space program has been and is important to America, and we plan to continue it. We believe, however, that a reordering of priorities to focus on the most important and cost-effective NASA programs can result in a savings of a quarter of a million dollars.

Now, coming down from space to the mailbox, the Postal Service has been consistently unable to live within its operating budget. It is still dependent on large Federal subsidies. We propose reducing those subsidies by $632 million in 1982 to press the Postal Service into becoming more effective, and in subsequent years the savings will continue to add up.

The Economic Regulatory Administration in the Department of Energy has programs to force companies to convert to specific fuels. It has the authority to administer a gas rationing plan, and prior to decontrol it ran the oil price control program. With these and other regulations gone we can save several hundreds of millions of dollars over the next few years.

Defense. It's the only department in our entire program that will actually be increased over the present budgeted figure. But even here there was no exemption. The Department of Defense came up with a number of cuts which reduce the budget increase needed to restore our military balance. These measures will save $2.9 billion in 1982 outlays, and by 1986 a total of $28.2 billion will have been saved -- or perhaps I should say, will have been made available for the necessary things that we must do. The aim will be to provide the most effective defense for the lowest possible cost.

I believe that my duty as President requires that I recommend increases in defense spending over the coming years. I know that you're all aware -- but I think it bears saying again -- that since 1970 the Soviet Union has invested $300 billion more in its military forces than we have. As a result of its massive military buildup, the Soviets have made a significant numerical advantage in strategic nuclear delivery systems, tactical aircraft, submarines, artillery, and anti-aircraft defense.

To allow this imbalance to continue is a threat to our national security. Notwithstanding our economic straits, making the financial changes beginning now is far less costly than waiting and having to attempt a crash program several years from now.

We remain committed to the goal of arms limitation through negotiation. I hope we can persuade our adversaries to come to realistic balanced and verifiable agreements. But, as we negotiate, our security must be fully protected by a balanced and realistic defense program.

The Office of Management and Budget is now putting together an interagency task force to attack waste and fraud. We're also planning to appoint as Inspectors General highly trained professionals who will spare no effort to do this job. No administration can promise to immediately stop a trend that has grown in recent years as quickly as government expenditures themselves, but let me say this: Waste and fraud in the Federal Government is exactly what I've called it before -- an unrelenting national scandal, a scandal we're bound and determined to do something about.

Marching in lockstep with the whole program of reductions in spending is the equally important program of reduced tax rates. Both are essential if we're to have economic recovery. It's time to create new jobs, to build and rebuild industry, and to give the American people room to do what they do best. And that can only be done with a tax program which provides incentive to increase productivity for both workers and industry.

Our proposal is for a 10-percent across-the-board cut every year for 3 years in the tax rates for all individual income taxpayers, making a total cut in the tax-cut rates of 30 percent. This 3-year reduction will also apply to the tax on unearned income, leading toward an eventual elimination of the present differential between the tax on earned and unearned income.

Now, I would have hoped that we could be retroactive with this. But as it stands, the effective starting date for these 10-percent personal income tax rate reductions will call for as of July 1st of this year.

Again, let me remind you that while this 30-percent reduction will leave the taxpayers with $500 billion more in their pockets over the next 5 years, it's actually only a reduction in the tax increase already built into the system. Unlike some past ``tax reforms,'' this is not merely a shift of wealth between different sets of taxpayers. This proposal for an equal reduction in everyone's tax rates will expand our national prosperity, enlarge national incomes, and increase opportunities for all Americans.

Some will argue, I know, that reducing tax rates now will be inflationary. A solid body of economic experts does not agree. And tax cuts adopted over the past three-fourths of a century indicate these economic experts are right. They will not be inflationary. I've had advice that in 1985 our real production in goods and services will grow by 20 percent and be $300 billion higher than it is today. The average worker's wage will rise in real purchasing power 8 percent, and this is in after-tax dollars. And this, of course, is predicated on a complete program of tax cuts and spending reductions being implemented.

The other part of the tax package is aimed directly at providing business and industry with the capital needed to modernize and engage in more research and development. This will involve an increase in depreciation allowances, and this part of our tax proposal will be retroactive to January 1st.

The present depreciation system is obsolete, needlessly complex, and economically counterproductive. Very simply, it bases the depreciation of plant machinery and vehicles and tools on their original cost, with no recognition of how inflation has increased their replacement cost. We're proposing a much shorter write-off time than is presently allowed -- a 5-year-write-off for machinery, 3 years for vehicles and trucks, and a 10-year write-off for plant. In fiscal year 1982 under this plan, business would acquire nearly $10 billion for investment; by 1985, the figure would be nearly 45 billion.

These changes are essential to provide the new investment which is needed to create millions of new jobs between now and 1985 [1986], and to make America competitive once again in the world market. These won't be make-work jobs. They are productive jobs, jobs with a future.

I'm well aware that there are many other desirable and needed tax changes, such as indexing the income tax brackets to protect taxpayers against inflation; the unjust discrimination against married couples if both are working and earning; tuition tax credits; the unfairness of the inheritance tax, especially to the family-owned farm and the family-owned business; and a number of others. But our program for economic recovery is so urgently needed to begin to bring down inflation that I'm asking you to act on this plan first and with great urgency. And then, I pledge I will join with you in seeking these additional tax changes at the earliest date possible.

American society experienced a virtual explosion in government regulation during the past decade. Between 1970 and 1979, expenditures for the major regulatory agencies quadrupled. The number of pages published annually in the Federal Register nearly tripled, and the number of pages in the Code of Federal Regulations increased by nearly two-thirds. The result has been higher prices, higher unemployment, and lower productivity growth. Overregulation causes small and independent business men and women, as well as large businesses to defer or terminate plans for expansion. And since they're responsible for most of the new jobs, those new jobs just aren't created.

Now, we have no intention of dismantling the regulatory agencies, especially those necessary to protect environment and assure the public health and safety. However, we must come to grips with inefficient and burdensome regulations, eliminate those we can and reform the others.

Second, I asked each member of my Cabinet to postpone the effective dates of the hundreds of new regulations which have not yet been implemented. Third, in coordination with the Task Force, many of the agency heads have already taken prompt action to review and rescind existing burdensome regulations. And finally, just yesterday I signed an Executive order that for the first time provides for effective and coordinated management of the regulatory process.

Much has been accomplished, but it's only a beginning. We will eliminate those regulations that are unproductive and unnecessary by Executive order where possible and cooperate fully with you on those that require legislation.

The final aspect of our plan requires a national monetary policy which does not allow money growth to increase consistently faster than the growth of goods and services. In order to curb inflation we need to slow the growth in our money supply.

Now, we fully recognize the independence of the Federal Reserve System and will do nothing to interfere with or undermine that independence. We will consult regularly with the Federal Reserve Board on all aspects of our economic program and will vigorously pursue budget policies that'll make their job easier in reducing monetary growth. A successful program to achieve stable and and moderate growth patterns in the money supply will keep both inflation and interest rates down and restore vigor to our financial institutions and markets.

This, then, is our proposal -- America's new beginning: a program for economic recovery. I don't want it to be simply the plan of my administration. I'm here tonight to ask you to join me in making it our plan. Together we can embark on this road --  -- [applause].

Our social, political, and cultural, as well as our economic institutions, can no longer absorb the repeated shocks that have been dealt them over the past decades. Can we do the job? The answer is yes. But we must begin now.

We're in control here. There's nothing wrong with America that together we can't fix. I'm sure there'll be some who raise the old familiar cry, ``Don't touch my program; cut somewhere else.'' I hope I've made it plain that our approach has been evenhanded, that only the programs for the truly deserving needy remain untouched. The question is, are we simply going to go down the same path we've gone down before, carving out one special program here, another special program there? I don't think that's what the American people expect of us. More important, I don't think that's what they want. They're ready to return to the source of our strength.

The substance and prosperity of our nation is built by wages brought home from the factories and the mills, the farms, and the shops. They are the services provided in 10,000 corners of America; the interest on the thrift of our people and the returns for their risk-taking. The production of America is the possession of those who build, serve, create, and produce.

The taxing power of government must be used to provide revenues for legitimate government purposes. It must not be used to regulate the the economy or bring about social change. We've tried that, and surely we must be able to see it doesn't work.

Spending by government must be limited to those functions which are the proper province of government. We can no longer afford things simply because we think of them. Next year we can reduce the budget by $41.4 billion, without harm to government's legitimate purposes or to our responsibility to all who need our benevolence. This, plus the reduction in tax rates, will help bring an end to inflation.

I would direct a question to those who have indicated already an unwillingness to accept such a plan: Have they an alternative which offers a greater chance of balancing the budget, reducing and eliminating inflation, stimulating the creation of jobs, and reducing the tax burden? And, if they haven't, are they suggesting we can continue on the present course without coming to a day of reckoning? If we don't do this, inflation and the growing tax burden will put an end to everything we believe in and our dreams for the future.

We don't have an option of living with inflation and its attendant tragedy, millions of productive people willing and able to work but unable to find a buyer for their work in the job market. We have an alternative, and that is the program for economic recovery.

I have come to speak to you tonight about our economic recovery program and why I believe it's essential that the Congress approve this package, which I believe will lift the crushing burden of inflation off of our citizens and restore the vitality to our economy and our industrial machine.

First, however, and due to events of the past few weeks, will you permit me to digress for a moment from the all-important subject of why we must bring government spending under control and reduce tax rates. I'd like to say a few words directly to all of you and to those who are watching and listening tonight, because this is the only way I know to express to all of you on behalf of Nancy and myself our appreciation for you messages and flowers and, most of all, your prayers, not only for me but for those others who fell beside me.

The warmth of your words, the expression of friendship and, yes, love, meant more to us than you can ever know. You have given us a memory that we'll treasure forever. And you've provided an answer to those few voices that were raised saying that what happened was evidence that ours is a sick society.

Well, sick societies don't produce men like the two who recently returned from outer space. Sick societies don't produce young men like Secret Service agent Tim McCarthy, who placed his body between mine and the man with the gun simply because he felt that's what his duty called for him to do. Sick societies don't produce dedicated police officers like Tom Delahanty or able and devoted public servants like Jim Brady. Sick societies don't make people like us so proud to be Americans and so very proud of our fellow citizens.

Mr. Speaker and Senator Baker, I want to thank you for your cooperation in helping to arrange this joint session of the Congress. I won't be speaking to you very long tonight, but I asked for this meeting because the urgency of our joint mission has not changed.

It's been half a year since the election that charged all of us in this Government with the task of restoring our economy. Where have we come in this 6 months? Inflation, as measured by the Consumer Price Index, has continued at a double-digit rate. Mortgage interest rates have averaged almost 15 percent for these 6 months, preventing families across America from buying homes. There are still almost 8 million unemployed. The average worker's hourly earnings after adjusting for inflation are lower today than they were 6 months ago, and there have been over 6,000 business failures.

Six months is long enough. The American people now want us to act and not in half-measures. They demand and they've earned a full and comprehensive effort to clean up our economic mess. Because of the extent of our economy's sickness, we know that the cure will not come quickly and that even with our package, progress will come in inches and feet, not in miles. But to fail to act will delay even longer and more painfully the cure which must come. And that cure begins with the Federal budget. And the budgetary actions taken by the Congress over the next few days will determine how we respond to the message of last November 4th. That message was very simple. Our government is too big, and it spends too much.

For the last few months, you and I have enjoyed a relationship based on extraordinary cooperation. Because of this cooperation we've come a long distance in less than 3 months. I want to thank the leadership of the Congress for helping in setting a fair timetable for consideration of our recommendations. And committee chairmen on both sides of the aisle have called prompt and thorough hearing.

We have also communicated in a spirit of candor, openness, and mutual respect. Tonight, as our decision day nears and as the House of Representatives weighs its alternatives, I wish to address you in that same spirit.

The Senate Budget Committee, under the leadership of Pete Domenici, has just today voted out a budget resolution supported by Democrats and Republicans alike that is in all major respects consistent with the program that we have proposed. Now we look forward to favorable action on the Senate floor, but an equally crucial test involves the House of Representatives.

The House will soon be choosing between two different versions or measures to deal with the economy. One is the measure offered by the House Budget Committee. The other is a bipartisan measure, a substitute introduced by Congressmen Phil Gramm of Texas and Del Latta of Ohio.

On behalf of the administration, let me say that we embrace and fully support that bipartisan substitute. It will achieve all the essential aims of controlling government spending, reducing the tax burden, building a national defense second to none, and stimulating economic growth and creating millions of new jobs.

At the same time, however, I must state our opposition to the measure offered by the House Budget Committee. It may appear that we have two alternatives. In reality, however, there are no more alternatives left. The committee measure quite simply falls far too short of the essential actions that we must take.

For example, in the next 3 years, the committee measure projects spending $141 billion more than does the bipartisan substitute. It regrettably cuts over $14 billion in essential defense spending, funding required to restore America's national security. It adheres to the failed policy of trying to balance the budget on the taxpayer's back. It would increase tax payments by over a third, adding up to a staggering quarter of a trillion dollars. Federal taxes would increase 12 percent each year. Taxpayers would be paying a larger share of their income to government in 1984 than they do at present.

In short, that measure reflects an echo of the past rather than a benchmark for the future. High taxes and excess spending growth created our present economic mess; more of the same will not cure the hardship, anxiety, and discouragement it has imposed on the American people.

Let us cut through the fog for a moment. The answer to a government that's too big is to stop feeding its growth. Government spending has been growing faster than the economy itself. The massive national debt which we accumulated is the result of the government's high spending diet. Well, it's time to change the diet and to change it in the right way.

I know the tax portion of our package is of concern to some of you. Let me make a few points that I feel have been overlooked. First of all, it should be looked at as an integral part of the entire package, not something separate and apart from the budget reductions, the regulatory relief, and the monetary restraints. Probably the most common misconception is that we are proposing to reduce Government revenues to less than what the Government has been receiving. This is not true. Actually, the discussion has to do with how much of a tax increase should be imposed on the taxpayer in 1982.

Now, I know that over the recess in some informal polling some of your constituents have been asked which they'd rather have, a balanced budget or a tax cut, and with the common sense that characterizes the people of this country, the answer, of course, has been a balanced budget. But may I suggest, with no inference that there was wrong intent on the part of those who asked the question, the question was inappropriate to the situation.

